Before ending sealing, the beam end concrete surface shall be roughened and cleaned. Then rebar binding at continuous steel structural beam ends and finger plate seat embedding and installation (refer to embedded parts installation for installation construction) shall be carried out.
Note: for the dimension and location of parapet, refer to the architectural change drawing.
Quaternary Pleistocene alluvium deposit (Qt3): It is grey-brown or yellowish-brown in color and mainly formed by clayey sand (SC) and clayey gravel (GC). Being medium dense ~ dense, it usually has a thickness above 35m and mainly spreads over GK183+600 ~ GK202+000 Section.
Drop down the bearing cap, and tighten the connecting bolt of junction surface.
Piers T5# and T6# are underwater piers which are greatly affected by geological and hydrological conditions. Therefore, there are many uncertain factors.
It is proposed to use 2 cranes with capacity of 50t to erect I beam. Oya Bridge will be erected followed by Sibu Interchange and Julau Interchange. Oya Bridge will finish erection on June 17, 2018. Sibu Interchange will erect I beam from July 28 to December 14, 2018.
Plan of 35kV Distribution Room and Substation Electricity Room
⑤ if without safety construction measures, not participating in safety disclosure or for unsound safety facilities or for any illegal command, be entitled to curb the construction and may bypass the immediate leadership and report to high levels.
2. The seismic peak ground acceleration in the section is 0.30g. Earthquake prevention measures shall be provided according to relevant specifications.
DIN 3015 Pipe Clamps Standard Series
Before laying, insulation telemetering shall be carried out for the cable. After that, it is required to carefully observe that whether the cable sheath is damaged, and review the cable dimension by selecting cable sections at random. The pipe laying worker shall identify the specification, model and length of the cable according to the material requirement sheet to avoid mixing and misuse of cables.
By reviewing the construction organization design, it is necessary to make arrangements for the overall construction of the project, plan the quantity of works to be completed in each stage, adopt advanced construction techniques and schemes, and make an overall plan for manpower, equipment and materials. The Project Department must be fully aware of the construction organization of each construction team.
7 FX-5 Constant Tension Wire Barrow.JPG
Braking mode compressed air braking
Translation service, education information consultancy, information technology consultancy (excluding finance, security and futures consultancy).
According to National Ecological Function Zoning, the project is mainly located in the residential security area of Beibu Gulf urban agglomeration, and the route does not cross the national important ecological function area.
Under symmetrical load, the arch and wall are of equal cross section, and the side wall is vertical wall.
4. Dead load 41.9kg/piece (4m long)
Full text: October 2018 - November -2019
Whereas, the node degree of Dongfanghong Plaza station, which also plays the role of a transit station, business district and workplace, is only 3. This indicates that although the station carries a large passenger flow, the number of travel directions of the passengers at the station is small, and it also reflects that there are a lot of repeated routes through the station, which needs to be further optimized.
The interlocking execution part consists of ECC and various electronic modules (POM, SOM, UNOM, etc.).
WEST KOWLOON TERMINUS ELECTRICAL SERVICES CABLE CONTAINMENT SCHEMATIC FOR SYSTEMWIDE E&M (MCS) (SHEET 1)
Arrangement of lines of Gbazango Station is shown as the following figure: a single crossover is set at the approach end for the turnaround of bad order car.
The Specification is to strengthen the management on measuring test, physical and chemical test, NDT report and product certificate/quality certificate and ensure the seriousness, completeness, correctness and traceability of inspection and test report and certificate of the Quality Department.
Electrical function block diagram, control electrical circuit diagram, wiring diagram, piping diagram (As-Built Drawings) and detailed function description of pantograph control;
Enter path: "Project Listing" "Overview"
13.1 Party B shall assist Party A in the installation, commissioning, testing and training conducted at the places of Party A and the final user.
The outline of CRH2 Series vehicle models auxiliary converter Type 1 is illustrated as the following Figure B.1. The outlines of Type 2 and Type 3 are illustrated as the following Figure B.2. The outline dimension inspection of the outline equipment shall be subject to the final drawings attached to the product samples.
Option D for Comparison (K0+000~K8+524.680)
(2) Release 50% of the load in the length of a round of excavation and construct the lining in the length of the next round;
To control as per deflection indicators; the thickness of design layer: 6 (cm)
Floor area on this story: 237.98m2
Due to poor railway track conditions, oily or watery rail top, etc.
Among them: 7 sets of original copies, 3 sets of laser CD. The soft copies of the documents need to be editable and copyable.
10.3.15 Allowable deviations and inspection method of dimensions of outer formwork and bottom formwork shall comply with those specified in Article 10.1.16.
According to the preliminary design report, the T-intersection of "TEMA Beach Road" is to be reconstructed.
Distribution, price and supply conditions of local building materials along the line (such as: gravels, rubbles, cobbles, sand, lime, ballast, etc.);
Overhaul of ZTY470 in CNPC North China Oilfield Company Shanxi Coal-bed Gas Company
The steel bar matching shall follow the lofting sheet and the construction drawings, and the steels bars of the same specifications shall be counted respectively, and the steel bars of different specification shall be matched by their length.
Response: We meet the requirement. We promise to attach a list of specialized and general instrument, meters and tools for equipment installation, commissioning and maintenance in the technical proposal and quotation.
If one plant is simultaneously used for mixing of over two kinds of concrete, it is a must to conduct material preparation according to the signs on the windscreen to avoid wrong mixing.
Floor area of pump shed: 39.5mX5m=197.5m2
b)Temperature: -30°C~+70°C (for normal operation);
(11) Be responsible for on-site information manager and document management; compile on-site management diary; be responsible for management, distribution, supervision and reply of documents from the supervisor, the employer and other third parties.
Sichuan Sanxing New Material Technology Co.,LTD.
1. In this drawing, the rebar diameter is in mm, while other dimensions are in cm.
(3) The jointing between pipes and fittings must be kept clean, dry and free from oil stains.
Unit: It refers to set, piece, unit and other measuring units, and it must be consistent with the equipment units in the contract inventory.
The annual rainfall ranges from 120cm to 300cm and the annual temperature ranges from 5°C to 37°C.
Excavation, backfilling and compaction of foundation trench for embedded kerb, work related to concrete cushion or cement mortar cushion shall be the auxiliary work of this specific item and shall not be measured separately.
Reliability and Safety Analysis on Multi-state System of EMUs with Degraded Components
6.33 The closing works shall be strictly controlled, and no works shall be left uncompleted for no reason.
The main line of the Project is a two-way four-lane expressway, with a design speed of 130 km/h and a subgrade width of 29 m.
(1) Fire protection measures during construction in case of relatively dry weather.
He needed to consult with the consultant engineer to plan the measures to be taken.
If SS4B locomotive is used, the investment will be less, but it cannot meet the maximum designed speed of freight car of 120km/h specified under the contract, so Harmony series (HXD) freight electric locomotive is temporarily recommended.
The quality record of installation works shall be arranged in line with the acceptance standard stipulated in the Contract.
The power supply scope of the battery area of this Project includes: power supply for 100,000t/a VCM (Vinyl Chloride Monomer) Plant, 100,000t/a PVC (Polyvinyl Chloride) Plant and auxiliary plants and utilities associated with the two production plants.
6.1.7 Quality engineers upload the test report in the Sample Approval Report and submit to the Section Chief for approval;
⑤ The principle of "one machine, one knife switch, one leakage protector and one distribution box" will be stuck to.
In 2012, the cargo throughput of Port of Maputo was 15 million tons, an increase of 3 million tons year-on-year. It is expected that the annual throughput of the port will increase to 40 million tons after completion of its expansion.
11) Each traction substation shall be equipped with two sets of 12-pulse rectifiers, which form a 24-pulse rectifier in parallel operation to reduce the pollution of harmonics to the power system.
Before construction, the concrete shall be concentratedly mixed at mixing plant according to the design mix ratio.
There is over-bulking at the two sides of the joint, the reason of which is that clamp is not strictly vertical with the steel sleeve and steel bar draw thread. Or, the oversize U-shape and bulking at the steel bar end, for which remedies can be taken to straighten it.
After finishing the existing 1:2000 topographic map at the preliminary measuring stages, the plane system shall be coordinated with WGS84 coordinate system, central meridian 69°, abnormal projection surface geodetic height and elevation 0. The elevation system shall be arbitrary datum.
Picture 12-72# spandrel arch of the first span is occupied for living Picture 12-8Transverse crack on 3# spandrel arch slab of the first span
Due to the closed management of the construction area, the original fire dike, walls and office occupancies around the tank field are applied to realize the continuous isolation and protection of the construction area. The relative isolation of the construction area achieves the physical isolation to the production area.
The tenderer of wireless communication system equipment provide the requirements on equipment installation size and specific installation requirements.
Through the research on the design, development and type selection of locomotive key components based on status-based maintenance, the change from fault-based maintenance to status-based maintenance can be finally achieved, which will greatly reduce the maintenance downtime and maintenance cost, and bring more operation time and lower operation cost to the Owner.
A total of 19 items have been verified and 19 items are conforming. A total of 10 items have been subjected to spot check and 10 items are conforming. 0 item is conforming after rework and treatment
The internal diameter of the tremie pipe should be consistent and the inwall should be smooth. Before being used each time, tremie pipes with different length should be selected for trial matching combination based on the hold depth and height of storage hopper.
Structure of the remote diagnostic data transmission system which works as the bridge for data trnasmission between mainline trains and the ground control center is shown in the figure below.
(4) The surface of concrete in the tunnel is covered with insulation coiled material. If necessary, a heat source is set at the pouring part in the tunnel. to create positive temperature curing conditions for concrete.
(5) Develop a plane and vertical section drawing of the line based on the survey data during construction design. Correct and moderately improve the plane and vertical sections based on the realities;
Decomposition of the foundation of train in stock, air brake device and hand brake coupler buffer device
After the square pile formwork removal, the concrete shall be sprinkled with water for wet curing immediately. After stacking of the intercalated layer, water sprinkling for curing shall be carried out on the sides with wet sacks. The square piles can only be lifted and transported to the construction site for pile sinking when the strength of the prefabricated square piles reach 100% of the designed strength. The square piles shall be transported with a 10m flated trailer.
LOT3 and LOT1A lines of Abuja Urban Railway in Nigeria.
\pxt6.6; A shallow "V" shaped gully with perennial slow and small water flow. The water surface width is 2~4m and the depth is 0.3m.
Factory test contents, test program, and test process of equipment.
DCS mainly communicates with the following communication frequencies: 2422MHz, 2462MHz. In this communication band, DCS can ensure normal operation in complex electromagnetic environment;
Design End Points of Options 1, 2 and 3 of Lekki Port Link Road Project
After the ladder cage is erected in place, it can be put into use only after being accepted by the engineering department, quality inspection department and safety supervision department. Sign board showing the "acceptance passed" shall be hung on the cage.
2. Party A hereby unconditionally and irrevocably entrusts Party B to pay the fund of this demand note to the following accounts that Party A opened in Party B's bank:
Allowable deviation for installation of platforms, steel ladders, and protection handrails shall comply with regulation of Table E.0.4 in Appendix E of this specification.
Development chances and opportunities can arise only after such "thresholds" are overpassed.
The FAS monitors the power supply, operation and fault status of each fire-fighting stabilized pressure pump through the monitoring module.
As a national high-tech enterprise, CRRC Sifang has set up the National Engineering Research Center for High-speed EMU Final Assembly, the National Engineering Laboratory for System Integration of High-speed Train, the National Technology Center and the Post-doctoral work stations, and has established overseas R&D centers in Germany, Britain and Thailand.
All fuel-fired construction machinery and equipment entering the site must be in good condition, with complete and effective tail gas purification devices, and shall be checked and qualified by the Employer's Engineer before use.
1. The HV power distribution substations are generally subject to two-in and eight-out lines, and the wiring of single-bus circuit breaker sections is adopted.
Fill: grayish white, mainly silty-fine sand, with main component of coral sand; loose, uneven particles; poor sorting and poor grading, locally mixed with 0.5-4cm uneven gravel sand with the content of about 5~10%.
On May 12, the first meeting on fuel consumption limits and indicator standards for passenger vehicles and light commercial vehicles in 2020 was held by the working team in the form of network meeting.
Other current assets/Prepaid expenses/Rent/Cloud storage lease
Scaffold boards should be laid smooth and fastened firm without using single board, floating plate or probe plate;
The formwork shall be standardized and modularized as much as possible to improve the turnover rate of formwork.
3. As the problem of project financing guarantee has been solved, the follow-up construction funds can be guaranteed, and by the end of the first quarter of 2020, all shareholders can maintain the same proportion of capital contribution.
Note: the daily inspection of information system on-site sensors shall be conducted by relevant personnel of on-site communication work area, i.e. it is shared by information and communication maintenance personnel.
Construction design drawings, supervision plans, construction organization design (or scheme), etc.
Designed transport capacity of the Urban Railway shall meet the demand of the estimated passenger flow volumn.
Name of sub-item in the bill of quantities (unit): installation of video monitoring system (station)
c) When using carbon arc gouging to remove defects, the grinding machine shall be used to trim dadoing shape and size and remove the carburized layer.
Provide reference data for making construction plan in advance.
6.4 Safety and health technical measures for concrete pouring
Clearance includes rolling stock clearance, equipment clearance, and structure clearance.
The elevation of the platform top is 9.747m and the cast-in-place slab is 200mm thick. The smokestop is 9.55m high and the wall is 300mm thick.
The active carbon has possibility of explosion, so nitrogen gas from is brought in the bottom of the storehouse for active carbon nitrogen gas cylinder, which also can keep active carbon with good activation property.
Participate in various acceptances and final completion acceptance of the project. Responsible for the planning, organization and reception of excellence-creating awards.
N1 and N2 are embedded reinforcement. N1 is arranged along the direction of bridge width at a spacing of 200 mm. N2 is a transversed crossing reinforcement (throughout the length ) and is precasted and embeddedby the bridge construction contractor.
(including RMB 53,738,456 yuan from China side and RMB 11,340,000 yuan from foreign side)
11. Refer to "Architectural Construction Drawing--H01~H02" for positioning size and practices of motorcycle ramp for details.
A river and fish pond, with 1~1.5m deep water and 1.5m thick soft soil.
The design standard of train control system is IEC61375-2007.
The responsible department shall be responsible for the annual summary review (such as annual work summary and management review), and relevant departments shall cooperate with the responsible department in collection, analysis and review of relevant information;
The particle size distribution of silica fume and cement measured by Mastesize Laser Particle Analyzer is shown in Fig. 1, and the particle size distribution width of silica fume and cement analyzed through Span method is shown in Table 2.
(2) Scope of the site (coordinates or location dimensions of all corner points of the land and buildings);
Electric cable laying 2~(4+1) cores, within 70mm2
This section has two oil and gas pipeline channels. The first channel contains 8 pipelines (2 water pipes and 6 oil and gas pipes). It is located in the GK86–GK88 section and 45 m away from the line at the shortest distance.
The Accounting Department will follow up clearing of provisional estimate with inventory age of more than three months every month.
The sample block of tensile property samples of the material shall be sampled after heat treatment and before shot peening of the torsion bar or the equal-diameter test bar along with the furnace (the length is more than 4 times of the middle diameter of the torsion bar and not less than 200 mm).
Engineering quality inspectors include 6 civil engineers and 4 hydropower engineers. The construction team is equipped with full-time and part-time quality inspectors and incorporated into the quality management agency.
♦ Core structure of 3# catalytic cracking unit revamping project for increasing residue blending proportion of Sinopec Shanghai Gaoqiao Petrochemical Co., Ltd.-pre-lifting mixer.
Brief conditions of the accident shall be reported to Dispatching or Safety Department of the Company which shall report to relevant leaders and chief dispatcher of the Company according to accident conditions.
1. Design of shaft excavation, masonry and support (including shaft neck, and shaft inset), and design of shaft equipment (including rigid cage guide system, ladder, pipe, and cable fitting installation).
Provisions for motors under 500kW shall be specified at discretion
-Control of major environmental factors and major hazard sources in this evaluation;
The frame grid shall be covered with 150mm of earth and planted with local grass
(5) Students will be able to conduct routine inspection and maintenance and failure treatment of the optical cable line;
In order to handle the communications between the workers and the maintenance personnel between different sections, section telephones are provided for railway sections, and the personnel could dial section telephones and call watch keepers or train dispatchers of upward and downward stations.
A.Ordinary cement with a grade strength ≤32.5Mpa shall be used
Through a comprehensive analysis, major weaknesses exist in the line include:
Earned manpower hour = completed project percentage x budgeted manpower hour
Clean the vitriol tank and pipeline; discharge the impurities and check the slag stored in Y-shaped filter.
(4) Adhering to the principle of from easy to difficult and staged implementation
Configure at least 2 LTO-5, with optical tape drive of not less than 4Gb/s, a read/write speed for a single tape drive is not less than 120MB/S (uncompressed) .
The surface of the rail has periodic corrugation and the average corrugation depth exceeds 0.04mm (on-board detection) or the maximum corrugation depth reaches 0.08mm (manual inspection), and the corrugation length is not more than 300mm.
Installation and secondary wiring of grounding wire: the through grounding wires in the control and protection panel are connected in pairs and connected with the main grounding grid at both ends.
If there is any sign showing that an fixed asset item is possibly impaired, the Company will estimate the recoverable amount on the basis of the single fixed asset.
2. B, D: vertical distance from the steel column to the edge of the embedded steel plate; The design values are all 325mm.
(2) Bid evaluation committee can adjust the minor deviations in the principle of going against this Bidder during the detailed review and this Bidder shall not raise any objection accordingly.
Subject: Notice of the International Cooperation Business Department on Forwarding the Notice on Comprehensively Conducting Major Inspection on Work Safety Issued by PetroChina Southwest Oil and Gas Field Company
During grouting, there should be no vacancy in the grouting pump. When the grouting pump is suspended, the grout delivery nozzle should not be disconnected from the grouting orifice to prevent air from entering the hole to affect the grouting quality.
In the process of observation, the following things shall be achieved: major observers shall be fixed; instrument and accessory equipment shall be fixed; position of the installed mirror shall be fixed; and the observing method and procedure shall be fixed.
The work such as construction project contract signing, drawing triage, design changes, progress and quality control, material and technical support, and completion, acceptance and transfer shall be exchanged the information with the owners, design units, consulting units frequently, and the construction information exchanging quantity is large, and the frequency is large.
Comply with the coordination the interface construction of each surface of the project by the owner and the contractor.
There is about 200,000 cubic meters of rubble concrete retaining wall for spoil yard.
4.7.5 Oxygen cylinder shall be provided with protective ring and safety nut. The cylinder valve shall not be contaminated by grease; acetylene cylinder must have flashback arrestor.
Figure 5.4.3.7-1 shows the permit-to-work system.
Connect the -40x4 hot galvanized flat steel with the rebar in the column reliably by welding
Except where indicated in the figure, the plate thickness is 100, the plate elevation is H-0.050.
The reinforcement in the frame beam shall be placed inside the column reinforcement.
The production cycle of products is16 months or so, we are asking for confirmation on whether it is appropriate to make procurement order due to the urgent time of delivery.
The internal medium of the direr must be of renewability.
Project Description: Newly Constructed Xi'an-Pingliang Railway Station and Some After-Station Project Construction Contracting Bid XPS-2, the project has complicated geological conditions, the tunnels pass the loess shallow buried section, loess settlement cave section, water inrush section with unfavorable geology of landslide, staggered loess, collapsed loess, swelling rock (soil) and so on.
1) Heavy-duty public transport type escalator will be used. It is characterized by safety, reliability and durability.
7. Complete the review or transfer work within 3 days for the various reports or notices submitted by the Employer and the Contractor that require to be forwarded after reviewed or confirmed by the Consultant of the Project.
There are 8 items in total subjected to the spot check, and all the 8 items are conforming and 0 item is nonconforming.
Installation preparation→prefabrication→water drain pipe installation→closed water test→standpipe installation→branch pipe installation→closed water test
1) Give full play to the respective resources and technical advantages of the Signal & Communication Research Institute ("SCRI") and Siemens, strengthen the cooperation between the two sides in technological innovation, achievement transformation, market promotion and other aspects, to create high-quality products for the signaling industry and to advance the signaling equipment of Chinese railway.
5.2 Identification of Processes Requiring Monitoring and Measuring
Construction equipment: equipment that is available and ready in Ethiopia will be preferred as much as possible. Other major construction equipment needs to be purchased.
When concrete pouring holes are reserved on a column, the door shall be firmly supported and additional column stirrup or inclined strut may also be provided when necessary.
Therefore, the transfer of traffic volume between these transport modes and highway is not considered in traffic volume prediction for the Project.
If the mechanical property test results do not meet provisions in 4.3, heat treatment can be conducted again on the unqualified batch.
Night warning lights shall also be set at the tip of tower crane and beside pot holes on site.
The land and resettlement compensation fees shall be paid timely, and the social security fund shall be transferred in a timely manner. The financial subsidy funds for social security and special funds necessary for rural social security institutions to carry out relevant work shall be in place, and special accounts for social security funds shall be established;
5. System verification phase: test report (including type testing report), design verification report.
The Project plans to provide a set of QD-16C-Ⅲ interlocking block prefabrication equipment and 2 sets of vulnerable fittings on site (including mold and motor).
During foundation trench excavation, original structure of soil shall not be disturbed. If it is disturbed, the disturbed part shall be removed.
1.2.3Measuring tools: 500V and 1000V tramegger, multimeter, low-resistance tester, vernier caliper, tensiometer, etc.
By 2050, trains will be quiet. More clean energy will be used and the energy utilization will be improved. The carbody weight will be reduced, rail traction will be improved and energy supply will be optimized.
Decorative material: 304# wire drawing stainless steel (surface layer thickness 0.8mm, keel thickness 1.0mm).
4 weeks prior to the design liaison/review meetings, both parties shall determine the specific agenda for each meeting and shall provide problems to be discussed and expected schedule.
c)The packing of the transformer shall meet the requirements of transportation.
YGYHZNo. (2019) 033
1.10 3.4 System Working Principle
This is to certify that Liu Zhi, male, born on February 9, 1973, majoring in Construction Engineering at our open university from September 1997 to July 2001 by taking the correspondence course, has completed all courses specified by the junior college teaching program with qualified scores, and is hereby approved to graduate.
Each device shall be equipped with slings that conform to the requirements of safe lifting load and are certified by a third-party inspection agency approved by us. The lifting point of the device shall conform to the lifting design and relevant requirements of the offshore oil industry.
If the Bidder fails to assign the respondent within specified time as required by the bid evaluation committee, the committee will make decisions unfavorable for rights and interest of the Bidder in accordance with the Bidding Document, but the Bidder is not allowed to raise any objection.
Internal box of water tank is welded with stainless steel thin board and adopts good welding treatment process in order to guarantee leakage never happens. External box adopts aluminum board pull riveting structure to reduce the weight of water tank. The bottom board adopts stainless steel structure to ensure the good anti-stone strike performance of water tank.
T-girder formwork /12 sets, box girder /12 sets
(2) For installed templates, while wetting the working-face, do not sprinkle water on the surface of the templates. Once this part of water remains on the templates, the combination with the new concrete will have some difficulties, besides the appearance of concrete is likely to be affected.
4. For handling of the equipment accident, the principle of "Four Nos" shall be adhered to.
1. Minutes and records (meeting notices, sign-in forms, contents, and resolutions) of regular safety meeting held by the safety committee;
Base yield rate of 8% is employed by capital fund of investors.
The line is an extension line of Mombasa~Nairobi Railway and is an important part of trunk railways in Kenya.
Assist the own department in implementing the fire prevention safety system and frequently conduct fire prevention safety inspection.
Without the written consent of the other party, neither party can leak any contract-related document, data or other materials provided indirectly or directly by the other party to a third party,.
Rectification and retest: the Manufacturer carried on the rectification right after the problem was discovered on November 08, and the plan for No.5507 Train moving upwards from INDODE Station in reverse IIG was issued in later test; the route was automatically triggered and the retest was qualified.
Article 32 Risk management in construction stage
When the measuring instrument is used to monitor and measure the product and process outside the Company, the technical condition of the measuring instrument shall meet the specified requirements, and the effectiveness of testing results shall be guaranteed.
For section GDK11+570.00~GDK11+843.20, the surface course in subgrade bed is 0.6m thick, and filling materials of Group A are adopted prior to filling materials of Group B.
1) The steel joint shall be in such type that complies with the design requirement, and can be bound or overlapped through welding, with overlapping length in conformity with provision of the design and construction specification.
The maximum principal tensile stress t1>[Ctp-1], the beam section must be increased
There is no municipal sewage pipe network surrounding the land, and according to the existing local conditions, sewage is treated by septic tank and then discharged into nearby seepage wells.
"HTTP user agent": the browser type (User-Agent) for crawling can be set according to your needs.
4) Accept and coordinate the supervision of equipment manufacturing from the Tenderee.
See "Container Forklift FL7-8" in Load Code for Harbour Engineering (JTS 144-1-2010, P68) for details and take the value therein as the control load of the empty container forklift.
Serious oil leakage of machinery shall be prevented, and direct discharge of oily sewage produced during operation and maintenance of machineries without being treated properly shall be forbidden. The oil shall be removed from the oily sewage before being discharged.
(4) Lubricate the master lock with LDS18 grease. Take the left master lock as an example. The surfaces of the master lock that need lubrication include the contact surfaces or surfaces of the lock fork, spring bolt, pusher dog, torsion spring, etc., as shown in Figure 4-7.
laboratory shall be established on site; all materials purchased shall be attached with quality certificates; conduct inspection and delivery acceptance in conjunction with the Supervisor; conduct the sampling inspection of materials and engineering equipment test and inspection according to the requirements, so as to ensure inspection and test resultsmeet the design specifications and relevant requirements in the technical details of construction and submit to the Supervisor for approval.
Inside the excavation contour line: In the case where the vertical excavation face is located inside the excavation contour line of tunnel barrel, shotcrete-anchor mesh protection is provided, where 6m long ^22 composite fiber anchor bolts are arranged at an interval of 1.2m in a stagger manner. 10cm thick C25 concrete is sprayed.
Figure 3-16 Concrete Efflorescence at the Bottom Surface of top plate of the Second Span
Moreover, the external monitoring and evaluation team also includes two Uighur people and one Hui monitoring investigator.
Before installation, pipelines and their accessories shall be clear of mud, rust, iron dust, cinder and other dirt. The anticorrosion coating for equipment and pipelines shall follow current industrial standards of SH/T3022-2011 Design Specification for Anticorrosion Coating of Equipment and Piping in Petrochemical Engineering.
If our company is lucky to the win the bidder, we will immediately organize relevant machinery, personnel and equipment to be approached into the site, pay close attention to all aspects of preparation before the start, transfer the backbones of technology and management to establish keen-witted and capable, and high-efficient Project Manager Department.
Figure 26 Loading Schematic after Simplification
The HPP is 125km from Bandung, capital of West Java, and about 75km from Cirebon City.
(7) The scope of supply in the response documents has substantial deviation from the requirements for negotiation and procurement documents;
Siltation occurs in the three excavated sand pit around the trial trench gradually, and the accumulative thickness of them are 0.19m, 0.24m and 0.35m respectively.
Nigeria Abuja Llight Rail IDU Depot Works
The designation of mortar used for masonry at different construction positions and of different structural forms is controlled in strict accordance with design requirements. The use of composite mortar is prohibited for masonry wall.
At the beginning of 2016, Bazhong-Dazhou railway was put into operation, and Pingchang Station had passenger service.
Be sure to wear safety helmets to enter the construction site, safety ropes for works at height and protective equipment for construction. Strictly abide by regulations on protection and disciplines for work safety.
Alignment and straightening are performed, and the distance between top plate and center of tee joint is measured for compliance with requirements.
3. There are two types of cushions in the whole route: 200-thickness gravel cushion + 150-thickness C15 concrete cushion (anti-static floor and cement mortar surface) and 60-thickness C15 concrete cushion (floors with floor tile surface).
Except to the extent that the Contractor would have been entitled to payment for the work, the Contractor shall subject to Sub-Clause 2.5 [Employer's Claims] pay to the Employer all costs arising from this failure.
The lightning protection belt is made of 25*4 hot-dip galvanized flat steel. It is exposed laid along the corners, ridges, eaves and at eaves angle and other parts vulnerable to lightning strike. The lightning receptors at different heights of the roof must be welded and connectedwith no less than 2 places. All metal devices on the roof shall be welded and integrated into a whole;
A 35kV dual-power distribution substation each is provided for working shafts in Wuchang District and Hankou, to ensure that power supply requirement is met. Main wiring of 35kV distribution substation is tied and segmented with single bus. Two power supplies operate simultaneously, and are standby for each other.
The Standard supercedes the Edition TB/T 2942—1999.
a) Formation of each train End and
The aluminum plate shall be handled vertically during the transportation and hoisting, and it is not suitable to handle the aluminum plate veneer up and down the platform.
In 2018, the scale of smart logistics market in China exceeded RMB 400 billion, reaching RMB 407 billion, with a year-on-year increase of 20.4%.
Concrete voids and pits, S=0.77m2, as shown in Figure
1) Fully responsible for the field organization and command of construction and production in the worksite.
10.3 When bar-planting, the bars shall be planted after being welded; if just the reverse, the welding point shall be more than 15d away from the concrete surface of basis material, and the root segment of the exposed part of planted bars shall be covered with a wet towel infiltrated by ice water.
3. Acid leakage phenomenon or leakage of electrolyte around the post terminal.
The re-rolling in second day is still weak vibration of vibratory roller.
Modeling shall also be developed for the pipe support boards at the bottom of well control and safety boards, i.e. pipe support boards at the bottom of well area, and modeling shall be developed for the entire pipe from starting point of the pipe to the end point along the route.
Digital Index of Illustrated Parts of YDK-2C1 Transponder
Be responsible for the implementation of handling accidental injury insurance for site construction personnel before commencement and is responsible for paying insurance fees.
The corrosion of parts and equipment caused by such environment can not demonstrate that CRRC products have problem with anti-oxidation and anti-corrosion measures.
Experience: 2014~2015; Safety Officer for projects such as external pipe network and road of economic housing residential district of Shaanxi Yanchang Petroleum (Group) Co., Ltd.
Left leg: without obvious stains, holes or damages. Ironing to be yellow is not allowed, with uniform color after washing. Legs of same sizes, uniform length and straight fabric grain, and without twist;
(1) With thick soil layers and bedrock completely-weathered, strong-weathered layers, it is recommended to compare end-bearing piles with friction piles. If end-bearing pile is adopted, the foundation base shall be located in weak weathered stable rock layers in certain depth and the abutment and bearing platform shall reserve wide enough edges.
② Deciding the mode, range, route and procedure for personnel and mass evacuation, transfer and settlement in emergency.
The contractor shall not replace any subcontractor or supplier without the prior written consent of the Employer.
No large machines and vehicles except machines for compaction, leveling and transportation of filling materials shall be driven on the top surface of the filled subgrade.
It includes static investment of RMB 20,985,014,100, with RMB 127,650,000 per main line kilometer; the total dynamic investment is RMB 839,400,600; the purchase cost of rolling stock is RMB 768,000,000 and initial working capital is RMB 13,151,600.
In this way, you can use the hexagon nut (7) of specified length.
3.1.2.3 Priming paint must be painted on the pavement firstly so as to improve the cohesive force between pavement and paint film.
L50*5mm angle steel brace, hot dip galvanized
Before operation, check whether the drawings, Bill of Materials, Process Card for Assembly and other process documents are well prepared; prepare all the tools provided in tool column of the process card; get materials according to Bill of Materials, and check the incoming materials; wear personal protective equipment.
Anti-freezing glass water should be used from October 15th to March 15th.
According to the above requirements, the Seller, within 10 days after the contract is signed, submits to the Tenderee for confirmation the document list, requirements of and discussions in the first design liaison meeting.
Fine-grain asphalt mastic macadam (SBS modified asphalt) (SMA-13)
The flat shunting GSM-R mobile communication system equipment cabinet, shunting fixed platform, shunting server and UPS equipment of the GSM-R mobile communication system communication system are placed in the duty room of the saloon car service shunting group of each station.
2014 First Prize of New Industrialization of Hunan
7) Temporary electrical equipment must be removed in time after use. When it is partially removed, the power supply shall be switched off and the wire ends shall be wrapped with insulating tape.
All parts and on-board equipment shall be free of interference of external electromagnetic field and function normally.
The safe belt shall be hung from a higher level and used at a lower level, no the other way around. It shall not swing or hit other things in case of accidents.
Based on the analysis of the bidding documents, monorail vehicles with a running speed of 80km/h, a 15min fire-proof carbody structure and brake performance meeting the requirements and matching the existing lines are designed and manufactured, and only the permanent magnet motor-hydraulic brake scheme can be adopted in the existing design.
1) Check and supervise the Contractor to establish and improve the work system for safety management, environmental management system and safety management system, and urge the Contractor to safely work in accordance with relevant laws and regulations;
Water tank chamber, roofing works, UPVC downpipe, φ100
There are safety protection measures and high-voltage warning signs for all high-voltage electric apparatus.
Indoor wireless field strength coverage shall comply with the design requirements.
With a forest coverage rate of about 50%, Laos is abundant in 、valuable woods like rosewood.
In 2016, the output of PE in China was 15,020kt; the import volume was 9,943kt; the export volume was 299kt; the apparent consumption was 24,664kt;.the overall supply and demand of PE in China from 2007 to 2016 are shown in the following table:
Contractor: Hunan Industrial Equipment Installation Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as "Party B")
Regular inspection and maintenance of various traction substations and step-down substations, replacement of vulnerable and consumable components;
5.2.1.1 The supplier evaluation system is implemented. The purchaser is also the evaluator. The first step of supplier investigation is to investigate and evaluate the procurement activities of equipment, materials, and construction subcontractors in their respective areas of expertise.
3. The Company's competent leadership signs the planning notice.
The shop is equipped with three groups of cranes. The installation quality of crane beams is the focus of precision control of steel structures in the shop. The installation quality of steel columns is the guarantee of installation precision of crane beams.
C30W4 reinforced concrete base slab (1,500 thick)
Split wall-mounted or vertical air conditioner is flexibly adopted for equipment and key staff rooms with temperature and humidity control requirements.
For the monorail rolling stocks on the mainline, entry and exit lines and test lines in the base, full passenger load (axle load of 110KN) shall be considered for the design load; for the monorail rolling stocks on other tracks in the base, standard passenger load (axle load of 90KN) shall be considered for the design load; fatigue check calculation shall be carried out according to standard passenger load; considering the influence of buffer stop, calculation shall be carried out according to empty state.
Ropeway next station: It is located in Hanjia Ditch in the east of Luya Falls Scenic area that the terrain elevation is 418m.
The condensed water extracted by the turbine provided by the Demander is not included in the water output.
The piles shall be placed according to the relative position between the cross curves of pier top and the piles.
2017-Now Power Supply and Comprehensive Monitoring of Equipment Installation Supervision Section 2 of Beijing Subway Line 16, Electrical and Mechanical Engineer
Table 4.5-3Root Mean Square of Vehicle Body Acceleration under Normal Empty (AW0) Condition (Evaluated as per EN 12299:2009)
Lightning protection equipotential connection: The earthing device is commonly used for the earthing of lightning protection device and the earthing of electrical and electronic systems.
Advanced unified access function can be used for solutions of the smooth-network converged campus.
5.5.2 Test port: 3AC380V output port of auxiliary converter
When there are no design requirements, the minimum distance between center line of pipeline and beam, column and slab shall be subject to provisions in the following table.
Because the gauge of the new and existing railway networks is different, it is impossible to interconnect the new and existing lines, but possible to realize internal interconnection between the new and existing railway networks.
Representatives of shareholders of Yunnan Investment Group said that since the civil construction contract involves total investment control, it is hoped that Laos-China Railway Company Limited could explain the payment of the civil construction contract, the design change and the factors leading to the design change.
8. Dimensions of all toilets refer to the location dimensions of sanitary fittings. Refer to construction drawing for water supply and drainage discipline for details
All electric train lines (DC110V) and signal lines shall be disconnected automatically when the vehicle is decoupled.
3. The longitudinal steel tendon should adopt M15-12 anchorage.
Classification by area: Place the equipment as per its specified area, according to the category of equipment.
The number of slots in the device subframe and their application, as well as the functions and performances of each type of board card shall be explained.
Annual average temperature is 14.7°C, and mean annual precipitation is 601.6mm.
Avoid sun, rain and heavy pressure during transportation. Ensure that the ball valves will not become damaged and rusty during the shipping process.
(3) Shelter for the platform: January 11, 2019 ~ April 20, 2019.
4.1.5 It is required to conduct the cost control, prepare the material supply plan, and budget respectively according to the construction drawings and the construction.
g) The software is the general application, and the self-test is completed with the compiler;
The contact surfaces of busbars shall be kept clean, painted with electric force compounded grease and connected fixedly. Connection bolts shall be fastened with a torque wrench, and relevant records shall be kept. The torque value shall meet with what is specified. At the side of nuts, cushions or locknuts shall be provided.
Requirements for deviation of the size of steel tube: Allowable OD deviation is -0.5mm; -0.5mm for wall thickness; 1.7mm for shear drag at both end faces of steel tube; ≤0.5mm for external corrosion penetration; ≤5mm for the end bend of various member steel tubes with a length L≤1.5mm.
Qualifications and management system for the Subcontractor
Output of the software validation process
Both sides of the culvert body are missing; the side plate at the water inlet is displaced; crushed stones are mixed between the adjacent side plates. See Figure 5 for details.
the Works, together with materials and Plant for incorporation therein, to the full replacement cost;
Apply release agent to the surface of re-polished formwork, to ensure appearance quality.
Group A filling material will be used for the surface layer of subgrade bed and the surrounding Group C will be used for the bottom layer of subgrade bed and below.
C.The minimum ambient air temperature is -25°C and it can be stored at -40°C;
Select MKD-5S all-hydraulic driver drill
For the products from Party B that are selected by Party A for the first time, Party B shall offer technical support for product application; the first article must be evaluated which shall be organized by Party B; Party B shall offer test reports, certificates of conformity and relevant proof documents to Party A for confirmation.
Permeable materials shall be employed for backfilling and compaction in layers. If the foundation pit spoil materials meet the requirements, priority shall be given to the materials. The maximum loose paving thickness of the backfilling layer shall not be more than 20cm.
The rivers within Lufeng County which belong to the Jinsha River and the Yuanjiang River systems include the Xingxiu River which belongs to the upper reaches of the Lvzhi River, a primary tributary of the Yuanjiang River, and is the most principal river within Lufeng County.
1) When loading, transporting, unloading and planting trees, the root system and soil balls of trees shall be kept intact. The main tips and branches of trees shall not be broken. The bark shall not be scratched. Seedlings shall be planted immediately after unloading. Seedlings that cannot be planted immediately shall be planted with soil to protect the root system.
In order to meet the needs of tourists for skiing and leisure trip in winter and to create a better atmosphere for Winter Olympics, China Railway Beijing Group Co., Ltd. has optimized the train operation plan according to the characteristics of passenger flow. Most of the trains stop at Badaling Great Wall Station in up and down traffic, providing tourists a better travel experience.
Locomotives under service in DJIBOUTI area
30% of permanent land shall be afforested. A combination of arbor, shrub and grass shall be adopted for the greening layout with 20% arbor, 60% shrub and 20% grass; 100% of temporary land use shall be afforested.
After termite control works is completed and accepted, during the maintenance and warranty period, as required in the specifications, yearly re-inspection shall be carried out over the first 1-5 years, and biannual re-inspection is required after 5 years and re-inspection and warranty card shall be filled out.
PBCU is mainly composed of air channel integrated board and pneumatic actuation components like solenoid valve and relay valve.
Special treatment is performed at the installation site of four screws on the base
Because there are welding spots, Spot Pairs for spot welding are generated accordingly.
Gully, hilly terrain, mainly composed of eucalyptus, rubber trees and brambles.
The Project construction unit earnestly implements the approval opinions of relevant government departments in the early stage of the Project. In strict accordance with the Project declaration procedures, the procedures are not complete and construction will not start. The Project bidding shall be carried out in strict accordance with the requirements of laws and regulations.
(3) The scaffolding piece purchase must focus on quality, with certain thickness and it shall be knitted tightly.
Dimension and weight list of straight tee and straight cross (DN = 50 – 1000)
Positioning detail of the foundation bolt are shown is shown in the following Figure 7-6-1.
Under the condition of meeting the clearance of ground roads below the bridge, the bridge of the Project adopts the height of 4 ~ 12m.
It is a unique celebration ceremony, with hot activities on scene and passionate points from experts. The high-profile appearance of Shenglong Financial Center, which is the tallest office building in Fuzhou, gives people a sincere sigh: the world's top 500 office standard building is really coming in Fuzhou with more expectations.
11.3.1.1 Mechanical coupler
(5) Equipment, buildings and structures should be arranged on the same plane.
The interruption of the emergency brake circuit will cause the brake emergency valve (emergency brake caused) to be deenergized.
The front-end communication processor uses industrial control computer and dual configuration. Its redundant structures are hot-backup to each other. It connects with network switch via 10/100MB Ethernet adapter cards, with load rate of CPU being less than 40%.
The structure is mostly broken, with significant changed mineral composition and well-developed weathering fractures. The rock mass is broken, which can be dug with pickaxe and is hard to drill with dry drill.
Safety nets shall be added one layer for rising every 5m, and shall be erected in accordance with the following requirements:
Complete rough floating with wood float within half hour after concrete moulding and float with steel trowel before prehardening.
Both the tram system and ART system both use a single routing. Eight, eleven and sixteen pairs of trams will be respectively operated in the initial stage, near term and long term, and eight, eleven and seventeen ARTs will be operated in the initial stage, short term and long term respectively.
There are 4 domestic water supply stations in the line, all of which are newly-built domestic water supply stations. They are shown as follows.
Qualification certificate for engineer: (major: engineering mechanics)
Power cord: WDZN-BYJ-2\U+00D72.5 (same for the rest)
Soil covering and watering should be carried out immediately after the fertilization to avoid fertilizer damage.
Reverse osmosis membrane process is used for sea water desalination.
And the cables and wires inside the box shall be fixed with ties and installation records shall be kept in time for review.
1/3 – 1/100,000 sec
Based on the mix proportion, of which the workability meets the requirements, the concrete shall be used to form flexural-tensile and compressive test pieces, which will be maintained for 28 days before their strength is tested, and the mix proportion shall not be used for construction until the strength meets the requirements.
7. The thickness and length of steel casing of cast-in-place pile shall be adjusted according to the actual geological conditions on site. In principle, it shall pass through the riprap structure.
At the site, the slope shall be formed around the building to ensure that the rainwater can naturally flow into the drainage ditch (well), flow into the temporary sedimentation tank through the water collecting well, and be discharged into the nearby river pond after the rainwater settles.
For details of information and data, please look up the user usage information on http:// www.download.phoenixcontact.com.
Two sets of control devices are set for this mechanism, with one in the control cabinet on the platform to facilitate operation of construction personnel and another on the control valve cabinet under the platform to operate the platform reset when the upper operation fails.
Recover the primary switch or the primary channel of the primary switch.
Fig. 4.2.2Plain Fig. 4.2.3Hill
The General Contractor shall submit the survey data of control benchmark and dense benchmark laid out by it self to the Engineer for review, and the General Contractor shall rectify the survey result based on the review result of the Engineer.
Telephone number of the firm: 087168050349
Mailing Address: No. 309 Shaoshan North Road, Changsha City, Hunan Province
Where the special terms are in foreign languages, their Chinese notes shall be attached.
When the geological conditions are good and the full section excavation method is adopted, a horizontal survey line shall be set up. When the bench excavation method is adopted, a horizontal survey line shall be respectively set at the hance and the sidewall.
Take out the battery of the instrument with dry battery as the power supply, so as to avoid corrosion of the instrument.
1.Technical Standard of Highway Engineering (JTG B01-2014), issued by Ministry of Communications of the People's Republic of China.
The type test shall at least meet requirements of the railway EMC, vibration standard and system function.
-- Cover and level the second course of joint with caulking compounds. Width of this course is at least 50mm wider than that of the second course of joint on each side.
After confirming the purchase of TBM equipment, the large TBM components transport investigation team will be established immediately. By driving from the TBM manufacturing workshop to the construction site of Lower Shing Mun Reservoir in Hong Kong, the conditions of roads, bridges and toll gates along the way will be investigated, and a reasonable transport route will be proposed.
The prices for commissioning and performance test etc. are estimated prices based on our understanding on the commissioning plan and performance test of the project. In case of major deviations of the final commissioning and performance test plan, the prices shall be adjusted in accordance with the actual condition.
2. In case of collision between the bearing anchor bolt and pad stone reinforcement, the latter may be relocated properly to ensure correct location of bearing anchor bolt.
Measures shall be taken for lightning protection, static electricity protection, fire protection and exploding preventing as per the regulations within the governed scope;
3. Grinding wheel size: Φ200XΦ32X25 (mm)
The safety leading group quickly judges the development tendency of the accident or danger according to the information obtained and then makes clear rescue instructions;
After carbody-bogie connection, connect ground wires (G40) of carbody and bogie at the side of the bogie, tighten to 53N.m with a torque wrench and make tightening marks.
The instruments must be calibrated when the construction process is ended to ensure that such calibration is conducted before the platform is running.
5.3.2 Operators at posts producing noises shall regularly take part in occupational health surveillance according to the Group Company's regulations. The staff who are susceptible to noises and have contraindication for noises shall be immediately transferred away from such posts.
Area of standing zone for A vehicle = 28.75 m2; passenger capacities of A vehicle under different working conditions are calculated below:
4. Dynamic design is adopted for retaining wall. If unfavorable geology is found during the excavation of foundation, it shall notify the Design Institute timely to carry out dynamic design.
No major accident occurs to equipment, operation and environment, as well as such accidents as fire, explosion and personal injury.
3.1.1 According to the qualification accreditation plan of group supervision line of safety, quality and environmental protection, the training accreditation plan and scheme are formulated for the working unit.
When the temperature is below 34℃, construction workers will work during the period from 6:00 to 10:00 in the forenoon.
The storage places must prevent the records from damages due to fire, flood and worms, as well as any deterioration due to the environmental conditions such as temperature and humidity.
We will assemble a group of multi-skill management talents who are well acquainted with management and relevant skills and businesses for management downsizing and a better management.
Minimum curve radius: 1200m under general conditions, 800m under difficult conditions and 600m under particularly difficult conditions such as mountain and hilly areas (based on the EPC Contract);
15. Position of Main Control Handle (Traction Brake Orders)
The station is located in the southeast of MOJO downtown with flat terrain and undeveloped vegetations. It is connected with No. 4 highway of Ethiopia nearby, which brings about convenient transportation.
The quality of its fabrication and installation will affect the safety and durability of the structure.
The overall characteristics of the population are rapid growth and a high proportion of the population in the middle prime of life.
☆ Net exposure hedging income (with "-" for loss)
K5+520 Bridge 1 of Lekki Free Trade Zone
The design organization is Chongqing Sanfeng Covanta Environmental Industry Co., Ltd.
The main part of integrated workshop 1 is a four-story steel frame structure with a building height of 22.25m;
b.Party B does not update the background investigation information of its personnel holding control area pass every two years, or does not submit it to the sponsor institution (Party A's security control department) for review;
The specific supporting fund amount, purpose and utilization may be negotiated between us and the Ministry of Finance.
and report to the Quality and Safety Department and relevant departments.
1.Grass species:111 Knotgrass;2.Turfing way:
In case the reinforcement is bended or moved or released, timely adjust and bind.
The VAT law of Montenegro generally follows the principles of the EU VAT Directive.
The technical standards of the Project are determined by reference to China's specifications and combination with the Intergovernmental Agreement on the Asian Highway Network and the actual situation of Laos.
(4) In other places, the steel beam is the center of the steel beam and coincides with the positioning axis.
The specific number shall be determined according to actual line.
Turbine adopts DEH for control, which can realize turbine start and stop, load adjustment, and accident handling.
In case that the resources are not applicable, the General Manager shall make decisions or shall be responsible for coordination of the settlement.
Wooden formwork will be piled up at southwest of the pit and will be transported to the wooden formwork processing area for processing to leave the limit piling area vacant.
Based on the interchange setting situation along the line and the distribution situation of intersected highways and nearby towns, it is recommended to take the following setting scheme for management, maintenance and service facilities:
(6) Check that there is no dislocation or looseness in the locking mark of the fixing bolt of the water tank hanger seat.
SOHU), CHANGYOU (NASDAQ: CYOU) and SOGOU (NYSE: SOGO), which is one of the leading Internet brands in the Chinese language circle.
Technical Specification for Interoperability Relating to "Rolling Stock - Locomotives and Passenger Rolling Stock" Subsystem of the Rail System in the European Union
19. Load Code for the Design of Building Structures (GB 50009-2012);
The thickness of iron feet for installation and fixing of plastic doors and windows shall be ≥2mm, and the width shall be ≥ 28 mm. Steel plates for iron feet shall be galvanized.
Track: Ballastless track is adopted to reduce the maintenance workload.
12.3.5 In case retaining wall is controlled by sliding stability, the structural actions for improving sliding resistance shall be taken.
In case of object hitting accidents, Project Manager should be responsible for general command at the site; when personnel find an accident occurs, he should shout loudly first and inform Field Safety Officer, who should dial accident rescue telephone number "120" and call relevant superior departments or hospitals for rescue, meanwhile, Safety Officer should also inform Production Leader and emergency treatment group.
In accordance with Technical Design Requirements for Nigerian Abuja Urban Railand considering passenger flow scale of LOT1A Line and LOT3 Line, needs of system transport capacity and actual conditions in Nigeria, this design shall apply 100km/h AC-DC electric diesel motor unit.
8. For any confusion, see Code for Accessibility Design (GB50763-2012).
Control the position of bottom reinforcement with cover cushion block and control the position of upper reinforcement with rebar chair.
In the abrasive environment, abrasion degree of the concrete structure is mainly dependent on the amount of impurities in the wind and water as well as wind speed and water velocity.
People on duty of road blocks of the Security Department shall inspect the goods-loaded vehicles going out of company to eliminate the risk of release of goods without procedures.
American Society for Testing Materials (ASTM).
Finalized products: products in finalized production after design and identification;
Contractor: China Railway 14th Bureau Group Co., Ltd.
FAI of Purchased Products
b. The safety dispatcher shall inform the disconnector operators to go to the dispatching room to confirm the track with OCS power cut off, and sign the EMU Running and Management Ledger.
It is necessary to prepare template construction position, time, quality standards and construction processes before construction, and quality standard may not be lower than template during construction.
Before construction, according to the requirements of the total construction period of the project, the overall control target is decomposed into unit work, divisional work and subdivisional work to work out the schedule and determine the key construction dates.
(6) The rest shall organize the construction in accordance with specifications and stipulates of Technical Code for Railway Tunnel with Gas, Safety Regulations in Coal Mine, Provisions on Prevention and Control of Coal and Gas Outbursts to ensure the safety of construction.
Product model SA21E
‘In the event that a Party fails to comply with any decision of the DAB, whether binding or final
Introduce two-conductor line in the cave to verify; lay measurement point on middle line of tunnel and lay benchmark for lined side wall.
2.22. Wires, cables, connectors, and under-floor electrical boxes and components
1.3.2 Main Technical Codes and Standards
(1) Phenomena: there is no gasket between the connections and upright columns, and the elastic connection is not provided between the upright columns and the beams.
The predecessor of the Company was the Jinling Machine Bureau, which was established during the Westernization Movement in Qing Dynasty, and has a history of 153 years.
The discipline supervisory engineer shall, as per the construction contract and approved construction schedule, review the Application for Inspection Concerning Construction Machinery and Equipment to Be Mobilized submitted by the contractor, verify the quantity and performance of mechanical equipment mobilized, and make endorsement when they are provided qualified.
CSR Qingdao Sifang Co., Ltd. will develop detailed inspection & repair and maintenance plan for the Authority, including yard, tool, equipment, personnel allocation, inspection and repair interval plan and inspection and repair items, and inspection and repair spare parts, etc. Refer to the attachment – Inspection & Repair and Maintenance Plan of the Authority for details.
Overhead ground wire (TJ120); 12 KN (max.)
Note: The drawing shows the high signal tie line, and in case of dwarf signal, the boxes shall be arranged according to the outdoor equipment layout.
This project shall meet the GMP standard and obtain the GMP certificate.
Figure 17: Chainage ~ Speed Curve of Centr~Canbe (Line 631)
5. Relevant audit record shall be available in the field. Sampling inspection is shown as follows:
GB/T700, steel products; hot galvanizing conforms to GB/T5267.3.
The firewall judges whether the "package" is from reliable secure site by reading the information such as the address in the data package. The firewall will reject the data once it finds that the data package is from dangerous site.
Fillers and compaction standards for surface layer of subgrade bed in the transitional section shall be consistent with those of adjacent subgrade beds. Group A of fillers shall be used under the surface layer of subgrade bed, and the compaction standard shall meet the requirements of the bottom layer of the subgrade bed.
① Predicted section of large deformation of soft rock: the large deformation is more likely to occur, special attention shall be paid to protection, and advanced support shall be strengthened.
Telephone and premises distribution system 128-point host
For advanced management and zero accidents in 2016, award of "Safety Management Units".
When stirring the resin, slowly push forward the anchor bolt, and continuously stir to the stirring time specified by the manufacturer's product specification.
12.2.8 The pre-assembly at polished fitting joints shall be done as per the numbers specified by the factory, and interchanging, change of side or face of the plate is prohibited. At the polished fitting position, the close contact area with gaps not more than 0.2 mm shall not be less than 75%.
Calculation of drainage capacity and drainage head required for 142m pump station is shown in Table 5-31.
Notes: 1. Nameplates shall be labeled on floors at all reference points (see signs on the drawings for reference points)
It is suggested to heighten the standard of the elevation of the alignment. The speed of express passenger train in plane area is 160km/h with a curve radius of 2,000m (in difficult sections: 1,600m).
During the holidays, it is not allowed to organize and engage in collective trips and carry out collective trips using the company's vehicles.
Handling and Storage of Receiving Route Planned Operation Platform Section and Adjacent Station Information
Figure 7.3.6-5 Segmented Pouring of Hollow Slab
The water content in body decreases as the altitude increases. Dryness and anoxia will cause the loss of skin water, resulting in the dryness of respiratory mucosa and overall skin, and people become prone to pharyngitis, rhinitis, dry cough, rhagadia manus and pedalis, etc.
The payment of liquidated damages or compensation shall not relieve the Vendor's responsibilities and obligations under the contract.
Water consumption standard: According to the indicator of the water consumption per unit area of warehouse (including production water, domestic water and the water for greening and road watering): 6L/ ㎡·d, K=1.5; water use time: 12h.
a. The personnel on the working platform and on the ground put rotary rod of the switch to "closing" position and manually put the operation mechanism of the operation mechanism box to "closing" position respectively.
The occurrence and extinction time of the fault; the position where the fault occurs; fault level and type;
Major functions of the motor is to control releasing and locking of locking device.
1.5.5 Investment Estimation and Schedule Arrangement
Note: The specific dimensions of the water supply valve chamber are indicated in the plan.
During rolling, rolling of low-temperature steel below 850°C is prohibited.
Code for Design of Passenger Transport Information System of Railway Passenger Station (TB10074-2007);
Pump: Q=31.4m3/h, H=57m, N=7.5Kw/set
(2) The strength grade for stone material shall comply with the design requirements.
Specification for Layout of Urban Road Traffic Signs and Markings (GB 51038-2015)
A precast concrete block is respectively arranged on the coping surface of the windowsill and at 200mm of the lintel spacing, and other precast concrete blocks are evenly distributed, yet with the maximum vertical spacing no greater than 400㎜.
DMS is configured with two sets of redundant servers to complete data processing work with a capacity meeting the capacity requirement of the whole line.
Table 21100-4 Device Tray Assembly
The equipment is mainly used to support and move the vehicle before its completion, so as to perform assembly line movement and improve the assembly efficiency.
Inspect and confirm that the inspection and maintenance of the hydrogen-side DC seal oil pump of #1 unit are completed, the work ticket is taken back and safety measures are removed.
4.2.2.5 Retain the evidences of possessing license, motherboard, handbook and other rights;
In the analysis, these items must be listed: main failure modes of equipment and relevant components; possibilities to interfere operations reduced during maintenance (i.e, on-site maintenance); impact of single failure and multiple failures on the system when they occur at the same time, etc..
Guide and supervise the Business Department to develop the compulsory courses for operators and ensure that relevant departments will train operators based on the course list;
The transaction data shall be held in non-volatile memory. The size of non- volatile transaction buffer shall be sufficient for storing 7 days of transaction data.
The general equipotential bonding box shall be concealed in wall at a height 0.3m above the indoor ground.
The transport department is responsible for preparing the organization scheme for dynamic detection and transportation, and doing a good job in the mobilization, compilation, return and application for deployment of test trains and rolling stock.
Conditions of soil at all the positions disturbed by cutterhead;
Do not disassembly, refit the measuring instruments or interrupt the measurement supervision by oneself.
The function of traffic markings is to control and guide traffic, to provide information for drivers to adjust their driving routes, to keep drivers and pedestrians fully alert and to pay attention to traffic safety.
Be responsible for the staff performance and salaries, labor organization, social insurance management, welfare and other personnel management of the Executive Office;
0.5~3.7m grayish yellow hard plastic silty clay layer. Foundation treatment can be carried out in case of inadequate bearing capacity.
Main products include but are not limited to: communication controller, industrial Ethernet switch, monitoring workstation, photoelectric conversion device, etc.
Markings set in this project mainly include carriageway edge lines and lane lines.
Project content and scale: road maintenance works: Jiaoda Avenue (Railway Bridge - Weihe Road); the road is a urban main trunk, starting from the southern end of the railway bridge (Yingjiu Road Bridge) in the north and ending at Weihe Road in the south; the road length is 1901 m, and the current carriageway width is 23 m.
Reserve the round hole; the position can be adjusted according to the requirements of the equipment discipline
1.1.4.2 General Requirements for Protection of Completed Works, Equipment and Materials
Before commencement of individual works, safe operation rules shall be formulated according to Technical Specification for Safety of Highway Engineering Construction (JTJ076-95) and actual conditions of works. Also, Safety technical clarification shall be conducted for construction workers.
3. The line has the new housing area of 72605 square meters, which is relatively greater.
the working power for shunt release is AC 220V. The electric-screen supplier should direct shunt releases and pilot switch contacts of air conditioner's circuit breaker to the terminal row of electrical feeder used, as the diagram shows.
The surface soil that has been piled for an extended period of time is loose in its soil structure and is liable to subject to wind and water erosion.
(13) Remove the bolts of the rear bearing cover and remove the rear bearing cover.
The development of the global organic silicone industry has been faster than economic growth. Although the market for organic silicone materials in developed countries is very developed, the consumption of organic silicone materials in the future will continue to keep 4% -5% of annual average growth rate due to the emerging new use of organic silicone materials.
Admission control can be performed based on IP, MAC, white list, etc., and media streams conforming to standard protocols (GB/T 28181, ONVIF) can be forwarded. Other data message can be discarded.
All staff of each subsidiary must check on work attendance in accordance with the regulations (including senior management, driver and canteen staff, etc.).
Possible control measures include aspects such as measures for reducing pollutant discharge, energy conservation and consumption reduction, clean production and land saving.
The supervision engineer shall confirm that added engineering change price as supplementation of the contract price is paid at the same period with payment of construction cost.
The working face of the stockyard is about 300m in width and 100m in height, and the capping thickness is about 3m.
The bearings, axle boxes and wheel sets shall be kept at the same temperature for 8 hours at least; if they cannot be kept at the same room, then temperature difference between the two rooms keeping them shall not be more than 5°C.
Performing the customer satisfaction assessment at Xinjiang Petroleum Survey and Design Institute.
(3) Each passageway shall be provided with upper and lower berms according to the specifications, and protective railings, safety nets and toe boards shall be installed on both sides of the berms.
The travel amount defined by the basic fare table is uniformly stimulated by ACC system.
The total investment of the Project is estimated to be USD 3.5 billion.
(6) The rolling needs to meet the requirements for elevation, width, thickness, and adjusted cross slope, cross-section dimension and line shape shown on the drawings.
The accuracy of SC data reached 99.99 %.
Before paving, water the lower bearing layer to wet its surface.
When the driver turns on the emergency braking switch on the train pipe, the train pipe will vent a large amount of air to cause the sharp drop of pressure, causing the action of JF5 emergency valve. Meanwhile, the train pipe will vent to the atmosphere via emergency valve. Therefore, the pressure will drop rapidly.
During the construction process, the observation of the outlet point shall be strengthened. When the flow increases, the early warning shall be given in time.
Addis Ababa, the capital city, is not as developed as big cities of China in its current economic situation, and seems to only reach size of four-tier county, but its surprising growth cannot be underestimated.
The operator operates with the prompts on the panel window; the dual display and contrast panel can be used and operated by one operator without any professional knowledge.
3.3.2.2. The driver controller is installed in the appropriate position on the driver's console, and the handle can be moved back and forth in the longitudinal direction of the train.
M (medium): about 13.3 million pixels (4464 X 2976)
(2) Perform refined management over the project and establish a responsibility cost management system for the project.
1)Operate on the log query interface of the on-board earthquake terminal, insert external USB equipment at the on-board earthquake terminal, and inspect whether File Open, File Close and other operations of USB equipment can be conducted. Inspect whether the volumes of used space and free space of the external USB equipment displayed at on-board earthquake terminal are correct.
2-2 Plain soil (Q4ml): mainly in grayish black, mainly composed of fine angular gravel soil, with particle composition of strongly-moderately-weathered slate, of poor roundness of particles, mostly in angular shape, mainly distributed within the scope of the existing railway subgrade, medium dense, slight wet.
The requirement of selection of high-performance concrete shall meet Code for Durability Design on Concrete Structure of Railway (TB10005-2010).
The safety management shall be carried out from four aspects: source management, process control, emergency rescue, and accident investigation.
When service conditions of the system do not accord with those specified herein, please negotiate with us.
th——daily operating time in the delivery and inspection buffer zone (8 hours);
Article 4 Fail to conduct timely verification and maintenance for special equipment in accordance with regulations, and keep using with the equipment failing to pass the inspection and causing serious economic loss or accidents, a notice of criticism will be made for the responsible organizations and responsible personnel and responsibility will be investigated;
The general drawings of equipment installation, equipment layout and engineering vehicle were filed on May 30, 2019.
The feeding systems of traction network to the electric locomotive include direct feeding system, direct feeding system with return wire, autotransformer (AT) feeding system and booster transformer feeding system, etc.
6. For any details not specified in this drawing, please refer to relevant specifications, descriptions and design drawings.
) The fire control room is provided with documents and data, such as corresponding as-built drawings, specifications for the control logic relation among all subsystems, equipment operation instructions, system operation specifications, emergency plans, on-duty systems, maintenance and servicing systems, and on-duty records.
3) Responsible for implementation, identification, and traceability management of inspection and testing of product, as well as the final delivery of product.
Ensure that the insulated glazed hollow bead thermal mortar slurry is applied in parts, each with a thickness of no more than 15mm.
C40 (T2) concrete is adopted for the bearing pad stone.
4. Color number: Before the granite stones are laied, the bulk materials shall be tried to be put together and the color matching, patterning and numbering shall be conducted for the right layout.
The lighting modes and lighting types, lighting system and illuminance standard of the Project shall be designed by referring to the Standard for Lighting Design of Buildings (GB50034-2013) and the Code for Electrical Design of Civil Buildings (JGJ16-2008).
Among them, the waste dump has the most concentrated amount of waste and has a large particle size of stone block. Two (2) bulldozers are considered to be equipped, while the particle size of ore and rock in ore dump is relatively small, so two (2) loaders of 3m³ are considered to be equipped, which are used for stock heap collection and road construction and maintenance at the same time.
Manual digging the pits under the poles, the group 6 soil, which was earlier loosened
According to the actual situation of the Project area, based on the principle of adaption to local conditions and the use of local materials, asphalt concrete pavement is recommended for main sections in project 1 and project 2.
Galvanized screws shall be sued to connect between cabinets, and cabinets with splash shields.
(1) Highway transport is a major traffic mode in Haiti and is the major traffic line for social and economic development.
The Site HSE management plan of Shanghai Electric (Group) Corp.
While the interior structure, erection manner, rubber, spring and erection fasteners of them are identical.
Chemical oxygen demand (COD): 500mg/L
Legal Representative or Entrusted Agent: Zhou Zhiyu (seal) (signature)
5S2, EN 60721-3-5-1997
After crushed in the quarry, the ores are delivered to the ore concentration plant. The tailings pond is located in the downstream of the north of the ore concentration plant and laid out in a linear manner.
After the whole section is jacked, the axis position and elevation shall be measured at interface of each pipe joint; relative elevation difference shall be measured if there are staggered joints.
Expected credit loss within whole duration (no credit impairment occur)
During constant-speed control, the control method of the traction converter is changed from taking the torque as the control target to taking the speed of the MU as the control target, but the control strategy is the same as that implemented in the traction condition.
C. The temperature at the air inlet/outlet of the inverter shall be measured, to meet the requirements for operation of the equipment.
② Communications with suppliers shall be strengthened: Manufacturers shall be contacted all the time to grasp production conditions; communications with suppliers shall be strengthened based on construction plans to guarantee the production and supply of materials.
7.8.4.1 Unified Management of Garbage and Sanitation
- Track equipment maintenance and repair plans.
2. If any component does not meet design requirements, we will replace it with a new one and prove that the new one is qualified before production without affecting the project progress.
The interface between traction substation discipline and communication discipline shall be determined in accordance with the relevant requirements of Guidance on Technical Scheme for Communication Networking of Railway Power Supply Dispatching System (YDTXH [2012] No.428).
(4) The leakage protector shall be installed on the side of the general distribution box and switch box close to the load, and shall not be used to start the electrical equipment.
Table 4-6-3-6 Data Sheet forTest of Kibwezi Station
The interface between the work shaft and pipe-jacking construction
The minimum curve radius of the passenger and freight railway line plane shall not be less than the values specified in the table below.
<5-3> Strongly weathered tuff: light gray, gray, medium-fine sand and massive structure, with rock core in fragments and bulks, with extremely developed joint fissures, the joint fissure surface in 5 ~ 7m section is filled with silty clay and the complete rock core is broken.
If the request for leave is within three days (including 3 days), the application is examined by the team leader, and approved by the responsible person of department (workshop). If the request for leave is more than three days, it should be approved by the department responsible person and also approved by leader in charge, and is sent to attendance administrator.
The earthing conductors shall be connected and disconnected by two persons wearing insulating gloves and using insulating rod. During the connection and disconnection process, these persons shall not climb the equipment frame;
UPT40040401-00110= Bank account
3.4.1The lubrication grease is insufficient or excessive, or of wrong grade;
The automatic monitoring scope is D3K40+200~D3K44+380 section and D3K45+430~D3K52+327 section of Tehran-Qom-Esfahan High-speed Railway airport tunnel, with lengths of 4180m and 6897m respectively.
Project departments shall, in accordance with relevant regulations on power supply and suspension, operate in the electrified forbidden area, and be given supervision and coordination by the Safety and Security Team.
Have all the contents to be considered in the preparation of documents been taken into account?
Fig. 4 3g Load Longitudinally, 1g Load Laterally and 3g Load Vertically
Project Name: Project A of Outpatient, Emergency and Medical Technology Building and Comprehensive Ward Building of Ankang Children's Hospital
(2) The method of cleaning pipeline: bind the cloth strips at two ends securely at strip lines. Two persons pull strip lines to and forth. Clean off the sundries within the tubes.
When the girder- erecting machine approaches to the specified location, slowing down shall be implemented in advance, and positioning in a manner of inching motion may be adopted.
• Establish d.lab laboratory to study transportation business
(=: coupling of coupler, +: hinge, gangway and workshop shock absorber)
The applicant's code of professional ethics shall be in the form of conduct rules or similar forms.
Technicians of the engineering department are organized to carefully review the design documents, understand the design intent, technical standards, be familiar with the design drawings, and submit the formed data of doubtful parts in combination with the on-site investigation to the Owner, the Designer and the Supervisor for joint review of the drawings.
Vessel shall be of cylinder and vertical type, and shall be installed in the base of construction steel.
4.1.1 An operation instruction is a tertiary document used for instruction of works, mainly including purposes, requirements, means (implementation methods), inspection methods, and handling methods of non-conforming products.
Supervise operating crew members and urge them to follow the safety rules, properly use the labor protection articles and implement site safety measures.
If the account currency is different from the business valuation currency of Party B, it shall be converted according to the exchange rate applicable to Party B at the time of deduction. At the same time, Party A authorizes Party B to redeem the financial shares and fund shares held by Party A in advance on behalf of Party A in the case of breach of contract to pay off Party B's creditor's rights.
The total estimated amount of this project is RMB 6.2929235 billion; the economic and technical indicator is RMB 129.751 million /main line km.
2. During the validity period of the Contract, the new technical achievements made by Party B using the technical data and working conditions provided by Party A shall be owned by both parties (Part B and both parties).
Pouring concrete shall be undertaken in the shortest time after completion of borehole cleaning.
Rectifier to be adopted should be 12-pulse-wave rectifier constituted by two three-phrase rectifier bridges connected in parallel.
The command event message "Emergency Door Close" shall be shown when door close command is enabled by PEC;
Weighted average gravity γm of soil above basement
Construction should proceed in civilized manner that brings about no non-construction damage to the local ecosystem.
4.25 concentrate sample is finer than the other two concentrate samples. Its minimum particle size is 1μm, and the passing rate of -200μm particle size is 94.07%, and that of the -400μm particle size is 61.91%. The maximum particle size is 150μm.
2)When the GPRS wireless communication module or the communication control module fails, the on-board seismic terminal shall display the fault status correspondingly, and the log record shall include information such as date, time, fault type and so on.
Fig. 2-4-198 Gully of the Subgrade Slope on the Left Side of DK139+600
Through the grid monitoring system, governments of all levels can get informed of pollution data of all monitoring points, and immediately detect and master over-limit and abnormal emission conditions of the pollution sources, so as to conduct treatment on air pollution and law enforcement of environment protection in a targeted way.
The stratum at the worksite is composed of Quaternary upper pleistocene silty clay and floury soil, which is described in detail from top to bottom as follows:
Forum Website: www.kxjlt.org
10.6.3.1 The lease, installation, maintenance units of large machines (tower cranes) have to obtain relevant qualifications.
The touring system extended from the park shall be designed to ensure the seamless connection of transport by considering the connection with the proposed light rail stations, bus stops, large public parking and bicycle rental sites.
There are 1211.38m/62 circular culverts in this contract section, and the diameter of all culverts is 1.0 m.
overall construction duration of 48 months (the actual commencement date subject to the contract to be signed)
e. The overlay method is preferred for the basement coil construction. When the construction conditions are limited, reverse method can also be used.
It is expected that we will communicate and learn from each other in wider fields, to benefit the people of both countries with railway development. Let's jointly build a community of share destiny, and open up a new path towards win-win cooperation!
Notice on Registration and Relevant Arrangements of PMP Certification
If the blasting for shallow holes is blocked and backfilled as designed, the blasting wave can be ignored.
The connection surface of grounding wire and equipment bolt shall be tinned.
This is also an important achievement of the railway sector in implementing the CPC Central Committee and the State Council's deployments of "stability in employment, finance, foreign trade, foreign investment, investment and expectation" and accelerating the construction of key projects.
If neither written confirmation nor inquiry is made by Bidders, the Bidding Agency has the right to deem that the clarification has been received and known by Bidders.
It is judged as per Interim Provisions on Durability Design of Railway Concrete Structures that in the atmosphere of chemical attack or chlorine, the corrosion of ground water and surface water in IIDK31+800~IIDK32+725.9 section depends on PH value and the degree of their corrosion to concrete structure is H1, the water in other sections is not erosive.
The protection value of lighting arrester shall be coordinated with the overvoltage protection of substation.
(4) The surface should be flat, solid and smooth without spring soils, chips and cracks after compaction.
(See the construction scheme for storage pit.)
1164 holes in total, each30min hole depth tentatively
3) The scope of this bid includes the installation and laying of all cables, wires, trunkings, brackets and pipelines applicable to the screen door system, punching holes on wall and fireproof plugging of holes.
Inspect with theodolite, steel ruler and line: inspection of one position every 30m
Disassemble the runner connecting shaft and place it horizontally on the transport holder of main shaft and then transport it out of the power house.
Office of Leading Group for Reform of Professional Titles of Hubei Province (seal)
The members of the Government are determined on the basis of the proportion of the parties in Parliament; a multi-party system and a system of separation of powers among the legislature, the executive and the judiciary shall be implemented.
The Tenderer shall give the Ethernet performance indicators including but not limited to:
Existing dispatching and commanding system, dispatching management mode and division of dispatching areas; functional demand of new dispatching and commanding system (including the location of dispatching center, setting of dispatching console and administration scope).
Provide high-precision geospatial information data service
Next, after 2015 and 2016, waterproof in China must be calculated with the formula.
This Standard is developed on the basis of standard gauge railway construction practices in Kenya and technological innovation results.
——When hydrogen pipelines are laid in parallel with gas pipelines and oxygen pipelines, there shall be non-combustible material pipe in the middle, or the clear distance shall be no less than 250mm.
The composition and applicable conditions of track transportation and trackless transportation shall be in accordance with Article 17.2.1.
Figure 4.4.1-13 Effect Picture of Pre-stressing of Scaffolding for Cast-in-situ Box Girder
—Install blinds or plugs for vent valve and condensate drain valve of heat exchanger
Nanjing South Railway Station was opened on June 28, 2011, with a total construction area of more than 380,000 square meters. The station building is 417 meters long (max.) from north to south and 156 meters deep from east to west.
1) Cables and wires must be selected according to the current railway regulations.
Sinohydro Bureau 8 Co., Ltd. 6th Branch
The chambers for on-site distribution box of fans are provided at the side wall on the right side of the driving direction from small pile no. to large pile no. with a distance of 5 m from the installation centerline of jet fans.
8.1.5.All air-conditioning units of the entire train shall be under the centralized control of the cab when the train is running and may be independently controlled by the maintainers upon maintenance.
Data: Data is sorted out in accordance with Specification for Municipal Engineering Construction Acceptance Data Sorting.
2) The ebula display accesses the OMTS network through the Ethernet interface and updates the data in real time through the train-ground wireless communication system.
Technical management personnel at all levels shall comply with the technical specifications;
11. The Agreement has 2 copies of originals and 10 copies of duplicates; each Party to the Contract shall hold 1 copy of original and 5 copies of duplicates. Where the duplicate copy is inconsistent with the original one, the latter shall prevail.
In high speed train gauge-1B, the components suspended above secondary springs is 50mm higher than that below the springs. Meanwhile, their dynamic deflections shall be taken into consideration.
1. This drawing applies for slanting and open cut tunnel and other types of tunnel shall refer to this drawing.
The shakeproof, sunscreen and antifreezing measures shall be taken to guarantee that the original samples shall be free of disturbing and water loss and the samples shall be timely tested.
The action plunger is moved rightward to open the charging path of the action tube, namely:
In Bolivia, the river transport consists of two systems: Amazon River and La Plata Parana River, and the lake transport is mainly based on Lake Titicaca.
For lower structures, the vast majority of abutments are of gravity type, and only a few are of light-weight type. Most piers are of solid type, and a few are of column type.
Qualified professional constructors are selected to install PV modules. Before installation, following measures are taken by constructors to prevent electric shock:
The quality inspection system at all levels shall be established and the Project Management Department will conduct a combination of routine and non-routine inspections.
Acceptance Report (Lot WGZF V Hengshan Station Building)
China Railway Eryuan Engineering Group Co., Ltd.: Xu Yajun (028-87668866)
In case of concealed installation, the thickness of non-metallic covering shall be not greater than 2cm.
The whole building is arranged horizontally, with clear function divisions connected with each other. Relaxation and recreation can be done in one bulding.
16.9.5 Promotion of Project Management with the 'Six-in-One' Target
The protective device shall act or give signal according to the protection setting sheet.
Quality and Inspection Method of Works for Rubbing Acrylic Varnish on the Surface of Wood
The permanent steel plates with engraved (non-adhesive) information (manufacturer's information, labels, services and operating range) shall be used as the nameplate identification for each instrument.
The type of the rainwater collection pool: The rainwater collection pool is classified into cylindrical and cuboid the pool according to the shape.
≥1.1 m/s2 (0-35 km/h on average)
2. Backfilling between abutment back and embankment shall comply with the provisions below:
For fire-fighting distribution lines and other distributing lines laid in the same cable shaft and chute, mineral insulated incombustible cables are adopted for fire-fighting distribution lines, which is allowed to contact naked sheath mineral insulated cables. And the metal sheath temperature is 70°.
5. Do not carry out building construction operation generating noise pollution and affecting rest of others at night, but except emergency maintenance and rescue operations.
The communication pipelines are provided with FRP cable pipe boxes while going across the bridge.
Receiving and feedback of service and product quality information
Its Authorized Agent:______ (signature)
Load shall be applied on the bracket in accordance with the requirements. Before the loading, load distribution status of joints of bracket shall be worked out to ensure the equivalence of loading.
Audited on: December 25, 2016
Lake Paiku – Kathmandu section: temporarily 650m.
(7) Guidelines for seismic design of highway bridges (JTG/T B02-01-2008)
When braking command signal is received by the microcomputer braking control unit, this function shall make the output of braking force smooth.
Natural reservoir plays a very important role for NA and the entire Indus valley.
(4) 350~400kg cement is generally used per m3.
It is be of good expansibility. When new functions, devices and components are required following development of metro operation, newly developed application modules can be conveniently added to application software system without affecting normal operation of application software.
⑹ Implement the construction progress report (daily, weekly and monthly) system, control the progress of the works, timely analyze the deviation of the actual progress from the planned one of key projects, and take corresponding countermeasures.
8 thick floor tile skirt (matching the floor tiles); white cement is used for jointing;
After paving main tiles, they should be fixed on gauge lathes with self-tapping screw connections via horizontal direction on junctions of two cured edges of tiles. And fixed screws number of main each tile are not less than 4, overlaps of left and right tiles must be fixed.
Relevant technical personnel shall be mobilized to prepare a commissioning report covering the following: organizational and technical measures during commissioning, technical problems and corresponding solutions during commissioning, test records and functional test records, stable operation conditions, and issues that need to be further addressed (if any).
During the trip, the crew have regularly disinfect key parts of the carriage and arrange passengers in a scattered manner.
has completed all the undergraduate teaching programme of Mechanism Design, Manufacturing and Automatization major in Tianjin University of Commerce and is hereby qualified for graduation, and is granted Bachelor's Degree of Engineering in accordance with the articles of the Regulations of the People's Republic of China on Academic Degrees.
13.3.1.Quantity, Type and Installation Location of Turnout for Wuhu Line 1
Article 27 If on-site general meeting or special meeting is held, the secretary of the Board of Directors shall arrange relevant personnel to form meeting decision according to the statistical results of the voting.
After selecting the corresponding stations in the input boxes of the starting station, the next station and the terminal station, click the OK key to set.
For the repair of passenger cars, the cost is estimated with reference to the actual level of Kunming Railway Bureau of China, i.e. USD 2100/car; the depot repair cost is estimated based on the budgetary rating specified by the Ministry of Railways and considering the labor cost and depreciation expense in China, i.e. USD 9,400/car, and the depot repair is carried out once every 2 years; the overhaul cost is estimated as per the actual price of overhaul in China, i.e. USD 78,000/car, and the overhaul is carried out once every 5 years.
(4) For bidding projects needing to be subcontracted in overseas contracting, an effective written contract or written commitment shall be signed with the owner; subcontract projects have been budgeted and reviewed by the cost or audit department;
Construct drainage ditches around buildings at the bottom of foundation pits and make sure there is sufficient number of sewage pumps reserved so that water can be timely discharged in case of waterlogging in the foundation pit or in the field.
4. Proper actions shall be taken to ensure the stability of the retaining wall during construction. Partial backfilling with filling materials shall be done for the wall back immediately when the concrete strength of the wall body reaches up to 70% of the design strength.
The fire permit must be obtained for operations with open fire outside the warehouses, approved by the person in charge of warehouse or fire protection, and the strict safety measures must be taken.
Train operation control system of the line is configured in accordance with CTCS0 standard, taking ground signal as the principal thing and consisting of general locomotive signal and train operation monitoring devices.
When stacking, put batten between frames and leaves for ventilation.
The measures to reduce noise in the sound transmission route mainly include setting up nature strips, sound barriers and sound proof walls, etc.
The wireless base station mainly consists of the base band unit (BBU), radio-frequency remote unit (RRU), feeder and antenna.
T3 kitchen drainage pipe CFL-T3-1 DN150 (L1 - L29)
The requirement below shall be followed temporarily: There are not less than 32 contacts for the typical mixed traction and step-down substation, not less than 48 contacts for the mixed traction and step-down substation at depot, and not less than 16 contacts for the typical step-down substation. The contact quantity can be expanded.
⑥ Waste soil and slag generated in the construction process shall follow the principle of using as much as possible with less abandoning, and balancing earth-rock locally as much as possible, and the excavated earthwork shall be allocated nearby, and this part of earthwork shall be backfilled locally.
The chassis is of non-center sill structure. It is composed of draft sill, side sill, hopper joist, sleeper beam, end sill and end-plate of hopper.
Boundary Mileage D1K23+129.05
The relation between primary and secondary beams can be generally judged directly from the drawings; for the positions hard to distinguish, the relation between main and secondary beam shall be expressed with "\U+201C (main) \U+201D" on main beam at the crossing of main and secondary beams.
CHQM-Z4.P01Control Procedure for Monitoring and Measuring Equipment Categorized as Measuring Instruments
The mean air leakage rate per hundred meter is 0.02, the friction resistance coefficient is 0.02, and the length of each section is 50 m.
The Project is the China-aided Rehabilitation of Ring Road in Freetown, Sierra Leone (Limkokwing University ~ Regent Village). Depending on the characteristics of the Project, the safety facilities include sign system and marking system (including protruding road signs).
The ability and quality of employees and contacts can meet the requirements.
Therefore, the stability of vehicle system is poor when LM tread is installed and vehicle system is instable when LMA tread is installed.
Anyone who has no passing credentials shall be banned from leaving the plant, and shall be asked to temporarily stay at the duty room. The situation shall be reported to the shift leader and the police for investigation;
Reinforced concrete frame with brick filling of walls and partitions, metal roofing, plastic windows, metal doors, walls and ceilings for painting with water-based paint, concrete floors, exterior walls for painting with facade paint, a base from seranite.
Fig. 7 Interference between Hand Brake Chain and Guide Pulley Set (1)
After the solved problems are inspected and considered as qualified by the quality inspection department, the Manufacturing Supervision Engineer shall be notified for rechecks.
With the development of engineering technology, manufacturers introduced superheater boiler locomotives in 1915.
The Contractor shall prepare more detailed schedules of divisional or subdivisional works according to the contract schedule and submit them to the Supervisor for approval.
10. Drainage facilities shall have solid ditch foundation.
In case of any losses incurred thereby to the Company, corresponding responsibilities shall be investigated according to laws.
4. It must take strict control to the spoil scheme during the construction.
Advanced equipment should be adopted in the production as much as possible to improve the labor productivity and reduce the ore loss and energy wasting.
The transformer substation is of 10/0.4kV; 2 transformers and 0.4kV power distribution units can be installed in the #5 area transformer substation.
1. Reinstall the valve accessories and the air pipelines one by one;
The material shall be compounded and stored according to the methods suggested by the Supplier.
We will immediately organize the staff to retest, check the data, and report the existing problems to the supervising engineer and other relevant departments in time to ensure the accuracy of the measurement control points.
④ Signboards shall be set at the both ends and branches of cables.
1. Use slings for hoisting as much as possible. The position of dents must be limited within 500 of the center of gravity of the component. After hoisting, the dents are treated in a centralized way.
Mobilize personnel and equipment, and set the instrument and read the initial value along with construction progress; moreover, read the initial value twice minimally.
3.1.5 Financial Expenses (interest of borrowings)
Upon startup and abnormal operation of units, gases with hydrocarbon released from the safety valves will be discharged in a sealed manner to the flare system.
When there is a large amount of accumulated water, 3 sewage pumps provided with the TBM mainframe, and 2 screw sewage pumps provided in the rear supporting equipment are activated for drainage, and the drainage capacity reaches 326 m3/h.
Use ties to place cables (2 axle temperature plugs) at cover plate 1 and cover plate 5; when laying the cable, be careful to reserve sufficient cable between the carbody and bogie and the reserved cable is of sufficient radian to ensure that the cable can pass the small-radius test. Besides, the cable should not touch either the bogie or the carbody.
Applicant: Tai Diancang, male, born on November 2, 1966, ID Card No.: 610113196611020456.
The exterior wall system is a color steel-rock wool sandwich panel facing exterior wall insulation system. The method is as follows from outside to inside:
(2) Reinforcement straightening: HPB300 reinforcement should be straightened with a straitening machine to ensure that the surface is smooth, and has no significant rolling marks.
Various machines, tools, equipment and labor protection appliances for construction shall be subject to regular check and necessary inspection, to ensure they are always in sound conditions. It is forbidden to use any unacceptable item out of them.
The specific completion date is the actual completion date when the works is accepted as stipulated in the Acceptance Form for Final Completion of Works by the relevant government functional departments.
Large and medium-sized river crossing: horizontal 1:2000, 1:1000 or 1:500, and vertical 1:500 or 1:200.
6.5.5.3.3.3 The device keeper shall strengthen inspection and maintenance of mechanical equipment so as to ensure normal operation of various mechanical devices in the process of concrete casting, and shall increase reserve of damageable small machineries and strengthen capacity for repair of large machineries.
Parts and components damaged during the warranty period shall be supplied by the Tenderer.
Some interior trim panels and beads are pasted with double-sided adhesive tape. During removal, attention shall be paid not to deform the removed parts or damage the surfaces of the interior trim panels and beads.
Hydrochloric acid, hydrogen chloride, methyl trichlorosilane, and dimethyl dichlorosilane
The welding material is sprayed with paint after being welded. Components in threaded connection are used with their mounting surfaces only coated with a primer or without painting. Upon installation, the surface finishing paint is visible.
It is mostly generated and enlarged from the dissolution along the diagenetic porosity and structure joint.
2.Select fault record files from the local to analyze.
Block-cast manganese steel crossings shall be used fro turnouts and crossovers. The crossings shall meet the requirements of UIC 866 and EN 15689. Besides, two weldable legs made of CEN54E1 R350HT rails shall be provided on both ends of the crossing and welded onto the crossing by flash butt welding in factory.
Tighten the bolt with the wrench, fix the module on the tray.
e)The test procedure of EN 12266 Standard shall be in accordance with P12 of this standard (see Appendix A of this standard).
The internal-combustion locomotives are adopted as the traction locomotives of this Project, which is the mobile pollution source with very low influence on the local atmospheric environment.
Plant Functional Design (General Instruction- Overall Operation Manual, etc.)
The seismic fortification intensity of this area is Degree 6, so estimation of soft soil seismic subsidence may not be conducted.
08 Special Topic of Environmental and Social Impact Assessment - Impact on Ethnic Minorities
According to different accident types, different emergency rescue plans are formulated. At present, the emergency rescue measures for the most possible hazardous chemical accident—— "sulfuric acid leakage accident" in the Project are designed as follows, and other accidents will not be described here.
Where the interval is too long, or the ambient temperature changes by more than 15°C, or external conditions exert an impact, re-measurement or adjustment of track panels shall be done.
During reinforcement hauling, attention shall be paid to avoid collision or hooking with other materials, especially electric wires around, above or below.
2) Unless otherwise specified, interior partition walls shall be made of double-layer oriented strand boards 9mm-thick of 90-thick light steel joists.
Inspection for quality organization chart and related job descriptions, ensuring that the quality organization structure and its job descriptions meet the requirements of our quality control system and the requirements of the project.
4 In-situ test: do standard penetration test in the clay soil strata and completely weathered strata and judge the soil strata uniformity and divide soil strata; estimate the subgrade bearing capacity and compression modulus.
Due to the unfavorable construction conditions and environment in winter construction, engineering quality accident is used to occur more often, especially the concrete works.
2) Development and utilization of land, including the quantity and quality of cultivated land (dry land and water land), forest land and pasture land, the nature of soil, the degree of fertilizer deficiency, etc;
The backbone members of BON have worked in the field of mechanical and electrical engineering at home and abroad for many years and have accumulated rich engineering experience.
If the height of pole and tower reaches or exceeds 40m, its ground resistance shall also be no more than 20Ω.
1. Basic computer application skills;
Drains shall be excavated according to the design and the drainage longitudinal grade shall not be less than 1/250.
1~5 kV (settable voltage, automatic voltage adjustment and stabilization), dedicated for double-insulated armature, capable of testing the core-to-shaft, coil-to-shaft and coil-to-core withstand voltages respectively
b. The water-washed penetration liquid can be washed by water spray, with the water pressure not greater than 0.34Mpa, water temperature of 10-40℃, and pipe pressure under water spray better being 0.2Mpa.
8. Exposed surfaces of wing walls at entrance and exit of culvert shall be conducted with coating and joint pointing.
According to the investigation results, the strata in the project area are mainly composed of Quaternary Holocene black cotton soil, silty clay, clay, silty soil and pumice soil and Upper Miocene tuff. Main geotechnical parameters (physical and mechanical) are shown in the following table.
Note: 1. Please tabulating and listing the List of Special Tools separately according to the decentralized control system, analytical instruments, other instruments and control equipment, electrical equipment.
The software integration test specifications meet the requirements specified in Clauses 7.3.4.29-7.3.4.32 of EN 50128:2011;
Rolling friction force of bridge inspection vehicle F2+ gradient resistance F3
3. In reporting to the National Development and Reform Commission and the Ministry of Commerce for approval, the traction system bid and the rolling stock bid shall be reported together and it is also recommended to report them to the examination and verification department of the World Bank;
If the length of the steel wire rope is too long, after the drill bit reaches to the hole bottom, it will obliquely impact the hole wall, giving rise to a hole expansion.
The IAD can accept the commands of the softswitch to detect various events and detect the actual status of user lines, and report to the softswitch.
12.2.12 The setting of the advance small duct shall be subject to the following provisions:
1. Machining inspection must be strictly in accordance with drawings and technological documents.
The details about the safety and environmental policy are as follows:
62.36 - 60 = 2.36 dB.
3. Elevation of slope is the design elevation of rail top. Design elevation of rail top of parking track in the parking yard is 0.63m higher than that of the line center subgrade surface.
5.4.3.1 Cost Control during the Purchasing Process
For works that are not accepted through proper procedures as per the regulations or are determined as disqualified in acceptance, dial-up connection shall not be made or the line shall not be put into use.
Prepare scientific and reasonable project overall schedule, schedule of divisional and sub-divisional works, quarterly and monthly (weekly) operation plan to realize step-by-step control, and correct any deviation immediately.
(3) Test, evaluation and computational simulation analysis and research of the stiffness and fatigue strength of aluminum alloy car body of high-speed train.
13. Wall tiles of the toilet in the station building of Hollholl station fall.
At the balance sheet date, the Company checks investment properties for any sign of possible impairment. In case of any sign of impairment, impairment test shall be conducted to determine the recoverable amount, and the provision for impairment shall be drawn based on the book value and recoverable amount, whichever is lower. Once the impairment loss is drawn, it shall never be reversed in subsequent accounting period.
Policies, laws and regulations regarding capital construction issued by Indonesia.
List of Interchange Ramp B Bridges of Ulaanbaatar Traffic Police Bureau
The power-on for equipment in power room shall be conducted as per the following standards:
When the expected results cannot be reached, correction and prevention measures should be adopted.
① Energize the network digital hard disk video recorder, energize the terminal cameras one by one, and energize the management terminal PC.
The depth of the investigation hole shall be controlled at the designed road shoulder elevation 3-5m.
When the voltage is applied to the rated value, and 1.2 times of the setting current is applied to the current loop, the protection shall not operate. Then the voltage is slowly (step-length delay is greater than the outlet delay) reduced until the protection operation outlet stops. The recorded voltage value shall be consistent with the locking voltage setting value.
6.3.12 The pre-laid ballast surface on the bridge shall be level with the ballast bed surface of the both bridge ends.
The factory packaging of the tachometric sensor has taken the protection of the terminals into consideration. When installing, remove the end cover which should be installed when the sensor is not in use. The sensor tips are isolated from each other at a certain distance (greater than 100mm). It is prohibited to let the terminal tips to touch each other, or sensor permanent magnet will be demagnetized greatly and damaged.
OSD screen menu, hotkeys, panel buttons
6.3 Place of delivery and delivery terms: Delivered at the designated place of Shanghai Port by the Buyer, free on rail.
5. No harmful gases causing explosion hazard are found around.
It is prohibited from taking use of original rail sections lower than the shortest length to weld long rails.
Auxiliary rooms include sanitary rooms (bathrooms, lockers, washrooms, and laundry rooms for special operations, trade or positions), living rooms (lounges, dining places, toilets), gynecological clinics, etc.
At the initial stage, there is no obvious material deterioration and structural function declination, but, the protective cover is somewhat damaged by the corrosion medium; while at the growing stage, aggressive damage will occur and grow worse rapidly.
48 Osmanthus;2. Diameter at breast height or trunk diameter: 7-8cm; 3. Plant height, crown diameter: 2.5-3m, above 1.5m; 4. Excavation method:
Signal output: push-pull: Imax =¡À20mA
Pipe thread connection is processed by electric threading machine, and the machining times is 1~4 times.
Once some abnormality is found, the machine shall be shut down and checked. It can not be repaires in operation.
AVE high-speed multiple units are adopted, with Talgo trains of pendulum type carbody for common-railway operation.
Initial Accreditation: 2015-10-30
Prior to construction, the technical personnel should be organized to seriously review the design documents and drawings, truly understand and master the requirements for the Project and the technical standard of the construction, understand the needs and requirements of the Project, and if having any questions, submit written reports to the designer.
In the process of filling soil, the horizontal displacement and elevation change of the side pile should be observed, and the horizontal displacement value of the soil and its trend are analyzed to judge the stability of the foundation.
DN32 from soft water system of WSD discipline
To improve the vehicle comfort, the LV3 vehicle of the Baojun 530 is provided with the PEPS system.
3. Heavy blasting is not allowed for excavation of stone slopes, to prevent the relaxation of rock mass, and smooth blasting can be used if permitted.
Transportation conditions: distance and road distribution;
(5) Organization Setup, Management Scope and Staffing
c. Materials and machines for hoisting (such as, the electric hoist, manual hoist, winch and jack), steel wire rope, iron chain, hook, pulley, snap ring and coir rope must be first inspected to confirm that they comply with the requirement for usage.
Volume 4 Elevated Section Works Book 3 Section at Stations 102~103 Fascicule 3 Cast-in-situ Box Girder (Shop Drawing version A)
2) When it is necessary to extend the laid control cable.
QHSE: quality, occupational health, safety and environment.
Rubber plate shall be used for connection of cable tray and distribution box (cabinet) to protect conductors and cables.
2. The upturned height of waterproof coiled material is 700 mm at the flashing position of parapet in the plant, and it is 450 at the flashing position of Auxiliary Office Room in the plant; the upturned waterproof coiled material is protected with laid bricks with a height of 500 mm on its external side, and the 100 mm thick sintered shale common bricks are adopted as the laid bricks;
Competence evaluation of operating personnel will be determined by their scores in the first and second half year, reflected in employee competence evaluation summary at the end of the year.
Replace the chip with damaged appearance and pin.
4.1.1. The ratio of measured valve of yield strength of steel and measured valve of tensile strength shall not be more than 0.85.
According to the survey, the special rock-soils in the surveyed area are saline soil and mollisol.
Air volume: 3350 m3/h, full pressure: 70Pa
①According to the route, it is to control the pile, remove all obstacles, weeds and the surface soil containing vegetation roots, within the construction site.
The point description are drawn and arranged in Word.
2.12.6 Regularly check the implementation of the procurement plan, analyze existing problems, work out solutions, prepare Monthly Procurement Report on a monthly basis, and report the work to the Project Manager and Project Management Department (project management office) to ensure the smooth implementation of project procurement in accordance with the requirements of sales contract.
2.2.2.1.5 Subgrade Construction Drainage and Rainy Season Construction
Material certificate of main parts and components, certificate of mechanical and electrical products, type-test report and design review report
All materials used to make cast iron gate shall be fit for sewage corrosion environment, and unprotected or non-anticorrosive material shall be treated according to relevant provisions specified in the general technical conditions.
1. Line representation method of opening doors and windows: The solid line represents the outer opening, the dotted line represents the inner opening and the wireless line represents the fixed window;
(1) Prevent construction materials and tools falling on railway line across the existing railway. Because line equipment or train will be destroyed to affect the driving safety.
(2) The Contractor shall organize sufficient resources (personnels, materials, machines and tools and so forth) to ensure that the demands of the Employer are met.
The standard of drain pipe shall conform to the requirements in the Unplasticized Poly (Vinyl Chloride) (PVC-U) Pipes for Non-pressure Buried Drainage and Sewage Systems (GB/T20221-2006).
The power supply and cable of switch machine and lock detector shall be terminated in a well-sealed junction box.
Work of each section and in each process shall be conducted independently and cross operation is not allowed.
Initiating explosive device warehouse is designed by local blasting company, arranged in triangle shape as per safety requirement, and reported to local explosive bureau for approval. It includes detonator, explosive and guard rooms.
4) During the indoor and outdoor joint commissioning, the indoor person in charge shall give priority to the command, and the power on and off shall be notified to each other.
Video storage device (network video cloud storage device)
This project is the largest fabricated plant in China, constructed by more than 8,000 people during the peak construction period and using more than 300 sets of various large machines.
8.3 Party A shall pay the remaining amount within 7 working days after the design results submitted by Party B are reviewed by the relevant administrative department where Party A is located and the approval documents are obtained.
The approval of the Purchaser shall not relieve the Seller of all responsibilities for commissioning.
Steel structural workshop is used in the steel bar processing site, and H-shaped steel is used for the columns and beams. Colored steel shed is set at the top, and C25 concrete with a thickness of 20cm is used for hardening the floor of the factory building, which is divided into raw material area, processing area, semi-finished product area, etc., and drainage ditched and sewage treatment pools are set around, and independent power distribution system is set up, and fire fighting equipment and facilities are equipped.
According to the master plan of the Project, the main products of the Project include chloroethylene, glycol, polyol, propylene, caustic alkali and so forth.
(a) First, adjust the cutter with large wear on the outer ring but not up to the replacement standard to the front of the cutter head to replace the cutter with excessive wear on the front of the cutter head.
3. All BS90A(M) steel rails in the product list of order contract from 2015 to 2019 as stipulated in Appendix 2 shall be supplied by the Demander and all the remaining rail materials shall be supplied by the Supplier.
When compared with the decentralized autonomous control mode, the interlocking system will not receive orders input via the decentralized autonomous CTC at this time.
EN 1090-3 Technical Requirements of Aluminium Structures
Lot CLJL-2 of the New Chengdu ~ Lanzhou Railway Project (Chengdu ~ Chuanzhusi Section) / Aba Prefecture, Sichuan
(2) Due to the universality of mixed transportation, Nanjing also clearly indicates that the five special waste such as decoration waste, bulky waste, electronic waste, garden waste, mechanical road sweeping waste etc. are collected and transported by the special vehicles of special departments at the spreading stage to avoid "mixed loading and mixing transporting" with domestic waste.
2) The supervision organization's supervision engineers shall review and sign their names, and stamp official seals.
National tax registration certificate: 610102220523364 Land tax registration certificate: 610102220523364
Piston-type cement slurry pump is adopted for duct mud-jacking with vacuum mud-jacking process.
1. According to the relevant requirements of "Technical Specifications for Risk Management of Railway Tunnel Engineering" (Q/CR 9247-2016), the initial risk factors of this tunnel are analyzed to identify the risks of tunnel chip off-falling, cave in and side slope collapse, as well as environmental risks.
10. N13 reinforcement along culvert axis is arranged continuously in one culvert segment and is calculated and listed as per 1m in the reinforcement table in this drawing.
5.6 Timely inform for acceptance after foundation trench excavation.
The liner relation between air spring load and pressure: 95 KN corresponds to 4.6±5% bar.
Collect complete data according to the preliminary survey results, check existing station resurvey data on site, conduct station topography survey, baseline survey, centerline survey, cross-section survey, station research and sign related agreements.
Special action expenses for the transport of out-of-limit equipment: estimated with reference to similar units;
G577 Hantian-Tekes Section Reconstruction Project
First, Li Bingxuan reported to the Board of Supervisors "Report on Work of Company in 2018 and Key Work Plan in 2019".
Municipal-level and district-level development and reform commission, urban management, construction, finance, environmental protection, business, education, real estate management, tax, publicity, finance and other relevant departments are responsible for the domestic waste classification within their scopes of responsibilities.
Due to non-conformity with the specifications, the appraisal responsibility for the engineering or raw materials will fall on the principal of supervision acceptance team and the construction team.
In the past three years, the project manager or technical director of the bidder was dismissed and replaced by the Tenderee in previous execution of contracts of the Tenderee (including tenderees who have relationships with the Tenderee of this project in terms of equity oraffiliated relations) because the supervision department or judicial office has confirmed the bidder's non-performance.
The reserving and pre-burying is an important part of the Work and its accuracy, integrity and construction quality will directly affect the construction of subsequent professional projects. Therefore, the strict measures must be taken to ensure the quality of the reserving and pre-burying work.
Section 301 General Rules………………………………………………………………………………………29
According to the sewage and sludge treatment depth, the treatment structure of the sewage treatment plant Project will be different.
5. Welding wire and ground wire shall be in place, steel pipe, steel bar and other materials cannot be used as work phase line.
Hazardous waste: waste asbestos, paint residues and containers containing paint, waste containing chemicals, waste oil, waste emulsion, sludge after surface treatment, and waste containing lead, etc;
Fourteen main mineral resources and twelve precious tree species are reserved in Cameroon and its neighboring countries. Most of the mineral products and timbers are transported to ports and sold across the world through this road, in which about 15% mineral products and 40% timbers are exported to China.
18.5 See "12.2.2 Requirements for Ramp-up Products in Stability Pilot Production Stage" below for requirements for stability acceptance.
Chengdu - Chongqing Railway Passenger Dedicated Line Co., Ltd. (official seal)
In case of disturbance in the process of rebars binding, rebars in the drawing may be moved but not be cut off or cut down at will.
The reducing and enlargement sheet steel formwork is adopted for every construction unit (part between two beam door scaffolds).
5 voltage sensitive resistors are provided, code 265~269.
One day, the teacher said to Yongzeng Luo that he had a classmate who was engaged in curtain wall construction in Shanghai. If Yongzeng Luo was interested, he could go to this classmate for shelter.
6.4.2.2.3 Mass Concrete
Moderately-weathered trachyte ④3 (QP): gray with grayish white paches, trachytic texture, massive structure, developed joint fissures, with relatively complete rock cores mainly in short column of general 10~35cm in single segment and a few in fragment, with crisp rock core sound by striking, and hardly fragmented by hammering.
The appointment and dismissal leaderships of Business Division and overseas companies above deputy section level shall be determined by CRFG and Business Division shall be delegated to supervise such appointment and dismissal.
Link up the progress and quality with each individual to improve worker's labor enthusiasm, so as to ensure realization of the duration.
2. For the project, main equipotential bonding box (MEB) shall be set at the general distribution box, and local equipotential bonding (LEB) shall be made for communication mechanical room. Refer to Chinese Standard Equipotential Bonding Installation 02D501-2.
There is unsymmetrical load of bedding at the left side of entry and exit sections of tunnel.
2. For main structure, C30, P8 concrete is used; thickness of the protection layer of main reinforcement: 50mm for side facing soil and 40mm for side facing tunnel. Symbols for reinforcement: ! stands for HPB300 reinforcement while ^ stands for HRB335 reinforcement.
Both Party A and Party B shall fulfill the obligation of confidentiality for the technical information and data involved in this Project.
Local People's Government is responsible for organizing the accident investigation team to investigate the fourth type accidents.
2) The design follows Chinese railway standards with properly considering the local usage habits in Nigeria.
The principle of "the person in charge shall take the responsibility" and "entire personnel, overall process, everywhere, every-time" should be adopted in the safety inspection and potential hazard government.
The management personnel shall first analyze the reasons for blockage and check the degree of blockage. For example, if the pipe is slightly blocked, the pipe can be pulled out for half a meter and then inserted. Such repeated vibration can solve most problems.
To avoid the joints of power contacting rails on both sides contacting with each other when sliding turnout switches, protective measures shall be taken or the joints shall comply with interface requirements for such rails.
Assign staff specially responsible for daily work, establish the work system and define each member's responsibilities.
The tightness of the joint bolt not only determines the integrity and strength of the rail joint, but also restrains the rail expansion and causes a correct and even size for the rail joint gap.
All the metal items and metal pipes protruding from the roof shall be connected to the metal roof reliably.
During the construction of walls, columns and concrete, shelves for temporary use shall be erected and scaffold boards be laid. Concrete construction shall not be carried out in case of raining.
The tensile stress on the total area of the thread root of bonnet stud shall not be greater than 62 MPa under the nominal pressure of medium.
* After the accidents take place, the emergency measures shall be timely taken to control and eliminate the accidents and protect the further escalation and meanwhile, the site of accidents shall be protected.
Making improvement measures for batches of unqualified product and keeping records of batches of unqualified product, keeping the unqualified product at specified area with clear area sign
Monthly Report of Casualties among All (Or Not All) Employees CNCEC16-HSE-CX-08-02-001-2017
Table C.2 – Fire Effluent Toxicity Requirements for Vehicle Components Requiring Certification 6)
A threading plate, threading machine, and wrench fitting OD of pipes shall be adopted. A bench screw or portal frame shall be used to fasten the pipes. Cooling liquid shall be poured onto the pipes during threading. The screw thread cannot be misaligned or too long. The screw thread shall be clean after residues are removded.
The right side at the same side of the station and the right side at the opposite side of the station are built with one lead track, respectively, with the effective length of 1050m.
The water content of specimens shall be calculated according to formula D.10.1:
(5)The fourth-level network is of field bus network, which is also the most critical level of the interlocking systems. It is directly related to safety, and adopts a high-reliability high-speed field bus CAN with a safe and redundant structure, to fulfill connection with the object controller and intelligent execution unit.
For areas which must be passed and cannot be avoided, please increase the bridge span to cross them.
The graded crushed stones that are prepared by the crushed-stone yard and are approved by the Engineer are used.
As of the end of 2017, there were about 9,000 stations in China's major railways, of which more than 7,000 have been equipped with CBI system, accounting for over 75% of all stations in China. There are still new railways under construction in each year, and there will be more stations equipped with CBI.
LED displays include displays located at the station entrance and exit.
As shown by the calculation results: Under the condition of new wheel, when the primary lateral stiffness changes within 1X106 N/m~5X106 N/m, the lateral stability index of the cab decreases first and then increases along with the increase of the primary lateral stiffness.
The rake is of "bucket" structure of heavy loads and large capacity and consists of the rake, rake teeth and the trolley with wheels on both sides.
(2) Possessive interval maintenance project of signal equipment:
The issuance (re-financing included), repurchasing, sale or cancellation of equity instruments are handled as equity change.
(1) If the amount of the change is less than RMB 50,000 yuan, the Priority Project Office of You County shall take the lead, with the Employer (the Owner), the Supervision Company and the Construction Contractor, issue a certificate on-site timely.
In the early period, attention was paid to the difference of response characteristics of elastic wave velocity to different fluids and with the deepening of research, the research focus has been shifted to the in-depth analysis of influencing factors and physical mechanism of elastic wave velocity.
The conformance test shall be completed by Party A or the hardware supplier of Train Network Control System (TCMS). Party B shall carry out the test according to the test items required by the test outline. Party A personnel shall have the right to make comments on the test outline, and Party B shall amend the test in accordance with this opinion as appropriate.
Press the button to move the platform and select the point position to be tested, click on add, the XYZ coordinate values shall be automatically created.
Among the ten trade partners of Cameroon, EU is the first and foremost trade partner. There are 7 EU countries entering the top 10, and the total volume of foreign trade of the 7 countries accounts for 59％ of that of Cameroon.
(1) The deionized water or distilled water is adopted in the solvent used and the tap water can be adopted with the permission of the supervisor;
3.2.2.1.9.Two kinds of OCS voltage
Supervisor: Zhejiang Zhezhong Construction Engineering Management Co., Ltd.
South Sudan originally had 248 kilometers (154 miles) of narrow-gauge (1067mm wide) railway from the Sudanese border to Wau. Other areas and cities have no railway traffic.
There are superior location advantages and favorable policies for the Project. Based on the airport, it is proposed to build the airport/harbor e-commerce trade logistics park integrating the modern logistics, trade, e-commerce, headquarters economy and settlement center with the supporting facilities; it is bound to become a hot land for logistics giants to rush to establish their branches in the park.
The total length of the branch railway lines is 40.299km.
3.4.15 In case of abnormalities during the operation of the transformer, immediately report to the shift leader who shall be responsible for unified handling.
The bridge construction technologies of the line are mature, so except preventing the influence of seasonal rainstorms against the construction, the construction scheduling and onsite construction management should be specially enhanced so as to give full play of the local workers' work efficiency.
TABLE 2.1.2 MINIMUM PLATE THICKNESS (MM) OF CIRCULAR AIR DUCTS AND FITTINGS MADE OF STEEL PLATE
4-channel insulated type unbalanced input; insulated BNC input port; the maximum rated voltage to ground: AC, DC600V
(6) Corrosion-resistant construction materials should be used for bridges and culverts if ground water is corrosive to the concrete.
3) Poles near the crossing, beside the loading and unloading track with running vehicles and on the roadside shall be protected.
In case of work-related accidents, immediately organize rescue, protect the site and report in a timely manner. Organize and participate in accident analysis meetings.
The pore diameter of anchor cable shall be 13cm and the depth of sediment section shall be 1m.
Cushion bottom of local floor of B1F +1.00
Observe the vehicle condition interface on the network display screen on which both the voltage and charging voltage of the battery are displayed;
8.1.24.1 Alamein to Alexandria
a. Prepare the temporary power construction organization design, determine the location and line direction of inlet power line, general power distribution cabinet and sub-power distribution cabinet, conduct the load calculation, select the transformer capacity and wire cross-section, and develop the electrical safety and electrical fire prevention measures,.
The following principles shall be taken into account for the scheme of route layout:
2) Use the Advanced Technical Measures to Ensure Quality
Due to special conditions or the proposal of more than 1/3 of member representatives, the Member Representative Assembly may be held in advance or postponed, but it must be voted by the Board of Directors for approval, submitted to the Ministry of Commerce for examination and approval and agreed by the Ministry of Civil Affairs.
Oil-saving rate=Actual oil consumption/Normed oil consumption
During the construction period, no one is allowed to go into the water without permission at any time.
and provides survey quality with accurate and reliable data.
The spectrum of reflected or transmitted wavelength mainly depends on the period variation (ΔΛ) and effective refractive index (neff) of fiber grating based on the fiber grating coupled-mode theory. Any movement causing changes of these two parameters will lead to shift of fiber grating Bragg wavelength. The relation between them and wavelength variation is as follow:
8) Other additional bid evaluation factors and standards.
Fixed lump sum shall be adopted for the expense for the design of general contracting;
Φ800 cast-in-situ bored pile is employed for the bent foundation; 3 Φ800 cast-in-situ bored piles are arranged below each bent. The superstructure consists of cast-in-situ frame, horizontal beam, vertical beam, track beam, front edge beam, back edge beam, mooring beam, ship breasting dolphin, facing slab etc.
The battery-electric engineering maintenance vehicles (electric rail vehicles) were delivered to Qingdao Anshun Depot in January 2015.
Protective measures in workplace: strengthen ventilation and exhaust measures in the working area, and provide exhaust fans when working indoors.
Potential failure consequence due to the nature of products and services;
Accumulated liquidated damages specified in this stipulation, in the amount of no more than three percent (3%) of the total Contract Price.
Run at a speed of about 100km/h at most sections, under the monitoring of LKJ data test and on-site locomotive speed meter.
For the trunk stream of the Indus River, the lower reach is from Kalabagh to Hyderabad and has the plain river characteristics of small riverbed gradient, wide channel, zigzag pattern, and low flow velocity. The part from Sukkar to Rohri is narrow.
14.2.1 The shell and wedge of binaural wedge-type terminal anchor clamp adopt the cast carbon steel.
The steel parts are welded by low-corrosion high-strength (LAHT series) structures.
The inverted arch section is poured along with the progress of tunnel excavation.
Achieve the process "highlight" by implementing practical and effective measures, enhance the staff's quality awareness and concepts, and encourage the personnel engaged in all types of work the all processes to strive for an excellent project.
2. On the construction site, slurry discharge system should be started in advance to discharge the slurry produced during pile construction to settlement tank in a centralized manner. Slurry deposited at the bottom of the settlement tank can be transported to a designated location regularly.
The emergency first aid training room mainly provides the training on first aid, such as wound bandaging and cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
(3) As for the general layout of the project, 7 positions with poor geological conditions are ruled out from the original microscopic site selection plan, while other layout remains unchanged;
The design can be supported by open-cut spread foundation or pile foundation.
(6) The power switch of the welder shall be set separately.
Other requirements for rubble concrete are the same as those for ordinary concrete.
Besides, whether the elastic modulus reduces or not shall be subject to the following formula:
According to the natural attributes of the ecosystem and the dominant ecological service function types of Ecological Function Zoning of Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region, the whole region is divided into three first-class ecological functional areas: ecological regulation function area, product provision function area and human settlement guarantee function area.
In addition to the above basic constrains, new developed product is required to satisfy the following conditions:
(1) The people are suggested to choose public transport means to reduce motor vehicles on the road; it is better to shut down vehicles in parking to shorten idling time of vehicles.
Hydraulic test for all steel pipes shall be carried out in manufactory.
The General Management Department shall be responsible for administrative affairs management, vehicle management and logistical support in the project; responsible for preparation for office meeting, unified management of documents and materials of the Project Management Department; responsible for personnel management and training of the Project Department and rescues for safety emergencies.
4.7 Each department shall be responsible for collecting, sorting and distributing the knowledge within the ranges of their respective fields.
Technical Specification of Centrifugal Pumps for Heavy Duty Services in Petrochemical Engineering
b. To prepare the project quality plan, which will be organized for implementation by the Project Team upon being approved by the Project Manager.
If there is no greening median on the road, there are many boundary lines on both sides of the road, and the buildings on both sides of the road mainly refer to non-residential areas, it is recommended to adopt overhead laying on the road side, and erect the viaduct on the side with fewer buildings;
Rainproof tarpaulin shall be covered with heavy objects, and its ends shall be bound firmly.
The hook shall be fastened. No one shall stay within the rotation range of hanger pieces. When the crane falls on scaffolds, masonry personnel shall stop operation and stand aside.
Test the public address and guidance functions provided at the exit of the station; verify the correctness, timeliness and definition of the public address and guidance information on the terminal equipment.
Installation of high-strength bolts should be threaded freely and it is not allowed to bepenetrated by the hammer. The direction of bolt threading should be consistent, and adding washers or expansion is not allowed.
4.6 The Supplier shall provide the Buyer with a list of machinery, instrument and equipment required for on-site installation prior to commencement of installation and provision of management services and shall make a clear agreement on the requirements for on-site preparation as additional documents of the contract.
In the plan, all raw materials comply with Chinese standards. If raw materials complying with Australian standards are used, the manufacture duration and cost should be adjusted.
Continuous grouting shall be carried out as soon as possible using a continuous grouting machine, and the time interval from mixing to pipeline grouting shall not exceed 40 minutes.
1) The longitudinal horizontal tube is set on the transverse horizontal tube and tightened on it with right-angle coupler.
2016: RMB 2.66278 billion; 2017: RMB 3.37033 billion; 2018: RMB 1.72160 billion
Certificate No.: 106137201106002796 January 15, 2011
The torsion angle of the tower shall not be greater than ±0.1°.
All the standpipes and the corners between floor and wall shall be added with waterproof layer for 150mm of each side.
 Coordinate and provide the workforce, properties and materials required to implement the Compulsory Provisions of Engineering Construction Standards of the People's Republic of China.
Peshawar is equipped with 4 passenger train washing lines and 1 passenger train maintenance shop (composed of 2 train repair lines with 4 repair platforms in total).
During the construction, trees, green land, pipelines, structures and other facilities within and outside the construction site will be protected. It is forbidden to cut down, dismantle or damage them arbitrarily. Temporary facilities will be set up according to standards and housekeeping requirements.
Contractor: Shanghai Machinery Complete Equipment (Group) Co., Ltd.
6.5 Protection of Wheel Slide and Sliding Rotation-Speed Sensor
GPRS-based State Report Sending
2.5 The steel pipes shall be installed into the box vertically and one knockout corresponds to one pipe.
Table 32Judgment by Using 10% Oxalic Acid Etch Test
Workshops (Departments) which are prepared to implement "coexistence of three types of employees and dynamic transformation"management shall submit Implementation Scheme of "Coexistence of Three Types of Employees and Dynamic Transformation"Management and Assessment Detailed Rules to the Human Resource Department and Enterprise Management Department to put on records;
Upon negotiation between the company and the employee, the labor contract signed by both parties can be terminated.
The advanced geological forecast system with TSP is used to periodically detect the surrounding rocks in front, different reflection waves are generated on different interfaces by vibration waves, and image point maps processed by computers will be used to forecast the front geology, to timely understand the geological conditions of the surrounding rocks in front and dynamically guide the construction, so as to ensure the construction safety.
At the back of upper wall, Ey = 66.914 (kN)
4. No hooks are provided inside the reinforcement for cover plate. To keep the cover slab upright, the mark Up should be made on the cover slab surface during manufacturing.
Fig.101) and antenna (see.
The influence and contribution of dissertation and achievements on scientific and technological development and social progress.
The practice for terminal joint shall comply with the design requirements and the specifications.
Valuables employed on the construction site such as hardware, DG-BMT, construction tools, etc. shall be put in the storage which shall be locked and in the charge of specified personnel.
Each member of the project should have interface responsibility and should communicate with other project members when they complete their own work.
3. The navigation conditions and standards of the river part crossed by the railway.
In the malaria endemic area, especially in the epidemic season, prevention measures must be taken in the high malaria area by taking pills.
Waste reinforcement and iron parts may be sent to local steel smeltery of Chengdu.
Figure 12.4.13 Technological Process Chart for Construction of Sleeve Valve Barrel
Base Period Prices of Construction Materials of Railway Projects (Year 2005) and Rating of Construction Machinery Shift Expenses in Railway Projects (Year 2005) (TJS [2006] Doc. #129, hereinafter referred to as "Doc. #129").
As an integral part of the Contract, it mainly involves the following aspects:
① Arbitration by Xi'an Arbitration Commission (this clause is invalid when resort to other ways of resolution for contract dispute)
Equipment gauge is the control line used to limit the equipment installation and is a contour outside the vehicle gauge.
The main principle is that, pressure oil is produced through the oil pump for the system.
The department in charge is also the project reviewing department .
Economic nature: limited liability company (state-controlled)
5.2.8 After the weld joint is qualified from the defect detection test, the run-on tab shall be cut and the cutting surface shall be polished, and then the polished surface shall be subject to magnetic powder inspection.
3.8.3.2. Phenomenon After Signal Failure Setting
including 1.2MW off-grid control, 4x400kVA off-grid inverter, 1.152MWh energy storage battery pack, 3x600kW fuel power generation system, microgrid control system, etc.
(2) Be provided with product certificate, 3C certificate and the manufacturer thereof shall pass ISO9001 Certification.
b. The lubricant shall be filled under the instruction of the supplier.
The Company encourages the employees to have a sense and behavior of ownership for their own goals and work, have the determination of overcoming difficulties, defying challenges, facing difficulties and completing work satisfactorily and have the professional working style of making quick response and taking immediate actions. In addition, the Company hopes all the employees to have the capability continuous learning, keep improving based on their own work, and strengthen occupational skills.
When coming across gypsum stratum during construction, first prevent the water used in construction from disturbing and damaging the gypsum stratum. Employ the construction method of jacking measures come after pressure relief measures and hierarchical support. Employ manpower in combination with air picks as far as possible for excavation.
3. Matters not covered in the Agreement shall be settled by both parties through negotiation or a supplementary agreement shall be signed.
The repair on conditions shall be performed for the antiskid host, speed sensor, exhaust valve and pressure relay.
Note: The positive tolerance may be larger when secondary cutting allowances for length and width are reserved.
(4) Lift-mounting of joint: use a portal frame in lift-mounting of joint. Tie lifting belts to the pipe which has been installed stably during joint alignment. Erect back beams on the support at the bellmouth of pipe to be pulled in. Use the lifting belts and the chain jack to connect, tighten and align. Pull the chain jack at both sides synchronously. Pull the spigot which is covered with the rubber ring colliding through the bellmouth and then into the bellmouth.
Figure 4.23 Support Formwork for Side Span Cast-in-place Segment
2. When the railway cutting subgrade is soil and easily weathered soft rock, the foundation bed surface shall be replaced and filled with 0.5m thick Group A soil and 0.1m thick intermediate and coarse sand, and shall meet the requirements on subgrade surface, 4% drainage slope on both sides shall be constructed on the bottom surface of the foundation bed.
When the market price of the short-term investment as calculated as per [overall investment/investment category/single investment] is lower than the cost as calculated as per[overall investment/investment category/single investment], the short-term investment depreciation reserve is withdrawn as per the balance and should be included in the current profit and loss.
When decoupling is initiated, the electrical head protective cover is automatically closed under the impact of the spring. When the vehicles are decoupled, the air pipeline is automatically disconnected and the valve is automatically closed.
(2) Reinforcements are used for an effective connection between the portal and the open cut tunnel.
1. Type of asphalt concrete: medium-grained asphalt concrete (AC-20C)
When the ponding in front of culvert is less than the height of wall in front of splayed wing wall,
Plate GB/T3880.1-5083-H321-4.0
When required by the allocation of maintenance base or girder span, reinforced concrete beam with span of 13~16m can be adopted, whose dimension of cross section are same as that of standard-span track beam.
Boten Station, Na Mor Station, Muang Kasi Station and DaLong Emergency Rescue Station are respectively connected with one 22kV power supply as backup power supply from Laos power grid.
for 110/24 V DC circuits
The indoor fire hydrant pump starting button shall be installed firmly.
(1) As deep excavation is required by Boten Station, two-stage slope excavation shall be adopted, with a slope of 1:1. Silty clay shall be used for backfilling, and tamping machine shall be used for compaction. The compaction coefficient shall not be less than 0.94. After inspection and acceptance, the bottom sealing cushion shall be poured immediately.
4) Mixed with compound delayed coagulation early strength water readucing agent.
Provide prompts and warnings, and arrange the products according to the product technical documents and requirements on the product's protection identification in fixed positions and in the manner of "five-five" arrangement and proper stacking, and the original packaging of the products shall be used for storage as much as possible.
2. For section GDK17+125.53 ~ GDK17+355.00, trilateral crowns are provided on the top of the base courses in subgrade bed and 4% drainage slopes are made from the centerline to both sides; within the range of 1.9m in thickness, the base course in subgrade bed can be filled with filling materials of Groups A, B and C; and for the part beneath the subgrade bed, filling materials of Groups A, B, C and D can be selected.
Table 4-4 Inter-city Passenger Transport Capacity in Quetta in Study Year (10000 person.time)
The braking distance under 100 km/h required in the standard is 297 m, while the actual braking distance was over 500 m.
Cable laying and arrangement have been completed, and checked to be correct.
Address: 2/F, B6, Tianfu Software ParkELEGON INFOTECH LIMITED
Note: Half of standstill rolling stock and low-speed rolling stock are considered
A security booth (control room) is set at the entrance/exit of the construction site gate. The relevant security guards are on duty for 24 hours a day; a set of access control system is installed, which has the function of checking on work attendance; the relevant personnel enter and exit the construction site with cards.
However, the scheme also has some deficiencies, mainly including shutdown of the boiler during the retrofit process, heavy workload, long construction period and high investment cost.
Installation of flange single opening exhaust valves,nominal diameter: ≤25
You can calculate annual vacation according to the service period ratio, refer to the rules and regulations of the hotel for the days of annual vacation.
Members of the Evaluation Committee shall vote independently. From the start of voting to the announcement of statical result of final ranking, no one shall reveal, negotiate or change the voting results, and means of communication are prohibited.
5.2.2.1 Air supply volume: considering the allowable strainer dust resistance, each unit shall not be less than 4500m3/h;
[Director of Occupational Health and Safety and Environmental Management]
3.1.11 The surface rain water and snow water within the station should be discharged naturally.
So it will cause three problems, the first one is that design cost is too high.
Since the immediate superior of Yongzeng Luo, a Singaporean, was afraid that Yongzeng Luo would surpass him, this immediate superior always intentionally or unintentionally obscured the brilliance of Yongzeng Luo.
3. Consortium bid is unacceptable.
The Company was officially involved in the cosntruction of the Beijing - Xiong'an High-speed Railway in 2018, and it has actively fitted into construction of "intelligent, excellent and green" high-speed railway to build the new high-quality benchmarking of the new era with all the strength.
Side formwork: remove the formwork when the concrete has enough strength to ensure that the surface and edge of side formwork will not be damaged due to formwork removal.
8) It is provided with the dual RS485 interface, is in the international standard communication protocol (such as Modbbus protocol) and is opened for the protocol; the speed is no less than 9600Bds and no inspection is supported.
The maximum validity period of product under actual storage condition is 36 months.
The fabrication sequence of the steel structure shall be determined according to the installation sequence on site. Since the installation of this project is organized into two sections, the fabrication of the steel structure is also organized according to the section division of the steel structure installation on site.
Shear strength method is used to measure the wheeltrack vertical force, horizontal force, rail dynamic bending stress, bending moment of sleeper, etc.
Design according to urban nature and features as well as local conditions and as per relevant national and local decrees, regulations and standards as well as requirements of the Bidding Documents.
ISBN: 155066 • 1-48858Price: RMB 27.00
Ruling grade: 9‰ for single locomotive and 18.5‰ for double locomotives;
Located in the southwest of Qinghai - Tibet Plateau, Lhasa – Shigatse Railway is wholly inside the Tibet Autonomous Region. Starting from Lhasa, the terminal station of Qinghai- Tibet Railway in the east, the railway line passes through Doilungdeqen County, Qushui County, Nyemo County, Rinbung County, Bainang County and ends in Shigatse with a total length of 253 KM.
Figure 2.40 Vibration Power Spectrum of Long Service Life Simulation Test (Vertical)
Turbine (steam lines - glands - drains - lubricating and jacking oil circuits)
Surveying and setting out are not conducted under the same temperature; one adjusting deviator during construction is too large.
Indicators: three in total, running (green), waiting (flashing green), intercom (green).
(8) Construction of cable trench, drainage ditch and pavement works 10.
The compulsory requirements of design alternation are not complied,
3 The manufacture accuracy of test pieces shall meet the following requirements:
After the current fast-closing protection is activated, the transformer directly trips so as to protect the transformer body, and the operating personnel shall take the following measures:
Manufacturer's Qualifications: Work specified in this Section is to be executed only by an established manufacturer,.
The Company has assessed compliance of execution of incorporated environment-related laws and regulations, and all are compliant.
The vehicles provided for this project are train sets with the formation of ABBA. All of these four cars are motor cars. The train set can operate throughout the day even if any of cars fails.
Yunnan Highway Construction Market Credit Rating Certificate
Gangway foot plate structure at the bottom of interior vestibule diaphragm is attached to the step board. The gangway foot plate surface is designed for anti-slip to ensure the safe passage of passengers and staff.
The examination on the equipment and materials shall be conducted as per the standard specifications and examination regulations specified in the contract documents and the examination requirements shall be prepared separately as per the types of equipment and materials.
Between the AC380V circuit and the DC110V circuit
Figure 5-1Schematic Diagram of Main Circuit of the Auxiliary Converter
Table 3-8 Trip Rate of Study Areas Unit: passenger trips/day
First Issuance Date: 2012-10-12
5. Record and save the identification process for identification, equipment and personnel.
The contents of SOX and HCl obtained in online analysis by analyzers shall be adopted to calculate injected lime amount, which shall be used as set value for loop regulation so as to ensure emission materials can meet national emission standards.
1. Except that the steel bar diameters and steel plate sizes are indicated in mm, all the other dimensions are in cm.
R & D and type test of first and second class compartment seats and seats for the handicapped
6.3.9 Periodical outsourced testing shall be carried out for the pre-treating pool of phosphating solution, and the phosphating solution shall be timely supplemented or replaced according to the test results.
For the Project, 1 set of total station, 2 precision levels and 2 leveling rods are provided.
Install first segment, second segment, third segment, members at two ends in horizontal direction, and the sixth segment.
3. Acceptance Handover Receipt of the Leased Facilities and Equipment.
⑤ The director shall contact the personnel on duty at the relevant station and organize the marshaling and coupling of cold-running vehicles.
All specimens tested in the third-party laboratory shall be imprinted with the marking of the testing department of CSR Puzhen, and the representative of CSR Puzhen shall be on the site when necessary.
Before a mechanical device is put into use, the Project Equipment Director shall be familiar with its performance and grasp the key points of its reasonable use to ensure operation safety.
Running stability test has been conducted to the tested vehicle 21011 and 21012. The test result is not to be evaluated.
The Bidder can visit the site on its own and the Bid Inviter will give necessary support provided that the Bidder thinks necessary.
Water and power, equipment and embedded parts reserved on top of walls are completed.
S.S. handrail is used for kinds of staircases, windows, etc.
10.1.6 Regular inspection, repair and maintenance shall be conducted to all construction mechanical equipment.
ZELC CSR Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd.
Bellows shall be protected against pressure and collision. The spiral connection and pipeline connection shall be tight to prevent slurry leakage.
(8) Construction of land areas with unfavorable geological and special geotechnical conditions: surrounding rock support system and monitoring measurement shall be strengthened.
For multi-girder bridges, each girder of single opening should be checked for crack; for multi-slab bridges, due to restriction of structural arrangement, the outer sides and bottom of both side slabs should be mainly checked for crack.
The indicating lamp, onboard signal indication and artificial illumination shall not cause signal illusion during driver's observation on running cars. A lighting installation with relatively strong illumination shall be provided for meeting requirements of inspection and maintenance of indoor equipment.
Productive prospecting works shall be performed in combination with mining demands.
6.60km to Usman Khatter Station
­Public Transport -- Interoperable Fare Management System -- Part 2: Business Practices [Working Draft] (ISO 24014-2)
2. Technical disclosure must be carried out at all levels before the construction, responsible persons must be defined, and the detailed disclosure shall be documented.
First confirmation—first metrological confirmation of newly purchased or made (including newly installed, updated, renovated or self-made) measuring equipment.
(4) When the anchor is installed, it is firmly connected with the formwork and fixed with positioning reinforcement to ensure that the end face is perpendicular to the prestressed tendon.
4.1.1 Corporate capacity: Examine the qualifications of the legal representative, registered capital, business place and business scope of the assistant company.
600 kt/a Methanol-to-Olefin Project of Shanxi Coking Coal Group
GB/T1231-2006 Specifications of High Strength Bolts with Large Hexagon Head, Large Hexagon Nuts, Plain Washers for Steel Structures
8) The wall shall be built with staggered joints, and the built length of the aerated concrete block shall not be less than 1/3 of the block length.
The shareholders shall, in accordance with relevant provisions, authorize the board of directors of the Company to exercise part of the powers of shareholders and decide on major matters of the Company.
In the project quality assurance program or project management procedures, control measures for non-conformities which are not in conformity with the specified requirements, especially those deviate from the Contract shall include:
There is a transformer with a capacity of over 40MV.A in the main substation of the plant, and a water spray fire extinguishing system is set up according to the Code of Design on Building Fire Protection and Prevention.
Filling material for subgrade shall be allocated by categories according to geotechnique test data and geology disciplines. As for allocation of earth and rock excavation, total excavation work and land use shall be reduced as much as possible. Earth and stones should be reasonably used and meanwhile resources should be flexibly deployed among stations and yards.
Select and train constructors participating in this Project
Auxiliary transportation: After the personnel, materials and equipment are transferred to the shaft station through the shaft cage, they will be transported to the working faces through the underground trackless haulageway.
3.1 Temporary outsourcing: periodic increment shall be outsourced quarterly or annually and recovered.
Press the key 1ZKZ1 or 2ZKZ1 when the main circuit breaker is in closed position and energize the opening solenoid of the main circuit breaker through the closed QDK normally open contact, to open the main circuit breaker.
Used for external cleaning operation of train, set one car washing line.
Middle and upper structures shall be treated as follows before being poured with new concrete:
IIOrganization Structure and Communication Mode of the RAMS
When a 4-car AW4 train couples with another 4-car AW4 train in stationary and braking state at the speed of 3km/h, the draft gear absorbs all impact energy, and the maximum coupler force at the direct impact section is 184.8kN;
Excavate sealing ditches and pave geotextile and sealing membrane.
Network Technology Scheme of Liaoning Bora Petrochemical Co., Ltd.
The outdoor water supply pipeline network in the plant mainly consists of source water supply pipeline network, fire water supply pipeline network, domestic water supply pipeline network, reclaimed water supply pipeline network and foam mixture pipe network.
Reinforcement Drawing for Water Retaining Platform of (ENS12-NS11) No. B12 Abutment
Supplement topographic maps for both centers (scale 1:2000), engineering geological data, providing basis for determining scheme and pricing project.
3. Parameter: 74708CMH, 600Pa, 960rm, 520kg, fire power: 18.5kw, noise: 94dB_x000D_
If the instrument pipeline is needed to be laid on an expansion body, a consternation device such as U-elbow shall be installed.
(3) For reinforcement structure of frame beam and scope of densification area of stirrups, see Attached figure 7A.
Where the restructuring of a company involves the resettlement of employees, a plan for the resettlement of employees shall be developed. The resettlement plan shall be reviewed and approved by the employee assembly or the employee representative assembly.
The Microcomputer protection system test shall be carried out under the "Excition I" operating conditions.
Careful Preparation of Construction Design for Key and Special Processes
PPT for final reporting required to cover at least the following contents:
In winter, inspections shall focus on protections against fire, explosion, snow, frost, condensation, slide and static electricity.
10. When the bottom sediment at the bottom of the pile/groove section is not cleaned.
Construction unit resettlement fee: not charged.
Scheme two is that the concrete cushion block is adopted at the bottom of steel tube and the top of steel tube is exposed out of the concrete surface and sealed by tape winding.Pressure grouting is carried out after concrete pouring is finished but since the effect of docking fasteners inside the steel tube, whether the concrete pouring is dense and firm or not is not known.
Each underground station is generally provided with 3 water-cooled modular water chillers (2 for bearing the near-term air-conditioning cooling loads in the public area, and 1 for standby; hereinafter referred to as water chillers). The water pump corresponds to the water chillers and 2 cooling towers are installed.
Hardening treatment shall be conducted on site for big formwork storage and drainage slope shall be established to drain water into drainage ditch as soon as possible and prevent water accumulation.
On March 22, 2016, in the report of the 2016 enterprise management meeting, the problems and shortcomings were put forward, including: the enterprise reform was not inadequate, the mechanism innovation needs to be strengthened, the economic operation needs to be deepened, and the company management and control needs to be improved.
Breaking Condition (pushing the handle to the end, speed of 41 km/h, full power not reached)
It has provided high-quality air charter services for its customers through close cooperation and has been recognized by customers.
1. Some passage and station facilities can be used.
2) The Supervision Engineer shall review the inspection data, conduct necessary verification on the site conditions, and approve the process construction after the inspection is passed, and sign the relevant opinions and conclusions in the construction conditions column of the Construction Inspection Form for Divisional /Sub-divisional Works.
Remote monitoring of main line interlocking system could be conducted through the central system
The items and requirements for electrical performance tests of cables should meet the provisions in the Electric Equipment Installation Engineering - Standard for Hand-over Test of Electric Equipment (GB50150).
The line plan shall be developed in principle of selecting an environmental line. The alignment shall be selected to avoid the sensitive targets in the areas and make full use of land resources, thus to meet the environment requirements along the line.
1.4.2 The Bidder must purchase the Tendering Document from the Tenderee and registered there. Any potential bidders who fail to do so will be rejected for the bidding.
7) C30 concrete is adopted for abutment cap, back wall, front wall, splayed wall, retaining plate and retaining block.
Perform such operations as cutting off the power supply and disconnecting the network on the application server, the database server, and the core network device. Observe the status monitoring of the monitoirng data processing device at the monitoring terminal and test the status monitoring function of the monitoring data processing device.
Schematic diagram of electric remote control system (specifying the relationship between remote control scope and integrated dispatching, the content of remote control information, equipment configuration and passage mode, etc.)
1.2.7External Interface of Police Power Supply System
Three-phase automatic switch 3RV6011-1KA15
4. Dimensions of the parts and relevant technical requirements shall be inspected as per the drawing. Assembly shall start only if they are consistent with the drawing.
★ Don't eat, drink or smoke in the filth working area.
The construction of sensitive targets like residences, school or hospital are prohibited within this area, as well as any projects that required high air quality, such as food processing, medicine,or cosmetics.
The station is an underground deep buried island station with the platform width of 22m. It is constructed in mining method.
Fax: 086-029-62960090
The data also show that the significant changes will still occur even if there is no sand excavation activities.
Interest rate for loans of circulating capital is estimated at 4.35% provisionally.
·Chemical water treatment system (not within the scope of this agreement)
Its Entrusted Representative:__________ (signature)
The contract amount is RMB 80.4 million yuan.
Training and implementation: Duowei has passed the management policy to every employee through training, job evaluation and other methods, so that they can fully understand and fulfill their own responsibilities and obligations in quality, environment, occupational health and safety, so as to ensure that the management policy is fully understood and effectively implemented;
5 To do a good job in the handover and the normal operation of the project, as a project management company, organize the corresponding management personnel of the Employer to carry out training so as to achieve independent management after the handover, and comply with the corresponding operating procedures so as to achieve safe, economic and reliable operation.
On the same line, several tunnels, bridges and subgrade retaining structures are often distributed.
7.5 If a procurement report is submitted to the project leader for approval, the procurement personnel shall timely sign the procurement contract to avoid the increase in procurement cost incurred by price fluctuation. After the contract is signed, the procurement personnel shall timely file up the contract and enter it into the data for reference.
Ballasted tracks are adopted for all and comply with the standard for heavy load tracks.
Network function: support static routing, policy routing, PPPOE dialing, DHCP Replay, Server, SNTP, DNS proxy and DNS cache and network high reliability (HA);
4. Roadbed thickness, width and material variety: -300_300_30 mm thick light gray granite (burning surface);
Table 2-4 Ferrochrome Output and Sales in South Africa in 2002-2011 Unit: 10,000 tons
Details are stated in 1.13 Description on Compatibility Between Provided Tram and Existing Network.
The Contractor shall be responsible for the quality of construction survey, design and setting-out.
Unless otherwise specified, the structural elevation shall be 50 lower than the architectural elevation.
The field wireless recording terminal shall support WIFI wireless transmission function, upload the recorded voice message to recording network management server automatically, provided with in-built gigabit electric port/optical port and realize remote transmission, and the distance between wireless recording terminal and recording network management server shall comply with construction drawing.
Establish, implement and maintain the occupational health and safety management system, investigate, identify and evaluate the hazards, determine major hazards, work out the safety objectives, indices and management plan, emergency response plan and control procedure, and organize implementation and control;
5) When calculating the loss of pre-stress caused by concrete shrinkage and creep, the tensioning anchoring age is 7 days.
Type and quantity of ISOFIX child restraint fixtures installed at ISOFIX positions are determined according to GB14166.
5. The reinforcement mesh in the padstone may be set with different layers according to the padstone height, the following provisions are made: a:
Fast convergence : When the topological structure of network changes, it is enabled to timely adjust corresponding routing in AS.
Erect an operation platform on the steam drum with scaffolding for construction workers to install the boom and for alignment.
Being responsible for division of work, review and management of detailed engineering of disciplines
2.9 Check chamfer size which shall be 3X3 and transition shall be of R0.5 mm small rounded corner.
See Waterproof Works for Underground Cut Tunnels for the details of placing waterproof layer.
The Regulations apply to management process for reporting and claims arising from violations against equipment supply contracts and project subcontracts for all domestic and overseas projects, as well as management process for payment of related quality guarantee deposit.
Not declared unqualified by United Nations resolution or laws in the Buyer's country according to the provisions of ITB4.7.
Analyze geological data carefully and carry out advanced forecast in a good manner. A complementary investigation must be applied for sections whose geological conditions are unclear.
In order to ensure system and data security, all the users of the system shall be managed in a unified manner. Management of authority by levels shall be performed over the users and the rules on use of user passwords shall be clearly defined. Strict user authentication and authority management methods shall be provided and the timeliness of information confidentiality shall be considered.
Profile of Sanitary Sewage Treatment Station ........... ......... .......M3490C SC-6
During the stay in Guinea, the reception and accommodation of Chen Xin, Xu Dacheng, Li Hanqiu, and Liu Haixiang will be handled by the Guinea Bauxite Company.
A steel ruler level gauge should be used for monitoring in pre-set water level monitoring wells. In the monitoring process, the orifice elevation should be regularly monitored.
a) Before picking up commercial cars (confirmation and inspection), thoroughly check their appearance for damages, stains or color differences.
TDCS system of the line is composed of the equipment in the train operation command center, the equipment in each station along the line, and network and network equipment. The train operation command center system is located in Dodoma, the Capital.
The Quaternary stratum mainly includes artificial fill layer, clay layer, sand layer, and residual soil layer. The basement complex is mainly composed of Precambrian granite, gneiss, and quartzite, overlaid with limestone and dolomite.
(1) According to the audit progress, summarize the audit results in stages, put forward the preliminary audit report, and submit it to the entrusting party for opinions;
For the production safety accident, fire accident and railway traffic accident, the fine should be imposed according to the following standards.
8)The box body and the box door shall be reliably earthed to ensure personal safety and avoid electric shock hazard.
Track lifting and lining tamping machine, ≤1100m/h
During the pouring of concrete, if the surface bleeds excessively, drain water timely or reduce water layer by layer.
Made friendly exchanges with railway departments, operating companies, and technical institutions of Germany, France, UK, US, Japan and Russia
5 ±500kV Jinguan Converter Station Project was award as China Electric Power Quality Project
10kV outgoing terminal of traction substation
The survey area belongs to the coastal area with relatively high groundwater level. The groundwater level varies based on the seasonal climate change, and it largely influences the upper subsoil of the construction site.
⑤ Insulation screen shall be firmly bound, and good sealing shall be provided at the outlet of all coils on the screen;
The material group is responsible for purchasing and accepting equipment and apparatuses for temporary electricity usage at the site, ensuring their safety performances meet relevant product standards and match with the specifications of the temporary electricity usage scheme. The quality safety group will assist the material group to accept the goods and keep acceptance records.
 Output driver stage connected to antenna with a only few external components;
(1) Check the paper filter of the air intake system. Clean or replace the paper filter when necessary.
③ The airfares only cover the China-Iran round-trip airfare of Chinese experts, and do not include the airfares in Iran.
The Procedure aims to specify work regulations in design and development, enabling the design and development process to be controlled and ensuring designed and developed products meetprescribed technical characteristics and contract requirements.
(3) Waterproof layer: 4.0-thick SBS modified asphalt waterproof coiled material
Priority will be given to ensure the finish and decoration progress of buildings so as to enable the site to get ready for equipment mobilization and installation.
The emergency department is an emergency air release valve. It consists of a diaphragm, a piston, a plunger rod, an air release valve, a vent valve cover, three shrinkage plugs, a spring and an "O" ring, as shown in Figure 6-28.
Galvanized steel sheet shall have crystalline patterns on galvanized layer and shall be free of scabs and rust spots.
As REP is a relay module, the time delay for MVB data transmission (③④) is ignored.
c) Provide suggestions to improve curtain wall system.
Construction is prohibited until the geological data are complete and approved by the designer.
242.57 km double main track, with one post and two booths for power transformation; 2 locations for station yard communication and 140 km signal blocking.
Tender documents, particularly the documents related to the requirements of Land Transport Authority; tender drawings.
1.Examine the security emergency strategies and contingency plans for network and information systems during the service.
In the Tender, the curve radius of transfer track is adjusted to R-250m curve based on the R-150m curve in Option M-1 in the Tendering Documents, which can greatly reduce the wheel-rail wear.
The wheelset drive device consists of traction motor, gear box drive unit, coupling, wheelset assembly, axle box assembly and other components.
Stainless Steel WiresGB 4240-2009
The insulator is clean in appearance and intact in whole; the hardware is locked and connected reliably. After installation, it must be ensured that the electrical distance between the live parts and the tower head meets the specification requirements, and the insulator string can rotate flexibly along the line direction and across the line direction.
Other quality indicators of fine aggregates shall meet the requirements of TB14024-2003.
Close attentions shall be paid to abnormal sounds and vibrations during escorting of the Machine. If such conditions are encountered, all escorting personnel shall be informed to keep an eye on them. The areas with abnormal sounds shall be inspected as key points after parking at stations to find out problems and solve them.
2) Transfer and implement the relevant documents from the Company's Party Committee and the superior Youth League Committee;
Drain cock body shall be installed for the water supply pipe and hot water pipe in the place that drains accumulated water in the gas appliance.
Typographer Jiangsu Phoenix Printing Group
Hot-rolled Equal-leg Angle Steel - Dimensions, Shape, Weight and TolerancesGB/T 9787-1988 (96 corrigenda)
3) Passenger train width is (with door open) 4,040mm.
Various rotating machines and transmission machines twisting, grinding, pressing, squeezing, touching, poking, hurting the human body
The project manager will prepare a project risk register that clearly describes the definition and category of risks.
1. Check the tension, crossed position and sag in the erection of bearing cable;
4The tensile load of barbed wire shall not be less than 2500 N.
4) Under the guidance of the project manager, all operators in the workplace of the accident site shall conduct the emergency evacuation according to the exercise routine of the site emergency plan and pay attention to protecting the accident site at the same time.
Corrosion prevention grease is grouted in the anchorage steel pipe to achieve the replacement of prestressed steel strands.
The DN150U-PVC pipe shall be adopted as the drainage pipe, and the drainage pipe shall be laid along the outside of the site at the exact locations determined according to the actual conditions at the site.
e)Loosen and remove the mounting screws of voltage sensor (a total of 2 M6 screws) and remove the voltage sensor.
CNPC Chuanqing Drilling Engineering Company Co., Ltd. Downhole Operation Company
On June 10, 2016, purging and pressure test of the whole line shall be completed.
Vehicle system contractor, power supply and OCS contractor, and construction unit shall provide the relevant interface equipment in accordance with the following list of interface requirements.
Before full welding of the purlin support, its axis displacement, radian, levelness and mid-span verticality shall be checked, and correction shall be made if there is any difference. At the same time, the weld shall be derusted and coated with anticorrosive paint after full welding.
Transfer pipette, pipette, Erlenmeyer flask with stopper, etc.
Dimension of the lifting shaft: LXWXH=7750X4500X3750mm
The reinforcement shall be accurately formed, and its shape and size shall comply to the plan.
The protective layer of main reinforcement is 50mm thick for piles and 30mm for foundation beam.
At the next stage, the team should, based on the measured axial load and the predicted axle, combine with pavement material tests, and further calculate and verify the pavement thickness and structure strength.
2. The accumulation of snow shall not be put in the vicinity of mechanical equipment after snow cleaning.
Domestic water for sites of Project Management Office, various engineering teams and supervising engineer could be taken from tap water in villages and tows along the line.
Spezend-Kuchlak section is of single track and broad-gauge railway. Protective facilities such as fences and enclosures are not set for other sections except enclosures are built within the station.
Date of birth: February 18, 1986
Wasteland, overgrown with weeds, with grass height of about 1m, with overlying layer thickness of 0.5 ~ 1.5m.
If his/her cloth is wet with sweat, replace it with dry one and turn on electric fan or air-conditioner (do not place the electric fan directly to the patient) for heat dissipation as soon as possible.
(10) The load applied on the 4 front slings should be uniform. The 4 slings should be adjusted properly when the elevation is adjusted. It is prohibited to adjust 2 slings first and adjust the rest 2 slings without instrument monitoring.
15-2The contract shall be binding on both parties from the date of signature, take effect on the date on which the external implementation contract of the Project becomes effective and terminated from the date of Party A and Party B's fulfillment of all obligations stipulated in the Contract.
a Wireropes with its actual diameter worn by over 10% shall not be used.
Latch hook strength of rolled wing rail in the primary traction point (for reference)
"Close cock F26 and start the auxiliary compressor. ?When the pressure rises to 680±20, the signal sent by the pressure switch U43.F25 becomes 0."
In case that the live working must be conducted, safety technical plans for live working shall be worked out and corresponding approval processes shall be implemented. Strictly implement the work ticket system when working.
Galvanized bolts shall be used to tightly fix the cabinet body and the cabinet body, and bolts shall be used to fix the cabinet body and foundation section steel.
Natural convective heating, aluminum profile cover, heating capacity of 10kW
The Seller shall submit to the Buyer the Interface Scheme Report before system design.
The hardware shall have enough memory capacity to save fault information. See Article 13.11 for details;
EOMR paper documents and scanned electronic documents should be submitted through the document channel number to the document department of Engineering Company's nuclear power project site.
50cm spacing, external angle of 1°~3°
Then excavation sideline is determined and identified with lime in accordance with excavation depth.
This Standard is proposed by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd.
Concrete is mixed by mixing unit outside the cave and concrete mixing and transport cart delivers materials to the cave and air compressor supplies the air during operation.
5. After the geological prospecting passes the acceptance, 80% of the corresponding geological prospecting costs shall be paid (totaling RMB 0);
L2-Distance of journal centers at both ends of machine, m
Train commissioning on Buyer's site and the work of the Vendor's commissioning personnel shall include the following contents:
If is a failure to organize the staff to carry out the safety diagnosis (without the standing book of diagnosis suggestion), 5 scores are deducted.
Party A shall have the right to deduct the design fee from party B.
Green credits, green bonds and other green financial products.
The first wheel-rail and rack-rail combined rail transit project in the mountainous region of China
The Egyptian party shall complete the land acquisition and demolition and provide the construction site, including the following contents:
Chinese cymbidium, bonsai, podocarpus nagi, peperomia tetraphylla, asparagus setaceus, philodendron congo, fittonia verschaffeltii, scindapsus aureus, small radermachera sinica, small pachira macrocarpa, small schefflera octophylla, and small ficus elastica
b) Form (e.g.: Languages, software version and diagram form) and medium (e.g.: in paper and electronic form);
One tunnel is set in the Project, which may require blasting operations.
1. If H≤15m, linear slopes will be provided for the bridge pier body;
The central dispatcher can manually arrange train routes on ATS workstations or manually operate individual turnouts separately, such as separate operation of a switch machine, individual locking and separate blocking.
When we visited the KL Monorail Depot to inspect the improvement works on May 21, we measured the existing 4-car trains and found that some of the outline dimensions exceed the vehicle clearance requirements in the Tender documents. The dimensions in question are described as follows:
Hmin refers to the minimum height of pantograph pan within the span (unit: mm).
The inner and outer conical surfaces of the pipe connector and the surface of the connector body shall be MRR Ramax 3.2 in roughness; other surfaces not required to go through machining shall be MRR Ramax 6.3 in roughness.
The electric windlass shall be fixed to tow the raft-towing, and to tow the raft-towing moving forwards in all directions, guide pulleys shall be set at appropriate positions.
2 X 37KW axial flow fans are adopted for the discharge ventilation, and to disperse smoke from the tunnel through a φ600 flexible air duct. Another axial flow fan of the same type is set up at an interval of about 1000m for the forced ventilation and discharge ventilation air ducts, and pressure inlet and outlet ducts, and the rest are arranged in the same manner.
Remote control and data cable - Standard technical features for the equipping of RIC coaches
After the prefabricated T-girder is hardened in a suitable site at the bridgehead, a beam making pedestal and a beam storing pedestal shall be arranged for prefabrication and storage. The beam body is hoisted by 100T crawler crane.
Publicize and implement the national policies and regulations on occupational health and labor protection.
Each construction team shall duly prepare supplies demand plan accurately according to needs of project and accurately describe name, specification quantity, technical standards and quality requirements, delivery time of supplies and ensure reasonable procurement cycle.
The wires with different circuits, different voltage grades as well as AC and DC ones shall not be laid inside the same conduit; the wire of the same AC circuit shall be laid inside the same metal conduit, and joints are not allowed for the wires inside the conduit.
——The altitude is changed into 1400m [4, 1 a) in this Version], and it is 1200m in the original version (1.1.1 in version 1982).
1. Standard for Design of Steel Structures GB 50017-2017
Due to poor laying process, there is severe flatness defect.
● Review of documents submitted by the EPC Contractor
8. The building materials shall conform to the green and environmental protection design standards in this project.
2)Words denoting a strict requirement under normal conditions:
Inspection Record of Connector Fabrication and Console Installation for MKD-ELOCO Project
If the above-mentioned works or procedures do not conform to the requirements, the contractor unit should rectify and apply for reinspection after qualified self-inspection, and the professional supervisor should sign confirmation opinions if the items are qualified.
Immediately fill bean gravel and cast cement slurry.
There are two construction schemes for wired transmission network. One is to use the transmission channel provided by the communication system; the other is to build a separate data transmission network.
Evaluate and purchase qualified suppliers of raw and auxiliary materials.
Type Test Program and Report of CRH380D Low Beam Lamps
For internal and external corners, tiles at both sides of the external corner shall be ground into an angle of 45o and spliced into a right angle. At the internal corners, the tiles shall be pasted according to the principle of larger surface locating above the smaller surface or the finished products of internal and external angle beads shall be used.
CPU board transmits the data information to TXS board through MB2.
3. 20-thick 1:3 dry and hard cement mortar bonding course
The cement plant is rich in reserves, with a daily output of about 220,000 bags.
1. Please confirm as soon as possible the complete set of drawings we submitted to your company on July 29 in order that our company may arrange production as soon as possible. In case of any problems, please contact us to communicate;
From February 19 to 25, 413,300 trips were made by China Railway Beijing Group Co., Ltd., including 181,100 trips departed from Beijing and 332,800 arriving in Beijing from all over the country.
 Cables from workstation to the cabinet in equipment room;
Construction Contractor: China Railway No. 2 Engineering Group Co., Ltd.
Compensation for toll free of Jiaozhou Bay Bridge in Qingdao International Beer Festival
Bill of Quantities of Ban Thin No. 2 Tunnel at D2K119+639
0.6cm-thick modified asphalt slurry seal coat+prime coat
(2) Party B agrees the detailed contents of application for establishment of L/G/standby L/C of Party A with reference to the Application for Establishment of Letter of Guarantee/Standby Letter of Credit submitted by Party A to Party B. The final content shall be subject to the L/G/standby L/C issued by Party B.
2 Rust should be removed from the surface of the lamp pole through pickling, then hot galvanized treatment is performed. The Zinc coat is not less than 70um; the surface should be smooth and firm. Plastic spraying is performed at last. The color of lamp pole is dark gray with color card of RAL7016.
10. Maintenance workshop: beam, plate and column, Foundation C35
6.1.18The specimens cured under the same condition shall be reserved according to the requirements in applicable discipline acceptance standards and the needs in construction.
1. Land acquisition and removal along the line should be completed prior to construction; in case of underground pipeline, the involved underground pipelines along the line should be investigated and protected.
Switch on the main control key, switch the parking brake switch SAPB to release position to release the hole train, resulting in green indication
A mould should be provided every 2~3 meters and fixed on ground by using iron stakes. Each corresponding groove should be at the same straight line.
During evaluation of software changes, the Tenderer shall ensure that the software changes are well matched with the hardware configuration and show the functions.
The voltage regulator leads shall be of upward connection mode: the high-voltage cable of the voltage regulator shall be fixed by cable tray. The cable shall be directly connected with the voltage regulator, and no hard bus bars shall be used.
Financial Data for Previous 3 Years [CNY Equivalent]
The bearing capacity of collapsible soil will change greatly after immersion, which endangers the structure of bridge and culvert and the safety of train operation. What measures shall be taken to eliminate the influence of collapsible soil on the Project is the key point of the bridge and culvert works of this line.
Cordless telephone is also provided, for potable communication.
If the full scale precision does not meet the requirements, re-adjust R3's resistance to meet the requirements.
This report is subject to the requirements of manufacturing and loading for trains and the total weight of a train is as follows:
Issuing the Notification of Supplier Corrective Action, the Commercial Department shall require the supplier concerned to make rectification and reply corrective action to verify the effect of rectification.
One cable television room (near the communication room of the operator) is provided at the the first floor underground of south and north entrance halls respectively.
When necessary, the power cord can be cut off with insulating tools such as electrical pliers with insulating handles, wooden handle axes, hoes.
Corresponding technological measures shall be taken at rockburst section, to release the inner pressure of surrounding rocks.
4.3.4The department is responsible for preparing and revising the List of Qualified Suppliers;
At different operation stages of the construction project, the content and focuses of coordination many vary. To sum up, the following five primary relationships must be coordinated and treated.
Supervise rectification at the construction site according to inspection results and give replies in time.
Corner making: Corners shall be made before brick laying. There should not be more than 3 bricks for corner making each time. Plumbing and profiling shall be timely carried out for the corner newly made and in case of deviation, the corner shall be repaired in time.
1) Move time of station machine five minutes forward.
Fluidized system of limestone storage silo (including fan)
During installation, the distance between the leaky cable and the wall shall meet the requirements for product installation, and it shall be ensured that the slot is facing outward.
One leader of supervision team, one subgrade supervision engineer, 3 bridge supervision engineers (including 1 girder fabrication and erection supervision engineer), 6 tunnel supervision engineers, 1 housing building supervision engineer and 6 supervision personnel are set up.
Brake hose connector assemblies, no matter in storage or in transport, shall be kept from direct exposure to sunlight or rain and snow and any other objects that may affect the rubber quality, for example, acid, alkali and oil, and shall be placed at least 1m far from any heat source.
(3) Axial bearing shall be oilless, self-lubricating and maintenance-free bearing, and shall also be resist high temperature up to 300℃.
3. Key Points of Quality Control in Project Management Process
3. The construction of roof, wall, and such openings as doors and windows shall be in accordance with D-A.
2. Test pressure of ground steel tube bearing internal pressure is 1.5 times of the design pressure, and shall not be less than 0.4MPa.
(3) Main substation shall better be built near transfer stations in the line, so as to make it easy for one substation to simultaneously supply power to multiple rail transportation lines;
The man, wearing safety belt, hangs and connects steel wire sleeve and large pulley with small ropes and then threads big rope into the large pulley.
λi - Ratio of box beam width to span, i=1, 2, 3.
Every piece of downlead should be of impulse grounding resistance not greater than 10 ohm.
3. This drawing is applicable to General Structural Diagram of Continuous Pier with height of 15m<H≤30m. See relevant drawings for variables S, i and δ.
When conditions for ultrasonic inspection are not available, representative cracks can be selected for inspection of depth by the core-drilling method. When such method is employed, it is better to choose the widest part of the crack for inspection, and the crack line shall coincide with the diameter of the drill hole to the greatest extent.
WJ8 fine adjusting pad under rail (1 mm)
In this contract section, there are 9 major bridges in total, to be implemented by 3 bridge construction groups respectively.
According to the forecast results of passenger and freight volumes, the details of summaries of freight flow density and passenger train pairs in the main line section and branch line section of this Project are shown in Table 3.-4-13 and Table 3.-4-14.
Stipulated in the manual, and issued with the general manager's approval;
Within three months after operation of the track, timely inspect the bearing to ensure it is working properly with good sealed state.
Use clamp-type ammeter to measure the current at point 72, point 73 and point 74 of terminal block T1 respectively.
The primary truss sections assembled at the wharf are shipped together with the supporting measures support frame, with a main thrust of analyzing the two processes of "loading" and "unloading" during this phase.
For installation of the unit panels of wet-connected sound-absorbing panels, their integrity inspection and bonding strength inspection shall comply with the provisions of Articles 6.4.3 ~ 6.4.4 in this standard.
The construction quality of concrete is inspected by inspecting such items as external dimensions, appearance quality, rebound strength, core strength, carbonation depth, reinforcement quantity, spacing, and protective layer thickness of bridge concrete, to provide data for bridge evaluation.
(8) Interface with HVAC discipline: The substation discipline provides various requirements for indoor temperature, ventilation, gas fire protection, indoor water supply and drainage, fire prevention and plugging of each substation, while HVAC discipline provides power consumption requirements for air conditioning, fans, and fire fighting equipment to substation discipline.
Timely dispose and report significant or emergent work-related items detected in project advancement;
6. Vertical prestressing forces are provided with JL32 fine rolled threaded thick steel bars of 785MPa, tension control stress is 0.9 times the tensile strength, and design tension tonnage is 568.2kN.
5. Project Manager of the Contractor: Lei Hongqi.
(Front end and rear rend are assembled in the same way. The height from coupler to rail surface shall be 889±6. Adjust height on the assembly after carbody-bogie connection or horizontal rail in intersecting workshop. )
1. The exterior doors and windows have the wind pressure resistance of Grade 3, air tightness of Grade 3 and water-tightness of Grade 2;
Verify the customer's property according to the supporting documents provided by the customer, including the product identification, appearance and quantity, and pay special attention to whether the customer's property is damaged during transportation.
The Technical Conditions shall be applicable to the new manufacturing of the 22CBDP1 vacuum breaker, and shall be referenced to for overhaul of the 22CBDP1 vacuum breaker.
HV switch cabinet (including bus duct/structure in cabinets and between cabinets.
To sum up, according to the analysis, it is quite necessary to construct the Project.
B.4 Select New Asphalt Grade and Consumption of Recycling Agent
Our bank promises to incontestably pay to you a sum or sums of money within the limit of the guarantee after receipt of your original written notice of claim declaring that the Seller has violated the terms of the Contract submitted with your original guarantee. The notice of claim shall be signed and sealed by your authorized signatory.
13. The tensioning should be performed in such a sequence that symmetrical tensioning should be performed first for tendons at the left and right sides of web plate, symmetrical tensioning should be performed for tendons at rear, top and base slabs in alternative manner. The tensioning sequence should be based on the design sequence of the girders.
All the equipment covers must be well sealed to prevent rain and dust.
The communications discipline shall newly build iron tower at each station(of which the location is as close as possible to the communication machine room), and the station yard discipline shall reserve places for the communication iron tower.
If the delay exceeds 15 days, Party A shall have the right to unilaterally terminate this Contract and shall investigate Party B's liability for breach of contract in accordance with the provisions of 14.10 and 14.11.
The construction sequence of lining is: Side wall foundation - arch wall steel bar binding - arch wall - secondary lining.
(5) Make sure the power unit, centralizer, and alloy bit drill in concentric circles.
Model: HPE3PAR StoreServ8440
Bridge and culvert works: January 1, 2020 to October 30, 2020;
See Table 2-8 for details of various affected populations in the counties, towns and villages (communities).
1. Doubling yield of rice, corn, sugar and beans to realize self-sufficiency and a surplus of food, with appropriate export; 2. Developing the cash crop with high yield which can assist in increasing income of the peasants and in poverty reduction.
Principle of maximum project benefits: This line is a rapid railway passage connecting South Sudan and The Republic of Uganda. A smooth and fast line route should be selected based on topography, geology, environmental protection, and distribution of economic points so as to maximize railway transport benefits.
On the wall body, an expansion joint with the width of 0.02m will be provided every 10~20m along the line; the joint will be stuffed with bituminous wood board.
The Contractor is encouraged, to the extent practicable and reasonable, to employ staff and labour with appropriate qualifications and experience from sources within the Country.
At the same time, the emergency plan put forward by EIA can effectively control the impact of risks on the drinking water safety of residents in the water source, so that the impact of environmental risks can be controlled.
The up, down, left and right overlapping width of mesh is around 100mm, and polymer modified mortar may be used to supplement some overlapped positions where the original mortar is insufficient. Meshes shall be free of corrugation and hollow.
ID No.: 510321197101095476 Post: Contract Commercial Principal
Stable high-pressure system is used in indoor hydrant system and spraying system of this project. Pump room is arranged concentratedly in each plot. Booster and stabilized pressure pump and outdoor pressure hydrant looping pipe are shared by the indoor hydrant system and spraying system.
The operation method is to select a plan from the list of plan names and then click the "Delete" button with the mouse.
Precast pier bodies in segments based on the different heights, and dry sections or wet connections can be adopted between segments.
6.4.32 Track lining and positioning shall comply with the following provisions:
Temporary facilities for tunnel 3 construction are laid in the sub-camp area. Temporary facilities for TBM construction are laid in the launching shaft area. Temporary facilities for tunnel 4 construction are laid in site E.
The on-site construction roads are temporary roads, and the permanent concrete roads shall be built to combine with each other.
7) The parking lot shall be separately provided under the condition of too long line or limited land area of depot or special operation requirement.
② After the stonework is excavated, it is loaded by the loader and is transported by dump truck.
3. Use WDS for data analysis of engine ignition system
Code for Design of Steel Structures
After the interface commissioning, the Bidder shall inform the Owner and the Engineer to apply for the preliminary acceptance of a turnout zone or other turnout zones 28 days in advance.
Subcontractors' on-site construction personnel shall be filed at General Management Department of the Project, General Management Department of the Project shall review and file certificate holding conditions of special operators, and establish subcontractor employment account, with contents including at least names, ID card No., work types, and other basic information.
During the warranty period, once the turnout fails, local technicist appointed by the Bidder shall arrive on the scene within 1 hour after receiving the notice from the Owner.
Allowable Deviation of Rail Plate Laying
2.4.7 The Contractor shall carry out subgrade deformation observation in accordance with relevant provisions and provide relevant data to relevant organizations in time.
The chainage for Civil Works of Liujing - Qinzhou Port Highway (№12 Contract Section) is K128+700-K140+410.023, with the total length of 11.710023km.
Objective and authentic statistics of "quality loss" and "quality loss rate" indicators
Lime: The metering pump automatically adds lime to the clean water tanks of No.2 and No.3 water plants.
3) MDBF: 1.01X109 h
Check of general plan layout include the contents such as coordinates, angles and distances of red line piles on the occupied land of the buildings, positioning basis and conditions of the buildings and structures, and vertical design.
The excavated volume to be backfilled later shall be excavated, transported and filled synchronously.
The project area is located in the northwest of the Dnieper River -Donetsk inland-flowing river basin.
The Top Management is the final person in charge of QHSE of the Company and shall act on the principle of "felt leadership".
The video surveillance system supports self-diagnosis of fault. Real-time fault information of the main components is shown on the monitoring screen in the crew cabin.
Monitoring sections shall be set up at intervals of 30 ~ 50m along the longitudinal direction of slope or landslide, and observation piles shall be set up at 5.0m and 10m outside the shoulder, pile (wall) top platform, slope platform and top of cutting slope respectively.
8. Set up EVA waterproof board and use steel formwork lining trolley to construct secondary lining of 40cm.
Be responsible for checking the contract performance of Party B, and carrying out labor emulations during the implementation period of the contract, rewarding the good and punishing the bad.
8.4 For soil and soft rock strata, masonry and closing shall be carried out in time after the slope is excavated. The slope shall not be exposed for more than 15 days.
Supply voltage: 380V/220V.
4.1.1.1 *System Structure and Extensibility Requirements
List of Station Distribution for Preliminary Design of Rawalpindi to Peshawar Section of ML-1 Line
Intelligent ventilation system/permeable pavement/recycling of rainwater
3) Make sure the brake of the whole trainset is released.
Mark with a fine steel needle on each thrust bearing bolt locking plate and round plate. One should rotate the supporting bolts with the same forces, and the bolt with less moving distance indicates that the thrust pad on which the bolt is mounted carried less force than the other one and should be adjusted.
6) Wedge block shall establish relation with divisional plane of exposed horizontal concrete plane and vertical asphalt plane.
3.4. General conditions of the Contract (adopting General Conditions of Contract from Annex 2 of TDBBJSF[2004]NO.5;
6.2 Technical Department according to the Importance Scale, will identify the components and characteristic content of grade A (key), B (important) as the objects of process control points, respectively formulate the corresponding control method, and compile them into corresponding process documents which will be issued to production workshop for on-site control.
(1) The operation risks with a residual risk rating of R1 or R2 are unacceptable. The Contractor shall control the risk at R3 or R4 to avoid changing the design in future.
The K25.8-K27.2 section is located within existing Quetta Station range; there are a lot of curves with small radius in station area; 2 curves with 600m radius, 2 curves with 300m radius and 2 curves with 400m radius.
9.1.7.1Screw off hexagon nut (5) along BECU speed sensor (1) to remove it with gasket (6), cable clamp (8) and bolt (7).
The Standard is initially issued and implemented on March 31, 2017.
Installation of operating mechanism shall meet the following provisions:
Make reasonable distribution for sections crossing villages with least demolition and influence on residents along the route.
Unconditionally accept the inspection, guidance and supervision of the local environmental protection testing department and the environmental protection supervision engineer of Laos-China Railway Co., Ltd., and regularly report the environmental protection management work of the project to the local environmental authorities and the environmental protection supervision engineer of Laos-China Railway Co., Ltd.
Measurement is performed at the position that is 10 mm lower than the surface of rail end. If the inside distance of the wheel set is 1360±3 mm, it is normal.
The coupler is Type E Grade E steel top operation coupler.
including raw materials, finished products, semi-finished products and products authorized to be processed.
HR department must establish training files for the staff as soon as possible according to requirement for standard implementation.
(1).The chimney of this lot is designed to a reinforced concrete chimney with the height of 180m.
Location survey of the site shall be conducted according to the design drawings. The survey shall include the hanging/suspension positions of leaky coaxial cable in the tunnel and their lengths.
Under this service mode, the subsystem of diversified payment platform can be connected with the third party payment platform, thus can provide a Internet e-payment way for the passengers buying tickets on site; in this case, they are able to conduct the e-payment on-line of rail transit by scanning and being scanned of the QR code with the Internet e-payment methods such as "Alipay" and "WeChat".
Testing results and measurement unit: see the testing results for details.
5.4 The commissioning area shall be clean and tidy, with sufficient lighting, ventilation and communication equipment.
If the problems found in the inspection are not reworked and treated as required by the construction team or still fail to meet the standard requirements after treatment, the project shall be stopped for rectification.
According to the test analysis in the section and adjacent construction site, the maximum content of Cl- in the soil is 1148.38 mg/kg; the maximum content of SO42- is 2033.94mg/kg.
If the system and equipment supplied by the Seller are connected with the system and equipment which do not belong to the supply scope of the Seller, the demander should be responsible for connecting to system and equipment of the Seller, and the Seller must bear and positively and actively coordinate.
The type, model and power of the lamp shall be in accordance with the requirements of the design and product technical conditions and shall not be changed at will.
Party A has behaviors of fabricating stories, falsifying evidences or concealing important information and facts, etc.;
In the shallow hill area near AKAKI~GELAN, there are more than 40 water wells with a depth of 100~180m in general and a good quality, which primarily supply water for ADDIS ABABA.
Self-diagnostic test can evaluate and report the status of circuit board, sensor, memory, watchdog timer, input, output, bus connection, PCB-level component , and operating conditions of software, firmware, etc.
The results of alignment measurement of arch axis are listed in Table 8-5 and Table 8-6, and the shape of arch axis is shown in Figure 8-5 and Figure 8-6.
Strengthen quality management, strict "three-inspection" system (self-inspection, mutual inspection and special inspection), pass the inspection all at once to prevent rework.
The causes for guide wheel overwear in existing KL monorail trains can be studied according to theoretic analysis.
Allocate mechanical equipment by considering with construction deployment and overall plane layout to ensure the project is under normal operation.
When the highway bridges and culverts structures are designed as per the serviceability limit state, the following 2 kinds of load combinations should be adopted:
3.2.2.3.3 Subgrade Pavement and Drainage Protection
Management Procedures for Product Inspection and Testing XD/XKYX-QZB-0216 (5th edition) -2016
<1-1> artificial filling clay soil (Q/4ml/): grayish white, brownish yellow, hard plastic ~ hard, dominated by silty clay, with poor viscosity, with about 30% sandstone, gray rock gravel, breccia, φ=2~50mm, mainly distributed in the house foundation and existing road in the test zone, with thickness of 0~2m.
Slotting length is 70m and adopts rectangular ditch whose form is consistent with side ditch.
If unmarshaling is needed, the vehicle end connectors shall be removed.
The person in charge of the joint commissioning shall report to the joint dispatching team in a timely manner upon verification that there is indeed a potential safety hazard affecting the commissioning.
The motor hanger bracket and brake seat are welded to the undersides of cross girder and front & back end beams.
Hazard: waterborne substance, non-dangerous, with slight ammoniacal odor.
d) Identify processes that have significant impact on product quality and set inspection points, and implement manual supervision or automatic continuous monitoring for special processes;
5. Dry mortar or plain concrete shall be used to fill between sleeve and square column; when pouring concrete, positions of embedded steel plate and sleeve shall be kept correct, and embedded steel plate shall be kept horizontal for ensuring verticality of column installation.
On Qinghai-Tibet Plateau, a series of east-west mountain ranges are developed from south to north. The largest ones are Himalayas Mountain, Gondis Mountain, Tanggula Mountain, Mount Kunlun and Qilian Mountain.
Total replacement of main busbar and branch busbar, 15.75KV and 16000A
Cutting slope must be stable, and/or the stabilization measures for retaining wall and slope must be sufficient and in place.
4.8~6.3m: auburnish black, light yellow mucky soil, saturated, C=8kPa，Φ=4°，Es=2MPa，fao=60kPa,qik=25kPa;
Weakened plane joint: Cut a crack-inducing groove by using a suitable tool into the plastic concrete during finishing of the concrete surface.
3. Span distance: 28 ~ 31m pre-stressed concrete T-girder bridge;
Air braking unit includes the braking module and the auxiliary equipment.
9In the drawing, the anchor plate is made of Q345C, the anchor bar is made of HRB400 grade, and the connection between is made by perforated plug welding.
EN 60309-1: 1999+A2: 2012 Article 19
a) Indoor fire hydrant system adopts temporary high pressure system.
Hard bends shall not be allowed in the full length of the bonded insulated rail.
Familiar with the operation and management system of soil remediation technology.
Determine the maximum allowable net content of each package as per the package code.
2.5 Resolve the Problems of Aerodynamic Drag Reduction and Lightweight Carbody
Table 2-3 Design Parameters of Double-Track Open-Cut Tunnel Section
(Seal) Special Seal for Professional and Technical Qualification of Yunnan Power Grid Co., Ltd.
16.2All taxes in connection with the execution of this Contract levied by the Chinese Government on the General Contractor in accordance with the tax laws in effect shall be borne by the General Contractor.
Second, determine the defect processing process again to realize closed-loop management of defects.
4. Document manager of subsidiaries determines whether such document is of company level;
2. The requirements for engineering quality inspection and assessment standards for roads, bridges, tunnels and drainage works, and all process evaluation results meet the eligibility criteria.
It is used for distributing the VGA signal output from the media player module to the LCD dynamic map display.
Note: 1. The steel plate with a dimension of 150x1150x8 (L x W x H) is added to the lower bar-type window at the position with ±0.00 elevation;
12.4.3.2Requirements for Accessibility
In order to ensure that all the purchased products for the valve products meet the specified purchasing requirements, the Company shall establish and implement SUFAQPD703 Purchasing Control Procedure.
Upon the arrival of the Bidder's personnel in the "contract plant" or "cooperative manufacturer", the Representatives in Chief of both parties shall formulate one general work plan, monthly work plans and weekly plans, and the Bidder's personnel shall operate based on the plans confirmed by both parties under the organization of the Bid Inviter.
The measuring ruler (L0=1m) shall be adopted to check the steps across the weld after the trimming and before grinding, and the measurement shall be carried out 15mm~25mm at both sides of the weld centerline and the steps across the weld shall be calculated, see Figure 1 and Figure 2.
MOJO Station link road starts from connecting the intersection between existing No. 4 Highway and the urban road, heads for east to bypass the residential areas, turns to north and keeps in parallel with the railway till mojo Station building center, with a total length of 979.922m.
1) The Goods covered under this Invitation for Bid are delivered (or shipped) at the time specified in Schedule of Demands.
Set the positions of the center line of the crossing pipe, the excavation side line and the boundary line of the construction zone.
TB/T 2557-2006 Electric Integrated Control Cabinet for Railway Passenger Car
Omission of team or group or personal issues in the documents issued to divisions.
(3) The Control Department shall monitor and measure the cost control;
In Russia, this line is connected to Trans-Siberian Railway by connecting the existing Choybalsan-Borzya-Soloviyevsk railway, both of which are 1520mm broad-gage railway.
The comprehensive performance evaluation method of the Company should be implemented to evaluate by Excellence Performance Evaluation Criterion.
Pressure Piping Code – Industrial Piping GB/T20801-2006;
Port of Matarani is also a candidate port of the Twin Ocean Railway Plan.
The hoisting equipment must be inspected prior to the lifting so as to ensure the good status of equipment.
3.1 Within the red line scope of planned roads, the construction drawing of architecture of the Project determined through approved initial design.
If any damage and loss are found, the compensation shall be doubled and the related responsibilities shall be undertaken.
To avoid the lightning invasion waves from damaging the 500 kV electrical equipment, one zinc oxide lightning arrester is installed independently on each incoming line/outgoing line of the 500 kV power distribution switchgear.
The minimum diagnosable unit shall be able to be diagnosed by the control system so that causes of failures can be quickly and easily identified. The supplier shall provide the minimum diagnosable unit specification to the Buyer at the design stage;
Neither the Company nor any of its affiliated entities make any warranties with respect to the minimum order quantities to the Contractor and this Agreement does not prescribe the Company or any of its affiliated entities any binding obligations on the minimum amount of goods and/or services that must be purchased under this Agreement.
Design schedule is shown in Bar Chart of Design Schedule.
Cleaning check and maintenance of disassembled pump, with check results recorded.
(2) Recognition basis for and method of providing provision for bad debts of insignificant individual receivables of which the combination based on similar credit risk characteristics faces high risk
Table 1.3.6-2 Evaluation Criteria for Alternative 1
On January 9, 2019, a public tender was released to select the General Consulting Company. In the middle of 2019, a tender will be released to select the Contractor. The Project will be completed at the end of 2022.
Well implement the hygienic assessment and occupational hygiene knowledge education and training works at the industrial site.
The MON screen switches to the "Poor Transmission of Passenger Information Display" failure information page.
Record telephone complaints and faxes from client and related parties to the Project, and feedback the information to leaders of the Company and relevant competent departments in time;
Products under any of the following circumstances must be inspected and tested: those specified in the construction contract.
For Contractor's information, when Mainland ticketing system handling ticketing services for trains with WKT as departure station, the Mainland ticketing system shall communicate with Hong Kong Seat Pool Server for seat reservation, confirmation and other relevant processing according to the interface requirements.
Materials Management Department should be responsible for establishing safety technology files for special equipment and managing the use of equipment. Safety and Environmental Protection Department should be responsible for assisting in checking certificates of special operation personnel, registering and testing special equipment as well as supervising and checking routine safety.
Staff dormitory, canteen and site management shall be incorporated into the construction site safety management system, systematic management shall be strictly implemented, and the site health management responsibility system and accountability system shall be established and improved.
Open windows which bring in natural light shall be provided in Control Room and 1 LV Distribution Room. Measures shall also be taken to prevent small animals from entering when the window is broken.
Party A has the right to require Party B to immediately replace Party B's persons in charge who are not competent to the work or neglect the duties.
3) 10/0.4kV box-type substation shall be provided at the emergency rescue passageway or the rescue station. Box-type substations shall be generally provided near high-capacity loads such as disaster prevention fans or fire pumps.
Supporting advantages: Large supporting projects such as the business gathering area, Aerospace City Block No. 1 and Tianyu Fields International Hotel are under construction; excellent education and medical supporting facilities will be in place through the construction of the High School Affiliated to Xi'an Jiaotong University in the Aerospace City and the Xi'an People's Hospital (a third-class hospital).
Construction of Slipform in Ditch (Alternative 2 Recommended by Chen Dingzhong)
(1) Purchase land in the host country and other countries overseas.
UAV is the abbreviation for Unmanned Aerial Vehicle, UAV refers to unmanned aircrafts controlled with remote radio control equipment and self-contained program, including unmanned helicopter, fixed-wing aircraft, multi-rotor type aircraft,unmanned airship and unmanned parasol.
Lightning protection and grounding of each information system shall meet the requirements of Clause 5.5.1 ~ 5.5.3 of GB50343-2012.
The Company has formulated and carried out Preventive Action Control Procedure to effectively identify preventive measures to eliminate non-conformity reasons or prevent generation of non-conformity, and the Quality, Safety and Environmental Protection Department should take charge of control and management of the procedure.
The formwork shall be installed firmly and reliably, spliced tightly and free of leakage of slurry. The formwork shall be supported from the external side peripherally.
Does the project land meet the standards upon delivery? Does the developer need to arrange removal and relocation? Is the site required to be leveled? (The land shown in the pictures has been leveled)
The Bidder submits the Bid in the name of others, colludes with others to bid, gives bribes to win the bid, or bid by other fraudulent means;
To order turnouts, the quantity and positions of welded joints and glued joints of rails at turnouts shall be determined according to design documents, and welding process, reserved rail length, weld width and stress-free temperature of rails shall be defined.
1.20 Figure 3 Overall Construction Schedule Network Planning Chart
As pipe jacking construction requires 24-hour uninterrupted operation, the labor force shall be allocated in three shifts each day. The specific labor force allocation and responsibilities of each shift are shown in Table 1.
Figure 3-2 Concrete Voids and Pits on Qom Side of the First Span
8. The Contractor shall commence works as per the Supervisor's instructions. Construction period: 1079 days.
(1) Before the installation of instruments, the models, specifications and materials of the instruments shall be checked according to their designed tag numbers.
9) Zhengzhou Xinzheng International Airport - AAA Grade Safe, Civilized and Standardized Site in 2015
The materials used shall comply with quality requirements and be properly places in accordance with fixed-location management requirements.
K75+310~K75+350 passes through a high embankment construction of railway access, with the height of filling about 5-8m, and the filling material is purplish red mudstone and siltstone, and compacted in layers.
Whether the arrangement and installation design of HV distribution device meet the seismic requirements.
Assembling and welding fixture of draw rod seat, pneumatic angle grinder, gas shielded welding machine, 5m measuring tape, 300 angle square, baking torch, infrared thermometer, permanent-magnet crane (1t) and pressing sleeve wire rope (1.5t)
4. The EPC contract shall be reviewed and decided by the authorized Board of Directors of SINH or other bodies before the execution;
During winter construction, slip and fire prevention measures shall be taken for transport roads and construction site.
Dimension of lower chamfer at side wall on Esfahan side of the second span (LXWXH)
Color shall basically remain unchanged in adverse environmental impact, including ultraviolet effect.
For the optical interface of the following specification involved in the Project, the maximum transmission distance should be calculated as follows:
Total floor area of single building: 542.93m2
(7). Pour conductive agent into batching tank with even force; first mix for 30 min in low speed; then mix for 90 min in high speed;
In case of a separate driver's cab, the cab may adopt half-bulkhead or full-bulkhead.
(1) Comply with the air control standard in Article 12.1.1 of DL/T5099-1999, and the control regulations of dust prevention and harmful gas prevention in Section 12.3.
-stress reduction coefficient in the case of shear cracking of concrete (to be calculated according to );
4) For the clearance of the curved section, the inner and outer clearances shall be widened and heightened according to the radius and ultra-height of horizontal curve or vertical curve on the basis of straight-line section clearance.
Minimum value: when annual operation revenues on average decrease to $22,855,300.
Schematic Diagram of Fitting of Outdoor Cold-shrinkable Terminal for 10 kV Single-core Power Cable Terminal Connector (Cold-shrinkable)
Bank Account No.: 7481 8100 0222 60
The distance between reinforcement framework and circumferential reinforcement must not be greater than 150mm and 3 times of pipe wall.
According to principles of planning of internal quality audit, Technical Qulity Department make plans for annual internal audit, and make the planning results into Annual Internal Quality System Audit Planning which covers audit purpose, audit principles, audit scope, headman of the audit team, composition of audit team, audit area, audit time. It is to be presented for approval of the administrator.
Upon confirmation by the operator, activate the PIS system of all stations to display accordingly.
5. The symbol S in this drawing--represents the effective depth of the groove weld, and P4---represents the thickness of the truncated edge of the weld joint is 4mm.
The Iran staff shall finish the operations by themselves, and then the Chinese party shall examine them. The maintenance shall be conducted as per the system operation flow and maintenance manual of applied equipment.
Engineering Supervision Department of Northeast Forestry University (seal)
30 wide and 100 thick outdoor bamboo board with high weather resistance
Predict the demand in the electricity market and confirm with the Employer
(5.1) The Quality Management Department regularly fills in the statistical statement of quality accident of the product system, and reports to the Company.
Masonry structure and reinforced concrete strip foundation are adopted.
Distribution of traffic volume is calculated by the Fratar model, to form the OD matrix of normal trend in the development of vehicle types in future characteristics years.
Third, according to the requirements of the project progress, the research work on the follow-up operation and maintenance scheme, adjustment of track-laying scheme, design optimization of beam yard, conceptual design of station house, feasibility study of the Railway Link Line between Laos and Thailand.
The training contents comprise lecturing and practice with the aim to helping trainees from AMTRAK and Authority get adequate knowledge about vehicle equipment and master basic inspection & repair skills.
6) The land area shall be sufficient and the long-term development shall be considered.
Analysis of the raw materials and auxiliary materials for the entire Project and auxiliary works and utilities;
7) To organize and summon quality acceptance in each phase and well carry out data reporting and filling.
1. The concrete shall be C30 waterproof concrete with impermeability grade of S6. The reinforcement shall be HPB300 (), and HRB400 ().
Start point for short tunnel mountain-crossing option: AK184+900
Kigali has developed a series of infrastructure development plans.
The fencing height is 2m (excl. the foundation height), and the spacing between fencing columns is 3m, with foundation size of 300mmX300mmX600mm.
The diameter of the aggregate entering the drying roller shall not exceed 51mm.
Lookout pavilion (2.8*2.8m, including foundation)
7.5 Daily Maintenance Records of Equipment (ZTT/QEOR713-06-GL)
The blasting operators must wear anti-static workwear, anti-static shoes, etc., and be equipped with emergency rescue equipment as required in the plan.
Frame structure was further improved (traction motor mounting seat, gearbox hanger, brake hanger etc.) based on the designer's requirements
Regulations on Supervision over Implementation of Compulsory Standards for Engineering Construction (Decree No. 81 of the Ministry of Construction)
10.5.3.4 Job Responsibilities of Safety Principal for Safety Assurance
At each point, the vibration time shall better be 20 ~ 30s and the time is also determined according to the situations that there is no obvious subsidence on concrete surface, the surface is free of bubbles and there is cement grout uniformly bleeding from the concrete surface.
(15) The connection surface of aluminum drainage connecting plate and parallel groove clamp shall be flat and smooth, and the installation shall meet the following requirements:
1 SKETCH FOR LIFTING AND HOISTING POSITIONS OF MC VEHICLES
The water inlet is completely blocked and copings are damaged (V=40.0m3). See Figure 3. The side plate and copings at the water outlet are missing. See Figure 4.
By operating the monitor display, the air conditioner is controlled to run in each of 6 modes for 15min. The air conditioner shall run normally, and its parts and components shall act in normal steps.
720 thick 1: 8 ceramsite concrete backfill layer (the cable trench sidewall is constructed with M7.5 cement mortar and 120 thick MU10 limesand brick)
DC110V/(DC5V) power supply
FE output interface of time synchronization system equipment (NTP)
Promote continuous improvement of quality management system and increase satisfaction opportunity through quality policy, quality target, internal and external audit result, data analysis, correction and prevention measures, management review and other methods.
4) Endoscope method: it can verify and determine the grouting compactness at each position of the pre-stressed holes, and is applicable to the pre-stressed holes that can be drilled;
Lowest water level recorded/stable water level (m)
(1) Based on the service requirements and the local natural conditions, such as climate, hydrology, soil, etc., and in closed combination with the local practices, comprehensive pavement design should be performed in the principle of "act according to local conditions, rationally choose materials, be easy for construction", to achieve the comprehensive design benefits of "economic rationality, safety and serviceability, and coordination with environment".
10.750,11.750~11.960;15.000 plan
② Relevant organizations shall decide the organization which will try out the products as per their service environment and load conditions. A Trial Operation Report shall be prepared.
Title (Qualification) Cachet of Department of Human Resource and Social Security of Yunnan
Article 8 Type: Limited Liability Company (sole proprietorship of legal person invested or stock-held by a non-natural person.
However, future events or conditions may cause SDHS to cease to continue as a going concern.
The steel shell features a closed structured of 5000 ~ 10000t after the processing is completed. Like the ships with a similar weight, it can be transported by semi-submersible barges or by directly floating on the water.
AK5+423 (20m away from the shoulder of the border highway)
2) After the construction site is leveled and mobilization, the office area, processing area, and material stacking area of our Company shall be arranged according the requirements of the Tendering Documents and the construction layout plan.
Color steel profiled plate, δ=0.8 760 type
■ Bored tunnel: USD 18 million for tunnel borer, USD 8 million for equipment installation, USD 32 million /km for tunneling, USD 17 million for underground stations.
(6) During the pouring of the concrete slab of the beam-slab-column structure, the pouring sequence and the division of labor shall be arranged reasonably. The beams and columns of the operation section shall be poured first, and the slab at the upper part shall be followed up continuously.
The Company and its affiliated organizations shall adhere to the principle of "prevention first, prevention and treatment integrated" to prevent and treat various occupational diseases (hazards).
The quality problems shall be handled in a strict, meticulous, realistic, just and scientific way during the project quality control. The supervisor shall observe the law and discipline, conduct just supervision and provide satisfactory services.
Storage temperature: -40°C~+85℃
(1) Corrected value caused by route factor (ΔL1)
Railway passenger service quality standard is the rules based on which the passenger transportation organizations provide services to passengers.
Carry out maintenance for the surface subsidence of the back of abutment and butt strap net-shaped cracking, damage and reveal of reinforcement and other defects;
3. For the water gas pipeline buried laying in plain soil, the depth between pipeline and ground should be no less than 0.8 m. The distance between water gas pipeline laying cable on the crossing track and road and subgrade should be no less than 1 m, and the depth between them should be no less than 1 m. The distance between the cable and water supply trench should be no less than 0.5 m.
Only check the function, but do not adjust the parameters.
Typical test curve of transverse functional vibration test is shown in Attached Fig. 3.
Signed at: Water Treatment (Liaoyang) Co., Ltd.
PPP Project of Gongbei Road and Haikou Road Underground Utility Tunnels in West Coast New Area of Qingdao, Position: Major Professional Engineer
During equipment unpacking, the tools used shall not be in contact with surface paint film of the cabinet and exposed equipment.
6.1.1 Automatic Pre-assembly Platform for OCS Brackets
1) Customer satisfaction and the feedbacks from interested parties;
Where the Company buys assets (except that the assets form business) from the joint operation, before it sells the assets to a third party, only the portion of profit/loss arising from the transaction attributable to other participants of the joint operation shall be recognized.
See Table 2 for the RIV test results of one set of 529d type current commutating to jumper connection fittings at a frequency of 1MHz.
(2) The construction of Ji'nan West Railway Station is mainly in the east square of this Station. The construction content mainly includes other parts of the station and the auxiliary parts of the station except the embedded main structure.
(1) The investor shall fully take charge of the construction organization, coordination and management of all works under the Project, including coordination between each relative organization within the scope of works and the contractor. The repurchaser shall support and assist the investor to guarantee smooth implementation.
Bid-winning price: The price quoted in this bidding is based on the comprehensive unit price of one meter of drilling depth, which is decreased by 10% as a whole (including the vertical well and the directional well) on the basis of the tendering control price.
When cutting is done with rotary saw, the revolving speed shall not be more than 800r/min.
At 7:37 a.m. on October 18, the train D3804, with the car No. 8 loaded with 66 flower products (1047 kg in total), departed from the Kunmingnan Railway Station, running to Guangzhounan Railway Station to deliver the high quality flowers from the Yunnan-Guizhou Plateau to Guangzhou, the flower city.
Indicator for FPGA operation: If FPGA works normally, the indicator changes in a fixed cycle (approximately 500ms), and so on in turn in a similar manner.
1-4 natural days: free (including the arrival day of train or truck).
3. All ends of steel strands (including those with and without bushings) shall be sealed with epoxy mortar, and end sealing must be conducted after prestress releasing.
If there is a large deviation from the test data during splicing, the splicing personnel shall be notified to take handling measures in time.
13.3 Party B subcontracts the Works;
Outlet box of MT41-1 motor electrical heater
Each furnace can manufacture 360~1,600m2 of thin CTS slab for vehicle and aircraft,
The plan is applicable to the Company's organizations, departments directly under and branch companies for implementation of QHSE management.
Table 13.8.2-5 Dimensions and Mechanical Properties of CEN60 Rail
Procuring Personnel Labor Input Schedule (Unit: man day)
5. Pressure test and design requirements of purging and washing: as per design drawing _x000D_
Reviewing the stress testing reports determined by the senior management as materially influential, knowing about the key hypotheses of stress testing, paying attention to the results of stress testing and their influences, deliberating the subsequent major improvement measures, knowing about the risk mitigation effects of the improvement measures, and taking the stress testing results into consideration when determining the bank's risk appetites and risk management objectives.
For power consumption exceeding 6 months, the lines shall be configured in accordance with relevant engineering design specifications.
Have measurable quality targets been set? Have quality targets been decomposed and assessed?
5 Balance of receivables and payables by related parties (continued)
The hammering rate should be 15-30 beats per minute;
│ │ │ │ ├─221731.7DK Frame Structure Work Spots
For details about types and dimensions, see General drawing for CEMENT-SOIL MIXING PILES. (Drawing No:
The third is to use intelligent means to supervise key areas.
Binding couplers at the same horizontal line should be set in "8" shape facing to the internal side of the concrete body, and the exposed parts of neighboring couplers of the same horizontal line should be staggered.
1.2.3 Occupational health and safety performance: measurable results of SEI management of its occupational health and safety risks.
4.1.1. Positioning of mounting holes of handrails for side door: Install the left and right handrails on the door symmetrically from the centerline of the door. The distance between the lower mounting holes of handrails to the upper surface of door frame slot is 150mm (±1mm). Ensure that the distance between the two handrails is 794mm (±2mm);
The Management Measures are applicable to all assistant companies engaged in production operations, product manufacturing and auxiliary services in Qingdao Haixi Heavy-duty Machinery Co., Ltd. and the suppliers to be admitted.
(c) Drawing load-time-horizontal displacement curves
Code for Construction and Acceptance of Cable System Electric Equipment Installation Engineering (GB50168-2006)
Fire fighting water will be separated from construction water, and fire fighting water shall not be used for construction.
Lamp poles as well as parts and components are all subject to -antiseptic treatment, and the zinc dipping depth is greater than 86 μm or 610 g/㎡.
3) Braking calculation display area: during braking test, the initial braking speed and braking time under conditions of fast braking, common braking and emergency braking are mainly determined by monitoring the jump of braking command, thereby calculating the average deceleration in the braking process by use of the formula .
9. Upon the completion of stage 4 of servicing mode, carry out the high-voltage isolating switch test to end the servicing mode.
Each interested unit shall be responsible for preparing and providing the required materials of the review it has relation to, practicing management review resolutions, and working out and implementing corrective and preventive actions.
In the BLT mode, the government will not participate in project investment, and the rent is not absolutely equivalent to the railway operation income. Under this mode, the investment risk of the investor can be reduced, and the risk will be transferred to the government or government-designated operating organization.
The Purchasing Department shall propose inspection application to the inspector and fill in the inspection warehousing form to indicate such item is under inspection waiting status.
Power incoming cabinet, lighting cabinet, advertisement lighting and air conditioning load feeding circuit shall be charged separately.
Construction period: 60 months (excluding construction preparation.
25. The piers 2# and 3# of this Bridge are located in the middle of the river, and the bridge foundation should be constructed during the dry season and the low water level period.
Installation and debugging of computer memory equipment (disk array)
2. The place where structure columns of elevator shaft and staircase columns meet shall be cast in situ integrally.
A layer of asphalt infused gunny cloth and two layers of asbestumen water-proof for sealing
The Operation and Development Center of headquarter will exam and evaluate the bidding review management each quarter from the first quarter of 2017, and quarterly results of examination and evaluation will be released in the operation system of each group.
Article 10 The Board of Directors of CR20G is responsible for the effectiveness of internal control and comprehensive risk management.
During high-place work, tools and accessories shall be placed in the tool kit and shall not be placed on templates and scaffolds. Ropes shall be used to transfer tools and accessories up and down.
It is a rail transit system with a low-to-medium traffic volume, where the track is positioned above the train, and the train is suspended in mid-air.
At low concentrations, the respiratory center is excited as a result; at high concentrations, it has inhibition or even paralysis.
In order to ensure side slope blasting quality, presplitting blasting, smooth blasting and rowed blasthole millisecond blasting shall be used in combination with appropriate blasting parameters to reduce shock wave impact and boulder frequency to decrease recrushing frequency and facilitate transport and filling.
Maintenance inside the raw mill (including the tube mill and vertical mill)
5)Automatic return to base station: If the elevator has no instruction and idles for 5 minutes, return to the base station automatically (for the location of the base station, see Table 5.2-1 and Table 5.2-1: Statistics for Setting Up of Elevator without Machine Room at the Main Line Station of Luoyang Urban Rail Transit Line 1 Project).
5.4.1.1.1 An employee shall use the name same as the name on his ID card to sign the labor contract, and the information provided in the labor contract shall be accurate and authentic.
V-shaped trench shall be used in trench excavation in rock works. Smooth blasting is used for surrounding rocks. YT-28 pneumatic drill is used for drilling in trench excavation.
At the construction sections located at villages and residential area, construction machinery with strong noise will be prohibited using at night (22:00-6:00) and the vehicles and ships will be prohibited whistling.
The gas breaks through the battery case. The liquid electrolyte foam and the like are sprayed.
Financial liabilities resulting from the transfer of financial assets that do not meet the conditions for derecognition or from continuous involvement in the transferred financial assets
Dangerous goods transport tankers and other containers shall comply with the relevant national laws, regulations and standards.
(3) Compared with excavators with large bucket capacity, such excavator has greater advantages in ore sorting and improvement of ore recovery rate and that.
20MW Solar Energy Integrated Utilization PV Power Station Project in Wudi County, Binzhou City
Deputy General Manager in Charge of Construction of the Company: is responsible for approval of the criteria and process control procedures of environmental management and operation, and approval of rules and regulations.
According to the characteristics of the constructional engineering, the risks of the constructional engineering can be divided according to objectives (process, quality, safety), time (design stage, preparation stage and construction stage), structure (individual works and unit works) and influencing factors:
The sum of total plots (in initial construction phase) in each parcel of the same plot shall not be larger than the planning construction capacity.
5 Costs of the shop drawing review, payment methods and methods linked to the review methods;
Inspection Table of Product Usage and Maintenance Manual (continued)
During concrete curing, the differences between temperatures of internal and surface concrete and between surface temperature and ambient temperature shall not be above 20℃ (or otherwise 15℃ for concrete of beam body).
3.1.8.1 The inspection of capacity and efficiency shall be as follows:
There are 8 items in total. Upon examination and verification, all the 8 items meet the standard requirements.
After hydrostatic test is passed, the Contractor shall remove drainage and ventilation facilities and install strip-shaped male plug with sealing welding anticorrosive protection tape.
The Compulsory Provisions of Engineering Construction Standards: Building (Edition 2013)
Nanjing port green integrated system engineering research center
7.1 Q/HXZ02.13Procurement Control Procedure
After hammering several times, tighten the nut and weld the nut with spot welding.
4. The costs incurred for completing the above obligations under the Summary shall be borne by the Nepalese side.
5. Area 1 is coloring area, and dimensions of such area shall comply with signed interface; its specific color shall conform to sample.
The braking system of EMU has the function of coupler failure protection. When the EMU is separated, the motor car, trailer car and control car can all produce emergency braking effect, and the motor car will cut off the traction power.
Contact the manufacturer to complete the operation and maintenance work of heavy and large-scale equipment; inspect, direct and assess the material purchase and management of each construction team.
Figure 4-54 Vertical Crossing Arrangement Diagram of Node
Urumqi Municipal Environmental Protection Agency Atmospheric Monitoring Station Project of Urumqi Municipal Environmental Protection Agency-Site 11 Midong Environmental Protection Agency
The original printing of the document (first issue) is marked with the number 0, and the subsequent modifications are marked by the serial number (01, 02, 03, 04...).
│ │ │ │ QOROQCH Section.qqq
The transfer time shall satisfy AMS 2772F standard, and strips in the transfer space shall make sure the temperature drop is ≦6℃(at the constant temperature of 500℃);
Pixel: 8 million; camera storage capacity: 32G
The full length of the new line is 1319.766km, including 149 bridges (4 are frame bridges) with 152,191 linear meters accounting for 11.5% of the line; there are also 27 highway bridges covering 54,617.5m2 and 2727 culverts in 34,764 horizontal linear meters.
(2) Check, fit and scrape that the contact face between the upper, lower slides and the crosshead body and guide shall be uniformly contacted more than 50%.
Tube side gas: common flow rate range 5~30 m/s.
(3) TEDS for running of high-speed train: one set of TEDS detection station equipment for down line of Yun Gui line at Kunming Nan station, and one detection station machinery house.
Devices/components that violate provisions in Part 3-1 and Part 3-2 of Standard EN 50121 are not allowed to be installed on rail transit vehicles.
The negative pole of the 24V power supply for the FIMO chassis is sourced from the connection power supply output terminal on the TB1 terminal block of the interlocking cabinet, and the positive pole is sourced from the cabinet power bus bar.
In 2018, China had railways with a total length of 128,000 kilometers in operation, with more than 8,000 passenger trains and 20,000 freight trains running per day on average. The annual railway freight volume reached 4.022 billion tons and the railway passengers nationwide reached 3.37 billion.
1. The current major risks faced by the enterprise and its impact;
Hanzhuang Pump Station Pivotal Project in Hanzhuang Canal Section (Batch 7) in Shandong Province
To participate in equipment arrival acceptance, goods handover and unpacking inspection as required.
5.1.1.1 Manual release objects include the leadership, various functional departments, directly controlled units and subordinate units, related parties and related HSE management personnel of Kingdream. The manual shall be issued according to the release list prepared by Production Management Department (HSE Management Department).
The tensile strength of single piece of φ25 finish-rolled screw-thread steel bar is:
4. Each station area shall be equipped with the corresponding fire-extinguishing facilities as required.
2. This bridge is designed for flood discharge and overpass. The water flow of a 100-year flood is 107.6m3/s as provided by GP. The figure is still being reviewed. Construction can commence after our institute has reviewed the span and foundation in the final draft to be presented by GP.
We have designed a modern, attractive, multi-lifestyle complex that provides the public with facilities to support the World Cup, theme resorts and entertainment programs.
③ major administrative staff and technical staff shall be staff with plentiful engineering construction experience.
The urban public traffic system is a very complicated system because it integrates many modes of public transportation.
The content includes guardrail, traffic sign, traffic marking, etc.
Standard EN13452-1 shall be met. Under the AW2 load conditions, with the half worn wheel, on a straight track:
Meanwhile, the Personnel Department of the Company appoints other production technicians and requires them to successively mobilize into construction site within 7 days.
Without damaging the surface soil and vegetation outside the construction camp, the trees in the expropriated land shall be preserved as much as possible.
Ensure the angle cock and the main angle cock open;
2. Reinforced concrete girder: after the reinforced concrete girder is filled with concrete, remove the 2 spans of temporary steel bridge, drive in 3 temporary steel pipe piles and remove the temporary steel bridge to the position 1.5m away from the construction span to be constructed.
To check the unit name, model, specification, package box number, number of boxes and check the packing condition.
This section passes through the pond and the wastewater discharge tank. The soil body on the surface layer is soaked by surface water for a long time, so it is mainly of soft plastic shape and locally of flow plastic shape, belonging to soft soil.
Power Plan of Floor 1 and Floor 2 of 2#~6#
Table 6.11.3 Requirements on Digits of Office Calculation Numbers
For welding on Q235 steel, E4315 or E4316 (φ4 or φ5) is adopted as the welding wire.
The direction change switch HKF is used to change the direction of the current flowing through the excitation windings of the six DC traction motors so that the DC traction motors can change the direction of rotation and thus to change the running direction of the locomotive.
The excavation depth of each layer in the vertical direction is 500 mm under the soil nail, and the longitudinal sections are 10-20 m in length according to the length of ordinary soil layers and rock formation.
The bench cut method is applied in tunnel excavation of standard cross-section of the tunnel, and this is a method that will divide the tunnel design section into two times, in which the upper bench is ahead of a certain distance, the upper and lower benches exist together during the construction.
BAS system shall be designed based the passenger service and production control platform or reserve access conditions of the passenger railway station where the BAS system will be accessed to.
Goods and materials packed and packaged shall be kept stable in cases; if there are packing lists and corresponding technical documents, obvious product logos and protective marks (such as rain-proof, fragile, overturn, placement direction, etc).
8.3.1The General Contractor shall formulate a special interface management plan. After confirmation by the Buyer, the General Contractor shall coordinate with suppliers in other relevant disciplines and implement it.
.1.6 After the surface grouting is completed, post inspection holes shall be set according to the design requirements to check the grouting effect, and the grouting holes shall be adequately blocked.
(3) Mixture mixing: the asphalt mixing plant shall be accepted by the Engineer before use. During mixing, various materials shall be controlled according to the following temperatures: asphalt heating temperature 155-165℃, mineral heating temperature 165-175℃, and mixture temperature 160-170℃.
(7) The power loss of capacitor including discharge resistor shall not be larger than 0.4W/kvar.
Figure 10.11 shows the siltation thickness distribution in the trench for continuous spring, moderate and neap tides for 15 days in flood season after the element is overlapped.
Stage 4 Construction Project in K10 Block for Stage 2 Reconstruction Project in Shilipu Urban Village in Hanyang District
By calculation, the characteristic value of live load NQ = (2.5+2 ) X0.9X0.9 = 3.645 kN;
6SC32 From fire control room to pump room
 Display mode: super bright white series LED digital tube (tentatively) shall be adopted;
The GEV concrete construction process is spreading, grout production, grouting, vibrating and to the next strip.
There are about 187 km special railway for gold transportation in Guyana, but currently, public railway transportation business has not initiated.
23.3 For any envelope not sealed and marked as required, the Buyer is not liable for wrong sending and early unsealing.
(6) Technical requirements for survey and design (see the current relevant standards, norms and regulations promulgated by the national and the provincial authorities as well as the bidding documents of party A);
(Wikipedia) In July 2017, Belgrade municipal government released the overall traffic planning.
In order to use the test device in a correct and safe manner, to safeguard the personal safety of testers, and to guarantee the smooth implementation of test, attention shall be paid to the following items:
Each station with a distribution substation in the whole line shall be provided with a new 10/0.4kV substation for power supply for the station equipment from one circuit, which is led from the feeder of the distribution substation, and shall be equipped with 10/0.4kV special box substations dedicated for the power supply of communication signals, of which the two-circuit 10KV power supply is led from the 10KV continuous power lines and the station feeder.
4. If the hot blast valve of the mill has not been closed, it is strictly forbidden to enter the powder concentrator for maintenance operations.
GB/T13384-2008 General Specification for Packagings of Mechanical and Electrical Products
Arrange reasonable construction date for embeddment of other instruments base on the construction progress. The embeddment shall be conducted in strict accordance with design requirements and engineer's requirements to ensure quality of embeddment.
When measured chemical composition and mechanical property are of threshold values, significant digit shall be rounded in accordance with this standard and rules for rounding shall be implemented in accordance with GB/T 8170.
Report on small scale test of remediation and process parameter of POPs and arsenic contaminated soil;
4.2.2.2 Ambient Temperature of Speed Transducer and Pressure Transducer
A passenger information system which highly integrates he such functions as the guide, broadcasting, monitoring and wireless communication has been built along the METRA railway line in Chicago, America. A control center is provided for this passenger information system to conduct centralized management and control of all the 239 stations along the railway line and automatically release the guide and broadcasting information according to the train timetable.
Passenger ticket system: According to the maximum number of passengers in peak hours at station, station-class passenger ticket system will be provided at the scale of small station for new passenger stations along the line.
In this case, the final clutch of the power gearshift gear-box must be disengaged to cut off the power transmission line and thus stop the torque transferred back from wheels so as to keep wheels of the track dynamic stabilizer in free wheel status.
However, it can be either mechanical excavation or manual excavation.
10.8.4 Noise Elimination and Vibration Absorption Measures
Figure 4 Humidity-shrinkage development values and test results of concrete under dry-wet cycle conditions
Total usage of HRB335 reinforcement (≥Φ10): 8,153 (kg)
In case of train delay on large scale, if the train cannot resume the normal operation via train reduction, departure intervals shall then be readjusted and trains operated in accordance with the corresponding abnormal mode.
Q: What are the most satisfactory aspects for this resettlement?
2)Corresponding cooling power calculation values (temperature, heat quantity, volume flow, pressure drop, etc.) for all cooling systems shall be submitted and coordinated with ZELC; a proper margin shall be kept for the cooling system.
All raw materials of concrete are measured according to the mass, the batching shall be weighted according to the batching list.
d. The special PV high-voltage lightning arrester is equipped between the DC output busbar positive pole to ground, negative pole to ground and the positive and negative pole;
Horizontal seismic force=48.99kN/m2
The Contractor must submit all necessary documents to the Marine Guarantee Inspector for review in accordance with the requirements instructed in NRF-041-PEMEX-2014, and report it to PEP which reserves the right to make the comments without affecting the contract time and costs.
6.00 m ~ 8.50 m from the left side of abutment
Total Cl- content in the materials shall be no more than 0.06% of the cementitious materials.
b. 2.5 (F1+F2/2)
This Project is located in Namangan, across Pop, Chust and Turakurgan.
When the electric service sector works with the track maintenance sector to replace frogs and steel rails, and perform stress relief operations, a large number of match lines, jumpers, and other connection lines need to be installed.
[Building storey]: 70 floors aboveground and 6 floor underground
If parked for a longer period of time (more than 1 month), the locomotive should be sealed by the use unit.
7.7.11.3 HSSE Inspection Content
Local indicating instruments shall be installed close to relevant valves.
Equipment and Material Group: Assist the Chief Commander in site commanding of engineering rescue and urgent repair and dispatching emergency equipment. Be responsible for supplying and transporting emergency materials.
The net is 3 mm-diameter double-galvanized-wires hexagonal net:
The vertical plane shall be gentle and conform to the minimum radius of vertical curve required for visibility.
③ At the joint of air vent, manhole and wall or column surface, the panel shall be sealed properly, without exposed white joint.
Article 18 The company may reduce its registered capital due to operating losses, but the reduced registered capital shall not be lower than the minimum amount stipulated in the Company Law.
Fix the bracket on the bottom plate according to the data in the construction drawings, wherein the axis of the bracket beam shall be located on the axis of the shell of the intermediate phase of the enclosed bus, and the elevation margin above the bracket shall not be more than ±5mm.
⑤ A Have breakfast →B Feedback meeting →C Have lunch → Airport drop-off
Time, entity and personnel of reporting of the accident, and telephone number.
All test results shall be submitted to the Engineer for approval, and all fees shall be borne by the Contractor.
Packaging, storage and delivery of the section insulator shall comply with the relevant requirements in national and industrial standards.
The locking bolts of the paper guide shall rotate freely, and locking shall be reliable.
Pressure wave of tunnels meeting at monitoring points 7, 8, 9 in the tail car (Unit: Pa)
5.4.3.6 When the air pressure reaches 0.45 Mpa during powder spraying or air injection, the injection pipeline may be blocked.
(Direction of the blast hole: the intermediate main blast hole is vertical to the borehole and presplitting hole at the side slope has the same slope with the side slope..
Full-time personnel will be arranged to manage vibration in concrete pouring just in case that vibration is missed or too much.
3.3.1 Prediction Method of Traffic Volume and Description of Steps
Standard for Lighting Design of Buildings (GB 50034-2013)
Operation of Station Yard and Freight Equipment mainly introduces the composition of railway lines, and the functions, equipment and layout of various railway stations.
(3) The concrete is poured in layers according to a thickness of 30cm. The concrete should be uniformly distributed and the layers should be kept horizontal. The upper layer concrete should be poured before the lower layer concrete is initially set or can be reshaped.
The concrete vibration of four corners at the base of columns shall be strengthened so as to prevent the poor connection at the base and fragmentary corner angles due to missed vibration.
High level design group shall discuss over system architecture design, project standard, file specifications and code conventions, interface, division and description of modules, data dictionary and database design as per Software Requirement Specification, Design Process and Graphic Design Process.
Concrete scaling, S=16.95㎡, as shown in Figure 3-3
Refrigerating capacity: 4.5kW; Power: 0.4kW
For Dunkwa- Takoradi section, the line is 163 km long with 23 stations.
Review and endorse the "Application for Inspection Concerning Breakthrough Survey Results" submitted by the contractor, review such aspects as measurement accuracy and balancing results, make endorsement when being proved qualified, and report the details to the Chief Supervisory Engineer.
No inter-bank lending, misappropriation or other illegal use of funds shall be allowed.
(7) Emphasis on project experience summary and accumulation: The technical experience and management experience of the Joint Venture Project shall be the wealth of all parties in the joint venture. Special personnel shall be assigned for sorting and summarizing at each stage of the project in terms of the capabilities and characteristics of the project personnel.
Wide entry way so as to make cattle be more comfortable; spatter shield can effectively avoid dung flowing into the underground tunnel, then causing pollution to milking equipment and underground tunnel.
Note: ① All members of the JV (as the Contractor) shall be listed one by one, and shall sign and seal.
12.14.3.2 For a delay of every seven days (duration less than seven days shall be calculated as seven days) as compared to the normal final acceptance time, the compensation shall be 0.5％ of the contract price.
(4) Regularly show AIDS publicity and education videos.
K80+626.00 Pongxong Village Medium Bridge General Layout of Bridge Type
After the occurrence of construction delay, the contractor shall submit the Intention Report for Construction Delay within the specified period in the contract;
The assembly of fixed stairs, folding stairs, handrails and stair supports and their accessories shall be deemed to have been completed when the above elements have been at the final position and all work has been completed in accordance with the scope, drawings and specifications.
Arrange full-time doctors and ambulances to be on duty 24 hours a day, ready to deal with all kinds of emergencies and accidents.
During transportation of the door and frame, hanle them gently and take protective measures to avoid being pressed, collided and damaged;
Organize the preparation of the rules for supervision of test and detection, and test and detection schemes.
left 20 mm; right 20 mm;
Notes: 1. this form shall be filled out by the application department (in duplicate: one copy for recording and one copy for the Procurement Department);
According to the design code for lightning protection, all structures, buildings and process devices, such as towers and reactors, are provided with direct lightning protection and inductive lightning protection, which is reliably connected to the grounding grid of the plant.
See Table 4-11 for the equivalent stresses of plastic sleeve + stainless steel sleeve + stirrup under the resultant forces.
Spherical steel bearing (TJQZ-TQ 8361-30000ZX-0.1g)
In such condition, the maximum pulling/dragging speed depends on the weight of the pulling/dragging train and the weight of the pulled/dragged train and the available braking conditions.
This standard is applicable to flame retardant materials for railway locomotives and vehicles with a highest operating speed lower than 200KM/H.
1.5.5.2 Prefabricated Box Girders (248) and T-beams (510)
Tools to ensure thickness of such lift including measuring stick, hand-held lamp etc. shall be provided for construction.
No3-6First Pass Yield Statistical Record of Assembly of Assembly Workshop (January-October)in 2016
As the local traditional architectural elements are used in this scheme, the form of big roof and side corridor is incorporated into the teaching building, aiming to build a well-equipped school that has complete functions and a beautiful environment.
2) For train level, WTB is arranged throughout the whole train to realize coupling of two trains, and trains can adapt to coupling configuration in any direction.
Layout Plan of Water Supply and Drainage for Main Control Building at \U+00B10.000m
City tap water is used as water source. Temporary high pressure fire water supply system is adopted.
(5) Unsteady image of the display: Check whether video signal output of the main unit works normally, the video distributor is damaged, the video signal line is flexible or split away, and the pin or line is disconnected.
Technical Standards of Highway Engineering of the People's Republic of China (JTG B01-2014);
(2) Handling of quality defects and quality accidents
The Supplier shall submit the notice of product acceptance inspection 10 working days before the delivery date.
Flow: 3.64l/min, pressure: 196bar
(2) Time guarantee: once the contract is signed, our company will immediately contact the manufacturer to place an order and transport the corresponding model/specifications of materials in our inventory items to guarantee the first batch of materials will be delivered to site before the project are commenced. Other batches of materials will be delivered to site as planned to guarantee that the project will be commenced on schedule.
0:m3;1 (for calibration by manufacturer)
For steel girder support, steel pipe supporter shall be adopted.
2. The Ban Ka No.1 Tunnel has a total length of 4600m, with entry mileage at DK150+450 and exit mileage at DK155+050.
Mitubiri: located in Muranga County, the station will mainly attract the outbound agricultural products as well as the inbound living materials.
An example of measured σzul is given in Example 2 of Appendix.
14.9 The Internal Letter of Responsibility comes in in sextuplicate including two originals and four duplicates, one original and two duplicates for either party.
Feeding hydraulic pump 1 → left position of hydraulically-operated reversing valve 2 → AG clutch engagement; scavenging FG clutch → left position of hydraulically-operated reversing valve 2 → one-way valve 4 → oil filter 5 → fuel tank.
23. Design Drawing of Construction Site at CH487+131~CH487+166
2.5.4.2.1.2. Installation of Inner and Outer Hot-galvanized Steel Pipes, Double-sided Plastic-lined Steel Pipes and Plastic Lined Galvanized Steel Pipes
7). Excavation and backfilling, blasting, operation in confined space, installation, hot work, radiographic operation, and electrical operation;
The tasks and obligations of the Seller and the Suppliers of vehicle and the third-party systems shall be specified at the design liaison stage and confirmed by the Buyer.
To make tight vertical joints of brick masonries, leave no potential hazard of water seepage and increase the shear resistance of masonries, standard bricks shall be laid by trying to squeeze the mortar whilst other bricks shall be laid by adding mortar to the entire bottom of every brick.
3) Collected feedback of external events, and no external event of malfunction arising from binding was found. This mode of failure was the first one in the GNPS.
Uuw1, AC bus UW-phase line voltage (-32767~+32767, 1=1V)
Inspect whether the cabinet has qualification certificate, whether the paint of the cabinet surface is intact, whether the cabinet is bumped and for other abnormities.
The bearing capacity is deemed as optimal when the ratio of span to radius is 1.66.
⑨ Wooden door leaves must be installed firmly, and shall be flexible in closing and opening, with closed tightly, free from inverted buckling.
The capacity of standby power supply of controller battery could meet the 8-hour operating requirements.
In order to achieve the Company's goals and decomposition objectives, the management system planning is performed.
In case that inner wall of pool (well) made up of cast-in-place reinforced concrete adopts wooden framework and is relatively thin, vertical cracks with various depth and length are encountered on pool (well) wall after framework removal.
Emergency plan of network and information system emergency incident treatment
Two work conditions shall be considered in the transversal direction of the bridge. The load mode 1 is one-wheel load loading at the moving of transversal direction; the load mode 2 is two-wheel load loading at the moving of transversal direction with space of 3.48m.
The specific cross-sectional layout is: 0.75m soil shoulder + 3.5m slow lane + 2X3.5m carriageways + 3.5m slow lane + 0.75m soil shoulder = 15.5m.
The communication function of LAN
Steel pipe pile (Φ1020mm δ10mm)
Talent Training Program for Railway Locomotive Discipline (International Cooperative Class)
At present, ISO tank containers are rare in domestic railway transportation. The ISO tank containers used in this Project require only a small amount of maintenance. When the manufacturer is determined in the following stage, the Park will be provided with small quantities of maintenance facilities; this part of investment is not charged into the estimation of the Feasibility Study.
(4) Feasibility Study Report of Minle Eco-Industry Park ~ Shandan Dongle Grade-I Highway Reconstruction Project of G227 Ganzhou Urban Area prepared by Gansu Kedi Engineering Construction Consultant Co., Limited in September 2014.
When the FRP/PVC pipe passes through the floor and the wall, it is necessary to pre-bury a sleeve on the floor and wall (this sleeve is pre-buried in civil construction).
10.14.3 Setting of the PLC control for Each System
Meanwhile, the both parties shall sign HSE management agreement, and the agreement shall at least include following contents:
Among which, GK148+600~GK149+250 is excavated cutting, GK145+000~GK148+600 and GK149+250~GK155+000 are filled embankments.
Simple lumbar supports are set in the wheelchair zone and the multi-function zone.
Complete measures should be applied to the design of the connector (such as guide block), to ensure the connnetor is fully aligned bfore abutting joint.
The comprehensive maintenance workshop is set in the Beleli EMU depot, which is constructed together with EMU depot complex.
"Six elements"—the ideal partner of financial institutions.
(5) Erect sign-supporting structure when strength of foundation concrete reaches relevant requirements and the Engineer's approval is obtained.
(c) The day, week, month and year refers to the Gregorian calendar day, week, month and year;
The specific management shall meet the relevant requirements in the Regulations on Progress Management of Infrastructure Construction Projects.
During the construction of large volume masonry such as pier shaft and pile cap, the hydration heat inside the concrete is very prominent. Effective measures must be taken to reduce the hydration heat and prevent the concrete from cracking. Therefore, we plan to take the following technical measures:
The ATS shall provide systems and servers to collect and process payment and ticket information as submit by the customer through the internet.
Schematic diagram for installation of thermal insulation pipeline which passes through firewall and concrete wall
Schedule of Survey and Design Items in 2016
10.3.12 Allowable deviations and inspection method of cross-section dimensions, elevations, planimetric positions (transversal) and wall thicknesses of manholes shall comply with those specified in Table 10.3.12.
Insulation resistance value of DB car
The S1 precision level is used for elevation measurement and monitoring, and the main ruler and auxiliary ruler are used for confirming readings, and the measurement time is arranged in a time when the temperature change is small in one day;
The incoming switches QS1 and QS2; the busbar sectionalizing switch QS3;
An oil-free piston air compressor with a displacement of 2400 L/min is adopted, with a rated exhaust pressure of 10 bars.
j. For subcontractors, leasing parties and service outsourcing parties, in addition to the environmental and safety requirements stipulated in the contract, appropriate safety and environmental protection agreements shall be signed according to different environmental and safety risks.
Therein, the daily operation and maintenance is estimated as USD 7,270/car, the depot repair cost is estimated as USD 26,190/car and the estimate is carried out once every 2 years.
It shall be determined that the risk of fatalities shall be at least reduced to meet the current standards of similar modern rail system that has begun to operate.
The identification of risks and opportunities of HSE management are planned, and the planning results shall be formed into all kinds of documents or systems, record forms and other documented information required by the company's management system.
<2-2>Clayey sand (SC): grayish brown, dense, containing a small amount of round gravel.
D1016total length of pipeline crossing-810m
Local equipotential box 300x200x120 (WXHXD) mm
4. After the completion of foundation reinforcement and before the construction of embankment filling, the cushion top shall be slotted and the profile settlement tube shall be embedded. The bottom of slot shall be leveled with medium-coarse sand, and the surface shall be backfilled with 5cm medium-coarse sand and leveled with the cushion. Effective protection shall be carried out for both ends.
Trenching is the key of work period control and consists of trench segmentation, excavation machine selection, trenching process control and collapse precautions.
Solid and hollow arrows are marked at the train exit and track to indicate the receiving and departure directions, with solid one representing forward direction and hollow one representing opposite direction.
The corresponding amplitudes of vibration to the first to sixth vibration frequency are shown in Fig. 8 - Fig. 13.
The Homak connecting line is freeway of two-way four lanes, with a subgrade width of 26.6m.
(4) Project effect evaluation: financial efficiency, impact, etc.;
A 9m3elevated fire tank will be provided near the running shed so as to supply water for the early fire.
(2) Master Plan of Kiev in Ukraine 2020;
The level of model definition in the schematic design phase should not be lower than LOD1.0;
The First Batch Transmission Line and Substation Project in 2014 of Yunnan Power Grid Corp.
(6) The system state at each level shall be clearly indicated.
All lighting fixtures shall be provided with PE grounding terminals to reliably connect PE wires to PE terminals.
Is there any expression of interaction between processes.
The main hazard factors during the construction period are given in Table 7.3-1.
Zhengzhou - Xi'an PDL stretches from the center of Central Plain - Zhengzhou City, crossing Luoyang, Sanmenxia, and Weinan City, and ends in the northwestern door gate of China - Xi'an City. This line passes through Henan and Shaanxi Province, and traverses Central Plain and east of Guanzhong Plain. Total length of the main track is 458km.
When vehicles go up and down the slope simultaneously in transportation, the distance between two vehicles shall be greater than 50m; the empty vehicle shall give way to the loaded vehicle when they meet on the road; overtaking is not allowed for vehicles driving in the same direction.
All the inlets and outlets of the tank as well as other instrument interfaces are designed at the top of the tank.
7.4 100 thick C15 plain concrete cushion shall be set under concrete base slab (unless otherwise indicated), 100 wider than the foundation at each side.
Test speed: 0 ~ 352km/h;
The audit program shall be prioritized based on risk, internal and external performance trends, and criticality of the process(es).
For pit excavation, the sloping shall be done as 1:0.5.
(6) The assembly and manufacture of bus bars shall be in accordance with the specifications.
Confirm the air channel valve of electric coupler on two trains is open.
1)Install the two flanges of the coupling joints into the shaft ends that require to be connected to the two parts respectively, fasten the compression nut, and compact the slow-resisting gasket.
Fill in this section the list of spare parts and vulnerable and consumable parts (only the ones to be replaced as per described in this document) for the system and equipment.
5Transverse single-hole light load: Maximum eccentricity of pier body : 5.704 (4.240) m Maximum compressive stress of concrete: 6.14 (17.70) MPa
6. During construction, it should be noted that for the bearing pad stone formwork at the outmost of the left line, an angle (50x3 cm) at the position indicated in the layout plan should be cut off for fabrication of bearing pad stone concrete.
No. 3 Pier Structural Drawing of (EW16~NS15) Section
By considering the definition of slope safety coefficient, the reliability (R) of the slope can be defined as: Based on the parameter that is considered to be influential to the slope stability, the probability of its safety coefficient greater than 1 is calculated, and that value is the probability of reliability that the slope can remain stable. It is obvious that the probability of slope instability or failure is (1-R).
The heat preservation paste is carried out at the same time from the bottom to the upper and from the middle to two ends, and one end of the heat insulation paste can be pasted in sequence along the direction of the flange, and finally, the joint is positioned at the top of the air duct.
No.: ZHW-BBDMP-AQ-3-2-2
Twp new versions XP for special hardware: Windows XP Media Center Edition;Windows XP Table PC Edition were officially issued by Microsoft in November, 2002.
Sanitation and first aid measures shall be established at the construction site, equipped with health care medicine, common medicine and protective articles.
The construction of two lines shall be started simultaneously according to the Employer's requirements, among which the Banha-Port Saide Line is divided into three sections, and the Zagazig-EI Mansoura Line contains one section with each section of about 60km.
Elaeocarpus sylvestris (D6-7, H200-250, S≥250, reserved with three-level branches, featuring beautiful tree appearance)
The blue line is the route in engineering feasibility study, and red line is the route in preliminary design. According to the field survey and measurement, local road sections in the preliminary design have been slightly adjusted, making the route generally consistent with the route in engineering feasibility study.
MVB communication is of flexible and simple configuration, and can be freely configured according to different applications.
2. Construction contractor: Sino-Israel Yunnan Chuangneng Metal Fuel Cell Co., Ltd. (tentative name, hereinafter referred to as the Company).
As for cut-fill adjustment, excavated materials shall be obtained from the nearest site to save land, and attention shall be paid to mutual exchange of the needed among stations and yards so that the excavated earth and rock can be properly used.
) The ground quality affects the equipment and personal safety directly. All enclosures of ground steel pipes and equipment shall be welded firmly to the channel steel for ground foundation and shall be tested after the construction is completed.
Will not cause personal injury to the travelers or drivers or maintenance personnel.
The longitudinal prestressed duct adopts metal corrugated pipe, the transverse prestressed duct adopts flat metal corrugated pipe, and the vertical prestressed duct adopts iron sheet pipe.
Reinforcement cage shall be manufactured in a unified way in the processing yard, and shall be made as a whole and in segments according to the length.
7.This bridge adopts double-track T-shaped abutments, round-end solid piers and round-end hollow piers, with foundation filled by open-cut.
3) The traction substation should be fed by two independent and reliable power sources which are in mutual hot standby.
3) Preparation is completed. Start rerailing test.
(2) CRRC ZELC will establish a product protection (including handling, packaging, storage and protection) management system to effectively protect products, purchased parts, raw materials or special products and harmful substances during maintenance.
Other expenses are as follows: (to be considered by Overseas Business Department (Africa))
Emergency Leading Team under Changqing Downhole Technology Company:
The information of this certificate can be inquired at the official website (www.cnca.gov.cn) of the Certification and Accreditation Administration of the People's Republic of China.
The high water pool shall provide a working pressure of not less than 0.35MPa for the pipe network.
The suggestions and requirements by the Employer will not mitigate or relieve any contractual liabilities of the Contractor.
The Bid Inviter will respond in writing to any request for clarification which it receives prior to the time specified in the Bid Data Sheet. Written copies of response (without identifying the source of inquiry) will be sent to all prospective bidders who have purchased the Bidding Document.
The greening under the bridge is a combination of paving grasses and planting shrubs. The abutment cone is greened by climbing plants.
Comprehensively considering the factors, like port location, geological conditions and the development strategy of Tibet Autonomous Region (giving priority to the construction of Kerung Port, steadily promoting the Zhangmu Port, positively restoring Yadong Port, gradually developing Pulan Port and Riwu Port), Kerung Port Corridor Alignment Option is recommended.
Commissioning test for DCS system, automatic regulatory system and online analytical instrument system;
The number of lighting fixtures in rooms provided with suspended ceiling shall not only meet the specified illumination level (minimum requirement) but also the architectonical requirements of the room (shape and symmetrical arrangement).
The digital sensor shall be painted with black enamel after inspection and repair (except thread).
Φ50PVC double-wall corrugated leaky pipe with hole
The designed spoil area is located at the col of 950m on the DK0+650 right side of the line (beside the opening of 3# inclined shaft). The capacity of the spoil area is about 257,000 cubic meters (loose volume), covering an area of about 70.5 mu.
2. The drawing shows the structures of the Ⅰ type side ditch and the cover plate at the general section.
After the implementation of the democratic system in 1991, Nepal promoted economic reforms and adopted a free economic policy oriented to the market economy.
If there is balance between actual design fee and estimated design fee, another supplementary agreement shall be signed by both parties.
Documents of the management system: Manual, procedure documents, rules and regulations, plans, records and relevant technical documents;
Necessity, urgency and socioeconomic significance of construction;
Cross temporary reinforcement measures shall be taken based on the specific circumstance prior to the sectioned lifting of column body. The strengthening shall be supported on the arc reinforcing plate.
With super large bridge discipline construction team as its main body, the company establishes "THE SARAWAK COASTAL ROAD (PACKAGE 05) project management department".
1.1 Construction clearance: Single-track tunnel adopts "tunnel clearance-2A" while double-track tunnel adopts "tunnel clearance-2B",and they shall meet the requirements of large machinery access and maintenance.
If steel produced based on foreign standards must be adopted, the allowable values of the stress of the materials in the calculation of the strengths and stability of the pressure vessels and the pressure parts should not be greater than those obtained from the guaranteed values of mechanical performance based on the foreign standards and specifications and the safety coefficients specified in GB150 Pressure Vessels.
Wulongling Tunnel Constructed by Applying Double-sidewall Heading Method
(01910007- 1) GSBA [2016] No. 10260001
HVAC unit commissioning test will be implemented on the first vehicle in accordance with EN 14750-2.
Once the PECU is activated, no cancellation is allowed. When the driver ends the call, the PECU shall be reset.
Issued on January 10, 2017Implemented as of January 15, 2017
3) Problems found in the check of design documents shall be timely communicated with the Designer, the Supervisor and the Employer to solve.
Walls shall be built with M7.5 mixed mortar and MU10 shale perforated bricks, with the thickness of 240mm.
The cleaning and warehousing form can be generated, and ticket warehousing procedures can be handled accordingly.
The information about brake rigging is presented in the part of braking system.
6.2.3.1 "Dead weight + earth pressure + ground overload" working condition
(4) Skilled workers cut and bend the reinforcement in the form and size as indicated by drawings for fabrication and processing.
7. Sowing grass seeds shall be carried out in the proper season. Covering shall be applied from sowing until the grass seeds grow to maturity to prevent rainwater erosion and maintain humidity and temperature. The quantity of vegetation shall be included in the landscape works.
According to the medium type in confined spaces, steam, water, hot water, mechanical ventilation or natural ventilation shall be used for medium cleaning and replacement. Water vapor shall be imported with a low pressure and speed as soon as possible.
The evidences shall be: ① true to reflect basic fact of employees' wrongful acts; ② related to the wrongful acts of employees and have practical meaning for proving the wrongful acts; ③ of legal sources.
5.6.2.5 The office meeting of general manager of the Company makes the recruitment decision.
Make most reasonable layout of column grid, ensure reasonable opening of windows and doors, and be practical, economic and aesthetic.
If the top slope exceeds 20 degrees, formwork and anchorage shall be installed on the top of the slope working face to make the concrete well compacted and prevent flowing and air intrusion.
The No. of monitoring and measurement equipment and actual data of other conditions specified by documents shall be covered in inspection record.
The construction of the main body and the wing wall of the culvert has been completed. The actual culvert length is 19.20m.
Na Mor station is set in the Oudomxai and about 15km from Na Tuey and is next to No.13 highway and about 5km from county. It is well connected with road traffic.
Platform trucks arrive at the hoisting position timely. Equipment to be hoisted will be bundled timely and chocked by planks or scrap tires to protect the equipment and increase friction. Haulage ropes will be fastened as well.
The General Contractor must provide a test report of belt life.
The Code for Durability Design of Railway Concrete Structure (TB10005-2010) shall be implemented. The design service life of the main supporting and retaining structure is 100 years.
Construction of Sponge City in Upstream Catchment Areas of the Yuxi River
1. φ20 round steel ladder (coated with antirust paint)
The surface of the test mold base shall be checked by visual inspection and hand feeling; the surface shall be smooth, without air hole, roughness and unevenness.
Reconstruction of Expansion Joints of MEGHNA GUMATI Bridge in Bangladesh
With optical cable terminal box, tail fiber, power module, lightning protection module and various accessories and wiring. The Tenderer shall refine and configure according to his/her own system scheme
the impact of project construction on the environment only refers to preliminary estimation, and specific impact degree will be subject to the conclusions in environment impact assessment report for the project.
5.4.1 The 3C products must undergo the routine factory test before delivery and can leave the factory after passing the inspection.
(5) The fluidity of mortar used for rock block and brick arch shall be 5cm to 7cm. The fluidity of mortar used for brick wall and block rock with big water absorption shall be 7cm to 10cm.
Ayat vehicle power and lighting system
(1) Inspect the insulation between wirings and the ground insulation of wirings at the vehicle end coupling, and ensure that inspection results meet the requirements.
The assembly of prestressing tendon and anchorage shall not only satisfy the requirements of static load anchoring performance, but also meet the requirements of fatigue performance test with cycle times of 2 million.
During maintenance of the traction motor, the consistency of the traction motor characteristics shall still be guaranteed by allowing replacement of stator or rotor only.
If the Purchaser is a statutory withholding agent under the tax laws of China, the Purchaser shall have the right to withhold the relevant taxes and remit such taxes to the relevant tax authorities.
Stop eating suspicious food immediately and collect and seal it on the spot for inspection.
All fibre cores terminating in the LDF shall be spliced to factory connectorized pigtails.
Financial assets that have been identified as impairment losses will not be included in the portfolio evaluation.
Circular construction of all suspended beam sections and removal of hanging basket
2. One electrical engineer from Chongqing Changke, one commissioning technician from Chongqing Changke, one commissioning manager, one technical engineer of each vehicle subsystem such as broadcasting system, door system and monitoring system;
Project Name: Bijie-Duge (Boundary of Guizhou and Yunnan) Highway in Guizhou of Hangzhou-Ruili Expressway
The quality problems required to be rectified by the supervision and monitoring organizations in the construction project have been rectified and approved by the Supervisor
Check the flexibility of parts and components and replace the damaged ones.
Install roof cable 1 on the DC arrester with hexagon bolt M12x90, flat washer 12, locking washer VSKD12 and prevailing torque type hexagon nut M12, and connect the other end to the AC/DC change-over switch after the lifting of roof cover with tightening torque of 46N.m.
The route is in the direction of west to east, which is parallel to the Columbia Highway 1 in order to facilitate the transportation of construction materials and the future traffic conversion. In addition, an appropriate distance is maintained to reduce the impact on the villages along the route to reduce demolition.
4 Site Acceptance of Raw Materials and Main Track Components
7.7 Isolation layer setting: When block material, cement mortar or fine aggregate concrete is laid above the roll material, film waterproof layer or insulating layer, an isolation layer shall be set between them.
According to different measured media or parameters, generally measuring holes on a metal wall may be grooved by machining or oxygen-acetylene cutting.
FAB7 P2 Expansion of Factory Service System for Tianyi Project - Electric Power Project
Design scope: DK286+700.00~DK286+720.00
There is no order, request, application, decision, judgment, resolution or other actions requiring the dissolution of the company, and also no mortgage, execution of judgment or calling against the company's assets.
(c) The elevation of the connection with the existing pipes or the river channel shall be checked.
(6) The side line of temporary station shall not be enclosed, and this closed section is under upgrade.
The power wire, signal cable, paired cable, cables and other weak current cables should be distributed separately.
7. The inner and outer surfaces of the steel pipe should be smooth, and free of folds, cracks, delamination, lap welding, arc breaking, burn-through and other defects with a depth exceeding the lower deviation of the wall thickness.
After the tower is erected, all bolts shall be tightened for one time with a tightening rate of over 98%, and the tightening rate of bolts shall be ensured to be over 98% after line erection.
Medium repair aims to overhaul some machines that cannot be used continuously so that the operation of such machines can be balanced to extend the overhaul interval of the mechanical equipment.
The functional localization of depot and comprehensive base shall comply with the principle determined in the urban railway network planning.
Reply: A floor beam is considered in the calculation because there is no concrete slab on this floor. The layout of this floor cannot meet the mass ratio requirement in the calculation.
HN2B2.2.3P Minor frame bridge (jacking) (level crossing to grade separation)
Location of stations near the highway around the city and easily accessible from the Princes Town area and the Point Fortin area,.
Holders took part in the 2009 National Foreign Language Test for Professional Title, with a score of 82 points.
The training content shall be based on the specificity and specialization of the operation, so as to combine the knowledge, reason, specialty and protection.
3) Before being flushed with water, the discharge pipes shall be connected to the drain well or trench, and this route shall be safe and smooth.
When the pantograph is placed at the highest working height, apply the force of 300N horizontally at two sides of pantograph head successively, and measure the displacements at both sides.
4)Disconnect all the connecting lines on AC filter capacitor (ACC);
Anchor rod grouting should be carried out in accordance with the design requirements, during which mix proportion of cement paste and cement mortar should be strictly controlled and uniform stirring should be realized; in addition, equipment and pipeline to be grouted should be maintained in good working condition.
The early-stage preparation for construction focuses on "three supplies and one leveling" (supply of water, electricity and road, and leveling ground) on the construction site.
4. Subcontractors of various disciplines will join as early as possible.
(2) Adequate preparations shall be made before the crossing. The paying-off sections crossing over the power line shall be as short as possible, to reduce the power outage time and safety risks.
3. The cleaning hole, inspection door, TV test hole in the drawing shall be reserved in accordance with the practical dimensions on the site.
 The response time for the system to accept the control command shall meet the following requirements:
As more types of construction workers, the construction workers should be in charge of the finished products of their own. The handover procedure system should be established to facilitate the finished product protection.
As the incident was found in a timely manner and handled properly, there were no casualties or damage to property.
1.7 In order to adapt to design changes, a certain number of spare connection terminals shall be reserved for the interfaces of BAS system and electric combined air valves, electric multi-blade regulating valves and fire valve equipment.
Materials, instruments, machines and tools, equipment, etc. required for scientific and technological innovation projects shall be included in the material and equipment plan of the unit, with priority given.
According to different monitoring methods, electromechanical facilities include the following five categories:
There are quite many problems, for example, international or U.S. general technical standards are used as criteria, specifications have not been developed for many projects, no prevailing standards in the industry, and missing test items and uncertain test frequency exist.
Operation, management, petrol inspection, repair and maintenance of the electromechanical system ad equipment, including environment control system, water supply and drainage system, elevator and escalator of the N-S and E-W lines.
b. Possible places, reasons, nature and consequences of accidents or emergencies;
Basic works → Construction of major structure → Roof building → Installment of water and power supply → Indoor and out door decoration.
During giving lessons in the training classroom,teachers shall provide each trainee with textbook materials and apply powerpoint pictures or video additionally for the sake of easy understanding.
⑤ Finished doors shall be stacked horizontally, and the site shall be leveled before stacking. Wooden square mats shall be used for leveling. It is strictly prohibited to place them obliquely to avoid deformation;
As of November 19, the daily car loading on national railways this month reached 148,700 cars, up 1.9% year on year. The daily freight delivery reached 9.094 million tons, up 2.2% year-on-year.
Method for drilling of strata containing caves shall be selected based on the stratum condition. The down-hole hammer non-core drilling may be adopted for cave detection only.
≥4N•m. After impacting, there shall be no cracking or falling off on the coating and no obvious crack on both front and back of the base material.
9. In the installation of reinforcement, the type, number, diameter and spacing of reinforcement shall meet the design requirements. The allowable deviation of the position of reinforcement shall meet the requirements of relevant specifications.
Persons in charge, foremen and technicians as well as full-time and part-time safety inspectors must be regular members of the Project Manager Department. Depending on actual situation, an appropriate number of laborers can be arranged.
In this project, 3 single-tube tunnels are constructed, and the one-way two-lane tunnel section is designed.
Safe and civilized construction inspection shall use "safe and civilized construction checklist" to give qualitative and quantitative evaluation to the inspected departments.
The light and loaded cars of this Line vary in direction and good volume. Loaded cars take the up line. The goods volume density of each section is detailed in Table 2-3-2.
The sections at K7+790~K10+560 and AK3+720~AK4+460 pass through the experimental area of the Nature Reserve, with a total length of 3.51km
Stage 3: price drop, sharp rise of industrial production capability, long-term severe supply surplus
5The properties of coarse aggregate shall comply with the requirements in Table 6.2.4-3.
At least one main pipe support should be set on each layer of the pipeline that is installed vertically. When the height of pipe layer is over 5 m, the number of main pipe supports should be properly added;
The lime wharf is provided with 2 belt conveyors. One conveyor of B=1000 is connected to A2 transfer station through R1 transfer station of the receiving and unloading system and the other conveyor of B=800 is connected to the lime yard through D1 transfer station.
Fig. 2.5-1 Tested Train Formation and Mounting Axle Position of Instrumented Wheelset (black ● in the figure refers to the instrumented wheelsets)
China Railway 15th Bureau Group Co., Ltd. / Bid Section 13 of Yuexi - Qianshan Expressway in Anhui Province/ Archives Management Director / with rich experience in archives management work
-15℃~+60℃; relative humidity in working environment: 100%, applicable to outdoor operation.
(6) HSE management requirements for sub-contractors or suppliers;
B. The surface of the sub-grade side slope shall be smooth and stable, shall not be deficit, and the curve line shall be round and smooth.
Connecting pipe fittings shall be assembled after screw threads are tested up to the standard (3 threads proper, generally by hands); after the lead oil is applied and the flax is twined, pipe wrenches shall be used to tighten the fittings, so that the installed pipe sections shall be straightened before installation.
Three passenger train receiving-departure tracks, one 450mx10.5mx1.25m long basic platform and one intermediate platform are set in the station. Six freight train receiving-departure tracks (including main line, frontier inspection line and shunting line) are set and 2 such tracks are reserved; one supervision track is set for international freight train.
For locks and keys used in train, relevant proposal shall be simplified as far as possible on the premise of ensuring safety.
At present, the progress of station building works lags behind. The Project Department must pay high attention to the progress, getting key nodes and increasing input, so as to guarantee the progress of the station building works.
Hole-forming of test pile is tested by the testing instrument of form forming of bored pile. This system includes three sets: pile wall contact spring bracket aperture detector, sediment acoustic wave detection probe and high-precision inclinometer. See Table 5-2-6-1 for acceptance criteria.
See Figure 2-11 for the proportion of copper consumption in various industries in developed countries and China to total copper consumption.
3.10.5.1 Overall requirements of system:
(4). The electricians must be qualified with the certificates. They will be responsible for connecting lines for construction correctly, repairing in time, and removing thoroughly.
As the station yard is reconstructed a little in this project, the design shall be conducted under the principles of fully utilizing existing signal equipment and minimizing the influence on transportation.
The top of tunnel will be backfilled with 5% cement soil, and the backfilling surface will be protected with slide-resistant piles + temporary baffle plates to reach the design height.
It includes embedded parts, steel plate of shear wall, steel frame beam, core tube steel frame column, and cross-shaped steel column of the A5 plot; The processing, transportation and installation of above ±0.00 steel structure of the A6 plot, including embedded parts, steel plate of shear wall, core tube steel frame column, and cross-shaped steel column.
Geological Surveying and Mapping Project for Project of BBMG (Hefei) Forklift Factory
As treating process and method of LKJ determined in order to ensure safety of train during running, the mode involves method of braking computation, output mode and time of control instruction, output time of each temporary control parameter, each working mode, definition of its control function, etc.
(3) Non mechanical operation personnel shall not climb or ride the excavators, loaders and dump trucks. Mechanical operators must strictly abide by the safety regulations, operate according to procedures and drive in a civilized manner.
Maintenance Shop in Vangvieng Service Area - General Specification of Structural Design
CIP can display the train approaching status and crossing equipment status and close and open of the crossing barrier can be realized by pressing the button on CIP.
A teflon hot-plate heated in temperatures ranging from 200°C to 230°C is placed between the pipe ends to be joined;
Table 9.5.9-9 Control and Prevention Measures for Common Quality Problems in Membrane Waterproof Works
(3) Before the wiring in the pipes, cabinets and boxes shall be cleaned; debris shall be removed; leading wires shall be inserted; talcum powder shall be put into the pipes for smooth wiring; and protective caps shall be provided at both ends of the pipes.
Hot pressure and air pressure are preferred for natural ventilation.
Note: Traffic units are converted into small passenger cars / per peak hour.
The welding materials taken from the drying box for more than 4 hours shall be re-dried and used.
3. The Accounting Firm Practicing Certificate shall not be forged, altered, rented out, lent or transferred.
8.2 High efficient lighting sources and LED T5 lamps shall be used.
Painting of miscellaneous exterior walls (exterior walls are part of masonry)
5. When retaining wall is higher than 2m, an inspection ladder shall be provided every 50~80m on the wall body along the line. Inspection ladders can be generally made by bending φ16 reinforcement bars and inserting into the wall body by 0.2~0.25m with vertical interval of 0.3m. See Reinforcement Detail of Inspection Ladder for particulars.
1. According to the actual situation of the project, prepare cost responsibility budget, decompose the project cost layer by layer, and ensure everyone has the responsibility of cost-saving.
Main driving forces and trends that may influence objectives of the Company;
Comply with the exact number and positions of gaskets specified in the list of parts.
Engineering characteristics (see performance requirements in qualification conditions of tendering announcement for details)
All adhesives to be used must be attached on the surface of smooth and clean metal or non-metal which is free of grease, silicon resin, solvent or heat activated substances, and the adhesives shall not result in film crease, curling, crack or coming-off.
1) The integrated management system is applicable to the quality, environmental, and occupational health and safety management activities for various railway, highway, municipal, water conservancy and hydropower, and housing construction projects undertaken by CR20G,.
Therefore, source rock is apt to generate hydrocarbon through pyrolysis under the catalytic effect of salt minerals. This phenomenon is more obvious with the increase of saline degree, reflecting hydrocarbon generation in low mature stage under the catalytic effect of salt minerals.
(2) Before cable laying, debris in the trough shall be removed.
--- Time requirements for water spraying test are modified (see 5.1, 6.1 of Version 1996).
5. The dimensions in the parentheses is applicable to 160 type expansion joint while dimensions outside the parentheses is applicable to 80 type expansion joint.
The concrete is casted layer by layer from the middle of beam to its two ends, with the thickness of each layer being 20-30cm.
Fine aggregate should be hard, clean, weathering-free limestone without any impurity, and should be manually rolled into rice-size fine sand with appropriate gradation. The upper surface may also use fine aggregate whose lithology is the same with that of coarse aggregate.
In 2019, CGGC confirmed the disposal of RMB 2.250 billion from the equity transfer of Daguangbei Expressway Company, accounting for 25.60% of its total profit.
2. For the beam column joints with dense reinforcement, lofting shall be carried out prior to binding, to avoid effect of reinforcement displacement on accuracy of formwork;
Project Manager (He Fei): be responsible for all construction management of engineering project
Where there is a contradiction between elevation and alignment, the necessary adjustments are made to ensure that the individual elements of the structure are horizontal and vertical.
Survey the slope line of the subgrade, measure the elevation of the left, middle, and right points of each pile, and make records. Figure out the subgrade filling width on the left and right sides of each stake mark.
Assisting the Project Manager in implementing national laws and regulations on health, safety and environment, and the EHSE management regulations of the project;
3. Take the headquarter as home front, on the principle of "home front serving the front", on the premise of construction need, assign personnel specialized in construction, research, etc. to the front, when necessary, to ensure a smooth construction.
Based on the analysis of passenger flow characteristics, the annual cross-border passenger fare mainly transported by Lhasa - Kathmandu passenger trains, and passengers gather at . In order to make sure the convenient connection between China's major towns and Nepal's capital, Beijing - Kathmandu passenger trains are possibly opened, which may take the cross-border passenger flows in Mainland .
The tension clamp shall not broken after 3 million times of fatigue test.
The division of the working section shall be subject to the column. During mortar laying and masonry, vertical joints shall be poured before sewing horizontal joints. The width of horizontal and vertical mortar joints shall be 10mm, and the length of mortar laying shall not exceed 500mm; combed joints shall be reserved for masonry of the constructional column, and the corner and angular contact of the wall shall be built at the same time.
It shall be confirmed that the cables in the rack are correctly connected, the rack slot circuit board are properly placed, and the power supply voltage is normal. After confirmation, the formal power-on test can be performed.
Describe the change of Software Configuration Management Plan
2) Test items shall include but not be limited to: vibration and noise level, mechanical performance, and electrical performance.
Steel pile casing shall be lifted into the hole, and circle center of steel pile casing shall be marked, and cross line shall be set at the top or bottom of steel pile casing; and then steel pile casing shall be moved to overlap the center of steel pile casing with borehole center.
In the right place on the construction site, there shall be newspaper boards and the bulletin boards for various management systems.
Disconnect the connection of all LV circuits to equipment at console, electrical cabinet (cab and passenger compartment), relay board on R1 car, air conditioning control cabinet, signal equipment cabinet, on-board, underslung and roof, etc., including all DC110V circuits. The wire size of 110V power supply and control wiring.
E-Hydrostatic fuel tank; F-oil-air radiator; G-temperature-pressure control valve 4106; H-main control valve.
The control in the project implementation process shall be implemented specifically in accordance with the relevant provisions of Project Management Control Procedure (MS/Q CX-720).
The sinking speed shall be not more than 0.8m/min, and the working current shall be not more than 70A.
Inspect and supervise the Contractor to process and preserve quality-related files and original observational data about issuing the certification and acceptance.
7. When the positions of ordinary steel bars and prestressed steel tendons in the cross girder conflict with each other, the ordinary steel bar can be properly adjusted to ensure
Transmission rate of electrical interface: 10/100M adaptive, full/half duplex communication mode adaptive
User Requirements of Integrated Supervision & Control System of Luoyang Rail Transit Line 1 Project Special Technical Requirements (3) Access Control System
2) 1.2m for evacuation passages of house with 1 side-type rooms;
Total length of the whole lot is around 39.9km with overall project investment of around RMB 460 million and planned duration of 12 months.
6.4.2.1 After placing and spreading the neighboring rock-fill material, the separated grains with the size larger than 300mm shall be removed from the upstream slope surface firstly and then the spreading of the transitional material shall be conducted till it becomes almost level.
Properly complete drawing self-examination and joint examination. The chief engineer of the project shall organize relevant personnel to participate in the self-examination. The joint examination shall be presided over by the Employer and attended by relevant units.
In order to ensure that the project is completed with high quality, high speed, safety and low consumption, three-level technical disclosure should be done well, that is, project technicians should disclose to on-site construction personnel, on-site construction personnel should disclose to operation team leader, and operation team leader should disclose to specific construction personnel.
Work Contact List on "Turnout Packing Methods for Manila Light Rail Turnout Project"
(1) Document No. of the work instruction; numbering rules: front four digits, last four digits; for example: 3640.Z011
5. Pipe supports after being removed of rust shall be brushed with two coats of red lead paint and two coats of gray mixed paint.
Where entry cannot be avoided, robust Engineering methods shall be used to support excavations to prevent any worker being trapped or suffering injury or ill health.
1) Use special EMC connector for traction converter connection;
The main contents of the vibration and impact test includes long life vibration simulation test and impact test.
Polarization mode dispersion analyzer, 1500 - 1600nm, 0.1 - 75ps
Instruction to preliminary safety protection measures planned to be applied to major safety hazards on site based on project realities on the premise that existing safety protection measures are satisfied:
Wingwall: 3.1*0.6*2.5=4.65, headwall: (.4+2.06)*3/2*0.5=1.85, wingwall, headwall and foundation: 1.2*3*3=11
Before taking insulating measures, the rescuer shall not touch the victim's skin or wet clothes or touch the victim directly.
Figure 1.4.3-1 Routing Recommended for 6th of October City Monorail Line
The training period of each person per year shall be not less than 12 class hours.
Prediction Results for the Traffic Volume of the Proposed Project Unit:small passenger car / day Table 3-64
Solutions are reported to the designer, supervisor, Employer, and related parties for approval.
3.4.1 Sales or engineering contracts with deferred payment clauses signed with the enterprises other than the Company and its affiliated organizations;
The engineering geology of weakly weathered rock mass is classified into Class BⅢ1 ~ BⅣ2, with high rock mass strength, deformation modulus E0 = 4.0 ~ 8.0, small compressive deformation, basically no compressive deformation and uneven subsidence, and fully meeting the deformation and subsidence requirements of toe slab of concrete face rockfill dam and left bank gravity dam section.
4.3 Modification and Withdrawal of Competitive Negotiation Response Document
│ │ ├─Left Inbound Track (Tunnel Option) DZK (including tunnels)
13. The measured coordinates and elevations of all drilling holes shall adopt the coordinates and elevations of the return points and shall be compiled into a comparison table of design coordinates and measured coordinates of exploration points, which shall include elevation data and shall be signed by the preparer and the reviewer.
The Main Fire Alarm Panel (MFAP) is installed in the CCR.
For the sucked cold air, its temperature shall not be higher than 45°C;
The large the , the less the EMUs required to complete all travel distance and the higher the overall operating efficiency of the EMU.
Address: No. 468 Longrui Avenue, Longwan District, Wenzhou, Zhejiang ProvinceTel.: 0577-85225567E-mail: hmt@china-hmt.com
After the construction drawings are completed on schedule and the construction drawing design documents are submitted to the Owner, 30% of charges for construction drawing survey and design shall be paid;
Progress payment paid for the first image schedule shall be: [the quantity applied by Contractor(7700171.43) – the quantity not conformed reviewed by Supervisor (285455.26)]=the number of progress payment paid for the first image schedule ( 7414716.17) yuan
Highest railway altitude: A section of 960 km long stands 4,000 m above sea level, with the highest point at 5,072 m.
Table 4.2-1 Safety Assessment Method and Reason Explanation
During concealed laying against the wall, the grooves shall be reserved by coordinating with civil works. If the design for pipe size is not specified, the depth of size for wall slot with concealed pipes embedded shall be D+20 cm, and the width shall be from D+40 cm to 60 cm.
The document shall be modified in a written form, and the modification notice shall be written by the original document distribution unit, and moreover, approval procedures shall be gone through according to requirements of Par. a) above;
The welding test block shall conform to the requirements of section 4, Part B, AWS D1.1/D1.1M:2015.
The Manufacturing Department shall be responsible for preparing (short-term, medium-term and long-term) production plans of products (including testing equipment), to meet the requirements of customers.
Mechanical equipment for installation and construction of HV and LV cabinet and transformer includes: two impact drills, one small freight car, two generators, two cutting machines, one crane and one theodolite.
6. The bottom of the subsidiary steel frame shall be fixed at some parts by using cement mortar with the spacing being about 500 mm.
It can be seen that the14th and 15th threads were basically all damaged and the adjacent 13th thread on the right was slightly damaged; the damaged surface is very flat.
In order to ensure the comfort of the driver and crew members, the driver's cab is provided with equipment such as the fully adjustable driver's seat and electric sunshade windows, as well as the facilities such as the escape windows which can be opened, the escape ladder, and the fire extinguisher.
Site HSE Department shall conduct performance audit and issue a performance audit report by means of interviews, inquiries and reference materials according to the signed HSE Letter of Responsibility and in combination with the report on work;
Due to a relatively high difficulty of drainage in flat areas, the construction in rainy season will be prohibited.
The transfer station buildings shall be simple, bright and outstanding in shape and be consistent with existing buildings in style.
This project follows the concept of unit tests, and tests the member functions of a class in real terms.
11.1 Any disputes arising from the implementation of the Contract shall be settled by both parties through negotiation;
Figure 6.4-7 Alignment of Intersection of Independent Avenue and Castle Road-Phase Design
Adjustment is only made to the transfer payment of the fixed-asset investment of the project.
The Board Meeting shall be held only if at least 3 directors are present (including at least 1 director designate by M-Development Corporation Co., Ltd.).
The original ground surface shall be cleaned before subgrade filling; the surface cleaning thickness at general section shall be 30cm; the surface shall be compacted after cleaning, with compaction degree of ≥85%; and the subgrade can be filled after the compaction requirements are met.
Danfeng County and Shanyang County along the proposed project are respectively taken as the east wing and key counties for Shangluo-Danfeng integrated development, indicating high starting point, good foundation, high demonstration effect, and extensive radiation scope, thus more attention and support shall be given during new urbanization development.
prepare and issue the annual financial report on road funds;
Gantry Type Spot Welding Robot Vertical Type Spot-welder of Side Wall
The controller can interact with passengers in the station berth.
e. Gauge measurement: A tension of 150N will be applied to the steel tape by a spring scale to measure the gauge, and at least three points per rail are measured.
(4) Submit accident investigation report to superior leaders.
(2) Notice on Issuing the Detailed Rules for Completion Acceptance and Handover of Railway Information Engineering Construction Projects;
① Strengthen the acceptance of finger plates before use, and replace the ones with unflat surfaces and bending deformation.
vThe axle bends or axle journal, dust-proof plate seat, wheel seat, axle body and other parts have 1 dimension that is larger over 4mm than the reduction of nominal diameter of the original shape;
Corrosion protection layer of steel railings and exposed part of embedded φ16 U-shaped bolt should be made of epoxy zinc-rich primer (2*40um) + epoxy micaceous iron intermediate coat (1*40um) + graphite gray aluminum alkyd topcoat (2*35um).
The horn meets TSI certification requirements and UIC 644.
The test shall also be conducted to the control valve at the resonant frequency for 30 min 1 min. Vibrate for 30 min 1 min at 150 Hz if there is no resonance point. Measure the performances as per 6.2, 6.3, 6.8 and 6.9 and the results shall meet the requirements of 5.12.
Among the four water supply stations, ADDIS and AKAKI stations are to be supplied with urban tap water; the rest are supplied with groundwater.
9.3.4 TBM shall be provided with manual survey points, and manual survey rechecking of TBM attitude shall be conducted on a regular basis.
The Subcontractor shall furnish a periodic affidavit and release of claims form and a periodic lien waiver form acceptable to the Contractor and Owner.
Cast-in-situ construction scheme is basically the same as construction scheme of frame culvert. The following shows main construction procedures of the jacking construction scheme:
Day means calendar day; "year", "month" and "day"are on Gregorian calendar basis.
4) Scope of operating temperature: -40°C ~ +50°C.
In issuing, if separation is needed, the separate part and the rest part shall have material marking, which shall also be removed and filled by issuing worker under the monitoring of material personnel.
Quality and specification of the used cement, sand, stone, water, additive and admixture must meet requirements in relevant specification and construction must be performed based on the specified mixing proportion.
Leveling with level gauge→ measuring layer height error → analyzing the error → error adjusting scheme (report for approval) → adjustment → drawing beam installation vertical section drawing → setting out → inspection.
7. In the case of hole width or diameter not more than 300, it is acceptable to not set reinforcing rib at the hole, and it is unnecessary to cut off steel bars via the hole.
2) Strictly control contract change. The supervising engineer shall strictly review the project change and design change proposed by each subcontractor and then add them into the contract.
As for arrangement of the handover plan, the arrangement of the Owner and the property operation unit shall prevail, and on-site handover should be conducted according to different disciplines, areas and systems;
Invoiced by: Liu Chengke Seller (seal):
In order to ensure the safe operation of gas transmission production, PetroChina West-East Gas Pipeline Company decides to have all the pipelines of this kind maintained to totally eliminate the safety hazards.
Eye and nose and respiratory tract irritation, chemical burns and contact dermatitis
Practicing qualification certificate No.: YJG S01006671
The pile class shall be determined according to the following principles:
Refer to Clause 3 of Table 7-5 Assembly Procedure of JZZ-2 Unit Brake.
Each department (Project Department) shall appoint a person to collect, record, store and prepare the laws, regulations and requirements applicable to the department and submit them to the Risk Control Department for confirmation.
Fire agent: water, foam, CO2, dry powder, inert gas and etc;
4.4.2 Main railway technical standards shall be composed of the following:
b) Name: Railway active electronic lock;
However, it has low transport speed, relatively low transport capacity, short vehicle life, high maintenance cost, high energy consumption and low comfort for passengers; it also occupies wide road. City bus transit is suitable for short- and medium-distance transport in cities.
Check that the air-side AC seal oil pump of #1 unit is free of sundries that may affect the operation.
Table 3-3 Proportion in All Ranks for Pavement Condtion Assessment
When the relevant parties put forward reasonable requirements or complaints, hazard identification and risk assessment shall be carried out for the reflected situation in a timely manner.
Measure the voltage between 7 (+) and 8 (-) of terminal block T2 of air conditioner control panel +254=61-A201
The production workers shall be able to understand relevant technical documents (drawings, formula and process documents, etc.) and to operate equipment correctly and proficiently;
Figure Marshalling after coupling with the impact speed for 7Km/h
Cable interlayer, tunnel (corridor), shaft and cable trench shall be kept clean and tidy, no sundries shall be piled up, and oil accumulation in cable trench is strictly prohibited.
Generally the drawings shall be amended and returned at the 14th calendar day upon reception at most.
Short-term investment refers to investment that is realizable at any time with planned holding time not more than one year (including one year), including stocks, bonds and funds.
GB/T 2424. 1 provides general guidance for the performance of Tests A and B.
The circuit breaker shall be of high corrosion performance. All iron parts shall be hot-dip galvanized. The mechanism box shall be of stainless steel.
The concrete is maintained by sprinkling water and covered with wet sacks. The concrete curing period is not less than 14 days.
ID No.: 360302198501100550
D25 hollow grouting anchor L=3.5m (ring) 100X60 (vertical)
Special seal for Calibration of Xiangyang Institute of Metrology and Testing Technology
During earthwork excavation, spoil shall be stacked in the area 30m away from the edge line of the slope top of the foundation pit. During construction, the ground load (including the surcharge load) around the foundation pit shall be no greater than 20kN/m2, and guardrails shall be installed around the foundation pit to ensure the safety of personnel.
The expression "no foreseen performance degradation" herein is an explanation for "normal operation of 30 years".
The detailed log of each test shall be documented as for part of documentation of completion of works.
2 Requirements on the construction period, safety, quality, civilized construction, environmental protection, etc. stated in contract documents.
Earthworks: 1.21 million m3/2=600,000 m3 per year
The control, alarming, protection and other switch contacts are required to send out 2 electrical independent contacts respectively, and the capacity is 220VDC 1A or 220VAC 3A.
1)Clean floating ash, greasy dirt and sundries of the base course, and water it for keeping humid.
Ability to release alarm off and system recovery information after earthquake
List of Proposed Project Personnel (Main Employees and Their Technical Qualifications)
1. Dimensions are not indicated in this drawing, and the unit is cm.
Use PC according to system configuration and security strategy requirements. Department managers are responsible for directing and supervising staff to follow and execute this system configuration and security strategy.
3.1.4.1Main Substation and External Power Supply
(2) The emergency oil pool is installed in the traction substation.
Stability: MTBF (Mean Time Between Failures) of system shall reach 100,000 hours, and components shall fully consider reducing maintenance work.
Reasonable arrangement shall be made for working faces, to accelerate the project.
When necessary, the wire and cable from the module box to the monitoring or control equipment shall be laid with multiple threads.
The reinforcement calculation adopts the design values of moment, shear and torque, and takes into account the structural importance coefficient ( non - seismic ) or bearing capacity seismic adjustment coefficient ( seismic ).
Manage the whole course of emergency events to improve the efficiency of emergency work
6. See the Bill of Quantities of Abutments for specific quantity of works.
Intertillage and weeding are very important for newly planted chunk woods, and such work is mainly to eradicate the weeds in the plant hole and around it, so that the weeds will not vie with the young trees for water and nutrient and the fancy effect can be increased as well.
⑤-1 Silty clay: light gray, auburnish yellow, plastic, slightly wet, uneven soil texture, medium tenacity.
If the condition permits, a ring road is set up as a low-speed test line, and the main line is used for high-speed test.
23.1.1.4. Test equipment of drive gear
Process flow: construction preparation → inspection and acceptance → arrangement of frame and leaf in order → fitting up → adjustment → fixation → self-check → application for acceptance.
The bandwidth of the industrial Ethernet ring network used in the signaling system is 2*1Gbps.
3. The first row of transverse structural reinforcement on the two sides of the deformation joint should be welded to all the longitudinal structural reinforcements on the inside surfaces of the structure section.
Allowable deviation of the depth of pole foundation pit shall be:
<2-4-1> Clay: black brown, hard plastic, with relatively strong viscosity, relatively pure, containing a small amount of plant roots in the surface, with rock core being air-dried and naturally cracked.
Disclosure plan shall include disclosure contents, organizers, participants, disclosure time, disclosure location, test methods, etc.
If filler walls are constructed with small concrete hollow blocks, refer to Section 1~3 on page 26 of National Standard Atlas 12G614-1 for the construction of wall-columns with a length of less than 400mm.
The requirements of NRF-041-PEMEX-2014 must be observed.
Epiproterozoic metamorphic rock (Pt3): sericite schist, sericite quartz schist, etc.
All installation parts shall be painted prior to installation and hoisting; otherwise, the Construction Contractor shall brush paints onto those unpainted parts unconditionally after installation.
The freight yard for oil is located between Damerjog Avenue and Coastal Avenue planned in the middle of the Industrial Park. Its west side is adjacent to the Djibouti Avenue (major road of the park). Its east side is close to the oil storage area, and about 1.3km away from the entrance to the park, and the center mileage is CK15+000.
The project manager and chief engineer of the project shall be selected from leaders with excellent professional skills, outstanding performance and strong sense of responsibility.
The sign is repeatedly provided with an interval to play the role of repeatedly prompting.
According to the project requirements, it is proposed to select a certain type of self-excited brushless generator, and the specific parameters are shown in Table 2 and Table 3.
The shift forman shall be responsible for the reservation and use of the universal key for the anti-misoperation locking device.
The original vouchers with regard to account payment must be with a receipt voucher of the receiving unit and person.
Motor field operation box AC0462EL23
Welding of inclined wearing plate shall be in accord with TB/T1580-1995 related provisions.
Deposit Bank: Subbranch of Economy and Technology Development Zone of China Construction Bank, Qingdao
As the railway bridges should have clear load-bearing, safe and reliable structure, sufficient strength and rigidity and satisfy the requirements of durability, deformation and deflection of structures must be controlled strictly to ensure the coordination and uniformity among structures, providing good dynamic characteristics for the combination of vehicles, lines and bridges and.
2. See building for detailed ±0.000 of the Project.
Volume 2 - Geology, Geotechnical Engineering, Hydrology, and Transportation Demand Analysis
5.1 Party B shall carry out construction and quality acceptance in strict accordance with design documents, construction and acceptance codes complying with the Owner's requirements, quality inspection and evaluation standards of the Project and technical requirements.
2. Registered Capital: Hengqin New District implements the registered capital subscription and registration system for limited liability companies.
GFL type lightning protection distributing cabinet adopts the comprehensive protection method to reduce the length of wiring, reduce the difficulty of wiring and improve the reliability of branching.
After the drill, the exit staff will report the number of personnel from exits and evacuation time (of the first passenger and last passenger) of the exits to the on-site commander in turn.
9.3 In case of any discrepancies between this agreement and the General Construction Contract (Project No.: NNGD-02DY-SG-01), the Lump-sum Contract shall prevail.
For data attributes, those data derive from building structure, people, things, objects, appliances and external environment. For collection channel, those data originate from the inherent characteristic parameters of the building, the operation parameters of facilities, fire alarm and linkage information, inspection information of firefighting facilities and behavior trace data.
The elevation of Pa in the drawing is corresponding with those of P1 and P8 in the layout plan, while the elevation of Pb is corresponding with those of P2 and P6 in the layout plan.
Filler for soft soil foundation, filler for immersed part of embankment, and filler for part below cutting bed where groundwater is developed.
1. Inspection of "on-board test functions" — failure of traction converters
According to the preliminary design materials and basic materials provided by the construction institute, the scheme of water collecting from Ishim River can be adopted in this feasibility study.
Guide supervision of each supervision team within the scope of tube section.
Meanwhile, during placement of exploration holes, drilling and borehole acceptance, photo of the whole site shall be taken.
The vibration and impact response and tolerance and the crash performance of the micro-computer integrated protection and monitoring device shall pass the test of severity class specified in relevant standards.
Testing sections shall be chosen in the hole section with relatively complete strata.
4.4.3 Be responsible for package design for sales and management of package materials and appliance.
2: Lightning full-wave impulse withstand voltage and power frequency withstand voltage refer to the withstand voltages under the atmospheric pressure of altitude 1,000m and below.
(6) Construction records or construction signing and confirmation forms and other records of construction cost;
Sufficient cables, screws and nuts, terminals, adhesive and tapes shall be provided to ensure compliance with the requirements of the system
The cabinet, including all the inserts, sub-boxes and individual components installed on the cabinet, shall meet the shock-proof requirements.
Self-check, information storage, inquiry and download functions
(3) cable bridge, cable gland, junction box, and armored cover of armored cables.
Be responsible for preparing the Rules for Implementation of Supervision of subgrade works.
The electric valve driver shall be installed to make actual opening direction of the valve consistent with indication direction of the driver.
1) The alignment shall be unified and tidy. After the cable is fixed, and there shall be no shaking or exposed conductors, which conforms to the Assembly Process of the COD-2000 On-line Analyzers.
If groundwater table is low or construction is done in rainy days, drainage sumps shall be set all around foundation pit bottom. The number, location and size of drainage sumps shall be determined through calculation according to the actual situation.
The energy can be collected for power generation through incinerating and treating the waste, so the project is also an energy conservation project.
Firstly, check and verify TSI System Schematic Diagram, Logic Diagram, and Terminal Wiring Diagram; the technical data of commissioning above shall be consistent with the actual situations on site and be correct.
(3) The heating of asphalt, mineral powder and temperature of asphalt mixture at delivery shall ensure that, when transported to the construction site, the temperature of them meet requirements of Table 5.6.6 in Technical Specifications for Construction of Highway Asphalt Pavements (JTG F40-2004).
According to the provisions of relevant laws, regulations and rules, including the Law of the People's Republic of China on Tenders and Bids, the bidding project has conformed to the bidding conditions and the Supervisor for this Project will be bided.
Table of culverts and channels (including mileage of up and down lines, type of diameter, skew angle, and horizontal linear meter, etc.), and provision of completion drawings or construction drawings is better.
During electromagnetic flaw detection, it is most likely to find cracks or flaws when the magnetic line of force is vertical to the direction of such cracks or flaws.
3:7 lime-soil is backfilled within 0.8m around foundation of greening areas. The compaction factor is not less than 0.93.
Article 35 The supervisor shall exercise the following powers in the supervision and administration of the joint venture:
The Company uses the current domestic color marking for identification of the technical status of measuring equipment.
Whether the drawings and other design documents are complete;correctness of benchmarks, coordinates and sizes, and whetherthere are any missing items in the design
Address: Building 11, Alley 1159, Kangqiao East Road, Kangqiao Industrial Park, Pudong District, Shanghai
During traction, the inverter outputs three-phase AC power with adjustable voltage and frequency to control the speed and torque of the traction motor.
The communication system of the line is mainly provided with transport system, data communication system, telephone switching system, cable dispatching communication system, mobile communication system, integrated video monitoring system, synchronization and clock allocation system, video conferencing system, centralized monitoring and alarm system, and power supply and equipment building environment monitoring system.
If corrective measures and implementation effect fail to meet relevant requirements, the department to be audited shall re-establish and effectively carry out corrective measures. After rectification, the audit team shall carry out tracking verification again until non-conformance items are completely rectified.
Capacity of high-speed rail is twice of that of highway, which can effectively release jam.
Version of International Rules for the Interpretation of Trade Terms: International Rules for the Interpretation of Trade Terms 2010 (Incoterms 2010) published by the International Chamber of Commerce (ICC)
A line-shape guidance sign is set at the outside of the curve with too small stopping sight distance in the road section where an accident easily occurs. With blue background and white pattern, such sign is used to warn road users of line-shape changes in front and cautious driving. It is required to ensure that the driver can see at least three line-shape guidance signs continuously within the curve range.
Table 3.1.2 Fireproof Distance between the Railway Line and the Outdoor and Semi-outdoor Storage Yards for Combustible Materials
If the foundation surface layer is paddy field, pond, and soft soil, reinforcement measures like dewatering, excavation and replacement, random rubble fill, and paving of sand bed course should be adopted;
When the monitoring index exceeds the standard, construction can be continued only after the settlement and displacement are lower than the design value and stable for 3-7 days.
(7) It is advisable to select the same system software or compatible system software in the network tolling and monitoring area.
◆ The installation direction of disconnector and the knife direction of grounding switch must be correct, and the phase distance, relative grounding distance as well as the phase tie beam shall meet the requirements; the post insulator shall be vertical to the base plane, and the centerlines of post insulators in the same phase shall be in the same plane.
If the site does not meet the installation requirements, the Tenderer shall assign the personnel to supervise the equipment.
1. Term meanings in this agreement is the same as those in special contract conditions and general contract conditions listed in 2nd item below.
Post-welding heat treatment at 620±14°C is required for pipeline welding joints.
General Design Specification of Inland Harbor Project (JTJ212-2006);
For nonconformity due to serious, common and subjective factors, reasons need to be analyzed and corrective measures are established and implemented.
G. The interval between surface rust removal and coating shall be within 4h, and it shall not be more than 12h in the workshops or on a sunny day with low humidity.
Building engineering product shall be marked based on unit engineering.
Compile the guides for inspection and acceptance measures for arrived devices.
Flight control person on duty Captain (Crew leader)
The construction area of the community health service center should meet the following requirements according to the number of people served:
When suspension clamps are used for overhead power line, the insulator shall be perpendicular to the ground level.
Fleet Condenser Three-Year ReliabilityEnhancement Scheme (2018~2020)
In case that it fails to make originals available, the organizations receiving such data shall stamp official seals on corresponding hard copies, and persons in charge shall sign their names and clearly write the reasons.
7) The earthing wires must be of low impedance, which means they must be as short and thick as possible.
In addition, most of the catering wastewater in the podium buildings and towers is discharged into the integrated oil separation treatment equipment to improve the quality of the effluent, reduce the pressure of the subsequent municipal treatment system, and reduce the impact of odor on the project environment. A small part which cannot be connected to the integrated oil separation treatment equipment due to the terrain shall be connected to the outdoor oil separator.
2. The canopy tube guide wall shall be provided at CH365+383~382, and 2 pieces of 7m long !89 anchor pipe shall be placed at each arch foot, with a longitudinal spacing of 0.5m. The locking anchor pipe shall be grouted.
Pump equipment: A total of 7 pump apparatus for the Project, all of them are the centrifugal pumps driven by motors.
The position of the section B is calculated according to the shear and the strength of the section is checked:
6.4.3 The following factors shall be taken into account in developing the detection plan for occupational health hazards:
The portion of subsidiaries' current net profits and losses attributable to minority interest must be presented as "minority interest income" under net income in the consolidated income statement.
2.3.3.2.6 Method Statement of Locomotive System Equipment Installation
8.1.2 Anchor (anchorage) mainly includes tension type, pressure type, load-tension-dispersive type and load-dispersive type, and applies to slope works and rock foundation pit works.
MN1H2.1P Double-wall corrugated (HDPE) pipe
2) The benchmark load and amplitude, frequency, number of times and others of vibration test and fatigue test on the component are provided by the bidding manufacturer, and are confirmed by the tenderee.
22.7. Confirmation of preventive maintenance and overhaul
1) The digital trunking TETRA standard is adopted for the internal space interface and signaling of the dedicated wireless communication system, and other signaling and interfaces must meet the Digital Cluster Mobile Communication System (ST/T11228-2000).
Experience and problem handling ability of personnel Satisfied Basically satisfied To be improved Not satisfied
The Project Management Department shall analyze the cause for the potential nonconforming products, accidents, events, nonconforming items and common quality defects discovered in the product formation tendency or in the examination by the superior department and Owner, and determine whether it is necessary to take corrective action. If it is necessary, corresponding improvement actions shall be formulated, which shall be approved by the competent officials of Project Management Department before implementation.
5. In the reinforcement drawing for reinforcement and frame structures, only the structure and dimensions of the large left half of the reinforcement and frame are shown, and the right half are completely symmetrical to the left half based on the intermediate wall axis.
Users can also use remote diagnosis tools to monitor CI system remotely.
Manual excavation pile foundation is temporarily used as frame column; the specific design will be in accordance with geological exploration data.
It is recommended for the Project to carry out environmental impact evaluation as soon as possible, and guide environmental protection engineering design of future design stage.
When maintenance in shops is required due to damage or normal maintenance, the Tenderer shall send qualified personnel to conduct after-sales work on the Tenderee's site.
Two layers of fiber glass based type Ⅰ (3mm+3mm) SBS modified asphalt waterproof coiled material
In Table 5-3, the maximum shearing stress is 0.35 MPa, smaller than of C35 concrete; according to Clause 5.5.2 of this document, shearing resistance calculation is not required, and reinforcement could be subject to the structure.
When the chloride salt mixed mortar is used, anti-corrosive treatment should be conducted beforehand on rebars or dowels in the masonry blocks.
When the post insulators are stacked, their central phases shall be in consistent with each other. Fasteners shall be complete and fixed firmly.
3.1.9 Do not handle large objects that will make you unable to see the situation above or around. If you have to handle objects that are too large or heavy, use appropriate handling equipment or get help.
5.9.2 The Measure is interpreted by the purchasing company.
Construction Management Department of China Railway Corporation (Seal)
UPS is capable of current-limited charging and over-discharge protection for storage batteries.
During the warranty period after the project is handed over, it is required to deal with the controversial issues such as causes and responsibilities of quality problems after the acceptance, and urge the responsible unit to handle them in a timely manner.
The Disclosing Party does not grant any license rights or other rights to any confidential information, Disclosing Party's trademark, trade name or trade secrets.
The Project will have some negative effects during the construction and operation, including: the project will increase the traffic loads on the surroundings of the park and affect the residents' travel; land acquisition arising from park construction; and influence of attraction of migrants on the local social security and public facilities resources.
1. Autoclaved aerated concrete solid blocks and concrete wall shall be used.
To protect the legitimate interests of the Buyer and the Seller, both parties hereto have reached the following agreement through negotiation according to relevant provisions in the Contract Law of People's Republic of China:
The hot-dip galvanizing should be employed for each metal part of the lightning protection and grounding unit.
After vehicles are assembled and installed in vehicle fabrication factories, the Tenderer shall conduct vehicle tests as per regulations in "Customer Requirement Specifications".
5.9.1.Train fault and status information can be uploaded to the depot maintenance center in real time.
The wall surface materials, surface treatment color, pattern and slogan shall meet requirements of the standardized construction site in Ziyang City and conform to Employer's requirements of the Site Safety, Environmental Protection and Health Management Acknowledgements, and shall be approved by the contractor and the engineers.
41) Implementation of "two emphases and one major source (namely emphasis on supervision of hazardous chemical process, emphasis on supervision of hazardous chemicals, and focus on major hazardous source of hazardous chemicals".
The foundation is poured in two layers. Steel formwork is adopted for abutment foundation formwork. The dimension of formwork conforms to structural dimension requirements; C30 concrete is mixed in a unified manner at the mixing plant and shall be transported to the construction site via concrete tanker and shall be poured with chute or auto pump.
The approach bridge is located in the shallow sea area, and the pylons are used for seabed cleaning with specific forms shown in Figures 1.1-4 and 1.1-5. These pylons are used for the placing and lifting of permanent magnets and salvage crates.
a) The incoming materials should be stored in accordance with the Material Management System.
In the warehouse-in of purchased or self-made batch products, Material Supply Department shall prepare warehouse-in No. set by set, and mark product object in distribution account.
Road works (0+000–1+800)
Figure 6-3-16 Beam Plate Reinforcement Process Flow Chart
The process flow consists of 6 processes: evaporation and crystallization, thickening, filtration and separation, decomposition and hot solution, centrifugal dewatering and product desiccation.
20.2Party B shall notify in writing Party A of all subcontracts under the Contract. However, the notice of subcontracting shall not relieve Party B from its responsibilities and obligations of under the Contract.
7—Exhaust valve; 8—Air supply valve; 9—Adjustment valve plunger; 10—Air supply valve spring; 11—Single-slow plunger valve; 12—Positioning plunger;
4)GB50490-2009 Technical Code of Urban Rail Transit
2. Excavation: strengthen advanced geological forecasting and adhere to the construction principle of first forecasting and then excavation; improve blasting design, strictly control over-excavation and under-excavation; incorporate deformation observation into process management, timely perform measurement and analysis and guide construction.
One 22kV power supply from the Vang Vieng Local Substation
2 Double probes should be installed at the detection point, and the installation structures of the probes shall be convenient for regular inspection and maintenance.
The vibrating rod shall be inserted into about 5-10cm of the lower layer of concrete, with an inserting interval less than 1.5 times of its radius of action, and shall keep a distance of over 10cm away from the formwork during vibration, and no omissive, excessive, and repeated vibration shall be allowed.
Pay attention to the protection of reinforcement position during pouring. In order to prevent template deformation, concrete pouring shall be conduct ed symmetrically in layers.
In the design, 80L-electric water heater for the public toilet and 30L-electric water heater for the independent toilet cannot meet the requirement of the students.
6.4. Metal components painted with anti-rust paint twice, silver paint twice
8. Since 1# pier and 3# abutment of this bridge is free from geological borings, drilling should be added before construction and construction can be carried out only when the design is corrected based on it.
Under the joint efforts of the sides, new progress in the economic and trade cooperation between China and Peru has been constantly achieved in recent years.
(3)Wireless Train Number Checking Information Transmission Service
(2) The quality assurance system shall be perfected, quality assurance measures shall be implemented, and the pre-work training system and technical review system, technical disclosure system, construction self-inspection system as well as other quality management systems shall be developed.
Interlocking equipment completes idle monitoring of track sections through track occupancy detection equipment, and can block and release track sections.
When receiving the external environment complaints, requests or suggestions, the Quality Department shall timely fill in the Information Communication Report.
Certain effect on surcharge preloading and foundation stabilization
In order to ensure that the strength and rigidity of the formwork meet the requirements, when using wood as the formwork, wood beams will be installed on the outside of the formwork, and the size and spacing will be determined by calculation.
(1) Collect relevant design data of iron sheds before dismantling and get to know the structure of iron sheds;
This icon stands for all such safety instructions that any failure to abide by such instructions may cause damage and/or faults of components/locomotive.
LGJZ No. 620100201400045
When the open cassion is being lowered, the positions shall be measured at a regular time interval. The wash against the river bed nearing the cassion, local flow rate and direction shall be measured if necessary.
High strength bolt of single cross beam (10.9S) 20MnTiB
(11) During power cut operation, the following safety measures shall be taken:
2.2.21 OA Office System: short for CR20G's office automation system. For this system, the functions currently in use include official documents, faxes, documents to be approved, approval of business travel, announcements, internal mails, internal messages, and so on.
The approval on Yizheng change was RMB 99.05 million (contributed by Yizheng city), that on Liuhe change was RMB 86.05 million (contributed by Nanjing municipal government) and that on an increase of land requisition and relocation by RMB 249.55 million (capital of Jiangsu province).
Connection survey was done for three frame networks which were used as origins of CPI control networks. They were numbered CP0-04, CP0-05 and CP0-07. The origins were respectively set at the start point, middle point and end point of the line.
Heater with plug on the one end and jack on the other end should be adopted to heat pipe terminals and pipe fittings to welding temperatures for connection.
After the welding and heat treatment operation is completed, cut off the power supply and carefully inspect the operation site and protective facilities. Leave the site only after making sure that no fire risk is available.
The plastic part in each exit and the outline border are secure.
This Contract Section starts from K101+275 and ends at K107+400, in a total length of 6.125km. Its main structures include "one tunnel, two bridges and one service area", namely, Xiakou Tunnel, Gaoganghe Super Major Bridge, Shijiaba Major Bridge and Xingshan Service Area.
The potential accidents and emergencies of the photovoltaic power station shall be determined from the following aspects: fire, natural disasters (flood, frozen disaster, wind damage and lighting stroke), industrial accident (occupational disease and personal injury), equipment damage accident, misoperation accident, traffic accident, etc.
3.3 Given that the traffic shall be maintained during construction, the vertical elevation and the difference of flatness shall be controlled within ±5cm and ±2cm respectively.
Place 4 jacks with elevation of 200mm on the flat car and lift the main transformer;
Revealed by the 2 boreholes for verification drilled during construction, there is no stone mixed in the ore body.
Installation of street lamp: during the construction of street lamp foundation, the inlet and outlet steel pipe should be embedded into the foundation, and the position of the steel pipe leaving the foundation should be centered as far as possible, so as not to affect the installation of lamp pole in the next step.
5.2.2.1.5. Formation of Reinforcement Processing Field
All the detection shall be carried out according to the operation requirement of the same accuracy level as regulated; timely put forward the achievement report; the mutual deviation of detection is usually less than double mean square error. If the mutual deviation of detection is more than double mean square error or the gross error is discovered, the supervisory board shall take specialized detection measures together with the Supervisor to deal with it.
The second design liaison meeting will be held at the headquarter of the original ISCS equipment manufacturer.
Reconnect cables at Point L and Point N of =31-X103.
Operators of special operations shall receive training and obtain the operation qualification certificate. But the welding operator must pass the examination held by the Ministry of Labor.
9) Drawing and technical document submission plan shall include: drawings, compiling provisions of technical documents and submission time.
Continuous running time 5~10 h
The system can allow station controllers to monitor four electric rooms (communication, signal, electric power and electrification), entrance, ticket checking area, ticket office and platform as well as the grade crossing of railway and highway. It also allows central dispatchers to monitor all monitoring points at each station along the whole line.
GB/T 2828.1-2003 Sampling Procedures for Inspection by Attributes - Part 1: Sampling Schemes Indexed by Acceptance Quality Limit (AQL) for Lot-by-lot Inspection (idt ISO 2859-1:1999)
The gravel cushion is mainly used for horizontal drainage and facilitates consolidation of soil layer after construction. The precast pile top is of gravel cushion, which can play obvious stress diffusion, improve composite foundation bearing capacity and reduce foundation deformation volume. The geogrid calculation should refer to Section 5.4.
Strictly manage the overload operation of the hoist and implement approval system.
Skirt Building Decoration of HuDong Finance Building (Atlantic Department Store SOHO)/F1-5,HuDong Finance Building, 1128 Xiangyin Road, Yangpu District, Shanghai
(1) To make up for the shortage of the Goods, technical data or spare parts;
2 borrow areas are set along this line according to earth filling requirements for subgrade.
The number of pipelines provided in Material List is for reference only, and the actual needs during construction at site shall prevail. The construction shall be carried out by cooperating with such specialties as building, structure, and electric power.
6) Cover and protect the concrete newly removed from the formwork with plastic cloth.
⑧ As the drilling operation is stopped for some reasons, the protective cover shall be arranged at the opening of the drilling hole.
In the whole process of pile foundation construction, safety precautionary measures shall keep to relevant laws and regulations of the People's Republic of China.
(7) Iran Environmental Agency has issued an environmental assessment document for the whole Line 6 Project.
Shallow soft soil with a thickness of 0.0 - 3.0 m in the embankment base will be removed and replaced.
Output of launched forced brake is closed or to be closed.
Refer to ISO 2768m-k for general tolerance.
Capacity: 0 ~ 36 channel AC input with optional voltage and current.
4. It must be guaranteed that the net thickness for protective layer of reinforcement must be not less than 40 mm during the construction.
2500X1200X1100mm (guardrail height)
GD19997_TTP-BCM_120706_ENCN_V01.pdf Type Test Program of Brake Control Unit
Conduct final inspection after material inspection, process handover and acceptance and quality inspection of concealed works, review the qualification of operators, and review and sign the quality acceptance records of inspected lot.
The Tenderee's manufacture supervision and inspection on the product quality shall relieve the Tenderer from its quality liabilities.
The roof beams of the project are of H-shaped solid web type with variable sections. The maximum height of the sections is 1200mm, and the maximum span is 25m. The roof beam of each span is composed of two segments to be assembled into a whole on the ground tire frame before installation.
Special Seal for Certificate of Work Safety Supervision and Administration Bureau of Henan Province
Reinforcement connection: Reinforcement shall be checked for firm connection whatever connection mode is adopted. When reinforcement diameter is equal or greater than 28mm, lap joint shall be not bound.
Annex D (Informative) Example of Test Certificate
The door leaf can only be cut off when the door is closed. After the door is cut off, other commands will not be accepted and executed, and the door safety loop bypasses the door.
Therefore, the starting point of the project is located at the entrance of Lekki Deep Seaport, which is routed to the west along the Coastal Highway, with entrances and exits respectively arranged at the entrance of Dangote Refinery and the entrance of Lekki Sino-Nigeria Free Trade Zone to effectively serve Lekki Free Trade Zone.
6.4.1.8. Another air compressor unit shall meet air requirements of train when one air compressor unit fails due to failure.
Based on the results of implementation, confirm the effectiveness of the improvement (by inspection or test)
LKJ05 Vehicle-Mounted Device Delivery Commissioning Checklist
(3) The main devices used in the lighting equipment mobilization and site acceptance shall meet the following requirements:
After pouring is completed, the pile cap shall be covered with plastic cloth or geotextile in time, and shall be cured after initial setting.
Laminates of Textile Glass-reinforced Unsaturated Polyester and Phenacrylic Resins for Load-bearing Structural Members (GF-UP, GF-PHA) - Physical Parameters for Standard Laminates
The requirement for testing tensile yield strength of reinforcement is: {8=15.1KN，10=26.3KN，|14=61.6KN
1) Power supply and distribution equipment is close to the load center, to reduce voltage loss in the line, improve power quality of power supply network and economic effectiveness of network operation.
The notification can be done via telephone or in a face to face manner.
A group of pitch points can be cut with a semi-auto cutting machine. During the cutting, gas welding operators are strictly prohibited from using the dedicated pathway for the cutting machine to avoid larger dimensional deviation.
The government launched an economic stimulus plan of about USD 6.3 billion in early 2010 and planned up to USD 34 billion in national infrastructure development projects. The funds will be used for road construction, bridge construction and power station construction in 2017.
Establish proper drainage system before processing abandoned ballast within the abandoned ballast field to prevent the loss of abandoned ballast; waste ballast and waste liquids generated by the construction process shall be processed in accordance with the relevant environmental requirements instead of being arbitrarily abandoned and discharged; it is required to provide sewage treatment pond at appropriate locations outside the opening in each work section of the tunnel for treating sewage.
Security guards should obtain as much information as possible about the perpetrators, such as license plate number, vehicle color, personnel description, height, weight, hair color, clothing and other identification features (tattoos), the perpetrators' whereabouts, and other witnesses.
Particularly, in case of fire accident occurred in underground station, it can make relevant disaster relief facilities effectively run in good time according to design conditions to ensure personnel safety.
2. Part 2 shall be excavated by weak blasting. Construct the initial support of side wall: initially spray concrete, extend steel frame (set foot anchor bolt or anchor pipe, not indicated in the drawing), lay mesh reinforcement, and re-spray concrete to the designed thickness after setting the radial bolt.
The Bid Review Committee shall, in accordance with the bid review method, carry out technical and commercial comparative review on all bidders.
CTC central power supply (with UPS 120kVA)
Supplier Prospect- Before Goods/Service Delivery
There are two proposals for process layout of dispatching console:
The access control system is composed of central system, station system, site-level system and terminal equipment as well as communication network.
Delete 1 (2) in this section and substitute it by:
f) Evaluate the Project and provide comments on percentage of completion.
The capability of withstanding an air pressure of not less than 1500Pa is temporarily consider for the inlet purification equipment, which is specifically determined during design liaison.
① Cable joints shall not be buried or laid overhead. Instead, they must be connected into junction boxes and attached to walls.
The location belongs to tectonic denudation hill, and the lithology is diabase, alkaline, grayish green-blackish green, and in ophitic texture and massive structure.
Calculated outdoor air conditioning wet-bulb temperature in summer: 26.9ºC
As to electronic media files, the competent unit releasing the document shall perform daily management of the document to ensure its security and the contents of its electronic version are consistent with that of the paper version.
⑨ -1 Sandstone (J1): completely weathered zone (W4), auburnish red, primary rock structure basically damaged, extremely developed joint fissure, calcareous/argillaceous cementing, rock core in earth pillar and easily fragmented by pinching, with a rock core recovery rate of 70%.
1. After the system is installed, block all roof drain and fill the roof or gutter;The water level shall be enough to submerge the roof drain for 1h, with no leakage found at the roofing area around the roof drain.
A brief meeting is convened every afternoon by the Project Manager to coordinate and arrange the work of the next day.
The foreign lender of the project is International Bank for Reconstruction and Development (IBRD), or "World Bank" for short.
The specific measures are designed as per durability requirements of manufactures.
The leakproofness test shall be performed after the pipes pass the strength test.
3.2 The QHSE Department is the competent department of management review, which shall be responsible for the preparation of management review, and the tracking verification of the implementation of the management review improvement measures. It shall supervise and assess the implementation of the management review of the subordinate units.
The supplies supply plan is the basis for implementing supplies suppliers, signing supply contracts, determining transportation methods, preparing transportation plans and organizing mobilization and storage.
Program preparation mainly focuses on design documents and specifications, also considers the actual situation of the site and our own construction experience.
In combination with other industries such as mechanical repair, etc., it is estimated that a huge output value will be achieved in the accompanying industries driven by paper making industry every year.
5) CR20G and the directly managed project department shall regularly inspect the emergency materials, equipment, facilities, personnel allocation, communication and alarm equipment and devices.
After the completion of rolling operation, the embankment appearance shall meet the following requirements: top surface of the compacted layer is stable without any subsidence, and the surface is smooth without any tracks.
The system control center is set in the fire control room on the ground floor of the office building.
Select the excavator bucket capacity required for surrounding rock mass stripping production of the mine according to the surrounding rock mass properties, annual stripping capacity and working system of the mine:
Within the scope of comparison, the internal line is 29.18km long, in which the bridge length is 0.53km, the ratio of bridges and tunnels is 1.82%, and the static investment is about RMB 1.317 billion.
(2) For working surface of main track waterstop base plate, the allowable deviation of torsion resistance within working range is ≤ 0.5 mm;
Figure 4-5-5-6 Screenshot of Normal Up Traffic Balise
(4) Optimizing blasting design and reduce the interval of surrounding holes to not larger than 50 cm. Employ the method of charging in layers with small primer-cartridges. Increase the number of primer detonators to reduce the amount of primary explosive in the same section, which will improve the effect of smooth blasting and reduce factors resulting in rock burst.
1. Current Conditions of Existing Locomotive and Rolling Stock Facilities and Equipment
(2) Precautions on installation and supporting of formworks for floor slabs:
The tunnel design given in the field survey stage is basically feasible.
Length of screw 1 is 550, and length of screw 2 is 600.
The trainees understand relevant theoretical knowledge of maintenance, and master the relevant professional maintenance technology, and can independently maintain the relevant support equipment provided by the Chinese side in case of the common faults and problems.
2.1.1 The places where class-A hazardous chemicals (flashing point: ≤28°C) or high-toxic, in line with Catalogue of High-toxic Substances (WFJF [2003] No. 142), and high-corrosive articles are stored or used;
Other drawings and documents required by the Supervision Engineer.
A retaining wall or mortar rubble (concrete) pile shall be set at the outlet of seeping groove as per design requirements.
Automation Level and Control Room Arrangement
TVM can sell two kinds of one-way tickets with different face values (ticket types released can be set through parameters).
Rated loading capacity 5t
(8) Clearance inspection for sections, station platforms, canopies and other equipment and facilities is completed and relevant requirements are satisfied.
1. The quantity of spare parts provided by the Contract is considered for installation and commissioning of track equipment. All defects found during installation and commissioning are rectified. Track equipment is intact and normal for operation. No debris is piled around sectional tracks, and spare tracks and auxiliaries are stored at specified zones at required quantity.
Lot I of Civil Works for the Project of PT.OSS Self-provided Power Plant
Before concrete construction, check whether the positions of expansion joints, drainage pipes and other embedded parts are correct, and are lashed properly; and reserve the square openings for mold removal according to the design requirements;
Start of rotary jet pile reinforcement: D3K38+630
All anti-static electricity bridging work includes but not limited to process pipes, supports, flanges, valves, vessels, equipment, bridges, etc.
The outside of the scaffold is fully enclosed with a dense green safety net.
Material procurement of Project Department should follow the Control Procedures for Materials Procurement, Procedures for Material Supplier Evaluation and Selection and relevant procedure requirements of the Owner.
It refers to the retaining structure that maintains the stability of the slope by its own gravity.
5.3.1.1 Lighting shall be arranged after the installation of equipment and process pipelines to avoid damage and waste.
The rated conversion power of switch is of: 2.5KN ~ 4.5KN
Fax: 051-56654 (railway system)
2. For the tracks of this tunnel, based on the through down track, all mileages, design elevations and design grades shown in this drawing correspond to the centerline of the down track.
④ The drilled hole is cleaned by high-pressure wind and water to remove loose rock powder and water inside. If the anchor bolt does not need to be inserted immediately, The mouth is covered or blocked for protection purpose. Before installation of the anchor bolt, check the drilled hole to see whether it needs to be cleaned again.
The estimated total investment of the construction and installation works for the Project is about RMB 2.675 billion.
Second Sheet Accounting Sheet (Accounting Voucher of Payee)
For layout of pipelines, convenience and space for installation and maintenance shall be taken into consideration.
Single-hole reinforced concrete circular culvert(1.0m)
Direct in the routine management of all resource allocation centers (including pre-allocation centers).
The metering standard used for physical design progress is the standard man hours required for Project design calculated based on contracting experiences.
Table 3.1.4-2 Test results of carbonation depth of other beam segments
The construction period of girder erection is from March 1, 2021 to July 30, 2021, meeting the requirements of the construction duration for milestones in the tendering documents
According to the design drawings, the name, model, machine number, transmission mode, rotation direction and air inlet position shall be checked according to the complete name of the ventilator.
Code for Management of Technical Standardization of Project Construction of Construction Enterprises
The vibration value of the pump shall be in accordance with the regulations of technical documents, but If there are no such regulations, the vibration value of the centrifugal pump shall be in accordance with the regulations of HGJ20203-2000;
The depot adopts a thorough-type layout, and has two transfer tracks on the south side connected to A1 Station.
When the Project crosses a village or water source, the water drainage facility and blocking measures shall be arranged firstly. After the Project is completed, the water drainage facility shall be timely recovered, and the construction shall be arranged in the dry season as far as possible;
This DMU is successfully developed by CRRC Tangshan Co., Ltd. in 1998, and the trial production of this DMU has successfully filled in the gap of China's railway transport.
1.5.1 General Affairs Department shall report the project completion settlement and its supporting documents to the Supervisor and the Employer's Project Department. The Supervisor and the Employer's Project Department are jointly responsible for the organization and preliminary review of the completion settlement, and shall complete the review and approval within 30 days after the submission of settlement report.
Dimension and ultimate deviation of shallow-buried rubber water stop for construction joint
Type, number and machine-hour of construction equipment used in the work;
Article 16The days of annual leave taken by the employees shall not exceed the approved number of days in general. If it is really necessary to exceed the number of days due to special circumstances, the employees shall timely report for review and approval, and the accumulated days exceeding the days of annual leave entitlement due to annual leave shall be deemed as personal leave. The number of days exceeded without report or approval shall be deemed to be absenteeism.
All pipes must be cleaned before installing the pressure reducing valve. The filter should be cleaned and removed regularly before the pressure reducing valve.
In October 2014, the Autumn Session of Mongolia Parliament made a resolution about the gauge of partial new railway lines and approved the adoption of standard gauge for Tavan Tolgoi - Gashuun Sukhait Line and Hut - Bichigt Line.
The open installation and concealed installation of the power distribution box shall be subject to the system description, and the installation position of the power distribution box shall be reserved with the construction of the civil structure.
5000TPD Cement Clinker Production Line Project in Kenya
Breccia: grayish brown, medium dense ~ dense, saturated, dominated by slate, phyllite and gneiss, the grain size is 2~55mm, with clay soil and sand partially, it is distributed in lens.
Overflow pipe and vent pipe of water tank shall be placed near the drain place but cannot be connected to the drain pipe directly.
(9) Monitor: two lines of LCD character mode LCD monitor and curve diagram monitor
(2) Provide the variation curve of COP of the water chilling unit at different stages, and the curve chart and table of the part-load performance;
For special types of work, corresponding PPE shall be provided in strict accordance with the requirements.
Second Continuous Unit Setting-out Plan of 2x30m Box Girder Web
All electric connector assemblies used shall be properly contacted under any working conditions. The opening and closing of contact terminal of electrical appliances are correct and reliable, free from stuck or retarded problems.
Therefore, we have people from the headquarters project and the project management departments to jointly form an efficient management team to execute the Project.
Electrical connection used for prevent the bearing from the influence of current corrosion;
3.2.3.1 Door opening/closing
If the tunnel span is large, measuring points shall be added in the arch part according to the construction method, and arranged by referring to the following figure.
Grouting shall be operated from above down in the order of drilling steel pipe.
The position of the steel bar shall be checked when the concrete is poured and vibrated. Measures shall be taken to restrict the position of the steel bar and prevent the displacement of the steel bar.
(7) Animal passages are set up for wildlife and livestock along the line to ensure their normal activities.
a) The Marketing Department is responsible for collecting technical information, industry information and technology development trends of professional products, conducting domestic market research and forecasting, and proposing proposals on new product development;
4. All bearing platforms and foundation beams not indicated are arranged by centering the axis.
The bearing layer under foundation shall not be thinner than 1.2m.
2.4.2 Specification for materials (including list of suppliers,and consumable materials,e.g.welding flux and solder,etc.)
Supervising Engineer (the Employer's Discipline Technical Director for the Project):
The design drawing and construction factors shall be taken into account during reinforcement blanking, to save material and facilitate construction. When blanking, the specification requirement that the welded joints within the same effective section shall not exceed 50% of total number shall be met;
The prediction shows that comprehensive wastewater of the Project has very low pollution impact on Nanting River after being treated and reaching standard, and it is unnecessary to carry out further attenuation prediction.
6.1 Owner of this manual should properly keep the manual without causing any damage to it. Private lending and giving to other people is prohibited.
→It is proposed to select the domestic electromagnetic flow meter with reliable operation and stable performance, and bring in other high-quality process instruments and water quality analysis instruments from abroad.
(2). As agreed by both parties that the Maximum Credit Limits under the Agreement cover the credit lines of unliquidated businesses under the original comprehensive credit agreement (No. 78621601034).
Doing this can help PCC know the situation.
Produce, store, adjust and control pressured air and provide all pneumatic systems of the whole train with required high-quality, clean and stable pressured air.
The scope of power supply in control centers, depots and comprehensive bases includes communication, signals, disaster prevent and alarming, station equipment monitoring, fire control, electric equipment for automatic fare collection and electric monitoring system etc., ventilation, air conditioners, water supply and drainage equipment, elevators, indoor and outdoor lighting equipment, and maintenance and test equipment etc..
List of Rectification of XXX Issues
It is indicated by the calculation results that under the condition of AW3 load, if the traction network voltage is 750V and braking network voltage is 825V:
q. The quality inspector shall report the joint inspection and the outbound direction of EMU to the inspection dispatcher after the joint inspection, and swipe his card at the working position computer or log in to the information system to record the end time of the joint inspection operation.
Some epiphytes have various blossoms, while others (including those on the leaves) have "a tree from another tree" and "grass from leaves".
By establishing, implementing and maintaining appropriate design and development processes, the Group ensures that products or services are provided and met to the customers, final users or organization's concepts or requirements regarding products and services.
Elevation above embedded bolt 4-M30 with head exposed by 110 shall be flush with that of trestle work surface P6-3
Figure 2-3-14 Circuit of Button Indication Lamp for Single Shunting Signal
Code for Durability Design on Concrete Structure of Railway (Description of Provisions are attached) (TB10005-2010), Complementary Standard for Construction Quality Acceptance of Railway Concrete Engineering, and Railway Concrete Construction Technology Guide shall be followed strictly.
- Power system test procedure - according to DOC#26;
Taxation Period: Quarter 1 Quarter 2 Quarter 3 Quarter 4
Unless otherwise specified, such notice, consent or confirmation shall be in writing and the word "notice" shall be interpreted accordingly.
(3) Refer to Standard for Constructional Quality Acceptance of High-speed Railway Communication Engineering (TB10755-2010)
System hardware: ≥HS 3* 300GB SAS HDD, RAID 0/1/5
When thin and long member bars are hoisted, lifting points shall be determined through calculation. As for the thin and long objects with even weight in the length direction, lifting points can be tied in reference to the following provisions:
Proper anticorrosive measures shall be taken for the mechanical equipment.
The specifications and models of the video, control and power cables of indoor cameras shall meet the design requirements of the construction drawings. These cables shall be laid in 2 different PVC trays.
PA system can modify the order and content of broadcast according to the preset parameters, and has the text-to-speech function.
8. Clean up the garbage in time and transport it to the garbage bin to keep the dormitory and
High Fill Embankment in K85+299 – K85+340
If it is not manual release-coupler, two couplers cannot be separated.
Samples of acceptable forms of guarantee and Declaration of Undertaking are annexed in Annex A, B, C and D.
Center line of vertical beam is also the center line of fastening pieces, therefore, the positions of the fastening pieces shall be controlled carefully when installation and the deviation shall be less than 2mm;
Defect of Rail Fastenings
In main interface, click the key to enter the fire alarm interface, and vehicle formation area on the upper part of the screen will display the current actual fire detection status of each vehicle with icon.
Installation of steel structures (packing room-finished product transferring room-bottle feeding shed)
44.6 After termination of the Contract, the completed works and the procured materials and equipment shall be properly protected and handed over by the Contractor.
a. Use the 500 V megohmmeter to measure the resistance between secondary windings and the insulation resistance to ground (resistance between secondary windings and insulation resistance to ground: ≥ 100 MΩ).
(11) The insulated shell of the screw base should not be damaged or leaked. The live line (phase line) should be connected to the center contact, and the zero line should be connected to the end connected to the screw base.
Contract No. (to be filled) – Wuhan Shopping Mall Reconstruction and Expansion Project
Yard tracks are preferably laid on flat slope; track outside shed may be arranged on the slope with the gradient not greater than 1.5‰ in difficult cases.
Address: No. 88-89 KTK Road, Yaoguan Town, Wujin District, Changzhou City, Jiangsu Province
Power distribution systems; Lighting system; Lightning protection system and earthing system of building;
All employees will receive pre-job training for strengthening the management awareness and improving the operation skills. The workers engaged in special types of work and technical management personnel must hold certificates to take up their posts.
IFS TC MAIL OKIT Other____________
(5)Determine the positions where protection is required, including crossings with tracks, bridges, rivers and passing through relevant buildings, and the protection mode.
Lead teacher Awang said excitedly to the station staff.
The overlying layer is f gravel contained silty clay and silty sand, without outcropped bedrock.
Single-column A-4 (upright column: Φ89X4.5X3200;layout Φ800)
The company won the bidding of Shanghai Taopu 620 Project in February, 2017, which achieved the zero breakthrough in the field of projects at ten million level.
The compressive strength of the brickwork can reach to 14MPa, unless specially indicate, the thickness of the exterior wall is 350mm, the thickness of the interior wall is 230mm.
Each prefabricated pedestal is equipped with two sets of base formworks which are interchanged with each other. The base formwork trolley is used to move out the formwork. The 10t overhead traveling crane is used for hoisting in the prefabrication yard when the base formwork is moved in.
1.1.1.3 Close the mechanical water filling equipment, close all the valves that are opened, and disconnect the water filling connector.
2. The subgrade bed surface layer in the scope of transition section shall be filled with graded crushed stones mixed with 5% cement,
The longest mountain tunnel on the 350 km/h high-speed railway in China - Dayaoshan Tunnel on the Wuhan - Guangzhou High-speed Railway
Hot-dip galvanized corrugated pipe shall be adopted for vertical and circular hole duct with sleeve connection. End socket of the corrugated pipe shall be polished smoothly. Both ends shall be twisted to complete contact and outer joints shall be baking hot and sealing tight with heat shrink sleeve.
This type of arrangement is featured in clear indication of line alignment to guide drivers' vision, ordinary drainage effect, which can be improved by adjustment of intervals of sumps based on calculation, and cultivation of greening on the central median, which bring about better visual effect than the aforementioned two types.
Based on the observational data for years of Haikou Hydrometrical Station, the maximum peak flow in Tanglangchuan River is 83.3m3/s, minimum flow is 0m3/s and average flow is 15.428m3/s.
Rust Grades and Preparation Grades of Steel Surfaces before Application of Paints and Related Products GB8923-1998
4.1 Responsibilities of the Manager of Metrological Management Department of Quality Management Department
① Traction substation: The electrical energy (AC 220 kV) sent from the power system is converted into electrical energy (AC 27.5 kV) suitable for electric traction of the railway line by the traction transformer, and then sent to the OCS erected along the railway line to supply power to electric locomotives.
All tests shall be witnessed by the Tenderee's engineer or the legal representative authorized by the railway and high-speed railway agency on site.
The foundation course should be moisturized before mortar paving of the bonding course. Plain cement mortar should be brushed evenly, and then mortar of the bonding course should be paved, tamped, leveled by wooden trowel, and roughened;
The signal equipment room in the main line station shall be located at the same side as the station control room as far as possible; it also shall be close to the communication equipment room and far away from the areas probable to disturb signal equipment operation like environmental control room and substation, etc. the locations of signal equipment room and signal cable incoming room shall facilitate leading in the cables of section and platform.
20 Technical Code for Regulation of CATV System (GB 50200-94);
Be fully responsible for the command and coordination of pipe jacking construction
In masonry works, the temperature difference between brick surface and mortar should not be more than 30ºC and the temperature difference between stone surface and mortar shall not be more than 20ºC.
On December 26, the Qianjiang-Changde Railway, which connects Qianjiang in Chongqing with Zhangjiajie and Changde in Hunan, officially opened to traffic, bringing EMUs to Xianfeng County, Laifeng County, Longshan County and Sangzhi County located at the junction of Hunan, Chongqing and Hubei, ending the history of no railway there.
e) The compensation rope core shall be coated with neutral grease, and the grease shall be ensured not to overflow from the core at + 80 °C, and the grease shall not crack at -50°C.
The overlapping construction with the erection of water, electricity and ventilation is the most outstanding conflict in engineering construction.
3. It is strictly prohibited to disclose or give the information provided by Party A to a third party.
There are 40 items in total subjected to the spot check, and all the 40 items are conforming and 0 item is nonconforming.
The project area is roughly divided into four areas, as shown below:
No person with or suspected of dishonesty or criminal records may be employed without the consent of the Chief Compliance Officer (Compliance Director).
(5) Cast-in-place beams and slabs and berthing members: C40F300
The stray current system protection system provided by bidder should follow the principle of "in combination of prevention first and discharging second".
(4) The key can be turned regardless of the position of the mode selection switch
(5) Check the bore diameter of interchange small bridge culvert for consistency with agreement, and check the drainage and irrigation culvert position and bore diameter for consistency with site and whether the use function conforms to actual needs.
Repeated sharp pulse generated in AC power supplies such as vehicle chopper;
5.3.1. The connection wire between the monitoring equipment and the detector is short-circuited and open circuit.
All the covers of the inspection wells adopt composite materials. All the well covers are burglarproof. The anti-falling devices shall be installed for inspection wells of the sewage system.
No preventing and assessing various violations and calling others together to analyze these violations as per the "four-no-green-lights".
(2) Learn the methods of operation of CBI system, and get familiar with the functions and meaning of each functional button on the display screen.
Figure 18 HVAC Unit Status and Temperature Display Interface
2 Major Construction Steps and Methods for Water Supply Works
10min in China, 3s in America.
General Certification Fundamentals + Corresponding Certification Fields Fundamentals3-year validity
5) Communication equipment: telephones, mobile phones and alarm apparatus;
The bridge shall be constructed in strict accordance with requirements of design drawing, construction specification and relevant regulations for technical operations.
F550 (Twin-chambered cylindrical furnace) and F201\F202 (Box-type furnace) are to be emphatically introduced:
When some reinforcements are required to be replaced during construction, the reinforcements for replacement shall be at the equal strength, and the replacement shall not be made without the approval of the Designer, to meet the requirements of minimum reinforcement ratio and crack resistance checking computations.
--Tool kit shall be used for work at height, and throwing tools at random is prohibited.
10.5.2 The girder casting beds shall be firm and stable and the settlement shall meet the requirements of the construction process. For the casting bed on the incremental launching line, the centerline and the longitudinal slope shall be the same as those of the bridge design.
And whereas, you require the Seller to submit bank guarantee of the amount specified in the Contract by approved bank to you, and we (the bank) agree to issue this irrepealable bank guarantee for the Seller;
When the concrete is poured, the top surface shall be covered with geotextile after the initial set of the concrete, and the bearing platform shall be wrapped in time after removing the formwork, the platform shall be wrapped with one layer of geotextile and then one layer of plastic cloth, and a specific person shall be appointed to spay water on the bearing platform for curing.
Wire duct shall be designed to meet modularized principle, the connections of wire duct sections shall be provided with effective protection, and cables in the wire duct shall be fixed effectively with wire duct body to prevent damage to wire harness by relative motion.
For the class-B minor nonconforming products to be disposed by "repair" or "concession", handling office shall make corresponding disposal conclusions for approval by handling office director;
Loading method: one weighing loading and multiple weighing loading in one vehicle;
including field monitoring subsystem, progress control subsystem, material supply subsystem, expert-assisted decision-making subsystem and professional data processing subsystem will be established to cover all aspects of construction management.
This height range is backfilled and compacted in layers with chip, with the degree of compaction ≥ 95% and the layer thickness ≤ 200.
The protection wires in the up traffic and down traffic are arranged in parallel connection of return crossing rails according to the calculated distance.
1. System arrangement: every startup burner is provided with a combustion fan for startup burner, and every furnace is provided with a separate furnace wall air cooling fan and a seal fan; the Project has two combustion lines, and is provided with totally four combustion fans for startup burner, two furnace wall air cooling fans and two seal fans.
a new110kv traction substation in Pengzhou, including 1.5km of 110kv power circuits.
Figure 4.21-7Scatter of Vertical Acceleration of Central Carbody Where Car 1 Is in Up Direction in Changyi Section of the Shanghai-Kunming High-speed Railway
The grounding system of the whole line shall be designed as integrated grounding system.
The voltage between point B5 and point A5 of C20-P6 plug of PPU/VIM+114=91-A103 is DC 110V.
(3) For sections passing under the existing expressways, existing railways and existing taxiways, temporary and permanent relocation and taxiway recovery shall be carried out by construction subcontractors. The backfilling and settlement shall meet local requirements. Only after the evaluation by the relocation unit can the road surface relocation be carried out, as well as the settlement observation.
- Switching the turnout and measuring switching amplitude between adjacent positions at end of No.4 beam.
Check the operation state of #2 condensate pump of #1 unit, the normal value of the starting current is 100-150A, while actual current isA,
The formwork erection and concrete pouring for guide wall shall be carried out in strict accordance with the specifications.
(2) The strength of metal hose or nonmetal hose is low. If its plane size is too large, it is easy to collapse, reduce the cross section of air duct, and it is not easy to hoist. Additional supporting and hoisting devices should be added, so the length should not exceed 2m, and it should be avoided as the main pipe as much as possible.
Management review and internal audit shall be performed to ensure continual improvement of management system effectiveness.
5.6.1.2 If the design documents need to be changed due to material supply and process conditions or manufacturing reasons, the relevant functional departments shall provide change suggestions in written form; and the Technology Department shall review and decide whether to agree the change within one week.
After the development and implementation of NAMHKOK HPP, the water temperature in the reservoir area will change as the barrage becomes a reservoir.
Flushing media used for hydrogeological drilling shall comply with the following provisions:
The Bidder shall at least offer the following documents and information in the Bid:
(1) Before plastering, check the positions and installations of reserved holes and distribution boxes, slots and boxes. The outer openings of boxes, slots and boxes shall be flush with or slightly lower than the plastering surface.
Due to the translator's negligence, the registered capital in amount of 2 million of Shanghai Kingsun Piastic and Mould Ltd. from Shao Songao was mistranslated into 20 million. It is hereby certified. We are very sorry for any inconvenience caused to you.
Supporting SNMP MIB, Console/Telnet/WEB management, SSH
Capacity of main substation: it is 2X180MVA as in final planning, and 1X180MVA will be completed in current phase.
When working in granite area, mud wall protection and pipe following should be done according to the content of gravel in weathered rock and soil layer, so as to avoid safety accident such as tools truck.
Communication discipline shall provide subgrade discipline with combined communications for commuting railway, signal cable ducts, and provide reserved rail-crossing pipes for rail-crossing points and cable trays for side slope, according to positions of sectional base station, signal relay station, traction transformation, AT station, and so on.
4. The end of each cable has been bound up using paper adhesive measuring tape.
Syria UCG 6500 TPD clinker production line project CO2 fire extinguishing equipment purchase contract
14) Technical Specification on IC Card for Urban Public Transport Part 4: Information Interface (JT/T 978.4-2015)
Be considered as conforming in the inspection when the packing of BACKUP cabinet body is attached with product qualification certificate, wiring diagram of products and factory test report of products; otherwise as nonconforming.
According to former descriptions, there will be a certain distance from top of fire pool to ground after modifications are made. But now the top of fire pool will reach the ground. Please provide the calculation sheet for fire water.
(3) South Sudan, as the underdeveloped country in Africa, owns vast expanses of grasslands and wetlands, among which are environmental conservation areas famous in the entire continent, such as Boma National Park near the border with Ethiopia, the Southern National Park near the border with Congo, as well as the Sudd wetland, the world's largest swamp.
In calculation, the foundation rock mass is assumed as a linear elastic massless unit, and the rock mass above the bottom elevation of the tower body is not simulated in the calculation since it has little influence on the calculation of stress deformation of the tower body.
Suspended solid (SS): 400 mg/L
Regularly check the sewage discharge and treatment of service facilities such as service areas, maintenance work areas and toll stations to ensure that the sewage treatment system is in good working condition.
1. Graduted from vocational school or above, at least 1-year working experience for assembly of mechanical products;
Before the cable laying, the length of each cable should be calculated according to the designed and the actual routes, for reasonable arrangement of each cable row to reduce cable connectors.
1.4.10.1 General Requirements for Instrumentation Construction
JC—Power System Diagram of Power Distribution Box for Posterior Auxiliary Room
We selected and analyzed the patents of Tel Aviv University and compiled them into Catalog of Ramot Patents.
The record controller of the Project implements the GP02-2018 "Record Control Procedure" of YDIC and the special requirements of the Employer for record control.
According to test results, the environmental action grade of damage caused by salt crystal of SO42- in water is Y3, the environmental action grade of chloride in water is L3, and the action grade of chemically corrosive environment with SO42- in water is H3.
② Registration of the information of the residents involved (including names of the residents, numbers of their households, identity information, etc.) and filing of the registration;
The total length of the line of the project is 9.912km. There are one 661.40m -super major bridge, two 695.00m - major bridges and three 206.7m-long medium bridges in total provided along the whole line, accounting for 15.77% of the total chainage of the line.
Ministry of Public Works and Transport of Laos (MPWT)
Size for curtain of 1.2m high window is 3m(width)x2.1 m(height), and that for 1.7m high windows is 3m(width)x 2.3m(height).
The Employer shall promptly inform the Contractor of any change to the authority attributed to the Engineer.
The Management Manual clarifies the management guidelines and objectives, the architecture of the quality, environment and occupational health and safety management system, the management principles and process, and it is the programmatic document for the standardization management of CR20G and an commitment to the Employer and the society.
(3) For each batch of shipped components, the shipping list and packaging list will be provided to the site, signing will be made for confirmation after the handover, records shall be kept, and then the information shall be sent back to the ERP system as the basis for subsequent traceability management.
The door, window and wall surface not to be painted shall be protected and covered well.
Consultant's work documents a Construction management and quality control plan
5.3.1 The audit team leader shall preside over the first meeting to explain the audit purpose, scope, basis, method and schedule.
Inspection standard: relevant standards of the Ministry of Roads and Transport of Mongolia
In addition, one chief dispatcher shall also be considered together with one software engineer and one hardware engineer.
The Contractor shall bear all increased costs, such as damages, loss, compensation and/or take responsibility for Handover Date delay incurred therefrom.
The pressure of BC (brake cylinder) is still 350±15 kPa (it may drop due to the leak of #20 pipeline).
Train radiophone extension, fire fighting broadcast, closed-circuit TV terminal, etc shall share the communication station with the running train so as to avoid redundant equipment and save the investment.
To be specific, we comply with the following rules for the colors of bridges:
The sealing strip is of polychloroprene or materials of higher quality, meeting the performance requirements of elasticity, tensile strength and weather resistance, resistance to ordinary cleaning agent and aging.
Test preparation: seal the sample according to actual situation (for example, plug cap or plug with wires are provided at controller plug position and corresponding cables are installed at the cable clamp position). Positions with sealing elements should not be covered.
For temperature measurement, temperatures inside and outside concrete, atmospheric temperature, and concrete molding (pouring) temperature shall be measured.
For the products meeting delivery conditions upon final inspection and test, Quality Department shall issue quality certificate as the document of product state marking.
Before ending each training class, trainer shall give some time for employees to raise questions freely as well as reply employees patiently;
This test can be carried out before the frame assembly process.
(6) The SEI Office shall undertake the safety notification of external personnel in the workplaces of SEI's office buildings to ensure that these personnel obtain necessary HSE information.
Drainage of the sand cushion shall be carried out properly, to ensure the bearing capacity of the sand cushion, and to prevent the rainwater or muddy water from influencing the quality of the sand cushion.
3. List of Shareholders (Holding More Than 20% of the Shares)
Design Director:December 15, 2015
For the longitudinal joint at the center line of the motorway, the base course side slope on this side shall be chiseled into the vertical shape by manual work within 12 hours after the construction of every section. For the construction of another frame, damp the contact surface and then brush the cement paste.
Oracle Audit Vault: it can automatically collect and analyze the audit data from several systems and change the audit data into an important security resource.
① The spiral staircase are synchronized with the installation progress of the wallboard and are installed from top to bottom.
Duly handle relevant contractual disputes as a fair third party strictly as agreed in the contract, and testify to relevant party honestly when necessary, so as to solve the disputes fairly.
Wind speed detection: range 0 ~ 75m/s; accuracy: 0.5m/s, discrimination rate: 0.1m/s
manufacturers for the above listed major Plant and Materials:
As the drainage culvert has not been built in some parts of this section, there are closed depressions. Temporary accumulated water formed after atmospheric rainfall cannot be drained or drained in time, resulting in temporary surface accumulated water formed in some depressions.
Provide services of technical consulting, scheme design and special construction for diseases of new lines and operational ones to ensure the construction quality.
5) Periodical inspection and potential hazard rectification system: the Project Department shall organize work safety inspection once a week; measures shall be prepared and time and personnel shall be assigned to rectify all inspected potential safety hazard, and records on rectification of potential safety hazard shall be kept.
4. Review the Claim Report for Extension of Time proposed by the relevant parties.
7. The elevation indicated herein is in meters and the dimensions are in millimeters.
This document is limited for the use in bidding for "Power Supply Project for Laos-China Railway"
w——Optimal water content of soil for compaction (in decimals)
Calculation: the whole line is provided with 1 maintenance workshop and 2 power supply workshops, each workshop is provided with 1 set of online dirt monitoring system mainframe, 3 sets in total.
Fifth payment for the commercial streets and Tower T2/T3/T4
According to post specified requirements, all-round talent operation training and training of one post with multi-skills and one specialty with multi-skills shall be carried out regularly.
According to the above table, the traction mass of the DC diesel locomotive at a grade of 6‰ may reach 4,000t, and that of the high-power AC diesel locomotive at a grade of 8‰ may reach 5,000t.
Reinforce safety awareness and stick to the policy of "Safety First and Prevention First".
Recently, CREC has already submitted the table of settings of grade and flyover crossings signed by field division managers (engineers) of the Employer for confirmation.
Domestic waste water is collected by the sewage pipe network after being treated by the septic tank and the waste water will be collected into the nearby municipal pipe network and ultimately into the Sewage Treatment Plant of Qingshui River Area for further treatment. The waste water after treatment of the Sewage Treatment Plant will be drained into the Nanting River.
and shall be 650m and 550m.
This is to certify that Su Yubin, male, born on March 31, 1973, specializing in Harbour and Navigation Channel Engineering in our university from September 1992 to July 1996, has successfully completed all four-year courses required by the undergraduate teaching plan and passed all the prescribed examinations, and is hereby approved to graduate and given the certificate.
Table 2.10 Checking Calculation for Principal Stress of Standard Combination under Persistent Situation
4. The thickness of the protection layer of the outermost reinforcement of platform foundation is 35mm, while the thickness of the protection layer of the outermost reinforcement of other structures is 30mm.
OnMM/DD/YY, we had (description of work safety accident) at/in (location).
4. Money and goods from the Party B that could not be refused should be reported to the higher level discipline inspection and supervision organization within a month and returned to the Party B or turned over to the discipline inspection and supervision organization in time.
(Layer) insulation to winding at the LV side of winding at the HV side;
Shunt pipe EDJG125/2.5-WTL
11.3 Chinese project management enterprise shall submit to the Ghanaian side the lists of equipment, materials, construction machinery and living supplies within 3 months before commencement of this Project, to handle procedures of tax exemption. The Ghanaian side shall complete these procedures within 1 month upon receipt of the above lists.
4.11 Management of supplier's qualification and sample data
Air conditioner and drainage pipe UPVC DN75 (including valve, pipe fitting, disinfection, flushing, etc.)
b) The warehouse keeper shall distribute the materials in strict accordance with the Material Requisition, and the amount shall be counted by the material requisition unit and the warehouse keeper and recorded in relevant column of the Material Requisition; in addition, the both sides shall make signature for recording.
Use the bulldozer for spreading/paving, use the grader for leveling, and make use of the markings on the side piles at both sides to control the grader for leveling. After the leveling meets the requirements, use the smooth-wheel roller to lightly press it for 1~2 passes, so as to make the surface flat and smooth and having certain compactness;
As for operation against rules and major safety hazards, the Notice Implementation Sheet on Rectification against Potential Safety Hazards shall be issued to relevant contracting units, and the contracting unit shall take charge of implementing of punishment and closed-loop management.
(7) Sundries such as electrode heads shall not be dropped for high-altitude operations.
Replace old beams with new ones fabricated on the basis of new concepts and technologies to completely get ride of the diseases of old beams and reduce the maintenance and repair workload.
Be responsible for transmitting the obtained applicable HSE law, regulations and provisions and other information of requirements related to safety, environment and health to the staff;
1.4 Climate conditions and application altitude of locomotive
(1) In the early stage of the project construction, cooperate with the Employer and the construction contractor to handle the pile handover process,.
(3) The design for preventing groundwater pollution in general industrial solid waste and hazardous waste storage and disposal areas shall be implemented according to the current relevant national standards and regulations.
The System was formulated to response the call of cadre reservation and development of the Group and develop more future-oriented managers conforming to the corporate development strategies for the Purchasing Company.
1) Based on technical and economic comparison, the bridge shall be replaced from prefabricated erection of concrete T-girder scheme to cast-in-situ bracket box girder scheme.
In the construction, the water content should be 1% ~ 2% higher than the optimal moisture content during compaction, so as to avoid the water content after compaction less than the optimal moisture content.
Earth and stone backfilling (with the materials from excavation of upstream approach channel
11. Once any incident and or disaster accident happens at the construction site, it shall be promptly reported to the related authorities, and the affected site scene shall be protected, and any necessary cooperate with the police office for case detection.
Target value of running speed of passenger trains: 200 km/h and above
The gatepost shall be 3.6m high with a cross section of 0.6mX0.6m, poured with C25 concrete.
See Page 63 and Page 66 of the national standard atlas 03SG520 for details.
(1) Vehicles running on roads are in motion. Due to the speed, people can appreciate instantaneous but continuous landscape.
In August 2016, President Talon of Benin paid a state visit to Nigeria and Togo's President Foley also visited Nigeria.
Problems such as blockage and siltation commonly exist in existing crossing pipe culverts. Some pipe culverts are seriously damaged, and some pipe culverts have small diameters and insufficient cross sections. Therefore, most of the existing pipe culverts need to be expanded or rebuilt in their original locations.
6) Railway operation costs, including details and values ​​of operation costs; charging forms and criteria for passenger and freight transport of railways; taxation and subsidy policies during railway operation, investment return requirements and recommendations.
If the source of assets belongs to state appropriations or donations or funds from society, it must be subject to the supervision of the auditing body and the relevant information must be made public in an appropriate manner.
Wheelsets are classified into two types: motor wheelset and trailer wheelset.
6.3.4. Release of Residual Energy and Hazardous Substance
6. Spray three-proofing paint on modules and machine parts.
Electric strength test: 0.5KV leakage test: 0.01mA
4.4.6.4 Inspect whether the stator core is loose or not. When the rotator core is loose, insert a thin wedge made of insulating materials between the laminations, and fasten it with epoxy resin to secure the core.
7. Party B shall underwrite relevant insurances for equipment prior to successful acceptance, as well as personal accident insurances for on-site service personnel dispatched by Party B and other personnel. The insurance expenses shall be included in the total contract price.
Based on domestic work experience and international advanced concepts, we will first study and collate the status of underground space utilization in Dammam, Saudi Arabia, and analyze the existing problems in order to overcome them in the Dammam Oasis project.
③ Calculate the reasonable range of water content of various fillers for different compaction zones;
(2)Separation shall be strictly provided between construction area and non-construction area.
Railway Applications - Rolling Stock Traction Transformers and Inductors on Board Rolling Stock (IEC 60310)
For capacity expansion, there are 18 stations for the whole line. 11 stations are added. 5 stations will be reconstructed and 2 block houses are reserved.
2.9. All relays, contactors and other components shall be free of damage and discoloration; otherwise, replace the corresponding components;
2.3The materials used for manufacturing such cars shall comply with the corresponding Chinese standards.
(1) Inspect, test and deliver engineering projects, carry out inspection and control over nonconforming products, supervise the construction process according to the inspection evaluation standards and deliver inspection results.
The decoupling diode 1D01 prevents the traction converter from getting electricity from place other than its supporting current collecting equipment.
In the section is an alluvial plain with gentle topographic relief and relatively flat and broad terrain. The ground elevation is 1608 ~ 1618m, the natural grade is 3 ~ 8°, and the relative height difference is 1 ~ 5m.
[3] Construction Standard for Rail Mass Transit Project (JB104-2008)
Requirement for oil resistance as per Part 10 of IEC 60811-2-1.
Engineering geology specification: it shall describe the engineering geological conditions of the construction site with reservoir bank collapse and shall, in combination with the characteristics of engineering works, propose the engineering measures and suggestions.
The equipment of the signal system shall be configured to benefit realization of running command automation, network and intelligence. Type selection of the equipment shall meet the requirement of standardization and modulization as well as the requirement of system extention and staged implementation. In the meantime, large-scale disassembling and renovation within a short term shall be prevented to reduce the waste and interference to the operation.
(4)During the manufacture of equipment, Party B shall accept Party A's check of the manufacturing quality of the main components.
Site construction stage: Before October 31, 2019, complete the construction of supporting facilities for the production of concrete products, such as concrete workshop, finished product warehouse, mixing station and office and living areas;
15.2.6 If the liquidation group finds that the properties of the Joint Venture are not sufficient for paying off the debts after liquidating the properties of the Joint Venture and preparing balance sheets and list of properties, it shall file an application with the people's court for bankruptcy.
And must be acquainted with the operation regulations and can eliminate the general failures and make daily maintenance.
3.3.5.5 Impacts of project construction and operating activity on non-material factors of project site
If the train can be operating normally on the Shenzhen Metro Line 11, it shows that the surroundings interference has no effect on the train.
A special person shall be appointed to prepare and add the antifreezing agent strictly according to the required amount and make records.
Construction measures shall be formulated for scaffold erection, dismantling and variation in advance.
6. Architecture structural discipline determines measures taken for rolling protection of the incoming water supply pipe and outgoing drain pipe based on road planning and bearing capacity of the foundation.
In addition, reviewing from executed loan projects of Iran, the government of Iran has no circumstances like intended default of payments or lack of repayment willingness regardless whether the financing is guaranteed by the state or the financing is provided through special financing arrangement between China and Iran. Repayment of various financing projects is good order.
The weight shall be mainly measured by electronic weighing sensor.
Entrance Design Drawing of Na Tong No.1 Tunnel at D3K38+065
① Route B is farthest from the east of Shuolong Town and does not enter the main township area of Shuolong Town. At the same time, the construction of the Project will exert less interference to the traffic of the current Shuolong Road Section of Tiandeng Connecting Line.
Geosynthetics shall be jointed closely with the impermeable bed rock on the bank slope via the anchoring trenches, with the anchoring length as specified in the shop drawings.
The mobile Switch Sub-System (SSS) includes devices such as the Mobile Service Switching Center (MSC), the Visitor Location Register (VLR) and the Home Location Register (HLR).
1F will be used to house lobby, café room, small sale facilities, food and beverage service facilities and other facilities, and special elevator hall for President use and hallway.
Pipeline damage shall bereport to the superior departments and the Employer timely. Damages to special pipelines shall be reported immediately, pipeline competent unit shall be immediately reported for repair, and personnel shall be organized for emergency maintenance actively.
For the design of camp water supply system, the location of concentrated water intake well shall be well-defined and "concentrated water intake and distributed water supply" is suggested .
Tanzania's fiscal revenue mainly comes from three major sectors; firstly, the domestic revenue mainly based on taxation; secondly, the general budget support provided by development partners; thirdly, the domestic and external loans.
The 20E, 21E and 22E series locomotives by CRRC ZELC have overcome the technical difficulties. Its innovational design can satisfy the transport requirement of the main railway lines in South Africa and can meet the requirement on the supply contract.
Rainwater well shall be set every 20~30m to collect pavement water for urban sections in Lusaka and Ndola. Longitudinal reinforced concrete drain pipes with a diameter of 0.6~0.9m shall be used to connect rainwater wells.
The infrastructure construction indeed produces very high costs, but it will have far-reaching effects, not short-term ones.
During CPI control point observation, we performed connection with the CPI control points CPI99, CPI180, and CPI181 in the scope of the adjacent Nawabshah to Hyderaba segment, which can ensure the smooth connection of the basic horizontal networks of the line.
Further, the Contractor also undertakes that he will permanently assign qualified IT Professional/s at the Contractor's cost to work with the Ethiopian Toll Roads Enterprise throughout the remaining period of the Warranty for ease of communicating the problems to the Contractor, and to fix minor defects on spot together the staffs of the Enterprise".
The policy of "safety first, prevention oriented and comprehensive administration" shall be comprehensively implemented, the post responsibility system shall be strictly carried out and precautions shall be made in advance.
After the lifting of car body, the removal of damaged bogie and the installation of rescue trolley, the derailed vehicle shall be pulled away from the site immediately.
For butt connections, the butt joint gap shall not exceed the wire wrapping gap.
University Name: Chang'an University President (Dean): Ma Jian
The automatic brake valve on overcharge position cannot hold the brake of the locomotive.
The thickness of soft soil subgrade ≤ 15m, cement mixing piles are adopted, with pile diameter of 0.5m, pile spacing of 1.5m and pile length of 15m.
Shenzhen Intercontinental Building Decorating Group Co., Ltd.
4. For places with underground water, it needs to plaster a 20 thick layer at the outer walls of the manhole to the place that is 500 above the underground water level, and the bottom of the manhole shall be paved with 100mm thick gravel.
During the construction preparation, the professional foreman should carefully study the construction drawings to identify all the reserved points for pre-embedding and number the points. The professional foreman should communicate with the personnel in other specialties to avoid conflicts or intersection in the future installation work and to avoid unnecessary rework.
Concrete voids and pits, S=1.48㎡, as shown in Figure 3-23
Under the condition that all the equipment is not operating, the delivery test on water tightness shall be conducted for 5 minutes.
2.2.1.6 Be responsible for organizing implementation of various technical and safety measures to ensure the stable operation of the information system;
\pxt6.6;small river, with a water depth of 0.7-1.5m.
③ China's regulations on turnout arrangement in opposite direction and in the same direction
As a member of the national engineering laboratory, the comprehensive evaluation laboratory for wheel-axle testing in MCRI in CARS is composed of test platforms such as metal materials, non-destructive testing, and physical testing and evaluation of wheel-axle. It is mainly engaged in research and development of new materials, new processes, failure analysis and testing technologies for railway wheel-axle.
(2) Bargushat tunnel ventilation design
See the figure below for front panel layout of JWTVM-2 series ticket vending machine:
b The corrugated pipes shall be connected with one bigger homotype corrugated pipe, be 20cm, and be sealed with sealant. Ф12 grouting vent shall be provided at the longitudinal direction of the duct as per relevant requirements, and the joint between the vent pipe and corrugated pipe shall be securely sealed.
Review quality assurance system and capability of supplier;
The selected insulation materials meet the requirements for fire protection and low smoke toxicity specified in EN 45545.
(2) The microcomputer-controlled VVVF AC transmission system shall be used for the electric traction system.
Recently, the Uganda Government and the Kenya Government have reached an agreement that the CCCC Group's subsidiary will operate the railway (CHEC and CRBC have reached the agreement). John Holland, CCCC's subsidiary, will be the operator of the railway.
Being yellow-brown, grey-black and hard plastic, it is commonly called as "black cotton soil" by the local people. It contains a little humus， which is cracking in natural conditions, with visible smooth surface, scratch and developed fissure. It is about 1m thick, most of which is strongly expansive soil.
Parking brake is only used at rest to prevent the train from sliding.
Concrete of tower column is mixed centrally in the mixing plant where two sets of mixing equipment of 75 m³/h are arranged to produce concrete of cable bent tower.
Three condensate pumps with 55% capacity (60 MW straight condensing condition) are provided in the Project to serve as standby for each other.
The purpose of this document is to provide an industrial design intent (layout, color) for the procurement project of Istanbul new airport line and operation and maintenance services.
M10X75 expansion bolt, galvanized lock nut, flat washer, elastic washer
c. For devices with a serial number, the serial number of the device must be registered.
a)Screw off contact (2/Figure 58) with hexagon wrench (5).
Cement stabilized macadam shall be paved at a time for the whole road width. Two pavers shall be used for paving in a staggered way with one in front of another to ensure that the overlapped materials paved previously and latter are rolled as a whole before initial setting of cement.
(6) Automatic inquiry machine provides passengers with self-service ticket inquiry.
Operating conditions: the quality of main body has been accepted as qualified, the concealed conduit inside the wall has been installed and accepted.
After the annular isometric prestressed concrete masts bear the load, the surface quality shall meet the following requirements:
Each subordinate unit shall carry out internal audit according to the quality system requirements of the unit, and submit the internal audit report to the Company's QHSE Dept. for record.
Under the leadership of management group of the Project Management Office, the construction team and the quality management organization determine excellence creation measures and quality implementation plan of the construction section of its own, and make the implementation on site.
Provide unified management of all construction units involved in the Project, and be responsible for guidance, inspection, supervision and coordination.
After the installation and alignment of horizontal equipment, loosen the foundation bolt at the sliding end by 1 thread to 2 threads, and tighten the lock bolt.
Title of invention: A Method of Curtain Wall Ventilation and Haze Purification and Its Structure
Carry out integrated supervision and control against equipment earthing (including subsystem).
The coating protection depends on the thickness of dry film (in μ). The film thickness of anti-corrosive coating is generally 150-200μ.
As reinforcement cage is lowered to the framework near the hoisting point and approaches the mouth of borehole, a wood stick or shaped steel (depending on the weight of reinforcement cage) may be used to pass below rigid frame and support reinforcement cage at the mouth of borehole temporarily. Temporary support at the mouth of borehole shall meet the requirement for strength.
(4) Settlement joints of slope protection shall be set as shown in the figure. Hornstone shall be used for masonry of settlement joints.
As per the overall construction deployment, it is proposed to set up the Project Management Department and the central material warehouse in Vientiane City (near Vientiane South Station).
It is mainly used for automatic spraying of brake disc lubricant, preassembling of brake disc, tightening of brake disc bolts, wheel assembling and inspection and fitting of (HXD1D) connecting pins of HXD1 series.
Train inspection manual electric derailer is set for receiving-departure track.
2) For special-type operating personnel, special safety training should be conducted.
② The main reinforcement or web reinforcement in the structural ring beam shall be welded together with the connection reinforcement head of about 20 cm prepared in advance, and welded together with the downlead in the column reinforcement.
12) It supports remote management, SMP, no less than 7 PCI-E I/O slots available;
The quality assurance system must reflect the responsibilities of each functional department of the project, with a clear quality inspection system (e.g. three inspection systems). The project department must set up an effective quality control leading group and specify the person responsible for quality control in each department;
Life-span of storage batteries shall not be less than 6 years.
2. This culvert is designed for overpass as well as flood drainage.
4.3.3.1 Sales Department: participate in the development of recall preparation programs, cooperate to complete the lists of recalled products and be responsible for communicating with customers in the the recall process and consulting with customers for alternative supply programs or compensation programs.
5.2.4The limit values of track irregularity caused by beam torsion under vertical static live load of high-speed and inter-city railway trains and the limit values of vertical relative deformation of two rails on one track within 3m-long shall conform to the provisions of Table 5.2.4.
Detect the flatness of floor with 3m leveling rule and mark the part where is higher or lower than the plane of underframe frame.
Partial Coefficient of Design Load in Serviceability Limit State (SLS)
When necessary, the Employer should entrust the design institute to prepare the design change document and transfer it to the Project Supervision Department upon signature.
Within the lifetime of the equipment, the Seller shall provide the technical support, the maintenance support and spare parts at favorable prices.
(2) W/NW-E/SE faults with large dip angle and being perpendicular to the north direction (sometimes nearly perpendicular), including Dona-Siahbishe Fault, Valiabad Fault, strike-slip fault in the north of Dozbon and Valasht Fault.
Other cross slabs of edge beam: (0.46+0.449)*0.35*26=8.27 kN
No.207, 2nd Floor, Tianze Building, No.72 Keji 2nd Road, High-tech District, Xi'an City, Shaanxi Province
2.6.6 Actively coordinate the inspectors to fulfill the responsibilities and be responsible for the quality problems for that the production work doesn't obey the correct judgment of inspectors.
Landscape effects must be considered when selecting bridge type. Depth-span ratio of the bridge shall be taken into account and harmony between the works and the ecological environment shall be respected.
The buried depth of water table exposed by drilling all over the site is 1.30~1.80m. The water level elevation is 0.03~0.38m. The variation in water level is influenced by rainfall and water consumption for construction.
Non-operation driving distance: driving distance (km) of vehicle under non-operation condition, i.e. distance "from parking area to point A" for first departure and "from point A to parking area" for end of one day (without any passenger);
The seal of all organizations reserved in the bank including special financial seal and personal seal must be given to different persons for separate keeping.
(3) Various equipment for project construction needs shall be provided.
3. Requirements of OCS for Telecommunication
See Table 2-1 below for the weight of train under different load conditions and Table 2-2 for the configuration of energy absorber at the train end.
② For multiple sets of cable trays installed in an up-and-down arrangement, one set of hangers shall be arranged on each side of the turning, and the two sets of hangers shall be symmetrically arranged with a spacing of not more than 1.5m. Otherwise, an extra set of hangers shall be added in the middle of the turning; the distance between the cable tray on the top and the floor slab shall not be less than 150mm, and the distance between the upper and lower cable trays shall not be less than 150 mm;
Project: permanent works and (or) temporary works within the project contracting scope agreed in the Contract Agreement.
The temporary steel bridge is constructed of steel pipe piles + Bailey truss + steel plate to ensure the effective passage width of the bridge deck is 5m.
Stopping accuracy of train: ±0.5m
Base station side: The system coverage scheme needs to consider interleaving overlapping coverage. This enables the system to work normally in case of power-off or failure of a single station.
Each department regularly monitors and understands changing situation of various external and internal environmental factors; and reviews internal and external environmental factors and changing situation once per half a year.
A. Key: (the complaint conforming to the following reasons and influence degree is defined as the key customer complaint)
Till 2020, over 400 enterprises will pass through approval of clean production, including compulsive approval for 150 enterprises, to manage the whole process of energy conservation, consumption and emission reduction".
During slope cutting, the reserved width shall ensure the soil layer beyond the design side slope line shall not be interfered.
Tensioning of steel tendon must be carried out only after the strength and elastic modulus of the concrete respectively reach up to 95% and 100% of the design values, as well as the concrete age are no less than 10 days.
DK4+750 1 Reinforced Concrete Box Bridge of 8.5m - Reinforcement Layout
Any other documents constituing the Contract Document (including bidding documents and tender documents).
Review opinion on feasibility study report and implementation
6. The project quality shall meet the following requirements: The first-time acceptance rate ofsubunit of project is 100%; the first-time acceptance rate of sub-divisional works (construction processes) is %: win the Shanghai Quality Structure Award, and try to achieve the National Quality Projectstandard.
7. After arrangement of the data returned by personnel specialized in geological discipline, sent this data to personnel specialized in subgrade discipline, and ask them to add the subgrade sections of construction site to relevant measured geological data.
Brown, plastic, most clayey soil, containing lots of plant roots.
High Voltage Identification! Operate 5 minutes later after power failure
HB1D2.2.3.1.1P Cleaning/screening of ballast
c) Key quality feature process that has a major influence on next process or assembly;
1 When the box-type substation arrives on the site, the appearance inspection shall be carried out in time and the following provisions shall be met: no mechanical damage and complete accessories are allowed; no looseness and loss of the components in combination and no damage to the internal electrical components and connections in the box-type substation.
and corresponding adjustment shall be made in the settlement according to the contract budget, price reduction promised by the Contractor as well as the contract price adjustment factors as agreed in the Contract.
(6) Querying of internal audit counter data, time, software version and equipment number of the equipment;
Center beam and side beam interfaces shall be connected obliquely with webs, or straightly with wing plates.
Testers shall have the title of engineer or above and master the test and evaluation methods of EN 13749 and UIC 615-4;
The quality and length of the anchor bolts, the quality and thickness of the shotcrete, and the installation position and spacing of the steel frame shall strictly comply with the design. During the construction period, monitoring and measurement shall be strengthened. If there is any sudden change or abnormal change in the measured data, emergency measures shall be taken immediately.
Note 2: PIN_40 and PIN_41 are respectively connected to 110 V power supply and earthing through external connections, which are used to determine whether the connector of the plug-in is connected;
Supply, Transportation, Installation, Commissioning, Implementation and After Sale Services of the Equipment in Equipment Room, in CARS's Equipment Room, in the Rented Equipment Room, and the System Software.
3.4.15 Organize to handle legal affairs about litigation, arbitration and non-litigation cases involving the Company and its subordinate companies;
1 The high voltage shall not be higher than 10000V, while the low voltage no higher than 1140V.
LB490 Mechanical sweeper /Weifang Tianjie Machinery Co. Ltd. / 2 years
a. Acid and alkali-resistant polished granite with dimensions of 300x300x20 for decorating, epoxy grout for pointing joint with joint width of 3mm and height of 900).
The backbone network's bandwidth shall be high to meet the growing demands of data traffic.
Detailed in Physical Interface Schedule - tab.Infs.810A.852.01.
In case there is a conflict between the elevation of the water supply pipe and the built thermal pipe, the water supply pipe must be raised locally.
Connection diagram for grounding main line and grounding body (flat steel )
Representative Project - Chongqing and Chengdu Rail Transit
Movement test at the maximum and minimum air supply pressure;
Roller room and car type furnace penthouse is the penthouse of the workshop.
6) The controller can operate in network connection mode or independent mode; for example, in the settings of network connection mode, the remote-control door open, close, monitoring and control can be achieved.
Applicable scenario: final bonding of small metal parts
In construction during winter rain period, covering for protection is required to ensure quality of finished masonry works.
Assembly quality shall be inspected prior to welding. Any silt, rust, water and oil shall be removed on the groove surface and within the scope of 20mm of both sides of the groove. Sufficient drying treatment shall be provided as well.
The importance of maintaining normal level of body fluids;
Relevant management departments in the society shall take certain responsibilities for the safety of the building project.
Natural ventilation shall be utilized for the rooms as much as possible to reduce energy consumption.
Block means that after the train enters into the section, it is isolated and stations at both ends of the section no longer dispatch trains to the section, so as to prevent the trains from colliding and rear-end collision.
2.5.5.8.2.4 SF6 Pipeline Connection
The system should have the functions of service braking, prompt braking, emergency braking, holding braking and parking braking.
J. After analytic demonstration, the electrical equipment of low efficiency will be modified in terms of energy saving.
Materials are not in fixed location and easy to slip and roll; lack of safety precautions around dumped objects
The existing railways have been built for a long time with low standards and large differences in source of subgrade fillings. After years of maintenance, repair and overhaul, most of the existing railways are still in service with intermittent subgrade diseases in certain locations; in acceleration reconstruction, unqualified sections shall be treated or reinforced.
The input data shall be integral and clear and shall not be self-contradictory, which will be taken as the main basis for the software development.
Individually-measured residue on sieve %((((((*%)(%)
The drilling depth is drilled to 10 ~ 15m below the subgrade base.
The joint between the roll of the adjacent two sections should be staggered for more than 300mm.
Regular time switch for video equipment and regular volume adjustment for audio equipment are available.
The Project Expert Group shall complete the review and guidance of the general idea and technical scheme.
Remove the foreign material from the cylinder, and replace the damaged cylinder.
Aluminum alloy square slab ceiling in the toilet, specification 600*600_x000D_
Equipment shall be installed neatly without inclination so as not to affect the original protection and operation performance of the equipment. Equipment shall be installed in a manner that allows it to be removed. Its fastening and connection shall be firm and devices preventing loosening by vibration shall be provided.
3. Top drive and electrically driven rotary table: operating regulations, torque setting and release of top drive and electrically driven rotary table.
(1) Safety education shall be conducted for all construction staff to nature the awareness of "Safety comes first" and implement the policy of "Safe construction and avoiding accidents via prevention".
Article 9 The Company shall actively coordinate and implement shareholders' capital contribution, and try hard to ensure that the funds can be available in full amount timely.
Personnel allocation for MAF commissioning (2 Months)
After the primer is cured, the surface shall be replenished with floating coat. Materials of the floating coat must be mixed in proportion, and fully stirred in an even manner.
1)If the Seller fails to supply part or all of the contract goods within period specified by the Contract or extended period approved by the Buyer according to Article 27.1 hereof, and once the ceiling of compensation for delay is reached; or
10)Car bottom: The bottom of the transparent elevator car should be decorated aesthetically.
The temporary facilities of the project are arranged according to the principles of simplicity, moderation, practicality and economy, and the construction team residents and temporary facilities are reasonably arranged in strict accordance with the construction organization design.
The duration of the grout from self-modulating to the compression channel shall not exceed 40min, and the cement slurry shall be kept flowing before use and during the injection.
50mm medium-grained asphalt concrete
5. Requisition, maintenance ,and compensation of access to construction site;
7.5.21The thickness of embedded support baseplate of concrete beam shall be not less than 25mm for plate-type rubber support and not less than 20mm for other supports.
Total construction cost of HSE Management Service Project at present: 104 RMB
7. This drawing is prepared as per straight lines. For curves, length of inside and outside reinforcement shall be adjusted as per actual conditions.
4) Above all, we select to use current design.
All indicators of the constraint adjustment meet calculation result meet the requirements.
The profile of rail imposes significant influence on the hunting stability and critical speed of vehicle by changing the equivalent conicity.
9. Procedure of equipment management: Issue relevant indicators of equipment management to the equipment management engineer → Supervise the completion of equipment management indicators → Supervise and urge the implementation of rectification measures for equipment operation problems → Evaluate equipment management condition.
The faults added can be displayed in a list.
Contract Agreement for No. N4 Contract Section of Subgrade and Bridge and Tunnel Works of Yulin-Shangluo Line Yulin to Suide Highway
1. The local dimension of the frame beam VKL12(2A) between axis P.1 and axis N on FUQUA-S-A-109 P.1 is changed from 400x1400 to 600x1400, and the bottom reinforcement of HL41 is changed accordingly.
CR5 may appoint a full-time or part-time compliance officer in each subsidiary/branch based on actual conditions to ensure that the subsidiary/branch understands and implements the System.
The transportation speed of vehicle and the waiting time for vehicle exchange shall be well calculated.
If internally- or externally-threaded special transition joints lined with plastic are connected to pipe fittings of other materials, ends of external threads shall be processed for corrosion protection.
Proactive contact and communication; summarizing and reporting the required land for approval; and holding the meetings for coordination and addressing of related issues.
A:150, right-skewed) in plane; a vertical curve with R=2000m in profile. The piers and abutments laid out along the radial direction.
The welding line of the welded air pipes shall be flat without cracks, bumps, penetrating slag inclusions, pores, and other defects. The deformation of plates after welding shall be set right and welding slags and splashes shall be cleaned.
1. The test report is invalid without the test-dedicated stamp, nor is it valid without the signature of the drafting, reviewing or approving personnel.
The work of this section is to build cement concrete slab on the completed base course that has been accepted by the supervisor.
Calculation according to finite soil body when the surface of the fill slope is upward sloping (Fig. 2-3), namely:
\W0.771407;\Q0;Length of Single Piece
66 railway Major Bridges, 171 railway Minor Bridges, 7 cross-railway highway bridges, and 1 reconstructed highway bridge, near K41+100.
(Third Prize For Excellent Engineering Consulting Award in Anhui Province)
The combination of a mature production chain and advanced scientific facilities will maximize production of turnout beams that are more suitable for local demands.
⑧ The roller shall closely follow the spreader for rolling if necessary, depending on the air temperature and the temperature of asphalt mixture during spreading.
Table 6-4-2 Grid Chart of Construction Schedule of Vientiane Station to Vientiane South Station of New Boten-Vientiane Railway Project (Section No.: Laos-China ZQSG)
① When the side formwork is removed, the beam concrete strength is ≥50% design strength.
Perform the above operations respectively on the T car and the MC2 car.
Relation between dynamic deformation and speed of embankment as shown in Figure 4-2-5-2 when inspection train passes at different speeds, the changes of dynamic deformation with increased train speed is not obvious.
The scheme of Gyirong port crosses Qomolangma Protection Area long, but crosses Langtang National Park short.
Formwork should be designed as per requirements in SS CP 23.
2. 1 point will be deducted for each failure found in key areas (independent offices, conference rooms, VIP reception rooms and toilets), and 0.5 points for each failure found in other areas.
The power supply scheme of thermal power station + external power grid is adopted.
Project manager of the Construction Contractor, construction manager and HSSE manager
Roughometer: IRI or σ of each lane along the whole line shall be calculated continuously every 100m?
③ Samples of all materials shall be submitted for approval.
At the place for stacking of finished works, rot, pollution and rust prevention measures shall be taken; no other materials shall be placed on the finished works.
For single-side mechanical bulldozing and compacting, basic wall is subject to higher lateral pressure out of plane, so it is moved and deformed.
Motor field operation box AC0473EL01
Allocation of Houses and Outdoor Ancillary Works at Boten Port Station
Preemptive multi-task type Automatic Selection Method of Reading Mode
The railway bureaus and the stations or depots shall carry out the emergency disposal according to the emergency disposal plan under the deployments of the ELGs for handling accidents under the State Council and the Railway Corporation.⑤
Inspect inner hole size, roughness and form and location tolerance of the gear hub.
6) House transformer: the dry type transformer shall be used.
The type of credit line includes the working capital loans.
Based on the above calculation results, considering the future development requirements, the capacity of the DC power supply equipment is shown in the following table:
When the bedrock at bottom of hole is a slope, the bottom of hole shall be leveled by shoveling and the lowest side shall be cast into the bedrock by 0.5d (not less than 500mm).
Other subsystems, such as PIS, HVAC and lighting system can be done by special reset button on driver's console instead of conducting reset through the network.
During the establishment, two matters need to be done: First, the establishment shall accord with the vertical control network of pile foundation already constructed; second, except for issued or submitted urban vertical control points, additional vertical control points shall be provided for control network to enhance the security of vertical system.
To test whether the anti-skid protection performance of the EMU meets requirements of the test evaluation standards.
Before formal construction, the Project Management Department shall organize pre-job training for labor force in a unified manner, clarify design contents, technical requirements, construction technology, operation methods and quality standards, and the labor force shall take the post with certificates after passing the training.
4) Slopping is carried out in accordance with the excavation depth and soil condition. Trench slope shall meet the requirement of the specification and design requirement and be adjusted in accordance with soil conditions on site.
Development Characteristics and System of HSR Technology in China
No pending litigation in accordance with Criteria 2.2 of Section 3 (Evaluation and Qualification Criteria)
5) Anti-aging test: as per Standard EN 15152-2018;
(4) Technical Specification for Safety of Installation of Metal Structure and Mechanical & Electrical Equipment of Hydraulic and Hydroelectric Engineering (SL 400-2007);
15.2. Take effective preventive measures considering building projects during construction, to avoid that they are blown over by the wind.
The Standard is formulated in reference to the redrafted Prestressed Concrete-use Steel Section 4: Steel Strand (ISO 6934-4:1991), and is not equivalent to the consistency degree of Section 4 of ISO 6934, with the main differences as follows:
5.2.2 For international projects, the Chief Design Engineer shall obtain, identify, and update the laws, regulations, standards, and other requirements for related to project safety design in accordance with the contract or the client's procedures.
1.7.1 Trial operation of lighting fixture: power on for trial operation to electric lighting fixture systemically. Light up all lighting fixtures in the system and put them into operation for 24 hours.
The site is only exposed in boreholes J5, J6, J7, J8 and J9, and the engineering properties are poor.
(2) Hinge is properly adjusted before installation. Clearances reserved at both sides of glass are controlled to be basically consistent, followed by installation of clamping strips.
To adapt to the development of technology, it's recommended that the substation adopt the unified transmission protocol standard with open application and network already released by IEC without depending on the system architecture of the supplier and to increase the expandability of the system.
Emergency extension set in tunnel (for internal use, with site selector, power amplifier)
The driver's console is located in the center of the cab. The layout of seats and control equipment enables the driver to engage in daily work when seated or standing.
Through study of the above issues, a comprehensive comparison, selection and demonstration is carried out in terms of technical feasibility, economic rationality, construction possibility and highway grade, etc. to utilize the scientific data to provide a reliable and accurate basis for the project decision making by the investment examination and approval department.
(b) Items and cycles of video conference MCU equipment maintenance and test
Water filling test shall be carried out on all installed rainwater pipes, and the water filling height must reach the upper rainwater head of each stand pipe. Test method: It is acceptable that the water filling test continues for 1 h and there is no leakage.
Main structures are 3 stations with 1 reserved station.
2. This floor plan is preliminary design, and the detailed layout will be discussed with Party A after bid winning.
We agree to abide by the Bid for the period of 20 days from the date fixed for receiving the same.
Found early failures, easy handling of minor faults and reporting to the front station or the aircraft section) 'Customer inspection (technical inspection and simple maintenance of passenger trains originating, final or passing); inspection in depot (the vehicle is fully inspected and functionally tested to repair general faults in the passenger servicing depots).
There is a 8km earth road connecting the project area to the nearest road RN1.
Figure 3.5-14: 2.4 GHz WIFI Solution Antenna Rack Bar Installation
Quantity of material feeding at every time is less than 0.1m3;ramming count at every time shall be not less than 3 within 1.0m of the pile tip, and ramming height is more than 3.0m; ramming count shall be more than 5 at 2.0m above the pile tip, and ramming height is more than 2.5m.
Project director: Yang Minghui (Signature)
The social relation management plan shall be prepared two months prior to the project construction and formally implemented after being approved by the engineer of the Supervisor.
Beijing Construction Engineering Group Co., Ltd.
(15) Party A has not fulfilled obligations as specified under any specific business contract.
Organize to develop annual objectives and plans on QHSE work within the scope of management and supervise the implementation;
·Tunnel ventilation and exhaust shall be properly designed, and monitoring and alarm devices shall be arranged so as to timely transmit information in case of dangerous accidents.
3) If there is any nonconforming product during construction, organize the special quality analysis meeting, formulate the scheme for nonconforming product handling, and verify its implementation effects;
(2)The Contractor shall set up a warehouse for industrial explosives in accordance with the Blasting Safety Regulations, and arrange a special person to be responsible for the storage, custody and register in detailed lists of industrial explosives, so that the records and explosives are consistent with each other and clear daily and monthly settlement can be achieved.
The project implementation unit shall keep an eye on the development of the situation, and take measures in time to ensure the personnel safety.
FAS system is mainly composed of dispatching station FAS, station and section FAS, dispatching console, station duty desk and fixed terminal.
7) Welding personnel must be adequately trained, know well about the quality standard for rail welded joints, strictly follow the operation specifications for welding equipment, and use the equipment according to the operation parameters determined by type inspection.
4.6.5 The appearance quality of prestressed concrete turnout sleepers shall meet the requirements of the design and relevant standards.
The wire telephone system includes two sub-functions of official telephone and special-use telephone.
The rebound rate of construction can be controlled at 5% to 10%.
FMTP technology demonstration project (600,000 t/a methanol to 200,000 t polypropylene)
a) Laws and regulations regarding occupational health and safety and the requirements of related parties;
Table 6.5.5.2-1 Dimensional Deviation of Cast-in-situ Structure
8.2.5 The Receiving Party shall not change any part of the confidential information or break down the confidential information or attempt to change or break down the confidential information in any way, nor shall the Receiving Party allow others to do so or attempt to do so unless agreed in writing by the Disclosing Party.
The scope demarcation for Contract 810B and Contract 852 shall be in accordance with the following Physical Interface Schedule - tab.Infs.852-810B.01:
The safety educations conducted on various kinds of personnel who are new comers, transferred from other posts to firefighting posts and entering the production area must contain relevant firefighting safety knowledge.
The TBM-configured communication system allows the TBM operation cabin to communicate with several fixed locations of the TBM areas.
The Indus Valley is of subtropical climate, characterized by a distinct monsoon climate. However, affected by the northeastern high mountains, the climate is usually between dry and semi-dry, and between tropical and subtropical.
Beijing Ocean Co-stone Capital Investment Management Company Limited.
Elevation for Axis 5-1 of Bathroom, Canteen and Flat
Inspect labor protection articles and safety protection articles, refuse unqualified articles and have the right to stop any improper use found on site.
(3) The final piece inspection shall be carried out for the components and parts processed and shaped by the mold, and the conforming ones can directly go through the transferring (warehousing) procedures.
Take charge of the authenticity and reliability of materials used for the preparation of project proposal and the feasibility study report, as well as the quality of submitted documents.
Special personnel will be assigned to record the original topography and forms and image data during and after construction; the data on construction acceptance of EIA and water and soil conservation will be filed separately to facilitate the Owner to carry out special acceptance of EIA and water and soil conservation, and the Company will actively participate in the acceptance.
1 pc. Standard RS-232 serial interface (RJ45 interface)
The trestle platform can only be put into after it is tested safe, stable and reliable.
Passageway (three~four layers)4.0kN/㎡
6.4.6.3.5 The structure size drawings (including the component names, materials, weights, main structural dimensions, etc.) of the above devices and the necessary explanations and the installation methods shall be provided by the bidding manufacturer.
(In figures: RMB 21,940,000.0)
Ukraine is rich in mineral resources. More than 80 rich minable ores, mainly including coal, iron, manganese, nickel, titanium, uranium, mercury, graphite, fire clay and stone, have been discovered in more than 7,000 regions of the country, of which more than 4,000 regions have been developed.
Screen is 45mm thick, with multi-function wiring system.
Participate drawings review, digest design content carefully and understand design ideas.
Led by ISO, IRT is composed of personnel with special skills for information security, and is in charge of responding and handling information security incident as per procedures established by the company.
◆ UPS over-high voltage, voltage value and time;
6.2 Files Management System (ZTT/QG42-01-GL)
(4) Allocate the fund for technical measures for occupational health and safety insurance by a certain proportion in the on-site fund, and establish the labor sanitation fund, special funds for special purpose.
Remarks: Since the database and technical reports generated in the development of the above work contain confidential information of PEMEX, the contractor shall not retain duplicates of any document or technical report in paper or soft copy.
Write an article about the introduction of Chinese culture or Thai culture and read it aloud.
Composition of TADS Detection Station (Outdoor Equipment)
Hanger link of the journal box spring suspension device should be lifted to the distance where separation of frame and journal box can be prevented, so as to prevent accessories of journal box spring suspension device scattering. Meanwhile, it can also be used as the hanging pieces of wheelset.
The shed is provided with washing equipment, dust removal equipment, welding equipment, vehicle condition inspection equipment and static adjustment equipment for weekly and monthly inspection.
Such valley usually has no flowing water, and a small amount of slope deposit or colluvium accumulates on the slopes on both sides of the valley. During the heavy rain period, it is discharged along with the rainwater and forms a small-scale debris flow.
Treatment of open joints in track bed slab and support layer for Liujiexing Grand Bridge of Wuhan-Guangzhou HSR.
6. Waste: wastes produced in the construction and daily life shall be treated in a unified and timely manner, stacked in designated locations, messing up is strictly prohibited, and avoid blocking water gullies and polluting water sources.
10.1.1 The performance of D1 embedded sleeves shall conform to the requirements in Table 24.
Members: heads of departments and offices and full-time safety engineers
The projection method can be divided into two types based on the projection lines converging or not, namely, central projection method and parallel projection method.
(2) The compaction of mixture transported to the site shall be completed in the current day or work shift.
The dispatching communication system adopts the 2M-ring networking mode.
Bare OCS equipment threats the personal safety of overhaul and maintenance personnel.
The Project is directly supplied by the municipal water supply net from bottom to top.
Otherwise, the sealant needs to be repaired or reapplied. In the case of reapplication, the sealant shall be cleaned up before construction according to the process flow.
2. The operator shall take and keep photos of the whole pantograph.
HRB400 reinforcement:354kg Q345 steel plate:850kg
June 30, 2019 to August 10, 2019
For subgrade sections and station and yard without anti-collision walls, t-suquare and level ruler can be used for surveying and marking.
3. The standard of compacted fillers shall conform to the Technical Specification in Section 3.4.4.
The process flow of the project includes transmission, distribution, weighing of refuse derived fuel and charging directly in back-end combustion chamber.
Location Diagram of the Glass Curtain Wall on Facade 6 (73° north by west)
4.5.3 Construction power supply shall be strictly carried out according to relevant codes, and distribution boxes and switch boxes will be located at dry and ventilated places with normal temperature. And as to internal fireproofing boards in the switch boxes, the policy of "one-machine, one-box, one-brake, and one-leakage protector) will be carried out. The fuses cannot be replaced by other metal wires, switch boxes will be locked and numbered, and a specially-assigned person will be in charge of daily pre-shift examination.
2.6.3.2 Plan and Measures for Plane Management
The project structure form is frame structure , with 33 stories and 147000 square meters covered area
Clause 14 The enterprise must implement a safety production responsibility system for all staff, and identify safety production responsibilities for various levels of leaders, organizations, departments, and staff, making each perform their own functions.
Songyang Academy is located at place about 1,620m on the south side of ropeway next station, and there are many mountains between academy and ropeway for obstruction. The ropeway couldn't be seen around Songyang Academy.
8. The dimensions of the empty wheelchair shall be designed to be equal to or not more than 1,100 in length, equal to or not more than 650 in width, to be 450 in height and 1,500 in swing diameter.
6. Include embedded parts and meet the design and specification requirement
The main arch circle is calculated as per the bare arch and the superstructure is applied as per the dead load. The overall temperature rise is considered as 24°while the overall temperature drop is considered as 18°. The gradient temperature is considered as per the temperature difference between the interior and exterior box of 5 degrees. The shrinkage and creep are considered as per 10 years. The uneven settlement of the division pier is considered as per 1cm.
Provide reinforcement and support before large-scale excavation (if necessary).
2 In the implementation stage, site survey, interviews and discussions, collection of relevant information and data shall be carried out as per the investigation plan.
(2) Open "capital management" – "receivables" and input customer's name; the system will filter the receivable records of the customer; click "gathering".
This guide is applicable to equipment safety functions in the system.
Strengthen the low temperature performance of rubber parts of the converter coolant line and that of rubber parts exposed outside of the train
The control unit shall be equipped with local /remote shift switch.
The input to the management review should include information on:
Assurance of good relationship with Third Parties concerned with the project execution, with the media and with the community,;
According to Clause 17.2.2, the interface communication of the CTC system and the train control center shall meet relevant requirements.
The capstone is connected with the leveling layer through reserved reinforcement.
2.5.1.3.6 Construction of Foundation Platform
Ideological and political work: The department is responsible for ideological and political education work for the Project Department and publicity of the project site. The specific responsibilities are as follows:
(Where, 155 refers to SIV AC output power)
Loosen the locking screw on the adjusting bolt flange of guide bearing pad, and rotate the adjusting bolt of guide bearing pad to push the guide bearing pad against the thrust block.
The encryption service provided by the platform, which has been authenticated and tested, shall be preferred to an encryption method created by yourself.
The journal box is fitted at both ends of the vehicle axle to support the axle rotation.
Based on the passing of static acceptance, the testing and verification of the CTC system interface and the relevant functions shall be carried out by the operation of test train.
The leakage rate shall be no greater than 0.0352xP0.65 [m3/hm2].
3. The specific detailed design of electromechanical seismic is the responsibility of a professional company and is reviewed by the Design Institute.
5 When using this drawing, pay attention to check if the exposed value (t1 / 2) of embedded steel plate center at the supporting beam bottom of this support meet the requirements of leveling,
At the beginning of the 21st century, China independently developed the EMUs such as "Blue Arrow", "China Star", "Pioneer", etc.
3.1Whole car hoisting facility and signs are provided.
Check whether transformer operates according to regular maintenance project of transformer operation.
EMC laboratory, large environment test area, low temperature and high temperature test area, test area for PV converter, puncture test area, sand and dust test room, water test room
The corresponding reliability index is the train failure rate for 100,000 km of the motor car.
Project description: The project is an electromechanical general contracting project developed by Hong Kong Hang Lung Properties. The above-ground construction area is 86372 m2, and the underground construction area is 93869 m2. The building includes three floors underground to four floors above the ground.
The concealed fire dampers are provided with an accessible manhole nearby.
Figure 7.12-16 Scatter Diagram of Wheel Axle Lateral Forces of Axle 2 of Car 2 Distributed with Speed - Down Direction
The Project will provide a 10.4" HMI display.
In according to the general project scheduling, arrange the construction work reasonably in consideration of the schedule construction of yard equipment civil foundation and material supply.
In refined decoration and electromechanical installation stage, the Employer will designate subcontracted works, the EPC Contractor shall perform regular finished product protection education for all the on-site subcontractors in accordance with the contract, rules and regulations, and protective actions, thus to ensure that all the subcontractors are aware of the importance of finished product protection.
There are 5 divisional works in total. Upon verification, all the 5 divisional works meet the standards and design requirements
4.1.3 Be responsible for preparing part development list.
We can also use indigenous raw materials, repair the old and make good use of the waste.
In preliminary stage and in short-term stage, substation at depot and traction substation at NS27 should introduce two ways of independent and reliable 15kV power sources,.
4) The establishment of locomotive maintenance equipment should be arranged in accordance with the equipment configuration and task quantity of the adjacent lines.
The construction of other sections can be selected according to the capital situation and traffic growth.
If the driver does not to press the lamp switch after the lighting-on duration, the lighting will be turned off.
The following contents shall be considered in the design of all the systems and equipment:
"Master-Apprentice" activities have been actively carried out to create a good learning and working environment for young employees.
1. Pay attention to work and observation;
1. Information about former subsidiaries no longer incorporated in consolidation scope this year
The receiving management and purchase of materials shall be carried out in strict accordance with the procedures, and actively accept the supervision of the Employer and relevant departments.
Table 4-6-5-3 Data Sheet for Station System Function Test of Emali Freight Management Information System
Organize the procurement of materials and equipment to be used for the project, and take charge in the related management work such as mechanical equipment organization and allocation.
When an educated trainee discovers an accident potential or an accident occurrence, he or she should promptly report the leader or relevant personnel and learn the emergency treatment methods for hazards.
Gender:___________________________
1. Have the product passed German Rhine TUV certification or other certification
Table 3-11Relation Curve among Time, Speed, Line Current, Motor Current, and Mileage for R4-K4-P2
3. It is required to strengthen management, defines the division of labor responsibilities, insist on standards and strictly follow standards in construction.
Check the plug inserting core for foreign materials, and clean it timely if any.
2. The ventilation holes are arranged at a spacing of 2m. If the prestressed reinforcements are in contact with each other, the position of the ventilation holes can be appropriately adjusted.
All operations entering confined space must have valid entry permits.
⑵ Strictly implement project construction procedures and control the process of project investment.
A. Refer to the process flow chart for machining of bolt-sphere joints for details.
1)Air vents shall be opened in the bottom plate of the dispatching console to allow cold air to enter, and be added with dust-proof sponge. Acoustical boards shall be provided around the traction machine cabinet.
Data cables, power cables, earthing cables, etc. in CCTV equipment; with connectors
All the works within the contract scope have been built up as per the content stipulated in the design documents.
Tensioning fasteners of connecting reinforcement bar shall comply with the design and the relevant technical requirements.
Be responsible for emergency preparedness and response to natural disasters such as flood control within the unit;
In consideration of chains winding on the winding shaft in brake, the perpendicular center line of the crankshaft or pulley should be staggered 40mm from the center line of the winding shaft, and the center line of the pulley should be 10mm before the installation surface of the manual brake.
Attachment 4: Specification on Interface Operation Flow in Project Group and Design Department .doc
a. Steering gears should be inspected frequently for flexibility. Steering gears with failures should be repaired or replaced timely.
Water pump, control cabinet, valve, water treatment equipment, etc.
(2) Motors of HVAC unit fans satisfy the requirements of GB 755 or IEC 60349.
Take charge of insurance claiming to the insurer.
The elevation of the pavement center is 20~30mm higher than that of the roadside, and open drains are set along the outside of the road, which are discharged into the municipal pipe network after secondary sedimentation.
The basic brake device is of lever-type brake with middle drawbar structure, and is mainly composed of channel steel brake beam, brake lever, middle drawbar bar, fulcrum, chain hoof ring, wear-resistant pin sleeve, brake-shoe holder, brake shoe, etc.
Koka main ore body and south of Koka Mine ore body are divided by a gully, extending from the top of mountain to the bottom; besides, there is another gully in the south of Koka.
2.13.1.4There are no foreign objects inside the camshaft box.
The main interface of the system consists of a menu bar and a navigation bar.
Abstract: This document describes the methods and contents for testing the sound insulation performance of the next-generation metro train - CFRP car body.
⑤ Intra-station coding: ZPW-2000 series coding is used.
The civil engineering of this Project was stared in November 1999; the overall installation of electromechanical equipment, pipeline, automatic control system was started on March 20, 2000.
1) The excavation depth and width of launching trench shall be determined according to the topography and the exit angle. The width of its bottom should be 500mm larger than the diameter of the crossing pipeline.
The evaluation standard for plastic concrete mix proportion design: Under the condition of certain strength, the smaller the ratio of elasticity modulus to compression strength is, the better it is.
The station adopts the horizontal layout, three arrival and departure tracks (including one main track) are built in the near term, two tracks are reserved in the long term, and the arrival-departure tracks have the effective length of 600m.
b. No adverse impacts of precipitation of central strips on pavement;
4.4 The data coding of Automatic Image Recognition Module shall comply with the HMIS coding specification and the "5T" data measurement specification, and shall be compatible with HMIS and other "5T" systems and data exchange;
(5) The stirrups are perpendicular to the main reinforcement, the intersection point of stirrup angle and the main reinforcement shall be bound. The intersection point of main reinforcement and stirrup non-angel part shall be stagger bound in quincuncial manner. The stirrup joint shall be staggered arranged in vertical direction along the column.
a.Check the roof end skirt and the cleanliness of its surface. If necessary, please wipe it with alcohol.
It is suggested that the final land requisition and resettlement line should be determined at the stage of detail working drawing, including land location and scope for the camp and the spoil ground.
Expansion joint dowel bar shall be installed together with expansion joint slab and joint filling slab.
the design of pipelines should satisfy with requrements of operating and sweeping.
Manufacture certificate, technical data, instruction are complete, no damage and deformation to appearance, with good painting, and complete electrical device, element and component and no damage in the cabinet.
4G signal cable: KVVP-4X2.5 (Najiao Village and Banmai Village)
The welds of welding fittings shall be in good shape and smoothly welded with the base metal, showing no defects such as cracks, lack of fusion, lack of penetration and undercuts.
(2) Using QJJ to de-energize one by one according to the train set for the purpose of avoiding routing on a wrong unlock;
The 144-hour continuous running test shall commence when the Tenderee and the integrator consider that the subsystem test has been successfully completed.
Table B.0.7 Railway engineering DOM precision (m)
Such equipment in the cabinet as the indoor transmitter, receiver, cable analog box and the like will be arranged in an interlocking centralized station or a secondary interlocking station in a centralized manner.
The specific work scope of the Supplier shall meet the requirements of this contract and the forms of all annexes to the contract.
3) The mooring post bollard should be casted with the serial number and the word, "350kN".
(1) Installation of lighting fixture: the fixture shall be installed firmly and correctly, and the lamps and lanterns are installed in the center of the wooden platform.
In the actual operation process,can be taken simply.
According to the existing urban layout of Choybalsan, existing railway conditions and environmental sensitive points, the following three options (option of connection through West Choybalsan, option of connection through Middle Choybalsan and option of connection through East Choybalsan) are studied.
Refer to Attached Figure 4 for details: Site Layout Plan of Aboveground Structures in Construction Phase.
Ensure the compliance and effectiveness of system documents implemented in their departments.
The Owner has accepted the tender documents submitted by the Designer for the Survey and Design of No. 3 Contract Section of Huishui-Luodian Expressway Project in Guizhou Province at RMB seven million six hundred and thirty-three thousand six hundred and twenty-four only (in figure: RMB 7,633,624) through the Letter of Acceptance dated August 01, 2012. Both parties hereby agree to the following terms:
(2) Terrain, geology, hydrological and railway operation conditions shall be considered for station setting and stations shall be set at the section with flat terrain, easy construction, straight line and good geology to ensure convenient and safe operation.
6. Before the unit operates under loads, check the AC circuits of electric protection for generators and transformers. Neither open current circuit nor short voltage circuit is allowed.
2.5.2 Construction Method and Process of Culvert Works
4.2.2. Align a handrail to the mounting holes after drilling, and fasten it on the side door with hexagon bolt, cap nut, plain washer and CS check washer;
Structure parameter of EDBEFFORTMOD function module
We shall bear responsibility to ensure project construction process measurement management; we shall work as the person in charge of works control point, middle line, side line and elevation, and the direct person in charge of corresponding data.
The project construction disturbs the earth's surface and destroys vegetation, accordingly inducing water and soil loss to affect the road safety and at the same time threaten the personal safety of the local peasants.
Annex11-Technical Proposal; the overall layout and the decoration of the interior trims of the driver's cab are integrated with the characteristics of Mumbai City, and thus conform to the modern aesthetic consideration. For details, see Chapter 17 Design of industrial,
The newly-set terminal OLT device of the access network at the Takoradi station manages ONU equipment throughout the line.
During this inspection, control measurement has been conducted for all bridges in rehabilitation section, including arrangement of temporary datum point and observation point, as well as measurement of bridge deck alignment and arch axial alignment of arch bridge.
The detailed work plan for Level 3 will show the activities at the early starting position and clearly show the critical and near-critical activities.
As shown in Fig. 6.3.1-1, the same GNSS satellites are simultaneously observed by using two (or more) receivers placed at both ends of one (or more) baselines to determine the relative position or baseline vector of the baseline endpoints.
With MVB and Ethernet maintenance communication ports, the host can upload alarm information to train management system.
All beams used shall be of box cross section so as to demonstrate the aesthetic characteristics of viaduct.
After the pre-stored steel strand is connected with the stored steel strand, the pre-stored steel strand shall be pulled to the top of the tower and run into the HDPE cable pipe until it reaches the anchorage position.
The maindiseases for bridges and culvertsinclude: insufficient drainage capacity of culverts with small aperture and serious deposition; steel girders suffering from long-term rusting endangers bridge safety; corrosion, peeling-off or cracking in the concrete or masonry structure.
Issues that have been handled shall be recorded clearly and accurately.
At the same time, in view of the problems found in the pilot process, the railway department has taken measures such as increasing hardware facilities, strengthening publicity and prompts, optimizing software functions, etc. to improve and perfect them one by one.
No.2, yintan road, hankou district, wuhan city, hubei province (opposite to haichang Polar Ocean World)
The optical cables can be manually or mechanically laid, or laid by the mechanical traction method for areas where the track has not been laid yet.
In addition, traditional relay protection device usually has a life cycle of around 30 years, which is so hard for microcomputer protection to keep up with.
Applicant's Legal Name: China Construction Fifth Engineering Division Corp. Ltd.
Anti-corrosion pile Φ(160-200)X2000
Standard Personnel certificate: 53181150000693
Table 3-3-3 Material Supply and Demand Analysis for Baotou Iron and Steel Enterprises (Units: ten thousand tons)
4. The rock-soil before the pile can be excavated when the concrete strength of the pile body reaches 75% of the design value.
Since the geologic model provided by the Kazakhstan Side cannot be used as the basis for this study, the geologic model of the deposit has been verified based on the existing drilling data and the geological section plans as provided in the exploration report, which is called the "verified geologic model":
2. Three years or more experiences in HR work or one year or more expierences in HR supervisor position;
Plug on the insulated pipe upon hydrostatic test (after the test).
In order to provide battery recharging for retention train, power socket, extension line and other facilities, it provides the possibility of train-to-train charging.
9.6 If it is found that the products of suppliers cannot meet relevant requirements or have quality problems during the implantation of the Project, CRRC ZELC will take the following measures:
Handling, display, alignment, leveling and installation (assembly) of outrigger protection in final position of the structure, including the materials for temporary support structure
The traction load of a passenger train with single locomotive (including the locomotive itself) is up to 600 t, and the maximum speed is 160 km/h.
4.10.2 Prevent accidental heating or over temperature of the liquid ammonia tank, which will cause the saturated steam pressure to increase greatly.
When forming holes, hydraulic pressure, electric current, vibration time at each depth of the vibrator shall be recorded, until reaching the completed depth specified in the design drawings.
For the component with content of more than 1%, the calculation results shall be rounded to two decimal places. For the component with content of less than 1%, the calculation results shall be rounded to two significant digits.
1. Stratum: the bidder decides the quotation independently according to the survey report2.Pile diameter: 100cm 3.Hole forming method: slewing drilling method4. Wall protective way: mud wall protection
Respect, support and cooperate with the safety officers in photovoltaic power station in the safety management in photovoltaic power station.
The original road is close to the village on both sides and there are a lot of buildings so that the road shall be relocated and reconstructed into the underpass.
9. All the storage room set in the project should be E type.
After five-effect evaporation and concentration of vinasse, the final brix of concentrated vinasse shall be ≥65Bx°.
5) For binding of foundation reinforcement, face the hook upward instead of flatwise. If the reinforcement has a flat section, elect it before binding. Tie the flat section with a slim bar, avoid its falling.
5) Data and information with confidentiality requirements in the process of engineering construction and commissioning shall be controlled and processed as required, and shall not be leaked to irrelevant personnel.
Gravel, Φ15 ~ 20mm, 400mm
There is new various permanently occupied land of 1257.13 hm2, temporarily occupied land of 199.59 hm2, various demolished buildings of 135,280 m2 and various demolished power and telecommunication lines of 109.1 km along the line.
The plan shall include the estimated cost of recycling, screening, and recycling materials and shall also specifically mention the issue of reducing the use of materials.
640m (length), 1m (width) and 0.5m (height)
2. The height of the cushion stone shall be determined according to the specific design.
8.4.4.2.3 Environmental Protection and Control Measures
Our company promises to organize construction according to standardization management.
The capital, Lafia has a population of about 450,000 by the end of 2016.
A new comprehensive maintenance center is established at Isiolo and it is the main operation organization, dispatching and control and management structure for inspection, repair and maintenance of all the fixed facilities of the line. In addition, it also undertakes the dynamic detection of all the fixed facilities of the whole line.
The wiring mark should be clear and hard to be worn. It should be ensured that the mark can be identified correctly in whole life cycle of the resistor cabinet.
It is 1332.72 m long and the bridge span is 6X 30 +
Take charge of raw material inspection (self-inspection and re-inspection);
If necessary, measuring equipment can be adjusted or readjusted, but those adjustments that may cause the invalidation of measuring results shall be prevented.
1 In general, the vertical stress of the initial stress is the self-weight stress, and the horizontal stress shall be no more than .
Construction preparation → Survey and setting out → Foundation pit excavation → Chiseling of pile head → Testing of pile foundation → Base treatment → Binding of steel bars → Formwork erection → Concrete pouring → Curing and formwork removal → Foundation pit backfilling.
In particular, locking quantity for the first traction point of switch rail and point rail will influence the running safety directly.
For the new equipment and facility unused on site, the user unit shall provide model selection report (relevant technical requirements and parameters need to be attached), which will be reviewed by each related competent department, and submitted to competent leader for approval.
3. Vertical grounding electrode should adopt L50x5 hot galvanized flat steel which is 2.5 m high. Horizontal grounding electrode should adopt -40x4 hot galvanized flat steel with a 0.6 m buried depth to surface.
1.11.1.1.2 Testing Program for Key Systems of Communication System
(7). The layout of on-site temporary power supply shall be subject to unified design and planning, wiring shall be performed by 3-phase 5-wire system (TN-S system), power supply shall be led from box-type distribution room to primary and secondary power supply cabinets; direct burial shall be adopted for cable laying, and the ground above cables shall be set with signboard, and protective actions shall be taken for the line led through roads.
The operator only needs to pull out the manual safety pin on the starting receiver of the corresponding protection area, and press the manual button to start the entire device for spraying operation, which is quite easy.
Unqualified insulation tools and electrical safety tools are used.
0-0.2m from construction surface at GK184+400
"Eight not-allowed" and "five must-do" shall be achieved in construction of removal and reconnection.
The silt content shall not exceed 3% of the total weight under any condition.
The constant power supply (220V) is provided for PIS system by power supply system
Article61 The Articles of Association were signed by the Investor on November 25, 2013.
CARS Delegation Attended the 19th China-Korea-Japan Railway Research Technical Seminar in South Korea
Under abnormal state, the on-board ATC system will trigger emergency braking.
α— Force characteristic coefficient of the tensile members at the axle center shall be α=2.7, the coefficient for the members subject to bending and eccentric compression shall be α=1.9, and the coefficient of eccentrically compressed members shall be α=2.4;
The ramps of this interchange are all single-lane accesses. The minimum length of deceleration lane of the single-lane access is 125m with transition section of 90m; and the minimum length of acceleration lane of the single-lane access is 200m with transition section of 80m.
28 -0.653702E-04 -0.150903E-02 -0.142380E-02
Color steel sheet roofRefer to National Standard 06J925-2, P15, Roof 4Lockrand plate (thickness ≥ 0.60) for vertical seam (360\U+00B0 crimping)
The new rolling stock depot designed at INDODE station will undertake servicing task of freight and passenger locomotives and of passenger train, and undertake the periodic repair of rolling stocks.
Droplet or liquid inhalation may cause aspiration pneumonia.
Fig. 5-7 End Beam of Frame for Installation of TPWS Mounting Base
The wireless interface is applied for LTE via TNC connector.
15.2.3.1.2.1 Equipment for Dispatching Center of Railway Cooperation
1.Please inspect R01 relay 2.Please replace board card EB01B
3.4.3.2 New Connecting Line Project for Rinas International Airport
2) Quality index: data which could be reached upon project acceptance;
Supervisor: Henan High-grade Highway Construction Supervision Co., Ltd.(Seal)
According to relevant service specifications, material selection shall be made according to pipe diameter, description and/or pipe wall thickness.
3. Sowing of grass seeds or grass planting should be adopted for greening in the framework.
Confirm the interface for work division with the local power suppliers, and the Nepali is responsible for laying the pipelines to the agreed position within the project Red Line.
Use hexagon bolt M5X30 and locking edge washer VSK5 to install auxliary lamp on the mounting frame at front end of the car.
Xishan Park ~ Eastern Passenger Station, 22.9km
The audit team shall organize the participants to sign in and fill out the Management Activity (Meeting) Sign-in Record.
2. The protection grade of the enclosure of the LV switch cabinet shall be IP40.
3.3.2.10.Operation mode: one-handed operation.
The inspection plan shall be obtained from the ticket inspection service interface.
9.10 QMS.PR 7.5.12-QC-S013 Procedure for Residual Sample Handling
The planing of the Zhengzhou-Wuhan section of Beijing-Guangzhou railway began in 1895, and the construction of it commenced in April 1897. It was completed in April 1906.
Equipment that is too late for acceptance shall be stored in the holding area to prevent using in a mixed manner.
a. For the lateral slope of ground less than 1:10, perform embankment filling directly after surface cleaning; for the lateral slope of ground at 1:10-1:5, surface soil shall be scarified and rammed, and then filling shall be performed; for the lateral slope or longitudinal slope of ground higher than 1:5, original ground in longitudinal and lateral direction of subgrade shall be dug into steps at least 2m in width.
Liquid chlorine is the most commonly used method so far, which is characterized by low cost, mature process, and stable and reliable effect.
Plan Layout for Baseplate on the Floor -1 (-2.420 m) of Mixed Traction Substation
The terminal entity that needs to access RA services should send an authorization request to access RA services, for example, send the authorization certificate request to OAS (OAuth Authorization Server) by using the ‘client credentials' pre-stored at the terminal as agreed in the protocol.
Altitude of stratum: 180\U+00B0∠11\U+00B0
The Contractor shall carry out non-destructive test and shall perform x-ray inspection on 25% of the butt welds in transverse tension made on the site; the Supervisor shall carry out witness inspection.
4.2.1 Responsible for organizing the inventory and financial processing of each production organization.
4. The outer surface shall be free from obvious scratches, bruises and other appearance defects:
In principle, the cost control for this part shall not exceed 0.5% of the purchasing cost control.
When the unit works are constructed by a subcontractor, the subcontractor shall inspect and assess the unit works that he undertakes as per procedures specified by the standard with the representative of the General Contractor participating in.
The width of subgrade surface in straight section is as shown in Table 1.2.18-3.
To ensure that the detailed engineering design is reviewed, and updated if required, in accordance with the specified parameters/standards and best international practices prior to the implementation of the civil works or procurement equipment and materials;
Technical Conditions for Preventing Alkali-aggregate Reaction of Railway Concrete Engineering (TB/T 3054-2002)
The PC workshop has 4 high-efficiency and energy-saving production lines, with an annual output of 80,000 cubic meters of prefabricated members.
2 The name of manufacturer shall be provided by the applicant.
2 Scope of temporary land occupation includes the offices, canteens and dorms on the Contractor's encampment, roads, parking yards for mechanical equipment, material storage yards, spoil areas, prefabrication yards, mixing plants, warehouses, temporary roads for mobilization, temporary access roads and temporary bridges.
Internal parts transfer order shall be kept by related organizations for two years.
The tenderer shall provide relevant performance parameters for indirect release added.
4. Holes with over 2mm diameter should not be found on the base surface;
5. Effectively supervise and audit the incomes, expenditures, implementation process and results of the Company's projects, ensure the safety and integrity of the corporate assets, and ensure the authenticity of the company benefits;
The section and segment layout of the immersed tunnel is shown in Figure 8.
Installation of and space occupied by the plugin door are shown in Fig. 3.2-5 and Fig. 3.2-6 below:
3.1.3The working oil should be replaced every 120,000 km~ 150,000 km running mileage of the locomotive.
BAUCHI-GOMBE Existing Road Cross-section
The HV power distribution voltage of the Project is 10kV, while the LV power distribution voltage is 380/220V. Three-phase four-wire neutral point direct earthing system is employed.
Special equipment safety law, management system and supervision regulations
Quality inspection card of intermediate and major overhaul process of traction invertor
Section 5 Image Interpretation Instruments and Gauges
In case of occurrence of dangerous situations, road closure, detouring, vehicle breakdown and accident, the Project Company shall comply with the relevant procedures, including establishment of temporary traffic cones and indicator lights and removal of roadblocks and fragments without hesitation.
Recommended extinguishing materials are anti-swelling foam, carbon dioxide, powder and water mist.
The tested joints include 229 R260/R260 joints, 83 R260/R350 HT joints, and 104 R350 HT/R350 joints.
5.8.1 Those exemplarily implemented fire safety laws and regulations and the post fire protection responsibility system, and those made outstanding contributions in the fire safety work.
The design of prestress is shown in Figure 3-3. Refer to the construction design drawings for details.
The Contractor promises and guarantees that it has the qualification for highway maintenance engineering construction that meets the requirements of laws, regulations and tendering documents, and is legally issued by the competent authority and effective during the performance period of the Contract.
A video monitoring system is provided to facilitate observation of welding arc and molten pool, for real-time adjustment of welding parameters.
Time for watering curing: Actual curing time is not less than 14 days, calculated from completion of pouring.
5)Report parameter management: The report parameter management should be to define some data items in the report as input parameters. After that, a parameter page will be automatically generated when viewing the report. The user can enter or select parameter values to realize dynamic adjustment of some report data.
The special system of SZ series shall be used for bracing, and bracing shall be placed in a single row with a general spacing of 600m~1000m; 100X100mm square timber shall be placed above the column, shear bracing and horizontal rod shall be set for the column at both directions in the way that firstly being set at the position 500mm above ground, and then at each 2m above the 500mm.
Prior to the construction of drainage pipe, the elevation of rainwater and sewage inspection wells at the urban pipe connection points shall be subject to actual measurement and repetition measurement. In case of inconsistence of the elevation at the connection points with this drawing, construction shall be allowed only after informing the designers to adjust the elevation of pipelines.
—Fully close the butterfly valve at 073-E853A process water inlet
5. The fixing screw of the air vent shall not be fixed on the outer surface of the air vent, but shall be fixed on the side of the air vent as far as possible.
Typical Cross-section of Upperstructure(0°,15°,30°)
Management fee _ Management fee - Consultant's fee _ Management fee - Consultant's fee - Attorney fee
The alarm report can be written into a file and can be output to an peripheral equipment in the form of ASCII file.
Too many quality problems of the manufacturer's equipment may affect the construction progress.
Design Detail of Transition Section and Immersed Subgrade Protection
(4) Within the time before the first trucks of commercial concrete arrive at construction site, it is important to ask the site representative of commercial concrete company for test sheet of cement, sand and stone, admixture quality certificate and mix ratio notice.
3. Check and adjust the operating condition of coaxial synchronous gear motors periodically.
4. When the spacing (a2) between No. 2 and No. 3 spiral reinforcement is less than 5cm, a1 can be enlarged to 2a1, a2 can be enlarged to 2a2. Then two pieces of reinforcement can be bound together to facilitate vibration.
Our project management organization for the system is set as follows:
During rolling and compaction, the method of "from static compaction, to weak vibration and then to strong vibration, and ending with finishing by static compaction" will be applied.
4. Building storey and storey height: two-storey/one-storey, storey height of 3m; two-storey, storey height of 3m;
In the case of heavy wind (larger than scale 5), rain or fog, lifting at high altitude and supporting processes of installation shall be suspended, such as welding, laying of profiled steel sheet, installation of high-strength bolt, calibration of member etc.
Turn the D2 mode switch +111=91-S101 to "ATPM" or "RM" position;
After the implementation of water and soil conservation measures in the Project, water and soil loss during project construction and operation can be effectively controlled.
1.0~1.0X10- 1 (or higher)
Shall be located at the end of the station management area of the station hall to facilitate the passengers who need help.
When turning in a narrow roadway, the front cutting head shall not collide with the left and right pillars.
The prices listed in the Price Breakdown of proposal shall be separately completed in accordance with the following manners:
Influence of the landform, geology and meteorology to the signal equipment and selection of the equipment
The drainage (sewage) pump supporting control cabinet has the function of local automatic control (low water level pump stopping, high water level pump start, super high water level alarm);
Emphasis shall be placed on gate chamber layout, gate structure, calculation of lifting forces and materials of anticorrosive coating.
(3) Collect conditions of the landform, geology and topography of the section with a large amount of stone work blasting, conditions of the neighboring residents, buildings, transportation and communication facilities.
Shanxi Linfen Jintang Real Estate Development Co., Ltd.
f. Implement sport and video demonstration, etc. promotion activities, highlighting road safety issue.
USD 93 million to 141 million (covered trench or bored tunnel)
Reinforcement for protective wall: HPB300 reinforcement: 697.68kg; C20 concrete: 11.42m3
Arrangement of drawing files for floor 3 is in disorder; format of CAD files is not unified; the overall plan shall correspond with the detail drawing in detail.
The delivery schedule of construction drawings meets the needs of continuous construction.
σs - Reinforcement stress at the gravity center of tensile reinforcement (MPa);
TEAM-2 2017/1/22 Shanghai↗
(2) Before the locomotive mainline test run, the water resistance record book and locomotive assembly record book submitted by the factory shall be audited. The test run shall be carried out only after the audit is qualified with the signature of the specified person signed on the test run permit.
5. Production shall not be performed until the design drawings are confirmed by Party A. The technical problems and doubts, technical deviation in bid document, and corresponding solutions shall be given;
All the motors that are installed outside must be fully closed and fan cooling, with the enclosure protection class of IP65.
HNDWJJ[2016] No. 82
In the case that the traffic diversion and convergence sections at both ends of a single lane that are open to traffic in alternate directions, it is necessary to isolate the vehicles to ensure traffic safety by using appropriate isolation facilities. The isolation facilities include tapered buckets, cement isolation piers, and water- (sand-) injected traffic isolation piers. It is proposed to adopt the following principles:
Unless otherwise agreed it is preferred that the equipment shall be tested in its normal working orientation with no special precautions taken against the effects of magnetic interference, heat or any other factors upon the operation and performance of the equipment under test.
Railway Applications - Specification and Demonstration of Reliability, Availability, Maintainability and Safety (RAMS)
Firmly fasten the embedded angle steels of all beam and column angle bolts and formworks to ensure the verticality and flatness and the beautiful appearance.
Times of Services of a Single EMUTable 7–1
2. Receive the remote control signal of BAS on the electric heat tracing device, and control the start and stop of the electric heat tracing system.
Divisional works, sub-divisional works, sub-items works and inspection lots are qualified in construction quality evaluation and unit works are accepted.
Table of Train Marshaling for Each Line of Each Design Year Table 3.3-2
With respect to the excavation of a foundation trench, reliable drainage measures shall be taken and preventive measures against surface water shall also be taken, so as to avoid collapse of slope or damage of foundation pit.
Arrange for formulation of construction planning or construction measures, as well as formulation and review of working procedures and technical measures of environmental protection management;
The pipe segments for pipe culvert will be purchased from local qualified pipe pre-casting plant, and transported to the site for installation.
The number of ETC stations at the toll station should be set in accordance with the requirement by 3 ministries that the coverage rate during the "Twelfth Five-Year Plan" period should reach 60%.
After the expiration of the temporary land, it shall be cleared up and returned to the owner or the user of the land.
The IO unit implements the drive retention and collection of relay states of the relay; each IO unit can drive 16 relays and acquire 32 contact states.
Mechanical equipment—we will reasonably select and arrange transport mechanical equipment to ensure efficient use.
Tender-winning price (contract price): RMB 5,046,230
Applied to: converter units for VSC-HVDC and UHVDC
Figure 10.1-3 Schematic Diagram of Truss Plate Figure 10.1-4 Schematic Diagram of Split Bolt and Cushion Blocks
If the trial assembly is needed, the product engineer organizes the prototype production line trial assembly. If the dimension and performance test is involved, the Quality Department shall fill in the trial assembly report.
For details of all the above works, please refer to the mobilization plan.
Moreover, a site for construction of SCR is reserved, leaving a space for technical improvement for future upgrading and reconstruction.
The measuring results shall meet the requirements in 4.5.1 of Technical Specification
The construction of the monolithic connecting plate , monolithic caps, parapet fencing and the monolithic slabs at the movement joint at piers No. 1, No. 4, concrete class B35 F200 W6
4.2.4 Is responsible for training management of straight cadres of the Company, including daily training course, IDP, and tutor system, etc.
26.3.4Design the Organizational Guarantee Measures
During the maintenance, the operator must put the vehicle into the stalling gear, tighten the hand brake, and pad the triangular wooden block, to ensure safety.
Table 2-6-1-1 Regional Area and Demographic Analysis
The shape, size and surface quality of the product meet the requirements of the ordering drawing.
Accepted drawing of the Shree Ugrachandi Higher Secondary School--bird's eye view
After the right track is closed, the frame bridge will be prefabricated at the outer side of right track.
The Standard provides the training contents and requirements for production personnel in the wind farms of PowerChina International Group Limited.
It adjusts operation scope of operators, operation authority tool, and allows the operation of adding, modifying, deleting operation type, operator, password and so on. Permission management applies to any operator workstation.
The ultra-large flow fire extinguishing unit is outstanding with large flow and long range. Its combination with the remote water supply and drainage system and remote delivery system for foam concentrate can mix the water and foam in an ultra-large flow, which is able to divide, suppress and extinguish the fire on site efficiently and utterly in a short time.
ISO 9001: 2015 Quality Management System - Requirements
N=0.10kW-220V, noise: 48dB(A)
Electric arc welding under minus temperature is to be applied and the temperature will be controlled by layer for welding.
5.3.1 The data of blast vibration monitoring shall be maintained properly; for this purpose, the Blast Vibration Monitoring Record Sheet in Appendix A of this Specification shall be filled in.
At the end of 1987, the exploitation capacity of groundwater facilities was 1.2 million cubic meters per year, accounting for only 13.5% of the recoverable amount.
TB/T 2879.6-1998 Painting and Coating of Railway Vehicle – Part 6: Coating Quality Inspection and Acceptance Procedures
K1 - compensation coefficient for line decay: 1.26 for 1dB line decay and 1.58 for2dB line decay
The electrical energy consumed by electrical braking when a train stops is 12 kWh (it will return to the electrical network) and that consumed by starting is 15 kWh. According to China's electricity charging criteria for subway systems, the cost of 1 kWh electricity is RMB 1.
In case the director cannot attend the board meeting in person due to special conditions, he/she may submit the Letter of Authorization and authorize other directors to attend the meeting and exercise the voting right on his/her behalf.
(2) Open the airway to keep the respiratory tract of the wounded unblocked.
3. Employer: Kunming Metro Operation Co., Ltd.
The electrical arrangement in control boxes should be neat and artistic, and be convenient for observation, operation, wiring, dismantling and repair.
(1) chemical pipe: the test pressure for the cold water pipe should be 1.5 times the designed pressure for the cold water pipe system, but not less than 0.9 Mpa.
Fire extinguisher nozzles were not folded type, and fire hydrants were not regularly inspected.
In case of fire, the smoke control at subway stations is very important.
As main line rails, CEN54E1 R260 rails complying with the requirements of EN13674-1 shall be used.
Normal and abnormal signal receiving in each section is shown in Table 7-3.
Paints and Varnishes - Determination of Heat Resistance (GB/T 1735-2009, ISO 3248:1998, MOD)
During the hoisting of electronic cabinet, please firstly make sure that the eyebolts and the products are securely connected to avoid any sudden falling.
Artificial young forest tending, and artificial planting afforestation; tree species planted / concerned: cinnamomum camphora, bischofia javanica, choerospondias axillaris, banyan tree, etc.
Be responsible for the presentation of any item to be improved for the management review and track management of any item identified to be improved;
SALCO Aluminum SmelterDesign Stage: Basic Design
Waterproof concrete (P6) + 4 thick (SBS)
During hoisting, all contact parts between steel wire rope and beam body shall be covered (padded) with protective materials, to avoid damage of edges and corners of beam body and steel wire rope.
Note: 1. The start and stop of exhaust fan at same room in the drawing shall be controlled by the same switch.
Internal wallboards of side and end walls, partitions, clapboards and accessories within above areas such as caps, boxes, cabinets and covers; interior trim strips and profiles, excluding trim strips and profiles of interior roof
Design quantity: 18000 m3; quantity of excavation completed: 18000 m3; completion proportion: 100%.
Bathroom and toilet unit, with modularized construction, short construction duration and high work efficiency.
3 Others: The whole line is planned to be provided with 44 concrete mixing plants. 24 explosive magazines, 8 filler mixing wharfs.
Water injection, sludge sucking and sinking are firstly performed to stable depth. The first steel casing needs to join height then sinks to stable depth, and height joining is performed again until reaching the full height of open caisson.
During dry drilling, the rotation speed shall not be too high, pressure increasing shall not be too great, and the drill tool shall be moved frequently.
Winter construction information feedback shall be strengthened, the characteristics of winter climate of each year shall be carefully studied, daily ten-day, monthly weather conditions shall be recorded in detail, and any problem found in construction shall be solved in time.
The followings were concluded as per the results for testing on Malaysia ETS line (Ipoh~ Pandang Besar):
Supervise and urge the Contractor CREC to arrange specially-assigned vehicles to water the construction road timely.
The effectiveness of the certificate requires periodical supervision and approval of TIRT; this certificate shall be invalid after the deadline specified above if it is not stuck with the qualification label of TIRT.
Wall-linking bars shall be arranged in the principle of two-step and three-span.
(2) Liability for breach of contract due to failure to pay the contract price as agreed in the Contract on account of the Employer: none.
The cable rope end anchorage, bracket, cable clamp bolts shall be installed in place and fixed firmly.
Mao Yisheng, suffering a great pain like he himself was going to kill his baby, accompanied the bridge which completed undergoing danger and hardship all the time till the last fuse was connected.
Responsible for testing and verification of RAMS indicators, as well as management of product reliability growth;
Perform procurement of HSE PPEs, tools and safety protection facilities;
The materials shall be evenly laid and compacted, and the thickness of the compacted cushion shall not exceed 100 mm.
Spot inspection of bogie assembly, indicating that the basic braking part assembly, bolster wearing plate assembly, side frame wearing plate assembly, accessories, and itemized tests comply with the technological procedures.
The test instrument is XG-I suspended wave velocity logging unit produced by Geotechnical Engineering Testing Technology Development Co., Ltd. of Langfang Development Zone, Hebei Province. The main technical indicators of the instrument are as follows:
The train HV circuit diagram is shown in Fig. 3-1 below:
Simultaneous operation is allowed, and so the total time is set to 1.5 hours
1. During welding, wear work clothes, protective gloves and safety shoes;
① Test the transverse vibration of pier top when the train passes bridge; analyze transverse force performance and evaluate transverse stiffness of pier;
220kV SDT Twin bundle Rail conductor Transmission Line from Guddu to Shikarpur (approx. 150 km);
The Project Manager shall work full-time other than part-time during the entire contract period. Moreover, it shall stay at the construction site of the Project for at least 22 days per month (the days of its leave shall not exceed 8 days) and shall not leave the site without the approval of the Employer.
(The remainder of this page is intentionally left blank for signatures/seals.)
Exposed parts of plain brick walls are sealed with 1:1 cement mortar.
The track circuit is set at the head of the shed line, and tracks within the shed are not provided with the track circuit.
Pull the lifting lever of main power switch down to "OFF" position so as to switch off the power of the whole trolley.
Treat and recycle domestic wastewater and flushing wastewater of the construction site by corresponding processes, without discharging externally.
(6) In addition to the above provisions, the relevant provisions on the foundation pit backfilling in the Code for Acceptance of Construction Quality of Foundation Engineering of Building Foundation should also be strictly adhered to.
Vertical View of Piers and Abutments (A0, A4、A8, M3)
Due to the small amount of reinforcement in the bottom plate, the insert type vibrator with large vibration force is used for tamping, and the concrete is poured from the cantilever end to the root in the bracket part.
2) Before construction, insulation telemetering or withstand voltage tests should be carried out for the cables. If several cables need to be laid in the bridge, the layout of cables should be drawn in a table or a diagram according to actual site condition, and the length of cables and the number of ready-made branch cable heads should be obtained to avoid crossing and mixing of cables.
(6) The crane shall be adopted for lifting during the assembly of framework pole.
Return to equipment supplier: It mainly refers to faults that cannot be repaired or repaired on site (board card failure).
Waste oil shall be placed in waste oil buckets and treated in a unified manner according to regulations.
The train driver or station staff sends a PSD close command on PSL; then, the operation indicator on PSL lights up, and the PSD begins to close. When PSDs are fully closed, the ASD/EED on PSL are OFF, the locking state indicator lights up, and the PSD opening indicator on PSC panel goes out.
12.2 Embedded casing shall be mounted at right angle to track groove plate, without gap at the bottom.
11. Grouting shall be performed as soon as possible after tensioning, grouting time meets the specification requirements.
② Move the M3 dam site upward to make it possible for the foundation part to avoid the sand bed, so as to reduce the work amount of dam foundation treatment and use waterhead more often to increase the installed capacity;
General non-conformities: refers to isolated, sporadic, and has no direct impact on product quality, environment, occupational health and safety, and integration of information technology and industrialization.
The rubber of a bogie shall have a service life of more than 6 years;
This document is formulated to ensure the correct and safe operation of information processing facilities by all employees of the company and to protect the confidentiality, integrity and availability of information and information systems.
1) Connecting track: It is a line to connect with other rail transits, and normally set between lines with vehicle resource sharing or large un-wheeling repair base.
Supplied at load access terminal or by external power independently.
The mean consumption and the maximum consumption of natural gas are respectively as 31000Nm3/h and 34500Nm3/h. The natural gas supply pressure is 0.01~0.012MPa.
Table 11-4 Schedule of Formal Training Courses
Processing of shunting supervision record needs to be supported by figure file about shunting supervision station yard. Such file shall be stored under the directory DJ\.
<21-2> Conglomerate with Mudstone (O1): gray, grayish brown, purplish red, conglomeratic and medium thick to thick stratified structure, with local argillaceous cementation, relatively hard.
The transmitter includes pressure/differential pressure transmitter. Based on installation environment, the transmitter can be installed with or without protective box.
Inspectors shall perform re-inspection for products in accordance with nonconforming product handling sheet and construction/technical problem handling notice, and shall perform external inspection for the original specified external inspection items or in case of inspection requirements from customers.
Boundary of Railway and Bridge: YDK10+523.000
The butt-welded flange, also called weld neck flange, is different from other flanges because it has a long and inclined high neck from the welding point between the flange and the pipe to the flange. The wall thickness of the high neck gradually transitions to the thickness of the pipe wall along the height direction, which improves the stress discontinuity and increases the flange strength.
2. Pipes are installed and buried inside H-shaped steel grooves, 90\U+00B0 edge standing upright.
6. Self-inspection Conclusion of Hubei Intercity Railway Company. on Wuhan-Huanggang Intercity Railway Project
It is free of crust, unstirred hard lump. The color shall be confirmed by consultation of both sides.
Conditions for safe storage: Store in a container with appropriate marks.
Existing road is 2.5m wide and of soil pavement with the width of 2.5m.
. Field profile: open road and drainage ditch, and open water drainage facility.
41. Management of warehouse equipment and facilities.
The total equipotential bonding terminal block shall be connected to the grounding mains in the room.
3.4.7 Work records of selection and management of contractors, suppliers and service providers;
Organizational and application procedure that can describe functions of site engineering shall be formulated.
7.3.5 The shifting laying of turnout shall be in accordance with the following provisions:
The following calculation only considers meeting the requirement of single operation, despite of other accident that may be encountered in operation.
(10) Whether design could fulfill the commencing/commissioning requirements of equipment and system.
The Contractor reports the site HSE management situation last week, the existing problems and the measures taken. The HSE Department announces the inspection results last week, the existing problems and the next arrangement, etc.;
The Rescue team shall confirm the need of site first aid or sending to hospital according to the degree of food positioning, or request medical persons to come to the site for rescue.
3.3.15.2 Dial Tone Transmission Delay
The hydraulic and pneumatic interlocking signal display system starts the signal lights, instruments, alarm buzzers and displays the working conditions and fault position of machineries through sensors installed in tanks, diesels, hydraulic converters, travel measuring wheels, generators and clutches.
Figure 6: Assembly of Middle Armrest of Second-class 3-person Seat (Without Buckle)
The Human Resource Department can release the recruitment information through local network, media advertisement and service companies.
As for the requirements of aerodynamic load suffered by passengers on the platform as specified in TSI, the calculated speed peak values are far less than 15.5m/s, meeting the standard requirements;
Motor air valve control wire WDZN-YJY23-5X10
High-strength bolt shall not be installed in rainy days and friction surface and bolt shall be free of water and other dirt. Meanwhile the impact of climate change on high-strength bolt shall be paid attention to.
(4) Catalogue for Elimination of High Energy Consumption Out-dated Mechanical and Electrical Equipment (Products) (The Third Batch) (Decree No. 16 of Ministry of Industry and Information Technology, 2014), March 6, 2014;
For the proposed difference clauses, make targeted solution approved by the leader.
3. Quantity of necessary containers per day: 45 (each container weighs 27t)
The Surveyor, the Designer, the Contractor, the Supervisor and the testing organizations have corresponding qualifications, and their working processes meet the requirements of relevant national codes.
(1) The model of processed wooden doors, quantity and processing quality must comply with the design requirements, with product certificate and use permit, and the moisture content of timber for making wooden doors shall not exceed 12%.
Pier body to be poured in two sections undergoes the following operation: After concrete strength in the first section reaches the standard, remove bottom template and reserve 2m top template, and then transport bottom template to the second section for installation till it reaches designed elevation, to effectively save construction cost.
Primary-A (equivalent to Class I railway in China)
EPROM refers to programmable read only memory that can be erased by ultraviolet light, it is used to store the long-term monitoring in use, relay protection function program and self-inspection program, etc.
10.1.1All the installation work has been completed according to the regulations of design documents and the quality requirements of relevant standards and specifications, provided with various product conformance certificate, all construction installation quality conformance records and the relevant data and documents, including the completion data, operation and maintenance manual to be submitted as per the agreement of the two parties.
The tester will retest the reinforcing steel according to the specification requirements. The qualified reinforcing steel can be only used.
5. Cable trenches are reserved on the stages at the outside of the side ditches of cuttings on both sides of sections DK20+770.00~DK20+785.00, DK21+075.00~DK21+225.00 and DK21+925.00~DK22+165.00.
Materials transported to the site shall be stacked here. Various materials shall be stacked in order based on their type and specification. Label plate and inspection status shall be set up.
Cable tension monitoring system software SICO-SLM-CENOP
1) Shop Drawing of Baseplate of Turbine Base;
During the field investigation, it is found that the road becomes narrow after passing through the town section. It is suggested that subgrade widening on both sides should be considered during the reconstruction and expansion. In the field section, subgrade widening on one side should be considered during the reconstruction and expansion.
1) The hole position shall be arranged according to the design. The deviation shall be less than 10cm, and the hole depth error shall be ±10cm;
During concrete pouring of element base plates, the small distributors are placed within the element, and therefore the water tank can be installed and sealing doors can be sealed only after the pouring is completed.
Construction of supply pipeline cushion, concrete support and pipeline and reserved interface in Area 4
(5) List of purchased part and related quality certificated (if any)
Connect the prepared strands to connecting sleeves as per number, and fasten anchor bolts, and straighten the strands.
The test unit's complete test plan for and detailed implementation plan for various test conditions of the Project shall be submitted to the CRRC Sifang (entrusting party) for confirmation before the test.
Temporary toilets are in west and east of the construction site.
If there is any error in quantity required by the project after inspection, relevant report or report on shortage, badness and damage shall be written and a satisfactory resolution shall be made on contact with related aspects.
The periods of initial stage, short-term and long-term for Nairobi-Malaba Railway are respectively determined as 2025, 2030 and 2040.
Risk controlling is trying to dominate the risk and have it under control to reduce the probability it occurs or to avoid the occurring, thus decreasing the potential losses.
Figure 4.21-48 Scatter of Vertical Stability of No.2 End Carbody Where Car 1 Is in Down Direction in Changyi Section of the Shanghai-Kunming High-speed Railway
To ensure that post construction verification, personnel training, trial operation, completion settlement and asset transfer can be finished as soon as possible, the said items are also part of the project construction, occupying 15% of the total weight of the project.
(3) On the finished surface layer, using trolleys, stepping, mixing slurry, and throwing objects are prohibited.
2.3.1 Selection of Permissible Tolerances for Outer Diameter and Wall Thickness
The grinding machine must be equipped with a secure and suitable wheel guard. After the grinding wheel is installed, no person is allowed to stand in front of the grinding machine and the grinding machine shall be made to run without load for 3 minutes, after which a grinding wheel dresser shall be applied to correct the outer diameter of the grinding wheel.
(2) Coordinate to establish and maintain the BIM, and organize, contact and coordinate the owner, contractor and other units to complete the relevant work till the Project passes the completion acceptance;
WDS (2014) No. 0102JJ65
The testing results shall be recorded on the joint commissioning record sheet for communication system and elevator telephone helpline. The original copy of the sheet shall be signed by the person in charge and submitted to the joint commissioning workgroup for confirmation.
In the preliminary stage, the through operation shall be designed that LOT1A Line after Kubwa Station to Idu Station shall connect Idu Station to Abuja Station of LOT3 Line;
There are interweaving sections between the two left-turn ramps and the divergence and convergence points of the South Outer Ring Expressway, and the relative traffic capacity is poor.
(If the main body is transported to the site with foundation channel steel, such foundation channel steel can be directly used for the horizontal transportation).
3. 12 pieces of 140X58X6 channel steel of transom
It is prohibited to blindly construct to break the pipeline to cause loss and impact its use.
Though Allana Potash forecasted that the sylvite demand gap in African market will be about 5.00 ~ 7.00 million tons in the year of 2020, it is learned that the Republic of Congo reserves rather abundant sylvite resources, and Ethiopia, as the new sylvite production place, also has the potential to hit traditional sylvite suppliers and occupy their market shares by virtue of advantages such as price or haul distance.
Measure the voltage to ground at point D22 (+) of plug X3 of DXMe1 +115=41-A104.03;
The construction of the tram project will greatly improve the service level of public transportation in Qazvin, which is in line with the goal of comprehensive transportation development, and further promote the development of comprehensive transportation in the city, which is an important step in implementing the comprehensive transportation development strategy in the city.
HSSE management personnel, technicians and experienced construction personnel shall be organized to carry out JHA analysis towards potential hazards or damages in construction and develop a JHA worksheet based on construction scheme.
IEC61133:2016 is a new standard, the use of which will increase technical risks and the risk of time delay.
The traffic volume of each section can be roughtly estimated according to the total inflow volume minus the total outflow volume at the section end. That is to say, the total traffic volume is the destination inflow volume minus outflow voume.
④-1 Silty clay (Q/4al+pl/): brownish yellow, plastic, wet-saturated, uneven soil texture, partially containing a little fine silty sand, clayed soil and iron-manganese concretion, medium tenacity, without vibration through shaking.
2.3.1.1Measure the insulation resistance of the live parts of the main silicon rectifier cabinet to ground with a 1000 V tramegger. The value shall not be lower than 5 MΩ.
Source of waste gases: combustion flue gas, equipment and vehicle exhaust, paint, paint, electric welding, etc.
The average diameter of trunks from 1.3m of surface
2. In the illuminance calculation sheet, the power of fluorescent lamp ballast should not be "0".
The Tenderer shall arrange face value designers to Luoyang site according to the requirements of the Tenderee, communicate with the Tenderee in a timely manner, and modify the design scheme according to the opinions of the Tenderee until a design scheme approved by the Tenderee is formed.
M10 cement mortar (P042.5 cement)
If Party A requires Party B to complete other installation works beyond installation of Phase-1 gas engine units, the procurement principle of materials and equipment for such works shall be as follows:
1. Highway grade: standard of two-way four-lane expressways;
6.5.1 The vertical control survey outside tunnel shall be done according to the design survey accuracy.
Structural Layout Plan at the Elevation of 20.0 of Exhibition Hall A4
The amplitude of water level variation of underground water is mainly affected by rainfall and tide.
4. One-side welding can be used for overlap welding between N1 and N3 reinforcement as well as N2 and N4 reinforcement.
3. Requirements on Construction and Quality Acceptance of Secondary Lining Concrete
Materials: black EPDM (Ethylene-Propylene-Diene Monomer) rubber; the requirements on smoke, fire and toxicity of rubber strips shall conform to EN45545; mechanical properties shall conform to HG/T3088-1999.
8.1.4 Only explosives and electric detonators permitted for coal mines can be used in sections of work area with gas.
The interlocking machine is generally of a redundant structure (hot standby, 3-vote-2, double 2-vote-2), and some are a highly reliable stand-alone interlocking machine.
5. Exposed corners of columns and walls in underground parking areas shall be designed with steel angle beads not less than L50 and not less than 1m in height on the side next to the carriageway.
A proper angle shall be arranged to make the cable cross through if possible.
Resolution: 0.08mm/pixel
2. Work shall be arranged reasonably to avoid fatigue driving. Overloading and overspeeding and drunk driving are strictly prohibited. Supervision shall be improved and punishment shall be more strict. Monitoring personnel shall be assigned to supervise and remind drivers, assist in observation and cooperate with the command.
Onsite Construction of Beimen Station (Shot on July 5, 2017)
Staff training of Rolling Stock (including 30 types of work )
From 12 a.m. to 3 p.m., suspend the workers' continuous operations. Meanwhile, adopt the way of shifting work and adjust the continuous working operation of workers.
3.3.3 The Seller shall not make any change to the project unless the Buyer submit a written request.
The backup time provided by the communication system for the perimeter alarm system is also 2 hours. According to standards of the new security code, the insufficient backup time shall be solved by the security discipline (host equipped with backup batteries, or other measures).
2) Golra Sharif to Taxila Section (K1522+210–K1539+850)
The route going through the area is full of rivers and river ways are rich in sand and gravel, so the gravel materials needed could be mined by ourselves at the rivers nearby.Therefore, the problems of building stones scarcity and long distance from the branch lines could be solved easily.
d) Make attendance statistics of the personnel in the department;
The driving seat can be adjusted to up and down, front and back, right and left. The backrest, headrest and armrest can also be adjusted to satisfy the convenience and comfort of the driver.
Insulation treatment shall be carried out after successful pressure test, rust removal and treatment against corrosion.
Mechanical stop shall be arranged to restrict the vertical movement of pantograph on sections without overhead contact system.
The preparation of the annual budget shall be organized and coordinated by the Budget Management Department using regular budget and flexible budget methods, with all departments involved. All business categories within the management scope of the overseas centers shall be prepared with superiors and subordinates all involved, summarized level by level, and balanced comprehensively.
The maximum bearing seat temperature during the test should not exceed 120℃.
3) Determine whether the quality of water produced by the equipment meets the design requirements through commissioning.
Changing level crossings of bridges and culverts into interchanges of this section: 7 box bridges are established with a total area of 490.0m2 (top), and 4 overpass bridges are established with a total area of 2856.6m2.
(1) At service full braking position, it shall take 5 ~ 8 s to reduce the pressure of equalizing air cylinder from 500kPa to 140kPa.
Environmental pollution: highly corrosive average precipitation:
After construction, the basket shall be stopped where workers are easy to get on and off, and bound with galvanized wire. Then construction personnel wearing harness can get off from the basket.
10.4.3 Acceptance of the Goods hereunder shall not exempt the Supplier from liability for the same during the Warranty Period.
The information exchange between the central system of railway administration and the national seismic network is shown in Table B.23~Table B.30.
Such important places as main electrical room, main operating room and operating room are equipped with trolley type or portable extinguisher and emergency lighting lamp.
4) Derivative instrument contract which will or can be settled with the enterprise's own equity instrument other than the derivative instrument contract with which its own equity instrument with fixed number is used to exchange fixed amount of cash or other financial assets.
One train is equipped with 2 single-bellow driven pantographs.
(2) General Information on Power Industry along China-Laos Railway
The quantities and amount of subdivisional works should have been and to be completed in this and the coming year and to which the measures should be taken shall be include in such schedule.
c) Determine and apply the criteria and methods (including monitoring, measurements and related performance indicators) needed to ensure the effective operation and control of these processes;
= the start point of K77.4 existing line reconstruction and design is located at DK77+400
Two generators are configured for production line. Refer to Schedule for specific generator power.
The detailed RAMS/LCC requirements shall be determined in the design stage.
The design and development changes shall be identified and records shall be kept.
● hydrant bolt port pressure should meet the most negative point (the farthest point) of water pressure requirements, water flow 72m3/h.
The 9.03m slurry TBM used in Taishan Nuclear Power Project created a Chinese record of 846m tunneling drive in a month.
6.13. Concrete structures shall follow the following provisions during the designed service life:
Displacement Observation Stake
The Quality Control Manager is appointed by the Company's headquarter directly and has one-vote veto to the project quality. The Manager shall participate in the preparation of project quality planning and quality plan, direct and supervise the implementation of project quality work.
The rest design work will be done on time according to the construction progress.
The steel strand shall be cut with cutting machine or grinding wheel saw, and arc welding or oxyacetylene flame is not allowed.
Keep in conformity with the operation policy and strategy of the company;
Moment of inertia of brake beam to axis y (m^4)
This last train heading to Guangdong departed from Suihua, Heilongjiang Province, and has been traveling south for 4 days.
Table 3-2-4 Checklist of Data Network System Function
The electric actuator is provided with the thermal motor, the motor is equipped with overheating protection, and the power is cut off at 135°C.
Section 5 - Eligible Countries (ELC;
4.11.4.1 General Requirement to Material Storage
2.2 Screw the pull rod (b) into the puller (a).
Participate in the rush repair of equipment, timely eliminate the fault, and ensure the equipment in the service area in ordered operation status.
A pair of level D GPS points are arranged every 5km along the river course in the survey area as the first-level control network of the survey area and GNSS static observation is adopted.
Before joint pointing, the loosened and deformed parts shall be trimmed and leveled to good condition.
Emergency response plan refers to plans developed in advance including comprehensive emergency response plan, special emergency response plan and site handling scheme, to prevent and control potential accidents and to reduce accidents and damage caused thereby.
The bridge structures mainly are of concrete and steel. The steel structure bridge needs a large number of quality steel and large steel structure processing plants. The large transportation equipment and good transportation conditions are required during the transportation, and the later maintenance cost is high.
Measures to prevent slag inclusion: the operators should follow the soldering flux application rules; the reinforcement end should be cleaned to remove all rust spots and debris before welding; the electroslag treatment procedure should be shortened, shaping the reinforcement end to slight convex; the tip layering process should be conducted in time.
In the presence of timing, automatic recovery should be switched back within 10 - 20seconds.
Pointed non-slip long tweezers 175mm175mm pointed, stainless steel
(5) The Emergency Drill Headquarters is responsible for summarizing various issues raised by the Evaluation Group and reporting to the Company's Emergency Command Center. The Company's Emergency Command Center Office is responsible for the implementation of the rectification.
Inspection Engineer will be responsible for the inspection, which include four stages, preparing inspection plans (including contents of the inspection and schedule), review of manufacturing scheme, intermediate supervision of manufacturing, factory inspection, and on-site unpacking inspection.
(4) Reveal to relevant financial organization for the purpose of financing of the Project;
One 80m long locomotive waiting track is set in the throat at the south end of the line.
1. Be responsible for drafting and implementing the equipment management system on the operation site.
Power cable: ZR-YJV22-0.6/1kV-4X2.5
e. Independent support or hanger shall be set for the fire damper with diameter or long-side dimension of not less than 630mm.
For the mandatory inspection given by the governmental administration departments, any dissent about the sample being tested or test results on the report should be dealt with in accordance with regulations or laws set by the Chinese government.
Station sections and acceleration sections of passenger dedicated lines are all designed with portal structures, as shown in Fig. 2-3-27.
Monitoring for shoulder retaining works shall be improved. Subgrade filling shall be stopped immediately if abnormal condition is found out during embankment filling. The subgrade filling shall be re-started after the retaining works inspection and corresponding measures are conducted.
Following faults excluded from Reliability Certification:
In particular, pay attention to guaranteeing no sharp edges and burrs at the opening of the circular groove of the oil filling hole.
Responsible for maintenance of documentation of daily activities, and make routine reports to leaders.
In 2016, China's economy has maintained a good momentum of stable and positive development, and the economic growth continues to retain in a reasonable range.
When the pipeline direction changes, add one anti-oscillation support;
The principal responsible persons, such as general manager of branches and directorate commander (project manager) act under authrization of the legal representative of the enterprise. They are responsible for the Board Chairman and Deputy General Manager in charge of safety, and take general leadership responsibility for construction production and safety work of the Company and engineering projects.
Its main task is to formulate the management rules, work processes and implementation measures for the operation of passenger vehicles, such as ticket booking and examination, so as to serve the passengers, receive and dispatch trains, ensure the trains operate in accordance with train diagrams, and complete the transportation tasks safely, efficiently and with high quality.
portable flashing light
2. Prepayments with top five closing balance collected as per the borrowers.
<5-4> basalt (N1a): gray and brownish gray, of cryptocrystalline texture.
Power resources in Kenya include hydroelectricity, thermoelectricity, geothermal power generation and wind power generation, among which hydroelectricity accounting for about 70%.
Before using, two components shall be accurately weighed, quickly mixed and placed aside for using. Air heater shall be used to blow hot air to accelerate solidification after the glue is applied on surface.
(1) Skirt drop depth: the Table below shows exit skirt drop depth T[2] calculated as per the curve between erosion depth of different grain sizes of various soil and unit-width discharge which is prepared according to surveys and test materials:
Preliminary acceptance: May 30, 2016
Through investigation, the alarm on lower differential pressure limit was caused by the failure of closing the tunnel hatch timely by the operator after the completion of filling.
Note: 1. As for equipment name or model, eight categories of specific equipment names can be used, such as steam boiler or WNS0.5-1.0-Y and elevator. If there is a lot of equipment, a ledger can be created for each category of equipment;
(1) There should be obvious zoning operation signage for each stage of subgrade construction; the construction area should be divided clearly and the mileage pile should be clear and accurate.
At 17:47, as is displayed on ATS, the earthing shoe of Vehicle 1 of Vehicle T01110# loses.
Inspection quantity: Checking at least once by each work shift.
The Safety and Environmental Protection Department organizes environmental protection trainings for all managerial, technical staff and those in a work team who are new employed or have their post changed, and carries out daily environmental protection education via various meetings, so as to improve the awareness and knowledge about environmental protection of those staff, especially the field technicians. Save the records of educational training with image data as attachments.
Solid aerated block and gypsum board partition column
Employees were not acquainted with position risks and whole-staff safety diagnosis records were not complete
As the weak floor of multistory brick building will be damaged first, we define the structural simulation characteristic parameter as:
Due to the low road grade and poor road conditions in the Upper Laos area, air transport has advantages in long-distance passenger transport (Kunming - Luangprabang and Kunming - Vientiane).
e) 15 days before the identification, Science Information Department organizes relevant members of identification committee to review the submitted necessary product drawings and technical documents for one week.
5.2 The welding seams and the heat-affected zones shall be ground smooth, and the test surface shall be free from grease, scale, welding flux, splashes, oil stain or metal concaves and convexes, so as not to affect the display of real defects during the testing.
The flange of the wheel shall be free of visible cracks, peeling sheets (width >10mm and length >20mm) and local worn area (length >40mm).
Electric hoist, CD110-9D type, lifting weight: 10t, lifting height: 9m, for repair of secondary air fan
(5) Construction process, materials and equipment within the scope of the Contract shall accept all necessary on-site inspections conducted by the Supervision Engineer, and we will try our best to facilitate this.
Make sure the stability of frame before ending work for the scaffold where are not removed. Temporary strengthening measures attached to wall shall be taken lest unexpected accidents occur.
☆ Stacking hoses and extension cables on the passageway lead to tripping hazards (in crowded and heavy traffic areas).
Additional 3 points for the subcontractors which didn't have general safety accidents in recent 3 years, deducting 2 points for each general safety accident.
Forecast of Medium-Deep Groundwater Flow Field in 10 Years (Zhengzhou–Kaifeng Section)
The ticket transporter and encoder shall accept the Ticket with the dimension as specified in Appendix S. The ticket insertion slot shall not accept any card that is thicker than 150% of the standard thickness of a Ticket.
Since Dubai is scorching hot in summer throughout the year, the dryness and heat at high temperatures make people lose their appetite and suffer from insomnia, resulting in dizziness, headache and lack of strength, and even such symptoms as nausea and vomiting. To spend summer safely there, it is necessary to prepare some sunstroke preventives!
Suntuitive is an innovative automatic dimming glass technology. When sunlight directly exposes, it will automatically gradually darken to a corresponding degree as the glass temperature rises.
Example of Tea and Smoking Room Example of Cigarette End Collecting Barrel
PZ-- Additional pressure value on the top of soft substratumPZ=BXLX(Pk-Pcz) / [(B+2Ztgθ)X(L+2ztgθ)]
5.3 After the contract approval is completed, depending on the actual situation (like the contract amount or significance), the Executive Director, General Manager and/or competent business officer shall sign the contract, or the Legal Department shall authorize the responsible person of the corresponding management department (or the user) for signing.
-32℃-760℃ (-25℉-1100℉)
12.2.8.3. Emergency Plan for Explosion Accident
After stretching and drawing, secondary grouting shall be conduced. The grouting pressure should be 0.5~1.0MPa. Grouting is stopped when the mortar outlet concentration is consistent with the mortar inlet concentration.
Section 2.28 Installation of Return Current Lead and Grounding
1) Procedures of manual ballast distribution and regulation
Before using the anchorage for prestressing tendon for the first time, sampling test on static force and processing properties of the assemblies shall be conducted according to requirements of GB/T 14370-2000, and the retraction amount shall be measured.
-- Be responsible for reporting and inspection of mobilized materials and the supervision during use.
Various reserved holes marked in the drawing and embedded parts in the chosen standard drawing, with close cooperation with other types of work , can be constructed after being confirmed free of error.
October 2017-December 2021
\U+00B7 paint mixed paint and planish
Review environmental state, identify and evaluate environmental factors once a year, and always update timely in case of change.
Calculation of electrical loads for the period of construction of the tunnel "Kandak".
Power dispatching and telemechanical system (SCADA)
According to land survey, the cultivated earth and plain filled earth within the project scope shall be cleaned off completely. Qualified filling materials shall be used for backfilling.
a) Identify the processes required for the quality management system and their application in the Company;
It is used for synchronously rotation along with the lever to control the closure and breaking of the corresponding circuit.
Sand-blasting gun, air pump, recovery equipment, spray gun, paint spraying air pump, rubber tube, scraper knife, hand emery wheel, emery cloth, steel wire brush, staple, small-scale compressor, small paint bucket, brush, pickling tank, accessories, etc.
Production and Operation Department - Supply Chain Center - Purchasement Personnel.
Check as per Annex D (JTG F80/1-2004)
Organization from to be adopted in the project is shown in the following chart.
The payment of design subcontractors is mainly in accordance with the node in the design subcontract, but the payment is actually implemented in strict accordance with the contract and company's provisions.
Environmental controlling dispatchers in command center shall be able to communicate, through wire and radio communication systems established by communication discipline, with station watchmen and field fire prevention personnel in normal and emergeny cases.
The blocking between the waterproof casing and the pipeline shall be performed according to the requirements of Waterproof Casing (02S404). Flame-retardant dense material shall be used for filling between ordinary casing and pipeline, cement mortar shall be used to wipe the wipe the opening, and the end face shall be smooth. Waterproof ointment shall also be filled for those penetrating the floor slab.
The construction site must be provided with safety publicity slogans or safety warning signs at the main construction locations, operation places, dangerous area, and main passageway entrance.
The clearance between the back support plate of mask and the large bottom plate of mask is 8±1 mm.Record 4 measured values: ( ).
hj——thickness of the jth layer of soil above the calculation point (m);
Based on the mix proportion design, the asphalt mixture is inspected for necessary usability and its technical indicators for the performance inspection meet relevant technical requirements.
The maintenance of engineering trunks also covers fault maintenance, annual maintenance, intermediate maintenance and overhaul;
Cost Estimate Quota of Hydropower Equipment Installation Projects (2003);
① The lighting design shall be simple and practical, convenient for installation and maintenance and coordinated with the architectural style.
Conduct power frequency withstand voltage test of ground rod: The ground rods of 10KV, 35KV, 63KV, 110KV and 220KV are respectively required to withstand a voltage of 45KV, 95KV, 175KV, 220KV and 440KV for one minute without breakdown.
low-area auto-spraying annular water pipe DN200
1. Track structure; 2. Structural characteristics of curved tracks; 3. Calculation methods of track stress;
October 2000 - December 2002 Dayi Plaza, Shenzhen Surveyor
We will see steam locomotive, diesel locomotive and electric locomotive models with perfect workmanship and different types as well as the models of their key parts.
(3) The actual resistance of the pipe network system is smaller than the resistance estimation in designing the air duct system, so the actual air volume is higher than
The door leaf shall meet the following strength requirements without plastic deformation:
1 Symmetrically assemble the wallboard unit blocks of PC HOUSE one by one, and simultaneously install the lifting lugs for lowering at proper positions.
Fluidized drying technology is adopted to carry out cooling and air separation on the cut stem so as to further improve the cut stem purity and reduce the crushing of expanded cut stem.
Corresponding explosion-proof protective measures shall be taken in accordance with different types of explosive sources and hazards during design of equipment and relevant electric facilities and process systems equipped and provided in the explosive and hazardous area.
If this cannot be realized, close the outlet gate first but do not close it fully until the inlet gate is closed.
Note: unless otherwise specified, the pipes shall go overhead.
This project is planned to provide flyover to cross over Churchill Roosevelt Highway at the original Southern Main Road, meanwhile, to provide grade separation ramps to form traffic switching, and cancel the traffic lights.
The group leader candidate must be approved by the Buyer and member information is reported to the Buyer for record.
In multilayer fill welding, after welding of each layer, the seam surface quality shall be inspected immediately, and any defect, if found, shall be immediately removed before welding of the next layer.
Stainless steel rectangular tube (304L\40\U+00D760\U+00D72)
According to the different performances of HASCO and SPENO grinding vehicles, and combined with the actual situation of lines, the debugging of grinding program is flexible and diversified;
The controller shall be equipped with standard interface for communicating with the host computer.
The temperature differs slightly for the two seasons, and maintains at 31ºC in the day and 23ºC at night.
● Operating system: Windows (software version conforms to ticket selling application software requirements).
(4) The floor of rooms in which there is/are water consuming point(s) shall be set with a slope not less than 1% to the drains.
The left side of such main line allows for 1 receiving-departure track for passenger train and a platform of 450X12X1.25m.
(3) Bridges at K27+960 section (kanchuan)
With additional 10% air volume considered, the air volume is 566500m3/h.
It features open and flat terrain. The stratum consists of Quaternary Upper Pleistocene coarse round gravel soil (6-11-3), which is medium dense, with layer thickness of greater than 10m.
b. General quality accident: the Contractor shall report it to the quality supervision station in written form within three days, and the superior competent departments of the enterprise, the Owner, the Engineer, and quality supervision station of provincial level.
(2) The "Contract Price" refers to the price payable to the Vendor after the Vendor has thoroughly and properly fulfilled the obligations hereunder.
The vertical and horizontal baselines of each segment shall be taken as the benchmark, and the secondary cutting amount shall be reserved at both ends during blanking, and the two ends and the groove shall be subjected to flame cutting after assembling, welding and trimming all parts of the segment.
High wind operation (gust level 6; speed 10.8m/s);
The both parties for interfacing shall determine their respective date of data exchange in construction stage whenever required.
Figure 8Net-shaped Crack of Bridge Deck Figure 9Broken and Fractured Guardrail
GL type supporting positioning device pre-assembly, single suspension mast straight push-off mode
Spare length shall be reserved for cables at both ends of the pier and at the expansion joint to serve as the relaxation.
Rubbles shall be vertically set. Generally, trenches shall be used for setting rubbles or the rubbles shall be embedded into the slope for 15~20 cm. in addition, upper end of the rubbles shall protrude out of the slope surface for 5~ 10 cm so that turf will be flush with top of the framework.
○ Insulators required for electrical safety and for operation purposes such as section insulators or neutral zones;
A grounding resistance telemetry test shall be conducted on the site lightning protection device and other protective grounding devices before construction in rainy season, and records shall be made.
Adopt pile foundation pile or cut-and-cover spread foundation based on the geological and hydrological conditions.
The nominal cover thickness of concrete is equal to the sum of the minimum thickness and the allowable deviation (10mm as specified in European standards) in construction.
Seriously check the drawings, conduct self-examination and review, and prepare the work execution plan.
(6) The works shall be educated to form good health habits, garbages and sundries shall not be thrown at discretion, and the work and living environments shall be kept tidy and clean.
Figure 13.22.4-23 Design Sketch of External Facade
The precipitation varies greatly in different areas with average annual precipitation of 2180mm in southwest and 1000mm in north.
8.8.1.4 Project Area Management Plan
Confirm the demand for audit proposed by departments.
(2) Before delivery from storage, the package shall be checked. If the transportation requirements cannot be met, the package shall be further treated;
Analyze the formation mechanism and promoting strategy of the technical standards of enterprises at home and abroad. Summarize the applicable conditions for different mechanisms. Analyze the requirements for the technical standard by the development of national grid company. In combination of the investigation results of the formation mechanism and promoting strategy of the technical standards of enterprises at home and abroad, establish the technical standard development strategy of the national grid company.
6.10.4.4.3 M5 stainless steel bolts shall be used to connect the primary frame and the auxiliary frame. Gap between the primary frame and the auxiliary frame shall be filled with foaming agent.
2.5m high fence wall is set around Vang Vieng beam fabricating yard, which is about 970m long.
The power spectral density function, Strouhal number St and onset wind velocity of vortex-induced vibration of the lift force coefficient in Solutions 1 and 2 are as follows.
GB/T 4208-2017 Degrees of Protection Provided by Enclosure (IP Code)
Standards and specifications: the design, test, manufacture and installation of the EPDM roofing should conform to the requirements of the applicable national standards and specifications and the relevant requirements of various applicable local Chinese government departments and competent departments.
(5) Minimum curve radius: 5000m or 4400m at difficult sections (4300m at Qom-Esfahan section);
6.1.5.Washer: 5th and 6th Digit Group (5X)
In case of communication failures between the LEU and TCC or invalid data, the LEU shall send default messages to the active transponders.
1. A smoke detector, a fire alarm, a fire broadcast system and a fire spray system shall be installed in every room including the kitchen area.
(3) Due to the distortion of data, lack of time or funds, the information mastered by consultants is limited or even inappropriate.
One integrated maintenance center is set along the whole line, one integrated maintenance workshop is set every 80~120km according to the station yard conditions and one integrated maintenance section is set every station.
The administrative and living areas of the mine are arranged in south of the mine at the upwind of the dominant wind direction in the mine, and in the areas among the industrial sites for mining and concentration and open pit, which is beneficial to the management of the Mine and the life of workers.
28)GB9254-2008 Limit Value and Measurement Method of Radio Disturbance of Information Technology Equipment
2.5 Recommended Vehicle for Batch 2-Passenger Capacity 1
11. Temperature rise test (0465000000.2#)
④ Construction in progress will not be conducted, work sheds and living facilities will not be erected or components, supports, materials and other matters will not be piled under the high voltage and low voltage electric wires.
The under cut method is rarely employed under normal conditions since the method has such disadvantages as higher requirements for geological conditions, higher costs, higher risks and lower efficiency, and the station after construction will have a large burial depth, which is inconvenient for use.
• Seismic design: The Project sections are located in Category 2 and Category 3 seismic zones.
System Drawing of Distribution Box for Ward Lighting of Building 5 5AL-BF
Aluminum alloy materials are fully used for car body structure to reduce car body weight and ensure car body rigidity.
A fixed point is added between the mechanism and the tunnel wall;
The financial institutions shall establish handling systems for discarded data and media.
14.1.3 Management Measures for Civilized Construction
③ First-aid equipment: Stretchers, disinfectants and first aid kits.
The minimum curve radius is 300m. Where deceleration is required when approaching or leaving a station, the curve radius in conformity with the running speed may be adopted.
It has a special locomotive maintenance depot: it is equipped with a complete vehicle disassembly/assembly position and locomotive weighing position; there are wheelset disassembly and assembly flow operation line and traction motor maintenance flow operation line meeting batch production.
3.1.7 Make special method statements for critical areas and main processes that could affect the project quality before construction and use them to guide the site construction and improve the project quality.
Electric welding machine, grinding wheel cutting machine, bench drill, threading machine, etc. shall be placed separately, with operating space reserved between each other.
2. The bay-type bus stops on the left and right sides of the integral subgrade can be set up in a staggered way according to the site conditions.
It is required to draw the wall body axis on wall footing, calibrate steel bar, set up handling frame on the working face. Spacing of the frame shall be width of wall body + 300mm support + template thickness.
The construction project of Longliwen (tai) expressway and Jingning section of the project is awarded the Qianjiang cup prize (quality project) of the Zhejiang construction project of Zhejiang province in 2014.
Iron, steels, nonferrous metals, wood and bamboo products, cement, asphalt, fire work products, floorings and housing materials, hardware products, electrical appliances, chemical light products, fuel and lubricant, tools and equipment, special-purpose materials, accessories and revolving materials
and 2-thick single-component polyurethane waterproof paint is brushed around the floor drain and pipeline, and the waterproofing part on the wall shall be
Generally, the distance between the hanging bracket and the sprinkler shall be no less than 30mm, and the distance between the hanging bracket and the endmost sprinkler shall be no more than 75mm.
The Contractor shall be responsible to lead and coordinate with Hong Kong Seat Pool Server and its supplier, MoR and it system supplier to identify the possible scenarios due to the system interfaces and ATS requirements.
The detection of PT line-break is only put into operation under the condition of normal operation of the line. If any starting element has been started, the detection of voltage line break will not be carried out until the whole protection group is reset and put into operation again.
The periodical inspection items of spherical tanks mainly include macroscopic inspection, wall thickness measurement, surface defects detection, ultrasonic testing and safety accessories inspection, and such items as material analysis, sealing fastener inspection, strength check, pressure test and leakage test can be added as required.
① For special borrowings borrowed for acquiring and constructing or producing assets which conform to capitalization conditions, the capitalization amount shall be determined by the actual interest cost incurred in the current period minus the interest income gained from the unspent borrowings deposited in the bank;
Table 2.1 Economic Comparison for Span from 30m to 60m
j. When the power supply equipment of main and standby circuits are laid on the same bridge or wiring duct, it is necessary to install the baffle between the bridge and wiring duct, and the main and standby loops circuits shall be laid on both sides of the baffle. When the number of current-carrying conductors in the same direction exceeds 30, it is necessary to lay on different bridges or wiring ducts.
If the luggage carried by the patron is detected at the door, the door shall not be closed to ensure the smooth passage of the patron;
"In May this year, poor counties in Yan'an all got rid of poverty. 2.26 million people in the old revolutionary base areas were free from absolute poverty.
9. This Agreement is made in twenty two copies, including two originals for each party; and twenty duplicate copies, with eight duplicate copies for each party, one duplicate copy for supervision organization, one duplicate copy for backup in transaction center, one duplicate copy for backup of quality supervision and one duplicate copy for backup in Wuhan Railway Supervision Bureau.
5. Design rail bottom elevation shall be supplemented in the "culvert cross-section" drawing to check type selection of culvert according to filling height.
Jianjin Jiansu Heat Supply Pipe and Equipment Engineering
Qingdao Jiaozhou Urban Development and Investment Co., Ltd. (seal)
Recent major constructing and proposed PE projects in China are shown in the following table:
(The hard disk capacity provided by the contractor shall meet the requirements of data storage, and necessary measures shall be provided to ensure data security.)
This certificate is hereby issued with the following supervision inspection steel seal on the product nameplate:
Finally, the housing part is fixed on the drive board component through screws, which is integrated into a closed box body.
(1)In case of one of the following circumstances, Party A shall charge the liquidated damages of RMB 200~1,000 from Party B according to the severity of the situation and instruct Party B to make rectifications within a precribed time limit.
Responsible Person: ____________________
The culvert engineering of this section is constructed by two construction teams. Each team equips with 50 people, 1 excavator, 1 truck crane and three tamping machines.
The design life of the main car structure is 30 years;
Excavation and outward transportation of wastes in the replacement part will be measured in the excavation and outward transportation of earthwork and not be included in the replacement quotation.
Relevant activities refer to activities that have a major impact on the return of the invested parties, and it is judged according to the specific circumstances, usually including sales and purchase of goods or services, management of financial assets, purchase and disposal of assets, research and development activities and financing activities.
Where, Eihp is the horizontal seismic force applied to the bearing top (kN);
Basic operation sequence is still from the east to the west and from the south to the north.
Various air inlets shall be installed at the decoration stage along with suspended ceiling.
1. Storage places for inflammable and explosive materials, combustible (inflammable) substances (such as wood), chemicals (such as waterproof materials) and other articles;
Access No.2 and 6, air pavilion No.2, shaft for underground excavation
Wires, wire color, signboards, indicators, buttons, wire ducts, and paint shall meet the existing relevant standards in the industry.
For easy maintenance, traction inverter is set with one maintenance access interface, this interface will be visited via PTU and complete following functions:
1. Purchase nursery stocks in strict accordance with the specifications required in the Nursery Stock List.
Before impoundment, keep a cover of thermal and wet insulation material on face slab of face rock-fill dam for flowing water curing. Protection material should cling to protected side;
One phase at the power supply side of the cable is connected to the ground, and the megameter or multimeter at the other side is used to conduct phase-by-phase conduction test on the ground to see whether the phase is the phase at the power supply side which is grounded, so as to determine whether the phases of the terminals on both sides of the cable are consistent.
4) Bolts shall be used to fix the raceway, bridge frame and bracket, and the dimensions shall be carefully checked at the corners.
(Source: Rwandan National Bureau of Statistics, World Bank)
④ A group of mixture samples shall be taken every morning and afternoon for each mixer to carry out the Marshall test and extraction screening test, for verifying the asphalt-aggregate ratio, the mineral aggregate gradation and the physic-mechanical properties of asphalt concrete.
Tolerances not indicated shall be executed as per ISO 2768-mK;
There are no detailed rules provided in this code for determining the geometric dimensions of the slope drainage facilities. They can be designed and calculated in reference to the relevant regulations of the current national standard Code for Design of Outdoor Wastewater Engineering (GB 50014).
7. November 2014-February 2016 Director of the 6 Billion Yuan Engineering Construction Project Department of Longwangmiao Gas Reservoir of PetroChina Southwest Oil and Gasfield Company (SWOG).
6/F, No.128 Xixi Road, Xihu District, Hangzhou City, Zhejiang Province
In consideration of the causes of frost heaving and operation conditions of the existing railway and based on the principle of "suiting the treatment to the disease and being economically and technologically reasonable", a rapid, convenient, safe, and easy-to-control treatment technology applicable to working in the "window" time of the operational railway was developed.
Expressway greening works can play a good role in stabilizing roadbed, preserving soil and water and beautifying the environment. The design should fully consider the characteristics of the expressway. Combine with the local climatic characteristics and engineering protection measures to restore the original greening, which is damaged by excavation of the mountain, and effectively prevent soil erosion;
Air Quality Monitoring Station Project of Hainan Ruibo and Qionghai Chemical Industry Park- Site5
With reference to the technical specification of the European train control system (ETCS), the technical specification of the Chinese train control system (CTCS) is formulated to develop CTCS and equip all railways with CTCS in China.
Affected by the profile steel, the concrete will not expand into concentric circle yet will flow along the profile steel, finally overflowing the profile steel after reaching the edge of casting mold.
6-3-2 Silty clay (Q3al1): The bottom elevation is 282.39m and the thickness is about 2.4m.
Construction costs shall be added for special parts such as basement (dark room), equipment and large diameter pipeline
Djibouti has a stable policitcal situation, smooth social and economic developments, simple and sincere folk custom and good public security.
The culvert pipe will mainly be used for drainage starting at 8m upriver from the original steel structure temporary bridge to about 25m downriver from the proposed medium three-span bridge;
Organisation and chairing of the 3 alternative selection workshops: 24-25 July 08, 16-17 October 08, 5-6 January 09.
6. Regularly inspect and overhaul machines and equipment to ensure their good condition.
7.9.7 Dirt tank shall be set with 20%, 80% and 100% liquid level sensors and blowout prevention device.
5.1 Management Commitment…………………………………………………………………………14
The axis-counting indoor device is mainly installed in the host machine cabinet, and the layout diagram of the intermediate station axis counting host machine is shown in Figure 2.1-1.
Power distribution box is not equipped with leakage switch or failure of leakage switch
(2) Releasing order of Management Manual of Hualu Engineering and Technology Co., Ltd.
During the selection of test pieces, a variety of selection schemes should be adopted for comprehensive selection.
⑤ Compression stress relaxation (23°CX7d) ≤14%;
7. Equipment for unloading, storage and discharge of locomotive fuel oil (diesel locomotive);
12. Commitment of the Contractor: the Contractor covenants to organize and complete the construction work as agreed under the Contract in accordance with laws, and, in order to ensure the construction quality and safety, warrants that it will not make assignment or illegal sub-contracting, and will bear maintenance responsibility within the defects liability period and warranty period.
Verify the opening pressure of overflow valve (B7.L1);
Before concrete spraying, the rock surface shall be cleaned with high pressure water or high pressure blast, so as to ensure cleanness of the to-be-sprayed surface.
Check whether the cylinder heater works normally and add snow chains and snow tires for light vehicles.
Capacitors shall be fixed firmly, installed vertically, and their nameplates shall face the corridor side.
(1) Table 2 - Special Emission Limits for Atmospheric Pollutants in Emission Standard of Air Pollutants for Boiler (GB13271-2014);
LOGSB shall, according to the actual quantity for maintenance, issue an invoice for maintenance of one locomotive at the price agreed in this contract for settlement after such maintenance for one subject matter is completed.
For some people, although they had lowered their requirements for salary, no company wanted to hire them. For Yongzeng Luo, a number of companies stretched out olive branch with double salary.
4) A suspended ceiling with a clear height of not less than 3000mm to the finish level of the anti-static floor and colors that coordinate with the wall surface shall be provided at the top of the OCC dispatching hall, signaling ATC equipment room, signaling planned train diagram room and signaling ATS training demo room.
The special railway line is a dedicated railway for transporting the chrome ores, located along the original forest, where no people live. It is very cold in winter. In order to reduce the number of employees, improve the quality of production and life and save operating costs, it is suggested that the block type plus the automatic interstation block plus CTC.
Preformed equidistant clamp TDJH-185/25
(3) In the aggregate exploiting, the exploiting shall be carried out in strict accordance with the regulations; after the soil is borrowed, the clearing and leveling work shall be completed, and the drainage channels be dredged.
Main tunnel excavation of the Class-V surrounding rocks, tunnel length within 1000m: dump truck transportation
If it is difficult to vibrate by mechanical means, use manual tamping to assist.
Road Vehicle - Vehicle Identification Number (VIN) (GB 16735-2004)
3) Formwork: For pile cap construction, composite steel formwork with Φ48 steel pipe back braces will be used. It will be fixed by Φ16 split bolts and externally supported by battens.
Handling Methods for Extra-difference Results of the Tender's Score:
A response should be made in not more than 0.15 s after receiving the system self-check and system resetting information issued by the central system of the railway administration (transfer the working status of the system to the central system of the railway administration, conduct system resetting and transmit the resetting status to the central system of the railway administration).
Please refer to the HR department of your unit for specific responsibilities.
Supplementary contract on third-party testing of tunnels of New Lindai-Zhijin (Xindian) Railway
(2). Upon occurrence of an object strike accident, the Project Manager Zhu Hong shall be responsible for overall command on the site, and inform the on-site HSE Safety Department in time. Then, the safety officer shall call the emergency number "115" in time or report to relevant superior departments, and at the same time, the safety officer shall immediately inform the Project Execution Manager to organize the emergency response team to provide on-site rescue.
In the open space at the east side of the depot, mixed traction and step-down substation and wastewater treatment station are arranged.
2.2.5 Selection and Metering of Distribution Equipment
Operate the interior emergency unlocking device when the train speed is not zero, the door will refuse to open.
In 2014, operating cost reached RMB 4,302,392,600, with increase by RMB 1,205,020,200 and growth by 38.90% than RMB 3,097,372,400 in the last year; the proportion of operating cost in operating revenue was 75%, with rise by 5.03% than 69.97% in the last year.
Establish a complete accident report and emergency management procedure to ensure timely handling of accidents and prevent the expansion of losses.
It is not allowed to perform blasting operation in 3 hours after final setting of shotcrete.
Punching, slag discharging, grouting and drilling work should be done before the pipe is put down;
2) The design service life of buildings is 50 years.
Requirements for the Work of The HSE Management Personnel of Contractors:
Table 4.44-7 Statistical Results of Maximum Sound Pressure Levels of Noise Outside of Cars in starting acceleration Unit: dB(A)
Provision of dynamic characteristic curve of all regulating valve and characteristic curve of actuator
Advanced pre-grouting reinforcement is adopted in the design to prevent the collapse of surrounding rock caused by excavation and retain most of the water gushing out of grouting circle. The rock mass is reinforced to improve its bearing capacity so that the excavation and support work can be reduced.
Equipment installation in place, cable laying and cable head manufacturing, installation and wiring of the equipment, secondary cable laying and wiring of the equipment.
b. Before the commencement of the subcontracting project, the Planning and Cost Department of the Project Management Department shall take the lead in organizing relevant departments and personnel to confirm and verify the construction (service) conditions of the subcontractors according to the subcontract, service agreement and relevant requirements (i.e. performance inspection before commencement).
Document No.:HBSK/R-24-09
According to the site mapping, there are no karst ditches and grooves, karst springs, underground rivers, karst cones, karst depressions and isolated peaks on the surface of the survey area. It is not developed for the surface karst morphology.
The maximum Tresca stress of vertical lifting reaches 124MPa, the maximum Tresca stress of turning 90 degrees is 99MPa and both of which does not exceed the sum of material maximum allowable stress. The design meets the requirements of the load conditions.
3.2017-2018.05, Safety Officer of T1B Mechanical System General Contracting Works and MV/LV Electrical System General Contracting Works of Semiconductor Manufacturing International (Tianjin) Corporation.
Table 2-1-1 Main Economic Indicators of Egypt in 2014-2018
The Vendor shall commit to meet with the interface specification requirements related to vehicle; the Vendor must unconditionally obey the coordination of the Buyer, so as to ensure the smooth implementation of the interface, and no extra cost shall be added thus.
Functional joint commissioning on key network management of the communication telephone subsystem
Take minutes of QHSE meetings held by company leaders and organize the printing and releasing of relevant data of QHSE Department;
③ Open the door panel of the plug-in box, use a M10 wrench to loosen the pivot screw on the front and rear lock pins of the plug-in box, and open the lock pins outward;
Note: If 1667 sleepers are used for each kilometer, a, b and c shall be 600mm.
The cabinet body shall be derusted and shall be adjusted in case of deformation. Patching or replacement with the steel plates of the original specification shall be carried out when the thickness of damaged or corroded part is greater than 30% of the original thickness.
Its leaves are high-quality feed stuff, and the fiber of its stem is the raw material of ko-hemp cloth and papermaking, and the flower can dispel the toxic effects of alcohol, and the powder of its root is edible.
Electromagnetic Compatibility-Product Family Standard for Lifts, Escalators and Moving Walks-Emission (GB/T 24807-2009)
2)The total running time from Y3 station down to I3 station is 1337.24s (with 11 stations and the average station time is 133.72s), and the average running speed is 53.55km/h (excluding turn-back time interval).
JB911 Electric Clearance and Creepage Distance of Low-voltage Apparatus for General Industrial Use
To sum up, the forecast of population of each station in the attraction areas in the study years is detailed in Table 3-3-12. The average annual population growth rate in Kathmandu and Pokhara regions is calculated as 2% and that in other regions is calculated as 1%.
1. The steel bars in the drawing are in millimeters, elevation is in meters and others are all in centimeters.
The access control system is independently provided with the central computer system and the station-level computer system. Each station-level computer system is connected with the central computer system by using the logically independent communication channel provided by the integrated monitoring system. The central computer conducts unified authorization and management over the access control system of the whole line, and then the access control system is interconnected with the integrated monitoring system.
25CrMo4 features high hardenability, no temper brittleness, quite good weldability, small tendency to form cold crack and good machinability and cold strain plasticity.
Review of discipline office shall be in the charge of the Office Director or Principal Engineer and relevant Discipline Director of project group shall be invited.
The supervision company is a company with good faith, high quality, precisian, righteous, experienced, strong technical force support, various control methods, and pays attention to the actual effect of supervision and the quality of supervision service.
Submission time: submit to Chongqing International Investment and Consultation (Group) Co., Ltd. before 12:00, March 21, 2012
The energy types for urban life and production mainly are electricity, diesel oil, heavy oil, LPG, etc.
Do not adjust LT0015, LT0014 and LT0046 for calibration.
② During accident analysis, the investigation team shall carefully sort out and read the investigation materials and analyze the seven items, namely injured parts, nature of injury, objects causing the accident, objects causing injury, way of injury, unsafe status and unsafe acts, so as to determine the direct and indirect causes as well as the responsible persons.
Shenzhen Pengsheng Certified Public Accountants (general partnership)
Returning the vehicle current to the rail through the wheelset
Meanwhile, a street lamp controller is installed on each street lamp for facilitating the control of a single lamp.
The fault diagnosis function of the vehicle is completed by the central control unit (CCU) in a centralized manner.
There is no temporary office area, living area or processing area at site.
(1) Basic vocational course (in total 2 courses and 112 hours)
3. 8-thick 1: 3 cement mortar priming, roughening
2.5.5.3.1.1 Process Flow Chart
Otherwise, trial operation must be conducted again until it succeeds.
The dividing joints shall be set at the connection part of support end, flexure, and protection layer of the roof boarding with extruded roof structure, and shall be alighted to slab joints.
(2) After the lubricating and isolating layer is made appropriately, erection of formwork, reinforcement binding and concrete pouring can be implemented.
ZELC—Z.GLGZ01—02 Management Regulation of External Technical Documents
The components and equipment of low floor items will not have fault or damage in case of emergency braking.
H type axle end baffle plate shall be installed at both axle ends to prevent the wheelset from falling down during hoisting and to ensure safety.
Sealing treatment at water outlet: firstly, lay an joint additional layer, extend the waterproofing membrane with the same length as the water outlet into the outlet, and reserve the waterproofing membrane with a width of 80mm around the outlet, and then cover the water outlet with the roofing membrane, so that the joint position of the waterproofing membrane is set on the edge of the hole and the hole is tightly sealed without warping.
8. Pipeline materials shall be chosen in accordance with the unified regulations of Design Institute. The corresponding grades of material number (B1A1, L1A0, BIA0PTFE, etc.) in pipeline section shall be selected for installation in accordance with the corresponding pipeline materials in material list. The construction should be performed after the check with marks in construction drawings and corresponding pipeline grades;
(2) Accommodate external personnel and do external coordination;
Dimension of upper chamfer of the second span in Qom direction (LXWXH)
Upon completion, greening and reclamation measures shall be taken.
Figure 12Maximum Braking Output Condition of Temperature Rise Test
For 1435mm standard track gauge, the distance is 1500mm;
The design pressure when there is no safety relief device installed should be adopted, and examination should be made if the pressure is beyond 0.1 MPa (g).
Figure: Schematic Diagram of Arranged Locations of Tunnel Emergency Exits
(3) Parent company and its holding companies (direct or indirect holding is more than 30%;
Ten Provisions on Quality and Safety Responsibility for Construction Project Managers (Trial) (Jianzhi [2014] No. 123)
Attachment: 1. Work Ticket for Maintenance of Substations
It can be known that the minimum value of the rated insulating voltage of AC 25kV is 27.5kV by checking Appendix D of the table.
KCIC's instructions, orders or approvals for CDJO shall be issued within a reasonable period as far as possible.
Review Comments of China on Notification USA/1392/A3
Set-up principles of public security buildings, tunnel protection buildings, military transport buildings and civil air defense works
For details of transformer settings and power supply scope in the Project, please refer to the load calculation sheet of power supply discipline and the figure of power supply system.
6) During the installation and handling of sanitary appliances, it shall be protected against bumping. After the installation, the water outlets of sanitary appliances shall be covered with protective items; the chrome-plated parts should be wrapped in paper to avoid clogging or damage.
6.4.4.1 Actively cooperate with the Company's system building and standardize its work as per TS16949 requirements;
11.1.3.3.4 All departments shall properly sort out the collected data to facilitate analysis.
In order to speed up the response speed and reduce the decision-making levels, in combination with the construction capacity and experience, in line with the principle of reasonable structure, simplicity and high efficiency, linear organization form is adopted for the project implementation process.
When placing concrete, not control elevation carefully, the upper opening of formwork is too low.
Former Management Procedure for Intrinsic Safety Inspection of Design (C-QS030208C-2017) is abolished at the same time.
Vacations of relevant regulations of China and Laos such as Lao statutory holidays, day offs, home leave, marriage and funeral leave, maternity leave, etc., as well as the work-related injury leave without pay shall not be included in the annual leave.
Connection and cooperation between all electromechanical installationdisciplines
Cleanliness of the main engine oil system after washing meets the standards required in the contract. Regulation and security system operates flexibly and smoothly;
2. Only the number and detailed drawing on one side of the centerline is shown. Please use it with the list of material of the other side.
(2).the road setting-out shall be strictly conducted in accordance with the coordinate, and the same time shall exercise strict control over elevation during the construction.
For shunting within the station, after the shunting button is pressed by the driver, NBP will generate a constant speed (45 km/h) curve with or without track circuit information from ATP onboard equipment. Once the train speed exceeds this restriction speed, ATP will automatically output brake signals.
The molasses are added into the dilution tank in the fermentation workshop first, at the same time, the process water is added to the dilution tank quantitatively, and then the molasses is diluted to 60°BX, and the molasses dilution is implemented continuously.
(6) Technical Code for Electrical Design of Buildings;
TB/T2538-1995 Test Methods for Safety Protection Device of Diesel Locomotive
8) Through compression test on cohesive soil, the compression coefficient, modulus and curve shall be provided.
2. Apply a layer of plain cement as the bonding course. The reinforced concrete slabs are water-proofing themselves. Refer to the structural construction drawing for thickness.
Start the lubricating system: press in turn the Gear Oil Cooling Pump Start and Gear Oil Lubricating Pump Start button, and then press Lubricating Grease Pump Start button to start EP2 lubricating grease system to lubricate and seal the main drive.
Internal combustion (double locomotive traction, coupled with 25 carriages)
Positioning and setting-out → manual channel cleaning to design elevation → channel inspection → construction of graded macadam base course → construction of reinforced concrete base course → sand bed paving → pipe installation → construction of inspection shaft → curing → hydrostatic test → acceptance → backfilling → construction of next section
The site shall be guarded to prevent personnel from entering and exiting until the arrival of other personnel of the emergency organization.
ATP system shall continuously monitor the speed of the train. When the train runs faster than its maximum safe speed or has other potentially unsafe conditions, ATP will perform emergency braking and on-board ATP equipment will provide the drivers and maintenance personnel with display, alarm and other information.
7)See Technical Requirements for Interface of Integrated Supervision & Control System for details of the yard and depot supervision and control function of security system (AF).
A steel name plate will be set in the entrance of the construction site, indicating the project name, Party A, Party B, designer, supervision unit, main subcontractors, responsible, enterprise logo, etc. The writing form, pattern and dimension of the name plate and the location shall be submitted to the Supervisor for approval.
The access of the monitoring system shall not change the original control function of the monitoring equipment and the self-control function of the monitored equipment shall prevail.
Clean grease and check the U-shaped groove installation face of the motor support plate (on the drive end).
(3) The raised pavement marker reflector is yellow and white in the left and right side of driving direction respectively;
Monitor the comparison of these advancement data to the target value and change the axis of the jack mode to control TBM.
Filter screens are easy to clean and install. Filter media have to be changed after they are cleaned 3 to 5 times.
1. Small observation hole cover (ZD13C-050-000)
Figure 5-1-4 Nephogram for displacement in longitudinal tension load conditions under servicing case
The connection between cross bar and rotation axis shall be flexible without stuck phenomenon.
Halogen-free, low-smoke and flame-retardant flexible wire, WDZ-RYYP, 4-core, 2.5mm2
The decoration boards or ceilings at equipment, pipes, valves, cables and vent duct required to inspection, adjustment and maintenance shall be of a detachable structure.
(4) For artificial afforestation areas which have not yet become a forest, mowing, fertilization and soil scarification will be performed.
5.3.3 The knowledge files require the implementation of classified filing management and other requirements are specifically implemented in accordance with the relevant provisions of the Written Information Control Procedure.
(8) No vertical curves shall be placed within calculated length of station platform and turnout area. The distance between vertical curve and the end of turnout shall comply with the provisions of the following table.
The operator, operation management modes and transportation organization methods of the existing railways (this Project).
Cold-rolled ribbed bar: Class CRB550 ( ), f = f\U+2019=360N/mm
(6) Standards, Specifications and Relevant Technical Documents
If the pre-stressed reinforcement is tensioned under the minus temperature, such temperature should not be lower than -15℃.
Increase the frequency of deformation observations and submit result in a timely manner, until the deformation is stable;
Warehouse for welding materials is mainly used for storing welding materials such as welding rods, welding wires and soldering flux, and will be equipped with temperature and humidity adjustment equipment.
E-mail: info@duowei.net.cn
(4) The locomotive signal test and train-borne section is provided at Boten and Vang Vieng locomotive turnaround depot respectively, with a fixed number of staff of 30 persons.
(1) The width of the construction access road shall not be less than 4m, the turning radius of the curve shall not be less than 18m, and it shall be connected smoothly with the highway.
Upon the approval of the Chief Design Engineer, it will distributed according to the regulations on the management of project documents and the provisions on the preparation of project progress reports.
Components: 0.75CaO•0.25Na2O•Al2O3•2SiO2•4.5H2O
15.5 Record of Safety Education for Team Members(SUFA-EHSQP-125-005)
Cast-in-situ construction on supports is the most traditional construction method. Formworks are usually installed on full supports, and movable formwork bases can be used instead of supports.
5x10t4/a distilled gasoline upgrading unit
In 2011, the company declared to reinforce management on safety and quality in "enterprise management year", and announced the idea of "no accident, no substandard product, and no risk", which all staff was required to commit to, read out in public and supervise one another by. Meanwhile, the company signed safety and quality responsibility contracts with each unit, initiated regional and boundary management in the workshop of TBM base to clarify safety responsibility area, arranged "pre-working safety oath" and "lecture on safety", made Typical Examples of Common Quality Problems of Equipment Manufacturing and Staff Safety Manual, and successively established 12 sets of regulations including Quality Management Responsibility System, Method of Pledged Capital for Safety Risk. The company continuously strengthened safety and quality education of the staff and focused on safety and quality management as daily routine.
ensure all the deliverables promised have been delivered correctly;
Certificate of Origin and Certificate of Quality for Complete Machines and Important Components
QB/EJX.QM—100 Quality Manual (Edition B/0)
The wind pressure of filter pressure regulating valve is 450 ~ 550kPa.
5.8.3 The equipment administrator shall organize the user organization, operation personnel and other relevant personnel to accept the equipment which have been subject to overhaul or item repair, and the equipment administrator shall fill in the Equipment Precision Record List, Equipment Operating Record List and Equipment Repair Acceptance Certificate, and the equipment shall be put into use again only after passing the acceptance.
Chen Xin, Yang Xincheng, Gao Xinjun, Li Yueming, Zhou Ruiwen, Wu Mingsheng, Yuan Bimao, Sha Lanke
Installation of window machine (dual-screen display and intercom facility, chairs and tables)
2. In any case, the Seller's maximum liability for any loss to the Buyer caused by the quality of the goods, whether direct or indirect, shall be limited to the contract price of the goods.
Major modification - by analyzing the scope and effect degree of the modification, the workload, cost and quality for modification implementation, in case of 1 < modification effect level value ≤ 3, the modification is a common modification.
A total of 9 items in three sub-units have been verified, and their safety and main using functions meet the specification requirements
Figure 6.3-1 Equipment Diagram of the Crossings Signaling Control System
The wheeltrack horizontal force is also calibrated on-site by using the horizontal force calibration frame.
According to the construction plan, main work of Nairobi National Park Super Major Bridge will be commenced on October 1, 2017 and fully completed on August 20, 2018. Its total construction period is 10.5 months.
It tests the return loss, insertion loss, near-end cross-talk, far-end cross-talk and other network performance indexes from the window ticketing information point, automatic ticketing information point, automatic ticket checking information point, fare-adjustment-at-destination information point, passenger service integrated control room information point to the corresponding information machine room and equipment.
Subgrade bed formation and the graded crushed stones and sand gravel in the transitional section
It is caused by water access to the high temperature reactor, since the pipe was not completely dried and inspected before startup, and the equipment overpressure actuated the safety valve.
13.6 For equipment, such as fans, water pumps, compressed refrigerating units, AC units, air energy recovery devices, which generates vibration during operation, shock-absorbing foundations shall be set and restrainers shall be provided around the foundation to fix it.
Table of Bridges of Laos Vientiane Capital to Vangvieng District Expressway(alternative line A)
20 hours data recording per camera=0.45GX1X20 (h) =9G
The principle of economic current density will be used to select LV cross-section of cable for power supply from distribution room to each building, in order to reduce line loss.
Specify the type of outlets, physical locations in the TMRs and interface requirements. The outlets at TMRs shall be underneath individual Ticket Machine.
(1) An assurance system for site quality and security has been established, and the head of the construction site and process has been identified.
Bases and metal components which must be cast, forged and machined by the manufacturer.
b. When leveling with concrete slurry, a layer of concrete interface treatment agent shall be applied, and then leveled according to the design thickness.
The cast-in-place concrete or the precast member assemblied with skeleton for slope protection shall be embedded in and closely attached to the slope surface. The embedded depth shall comply with the design requirements, and the water flow surface of the skeleton shall be smooth-going, and shall be smoothly connected with the slope surface.
According to different underground burial conditions, the underground water can be divided into three types: perched water, phreatic water and confined water.
A special tool used for testing the performance of fire alarm detectors, which is widely used for fire protection inspection, acceptance of fire protection works, and routine maintenance of fire-fighting equipment.
≥930kg/m3 (basic resin)
⑤-2 Silty soil (Q/4el+dl/): auburnish redb, slightly dense, saturated, formed by weathered residues of conglomerates and sandstones, with core easily melted with water.
When the knob switch turns to "100%", all illuminating lights of the passenger compartment will be on;
The realization of anti-explosion safety requires not only the input of resources and funds, but also the supports of good technologies and hardware.
Free of cracks, air leakage and interference; the anti-loose mark is free of misplacement.
Non-conformance detected in internal and external audit and management review.
(2) The idea of "hinged design" is shortening the lining segment as far as possible, to make the fault and the ling segment within a certain range on both sides relatively independent, and the rigid lining segments are connected with flexible joints.
(2)During the warranty period, if the failure of the system equipment arises from the following raw material quality problems, the tenderer shall replace all the parts and components with the same functions by satisfactory parts and components at the tenderer's expense.
Strategic suppliers refer to those who provide key materials and have strategic significance on the production, operation and development of PGG CSST. In principle, strategic suppliers must be directly-supplying manufacturers.
The main body of TE29 Station, which is divided into 30 sections, is constructed from two working faces (the east and west ends) to the middle by one construction team of main structure, with an average progress of 2 bay structures/month.
According to the feedback from the owners, the 24h cooling water tenants accounted for 1/3 of the number of tenants in the initial opening stage.
4) The key points of replacement construction include the following aspects:
Fig. 1.2.3.-69 Elevation of Step-down Substation
The pumping speed shall be slow at first, and then shall be gradually increased.
4.During commissioning, the Seller shall submit a report to the Buyer on a weekly basis. The report shall contain the contents of commissioning, project progress, accidents, existing unfavorable factors, possible delays and suggestions for remedial measures, etc. For emergency situations, the Seller must notify the Buyer at any time.
The anticorrosion paint of steel component surface after derusting shall be confirmed as per the corrosion medium.
Contract No.: Z2003SLFJ-TS09
Monitor and manage the network topology, network fault, network performance, network traffic, network event of users;
The tunnel entry~D1K256+790, inclined shaft pass through stratum that made of sandstones, mudstones, shale, mudstones mixed with coal seam (streak) in Triassic. No exploitation is viewed on the site. The maximum burial depth of the tunnel is about 300m. Gas and other hazardous gases might be encountered when the tunnel passes through the stratum during construction.
During construction, increase investment in technology, provide advanced construction machinery, form a strong, hardworking and strict team, and put in the promised personnel and equipment in the bidding contract to ensure the smooth progress of the Project on schedule.
Manual reset or automatic reset by DCU after retardation. Isolate it after once of reset.
2. All the unqualified ones shall be summarized to FN at Sheet 1 to determine the results.
(6) Timing function: accept the timing command of the primary station, and always keep synchronous with the primary station.
A. Visual inspection of mixture: rough mix ratio, asphalt-aggregate ratio and color, whether there is detachment or caking. Timely feedback the inspection results for making adjustment.
With local power supply conditions taken into account, UPS load capacity is calculated as power consumption for all signal equipment except for switching machine. The supply duration at each station shall not be less than 2h.
According to the needs on the site, safety protection facilities (such as temporary security fence, warning tape, warning sign and the like) shall be timely provided.
In order to improve the efficiency of emergency response, it is necessary to achieve centralized and unified command at different levels as much as possible. Through centralized and unified command, the various resources needed to coordinate emergency response can be quickly controlled, or obtained or utilized, which is helpful for leaders to obtain all decision information, and for the formation of a procedure-based, standardized participation mechanism.
For inventory checking, when the coin or banknote in the recycling bin is almost full, TVM will suspend inventory checking and remind the operator.
JUD: I have obtained strong judgment, through several years' management experience, improvement of professional competence and accumulation of experience and technology.
In installation of embedded pieces and embedded sleeves for work, what fixing method and measure will you use to fix them so that they will not displace?
Any executive director who is unable to be present may assign a representative with a written proxy to attend the meeting with voting power.
2. Horizontal space of upright tube is 1.0m;
The use unit must formulate and implement fire prevention systems and safety measures for the use of hazardous chemicals, and technical, management, operation and warehouse management personnel must fully know the dangerous characteristics, storage methods and fire prevention measures of the hazardous chemicals used by the unit, and will handle it in case of emergencies.
The manufacturer shall be responsible for any leakage by returning or exchanging. In the case of pressure testing in winter, the water in the equipment must be completely drained to prevent the equipment from freezing.
One for each type of pressure relief valve installed
Therefore, the air pollutants emitted during the operation period of the Project have little effect on the ambient air quality.
High formwork supporting system is accepted by the Company before utilization;
Generatation of forms such as issuance, initialization, value pre-assignment, cancellation of ticket cards and outbound delivery orders;
From the date of acceptance, the flower maintenance period is six months and the lawn maintenance period is one year. If the maintenance period is out of the contract scope, please continue to organize construction contractor to carry out maintenance work.
It is because the lateral force from the wheels to the stock rail is completely borne by the bolts of filler and the bolts are under large tensile force, resulting in fatigue crack after a long period of cyclic loading.
10. June 20, 2012, Reply of Ministry of Railways on the Curve Superelevation Setting Standard of the New Changsha-Kunming Passenger Dedicated Railway (TJH [2012] Doc. # 801);
The prefabricated structure incorporated features reliable quality and no leakage. During the whole construction process, the precision and structural deformation completely meet design requirements.
The amount of feed is designed with stepless speed regulation, with the digital displayed valued to be the amount of feed per workpiece revolution.
3)The scope of signal display and fault alarm includes, but is not limited to, the requirements in the following table, which will be further determined during the design liaison stage.
When temporary warehouse (storage room) is set up, the approval from the General Manager Department and local relevant departments will be required.
The current directions of ebb and egre are basically controlled by topography, mainly being S by E and N by W respectively.
Braking is not released (if the relevant SKS fails, the signal will be bypassed)
The necessary rest, communication, food, heating, transportation and medical support shall be provided for the rescue personnel according to the site conditions.
Implement the purchase contracts involved in the tendering for materials and equipment, and endorse the payment of purchase costs of materials and equipment.
(4)During the operation, attention should be paid to keep safety and be away from any injury of hand or foot;
The calculation is made from the conditions for diluting the exhaust gases to the maximum permissible concentrations.
(4) Double cross-bar guard railing will be set up for foundation pit protection, and the warning mark will be set up. The firm and unobstructed passage will be set up for the operation personnel, and the width is not less than 80cm.
Where it is unable to avoid noise disturbance, it is necessary to inform the surrounding residents in the form of notices.
6.3.4 Take charge of procurement, overseas transportation and delivery in batches of engineering project equipment, bulk materials, and equipment spare parts (excluding procurement, expediting and quality inspection of electrical automation equipment):
The control system of the main line turnout area ensures correct interlocking relationships for signals in the turnout area.
Adopt silencer to reduce the noise for mechanical equipment which noise exceeds standard.
The assessment result shows that the employee does not meet the intended job requirement and therefore is not competent for the job;
2.12 The procurement manager shall organize the procurement and the hazard identification and risk assessment of procurement service providers and suppliers.
3.7.6 When a conductor bends, its knuckle radius shall be more than 3 times of its diameter. When a bridle bends, it shall also meet the above requirement and be provided with smooth transition.
The communication and signal dedicated box substation is set next to the communication base station and signal relay station machine room, and other box substations are independently set.
3) Each of the second, third and fourth power receiving impulsing time is 5 minutes, and the interval should be 5 minutes. Then simulate the switching off for transformer overtemperature, pressure release and heavy gas protection actions.
During the construction, it is prohibited to move or to remove the safety facilities, signs and warning sign boards on site without the approval of the construction principal on site.
Design and material selection of the interior decoration materials shall be as per Code for Fire Prevention in Design of Interior Decoration of Buildings. Refer to the list of interior decoration methods for details of the combustibility requirements of various materials. At the same time, corresponding requirements of Code for Fire Prevention in Design of Interior Decoration of Buildings and Design Standard for Fire Protection of Temporary Buildings and Structures of Expo 2010 shall be satisfied.
9. The transmission mode based on wireless communication technology is adopted between the train and ground, and when the train operation speed is 0 to 90km/h, the main control indicators include but not limited to:
The borrowing costs incurred during such interruption shall be recognized as expenses, and shall be included in current profits and losses, till the acquisition and construction or production of the assets restarts.
Investment Estimation Preparation Depth Table 21.3-6
Owing to the regional particularity, European railways often run through many regions or even many countries.
China Railway No.8 Engineering Group Co., Ltd.: RMB (in words) eighty-four million twenty-eight thousand three hundred and ninety-two yuan (RMB 84,028,392).
3. The wing wall foundation shall be designed as the foundation with no freezing damage and the foundation thickness should be 1.25m.
3. Mengxi-Huazhong Railway Co., Ltd. shall organize the design institutes and construction contractors to complete the work for guaranteeing the preliminary operation in accordance with the relevant regulations of CHINA RAILWAY.
Before construction, the Supervising Enginner should organize the design hand over and clarification between the designing Contractor and site supervisors.
(3) Schedule for equipment and material manufacturing;
The A1 Line is 2.964km long and T Line is 2.9km long, both of which are almost in the same length.
Vacuum cleaner, rather than air compressor, shall be used for vehicle, equipment or material cleaning.
The register of staff of the institution and their qualification certificates must be filed on site and in the Project Department.
An Output Circuit Self-Correcting Analog Quantity (set)
Each pump is equipped with independent intake trench, and one 1400x1400 electric sluice gate is set in front of each intake trench.
11.3 The electrical graphical symbols in plans and block diagrams shall be in accordance with 4229(2015)S-01D-02 and those in system diagrams and schematic diagrams shall be in accordance with GB 4728.7-84. Special graphical symbols are indicated in relevant design drawings.
Combined with the specific engineering content and quantity of construction units, the configuration shall be carried out according to the Technical Regulations for Configuration of Construction Machinery for Railway Subgrade Engineering (Q/CR9224-2015).
3. Quota application: Circular on Issuing the Evaluation Form for Valuation Based on Change from Business Tax to Value-Added Tax of Electric Power Projects (DE 2016 [46]).
(Baiyinkulun Station electric power engineering) Completion Acceptance Report
Equipment Management Department, which was mainly responsible for the management of special equipment, was not assigned with the management having the qualification of special equipment management personnel (original management personnel was transferred away) and the requirements in the Safety Law on Special Equipment was not complied with.
The Knorr brake system is adopted in the pneumatic brake device, mainly including control valve, angle cock, auxiliary reservoir, automatic empty and load brake equipment, brake hose, brake cylinder and automatic brake slack adjuster.
 It shall support the static configuration of network management to establish Ethernet services.
The wiring method is shown in the rear view of the lightning-proof cable distribution cabinet.
Budget Estimate Clearing for Second Line of Xi 'an-Ankang Railway
Road No. 13, with width of 9m, earth road shoulders of width of 1.5m, and total width of 12m.
In terms of the pre-feasibility stage, feasibility stage and planning stage of the Project, the earlier the stage is, the more important the discipline is.
In consideration of the above conditions restriction, it is admirable that mainstay of the previous project team settle the pending problems.
Self-inspect and apply for acceptance after treatment (contractor)
◆ The shelf life is one year. After the expiry date, the product shall pass the test before use.
6.6.1The toilet door should be made of fireproof and scratch-resistant materials, and red - white indicator light should be installed above the door to show whether the toilet is available.
5.2.1 The system is mainly composed of CCTV of stations, yards and depots, main substations and control centers, equipment, materials and software for monitoring of train-borne CCTV in control centers, central police room of Luoyang Urban Rail Transit and public security sub-bureaus.
2. Where lifting work is carried out prior to blanking by using a steel palte, relavante data (like dimensions and locations) of the support, cushion stone, and steel plate of original cushion shall be carefully chackedfor accurate blanking.
Changes of the responsible person (changes of legal representative, responsible person, chief representative, self-employed individual, investor and partnership performer, etc.;)
Figure 6.1-3Running Stability of Cars in Crosswind under AW3 loading condition
3. The finished surface of the toilet floor is 0.015 lower than that of the same floor.
6.3 Annual Training Plan (to be kept by Human Resource Department for 5 years)
Mixed passenger and freight railway for double-deck container transport: electric traction SJX-QD
8.1 The workers shall be dressed neatly (wearing standard work clothes with uniform marks), and shall wear labor protection clothes and hats (labor protection clothes, safety helmets, etc.) when accessing to the site.
(15) Notice on Issuing the 13th Five-Year Plan for Prevention and Control of Volatile Organic Compounds Pollution (HDQ [2017] No.121)
The Seller shall propose a design liaison plan in the Bid documents based on the requirements for cable manufacturing and installation, including the time, place, content, number of people, cost, etc., to be confirmed by the Buyer.
(2) Establish and improve leveled examination stimulation mechanism through establishing performance evaluation and salary incentive system with work objectives and performance as the guide.
Catenary side test refers to the condition that measuring devices such as HV transformer, primary current transformer and return current transformer are configured in the main circuit to provide catenary side voltage and current signals to the train control system and traction control unit.
7. Participating in the preparation and organization of bid documents (processing and construction);
The contract amount of the Wuhan West Fourth Ring Road Project is ¥5,300,000,000, of which the contract amount of the Han River Super Major Bridge is ******.
Transition section and adjacent subgrade shall be filled and compacted in layers synchronously.
Seen from the above table, in the long term, when 7 vehicles are used, 33 pairs of trains are operated at peak hours, and the operation interval is 1.81 min, with little capacity surplus.
Construction process: leveling cement, mortar and coarse powder → installing main and branch pipes of plumbing, heating, etc. → pouring concrete into the reserved holes on the board → snapping lines on the wall → confirming standards → calibrating door and window frames → paving ceramic tiles → joint pointing.
Selection of construction machinery: during construction in rainy seasons, due to slippery roads, crawler machines with large adhesion, good passing ability and strong traction ability shall be selected to use as far as possible, with few or no tire type machines to be used.
When receiving the samples, the test personnel shall count the samples, attachments and technical data, check if the samples are intact, and confirm whether the conditions of the samples are consistent with the contents filled in the test commission form; for the samples delivered with package, it is also necessary to check whether the seal is complete and valid and whether there is any damage during transportation.
All lamps adopt three-wire lines and are equipped with PE guard wire.
Schedule plan of each level under the general project schedule are called sub-schedule plans.
P9. Excavating sand and pumping ground water are not allowed within 500m of the bridge site along the river channel.
Unreinforced diagonal rebar shear force=0.050\U+00B7ftd\U+00B7b\U+00B7h0\U+00B7 coefficient of web structure=0.05*1.52MPa*180cm*143cm*1=1956.2kN
Distributor must be arranged at the connection part between branch air duct and main air duct.
Wiring for the indoor cabinets of the main line is designed as the cable routing mode under the overhead floor, and the cable entry of the cabinet should be of the lower wiring mode.
Under the same slump condition, the early strength (compressive strength and rupture strength) of concrete mixed with the expanding agent shall not be lower than the concrete mixed with the same kind of cement without the expanding agent.
For this figure, reference has been made to [EN 50129]§A5.1 and §A5.2.
The Company has added the general requirements of Party construction work to Articles of Association, and implemented the Party organization's legal status in the governance structure of the company.
1.3.4. Production, Domestic and Construction Drainage Systems
2nd Engineering Co., Ltd. of China Railway Electrification Engineering Group Co., Ltd.
8. Planned Buildings in the Seismic Region/ Construction Specification and Standards 22-01-01/;
It usually results from an unsuitable distribution of brightness and huge difference in brightness, or is due to an extreme contrast in space or time.
Deep and narrow groove backing welding, and tack welding, welding reworking and other sporadic welding
Height, DBH, biomass, canopy density, coverage, survival rate, and preservation rate
Setting out shall be performed before the installation of base to mark out the installation position of such base. Wood pads shall be provided under such base. The arrangement of such pads shall be level and firm, without suspension and gaps.
Measures shall be taken to achieve the occupational health and safety and environmental objectives of the company.
The average journey of these trains is about 800 km, and the average journey time (including loading and unloading) is about 40 hours.
The earthwork construction machinery should be assembled completely within 5 days after accepting the bid-winning document and be overhauled, approaching within 7 days, and other machinery approaches within 15 days. And the pavement construction machinery should be overhauled completely within 15 days and should approach.
The Bid Inviter's personnel shall, under the guidance of the Bidder's personnel, jointly fulfill installation with the Bidder's personnel and commissioning shall be fulfilled by the Bidder's personnel.
It is mainly applied in fields including monitoring at boundaries of the plants, source identification, measuring of background concentration, spatial and temporal identification of pollution sources and monitoring on emergency incidents.
For every elastic rod, the toe load is 10KN, with the tail of the rod acting on the arc bottom of the iron seat. The toe load produced herein is equal to the pressure ;
Cookware and tableware must be cleaned in time and disinfected regularly.
Before the strength of the poured concrete reaches 12 N/mm, it is not allowed to walk or erect formwork or support on the concrete.
While connecting the pavement with other asphalt pavements, the connection part shall be planned to ensure the thickness of the newly paved asphalt layer.
(1) In the whole process of construction, management shall be carried out in strict accordance with the approved construction organization design, and supervision and acceptance by the supervisor shall be accepted.
The land use range of special sections shall be rationally determined in accordance with the needs of subgrade stabilization and protection works.
Once the hole is drilled, the impact equipment will be automatically shut down and reverse drilling will be automatically enabled (optional).
2. Foundation bearing stratum is the Ⅰ3 layer of breccia silty clay and the characteristic value of the bearing capacity of foundation is 230 kPa.
(1) Letter of Confirmation regarding Layout of Piers and Station Foundations by Ministry of Planning and Transport (ALRT, October, 10, 2016);
The same high voltage isolator is used on HXD1 and HXD3 locomotives and Sifang EMUs. It has been installed on more than 6,000 cars and locomotives accumulatively. It meets the requirements for running in extremely code weather and hails.
(5) Power factor compensation: The concentrated automatic compensation device for power factor is installed on low-voltage side. The capacitor bank is of automatically circulated switching mode, to require compensated power factor not less than 0.95.
The contents in the foundation construction stage mainly include: the construction of foundations of the mixed-use building, production building, warehouse, utility building, chemical store, guard houses A and B, rubbish area, and photovoltaic power generation shed, etc.
Strengthen material storage management to prevent expired, invalid and damaged stock materials; implement the strict warehousing system, and ensure that unqualified materials will never enter the construction site;
Approve packing, transport and warehousing proposals provided by Party B.
The power supply for on-board auxiliary system is realized by the traction system and auxiliary system, as shown in the figure below.
According to requirement on lateral speed of passing railroad turnout and comfort degree, curved beam with different curve radius could be used. Transition curve could also be set in accordance with requirement on comfort degree.
K = 2.15, conversion factor of L
As we all know, value-added tax and business tax are the two most important taxes in the tax structure of our country and the main sources of tax revenue in our country.
Lan Bo (Material Department)Tel: 0784310336
5.3.14 The concrete construction shall be inspected according to Articles 6.4.2~6.4.4 of Standard for Acceptance of Concrete Works in Railway (TB 10424).
The Tenderer shall provide the Tenderee with details on paint color which shall be determined during award of contract.
The Contractor must store all structural elements or components so that they can be mobilized to the wharf at any time and allow the above loading operations without unnecessary movement or interference with construction or manufacturing activities.
(1)The setting value of long-time delay action current of the breaker is less than or equal to the allowable wire current-carrying capacity.
Drain pipes are not allowed to be connected with sewage pipes or other drain pipes and shall be arranged separately.
The realization of the monitoring function does not affect the normal work of the monitored equipment;
• Horizontal pipe section of a junction between vertical air duct and each layer of horizontal air duct;
7.3 Where abnormal expenses incurred during the month of shipment due to the delayed feedback cannot be confirmed in the month of billing, Party A is obliged to confirm them within 3 workdays after receiving the notice from Party B and Party A shall pay the agent freights to party B in full within 3 working days after Party B officially issues the invoice.
For the Project, there are many transfer pumps located in tank farm, where variable-frequency technology and automatic control system are to be adopted for most of the pumps.
⑥ Platforms and passageways must be installed with guardrails, with a height of not be less than 1m. There shall be no obstacle between all the passageways and the scaffolds. The working surface of scaffolds shall be fully paved with scaffold boards, which shall be firmly bound. The length of probe plates shall not be greater than 300mm;
Can the calibration records of tightening tools be provided?
Party A shall fully take over the vehicle and site management work on the date of termination of this memorandum or other date agreed by both parties;
7. Refer to the Structural Drawing of Wharf Decks and Curbs for structural drawings of guardrail foundation.
Half-year Inspection, the Following System Equipment Overhauling and Daily Maintenance on Shift
All measurement results are drawn and printed by computers.
(1) Upgrading China's Manufacturing Industry to the Medium or High Level and Developing New Drivers for Industrial Development
1) When the general height (H) of the slope is not more than 4m, alternate arrangement of drainage trenches and shrub-grass is adopted for slope protection.
Drive air through the surface of outdoor heat exchanger to realize quick heat dissipation of outdoor heat exchanger.
Anchor sealing reinforcement shall considered together with the section reinforcement of girder body. The net thickness of protective layer is 45mm. The original anchor plate screw holes are filled with 4 screws with hooks by screwing to connect the reinforcing mesh with the anchor bearing plate.
4. During the construction, additional load must not be increased near the construction area of the diaphragm wall; the construction machinery and materials shall be stored far away from the construction area. When the construction machinery operates near the construction area of underground diaphragm wall, the speed and vibration shall be reduced to avoid hole wall collapse of diaphragm wall due to overload.
ED brake torque output of inverter (1=1Nm)
Quality control of filling and compaction: the filling of embankment shall inspect and control the compaction quality as specified inspection frequency and compaction standard of specifications.
Check the preparations for the enabling of feeding for the OCS cold-running test carried out by the contractor.
It is prohibited to work with faulted electric saw and electric planer. Saw blades with cracks must be changed.
This suspension method has the advantages of relatively independent stiffness in each positioning direction of the axle box, accurate positioning and long service life of the spring, and it can guarantee good dynamic performance of the vehicle.
This section is an urban sub-arterial road. The average design illuminance of motor way shall be 20Ix and that of sidewalk shall be 10Ix. The uniformity of illuminance shall be not less than 0.4. It shall meet the requirement for evaluation indexes such as glare restriction and guidance.
After the count has been performed, counting personnel shall confirm the results of inventory count.
2. The foundation is designed according to Detailed Survey on Geotechnical Engineering (Detailed Survey) of Phonhong Service Area of the Vientiane Capital - Vangvieng Section of the Vientiane Capital - Boten Expressway.
Thepile foundation or spread foundation should be selected for thesubstructure according to the following principles: open-cut spread foundation should be applied in sections with exposed bed rock or shallow overburden while the pile foundation should be applied in sections where the bed rock buried deeply (more than 5m), or land undulates greatly and slope is steep.
5)The Seller shall provide 2 sets of detailed operation manuals to the Buyer for review, including the operation of all the equipment supplied.
3.7 The Human Resources Department is responsible for handling the procedures for employees' entry, confirmation, internal transfer, resignation and retirement,.
Take overall responsibility and management for construction safety and housekeeping on site.
Therefore, it is necessary to construct the project to save energy and improve living environment.
The test routes shall cover all the basic routes related to train operation.
The line includes 5 stations in total, including 2 junction stations (including EL Manashy Station), 1 new passing station and 2 reserved passing stations.
Roof 1.5mm-thick polymer waterproof coating (one layer of fabric and two courses of coating)
The center line of pump shaft shall be used as a reference for centering, while the inlet and outlet flange faces as a reference for leveling, so as to make the installation meet the technical requirements.
Each car is equipped with a fire alarm controller, which can specifically display the alarm and fault states of each probe in the car.
In case, it is found that the Indian agent is representing more than one Tenderer then all the offers represented by this Indian agent will be rejected.
The paint must be filtered to remove impurities, and should not be applied until all bubbles in the paint disappear.
EPS strip modelling strip 300*400
-LED light source wavelength: 615 nm for red, 500 nm for green
Salary of office management personnel, financial personnel, labors and network personnel
D.Connect the mechanism and mounting rack with prepared screws (4, 5 and 6).
Specific standards and requirements of basic office conditions shall be determined by mutual consultation.
and is recognized by ABS, BV, CCS, DNV, GL, KR, LR, NK, RINA, IRS, RS classification societies.
Spoil produced by bridge foundation excavation is generally stacked on stations and subgrades and are protected by retaining walls. In addition, slopes are set for greening.
This is used for roofing, so it is called common fine stone concrete roofing.
Check that the motor-operated bypass valve of the open cooling water pump of #1 unit is power-on.
2. During the welding, it's not allowed to scald the shield core wire, the sheath and the wire lead.
Give scores to the contractors of CSG infrastructure projects awarded with prizes on aspects including safety, quality, progress, cost and technical performances.
Taking into account the weight of the train towed by the locomotive, two 500l main air reservoirs (A11 and A15) are arranged in series connection for the storage of compressed air.
As of 2015, the capacity of PE in the whole world was 101,010kt/a, while the output was 87,910kt and the average startup rate of plants was 87.0%.
(6) Check whether isolation switch can be operated reliably;
[Fn] key: Auxiliary function key, required to be used together with F1, F2, F3, F4 or F5.
- Fatal injury to the public and construction workers
10.10.4. The performance of coupling shall meet the requirements for train return running speed of 100 km/h.
The terrain is obviously undulating, with low hilly features, and the ground slope is greater than 10°.
each 2 CCPCTicketing Counters (B1 Level)stotal 28 counters at day-1,38 counters at day-2, each 1 CCPC
Design Representation Methods for Construction Drawing of Building Structure Reinforcement(SG111-1~2)
(Official Seal) Mao Hongxing (Signature)
Mean time to repair: not exceeding 30min;
The company adhered to monthly comprehensive or special HSE examination to find problems and rectify potential hazards.
The product capacity of cereal crops and economic crops is low due to the insufficient input.
The allowable deviation of coarsely adjusted track skeleton shall be 5mm for centerline and 0,-5mm for elevation.
The laitance and grease contamination on the top of the beam should be cleaned before pouring the cast-in-place layer concrete of the bridge deck so as to ensure the good bonding of the new and old concrete. Attention shall be paid to embedded parts such as embedded draining pipe.
Invention of Tunnel Arch Scaffolding Installation Car.jpg
Dismantle the facilities which obstruct the lifting operations around the lifting area.
1) Implementing segmental enclosure construction, and segmental closure and segmental channelization for the whole contract section to minimize the effect of construction on the traffic.
Check whether lines are tied neatly and tightly and check that spare length is available for guide lines to be tied properly;
4. In case of more traffic volume, the system expansion and equipment replacement are required.
Carry out commissioning for the channel with combination of the telecontrol system. The operation shall be in a good condition. The combined commissioning of substation automation system and telecontrol system shall meet the design requirements. The inspection of control function of substation integrated automation system meets design requirements.
h)Monitoring and surveillance content of equipment status includes the status of the power supplies (including external power supply and uninterrupted power supply) and the working status and fault information of the equipment such as seismometer, data acquisition device, earthquake warning relay and the mainframe of monitoring unit.
Minutes prepared shall be confirmed by all parties with seals affixed before being implemented.
The platform shall be built on a solid ground and connection must be secure and stable.
General lighting shall be controlled by remote control from the central monitoring panel.
The Contractor shall replace the bentonite slurry section by section respectively according to the grouting pressure until the whole section is replaced.
Car 7 Traction system PSLVD control power supply low voltage
Operators of the Subcontractor engaged in the works with fire risks such as electric welding and gas welding and operators of automatic firefighting system must work with permits and strictly follow thefire safety operation rules.
B.4.2.1 The performance categorizing system for asphalt cementing material on road is adopted in the US to evaluate asphalt performances; therefore, SHRPPG categorizing system is adopted as the index of new asphalt grade.
Organization work of trial operation: Director, operator and supervisor of trial operation shall be identified.
Where the Seller fails to supply goods and services in accordance with the time specified in the Contract, except the situation in Clause 29 in the Contract, the Buyer shall deduct liquidated damages for delay from the contract price at the premise that other remedial measures under the Contract are not affected.
Standardize the procurement and outsourcing of materials, prevent the risk of incorruptibility, control costs, improve the quality of purchased products, and ensure that the real objects meet the requirements.
Installation of rubber and plastic insulating pipe, PEF insulating pipe, Pipe ≤ Φ57, Thickness 50mm
2. This set of drawings consists of 19 pictures. Its drawing No. is HEN417-A-SG-05-10~19.
Strictly implement the management of cutting off power before going off duty (keeping the lights only) to prevent fire hazards.
Former Procedure for Management Review (C-SD010101C-2017) is abolished at the same time.
Designing institute is responsible for networking and re-surveying; we are responsible for re-surveying, use and maintenance.
The design track laying in the stage is generally conducted along the railway corridor planned in the early stage of the city. Demolition of the buildings and structures is mostly within the suburban area behind IDU Depot and it is generally demolition of residence.
Take charge of identification and verification of personnel and materials entering and leaving the key points.
In the option of perpendicular crossing at 1km downstream of Ban Na Han, the bypass distance is long and there are two consecutive high bridges in the D5K140+000~D5K142+500 section, leading to great work quantities; therefore, this option was abandoned after study and then a comprehensive comparison was made among the other three options, as shown in Fig. 3-2-11.
(4) Form of contract price: fixed comprehensive unit price.
For the personnel who are responsible for the supervision and inspection, the staff of the company has the right to supervise their work. If there is any slack work or favoritism, the staff of the company may report to the leaders of the Quality and Safety Department.
It is a reinforced concrete slab culvert, with clear width of 1.0m, water outlet clearance of 1.1m, water outlet clearance of 1.4m, angle of 90°, length of 8.0m; the left side portal is wing wall type and the right side portal is shoulder wall type.
6.18.1.5 Take charge of routine maintenance and repair of water and electricity supply equipment and facilities of the Company;
1. The transport, storage and use of blasting materials must comply with provisions related to explosive management in Tajikistan.
(7) The Product is prevented from contacting with any chemicals and protected against impact, scratch and vibration.
At the beginning of paying-off, the operation shall be slow; adjust the paying-off tension and wait for the full ascension of traction rope and OPGW, and then the speed can be accelerated gradually.
Ex-work price N1400/t, 125 km haul distance
Among them, 1 is district station (Takoradi) and the rest are all intermediate stations or passing stations.
The drainage slope aspect is correct; the water drip is flat and straight; the depth and widthof the neatly arranged larmier are not less than 10mm.
6.9.3 Archives Data Room and the Computer Room of Information Center are the Company's key positions of fire protection. Thus, fire prevention inspection shall be carried out at regular intervals and fire prevention measures shall be implemented to earnestly implement safety fire prevention work.
Figure 2.7.3 Engineering Geology Section in West Anchor Block Area
The gneiss is unevenly weathered, with local soft and hard interbeds. In the process of tunnel excavation, attention shall be paid to avoid the local instability caused by this. The monitoring of slope deformation shall be properly carried out and protection shall be carried out in time to avoid the landslide.
Many fire hazards incurred due to throwing about the cigarette end with a spark frequently appear in newspaper, and the most typical case is the Great Khingan fire hazard happened in May 1987.
In the public buildings, it is appropriate to arrange cleaning opening at the sewage horizontal pipeline connecting over 4 closet pans.
6.1.1 This Method (interim) is hereby formulated to standardize survey of China-Laos Railway Project, to define responsibilities of all parties and to ensure smooth implementation of construction.
1.1.2.6 AFC Training and Simulation System
The natural life of the equipment, that is, the whole time that the equipment goes through from the beginning of operation to the end when it cannot continue to be used or is scrapped due to severe material wear.
Generally, equipment for duty and operation readiness is not used in training; those who leaving the team for external training must be approved by the brigade leader, and who leaving Haikou for external training must be approved by the head of department.
In addition, the products of CBPM-KEXIN have attracted attention from the mainstream equipment manufacturers of the overseas banknote printing industry. The company has cooperation with KBA, Voith and Muller.
No certification required for water containers in vehicles of fire protection level 1.
11/20/2011 - 11/18/2013
5) Participate in investigation and handling of safety accidents and equipment accidents, work out corresponding measures, and urge and supervise their implementation.
Note: The applicant may adjust the form as appropriate, but may not reduce the information and contents.
The test for streamline design of the passenger station: to enable passenger transport personnel directly drive variation of hardware streamline light strip via friendly human-machine operation interface and realize real-time and effective organization of streamline via management system of passenger service equipment (such as guiding sign);
All accidents shall be investigated and analyzed based on following requirements:
Requirements in relevant standards of the former Ministry of Railways and China Railway Corporation shall be followed.
The islands shall be deemed as operating platforms. Drilling rigs shall be put in place after site leveling and setting out. And then bored piles and pier shafts can be constructed.
The computer interlocking system consists of interlocking particular console, interlocking computer, monitoring controller, and electricity system maintenance computer.
8) Pavement works must not be constructed when the temperature is lower than 5°C; when the temperature is higher than 5°C and the wind force is less than Scale 6, measures shall be taken to increase the mixing and paving temperature.
4.3.2 When two staff are treading, they shall cooperate, which means one pulls while the other delivers.
Hardware change inspection (CPU/ memory/disk/motherboard change inspections are supported)
Move the operation rod 1 of the operating mechanism to the closing direction, and install the pull rod 2 between the A-phase connector 3 and the mechanism operation rod 1.
The Contractor and Designated Contractors shall jointly develop respective test plans for the Integrated Tests, which shall be included in the Detailed Interface Test Plans and Interface Test Specifications as stipulated in Clause G23.9.2.
Use traction substation at Caojiahuo Yard of Bao-Xi Line to supply power for the Railway Line
Self-maintenance and outsourcing maintenance are mainly used for the component maintenance.
Planned Completion Date:April 8, 2017 .
The stator bonded with magnetic steel is placed on a V-shaped block. The test is performed in accordance with the test requirements of GB/T2423.55, i.e. 6 points and 2J and the test results meet relevant technical requirements in 7.30.
Supervisory Seal for National Uniform Invoice Sichuan Province Manufactured and Supervised by State Administration of Taxation (Seal)
Conduct "roughening" of the concrete surface for cleaning, plumbing, screeding of the base layer of the wall. Then use 1:3 cement mortar to plaster the scratch coat and level the surface with trowel.
B. Pressure test should be performed according to the program approved by the Owner, the Employer and supervision department.
Put it in the pressure vessel and exert the maximum pressure, the air valve of bladder should be air-proof completely.
Layout Plan of Roof Beam and Layout of Lower Purline on Landing Platform Roof
It is formerly known as Adolfhafen.
The distance between the datum point and the settlement observation point shall be not too long to ensure the measurement precision.
(8) Water filling test shall be carried out on all installed indoor rainwater pipes, and water filling height must reach the upper rainwater head of each stand pipe.
Architectural effect drawings must accurately reflect design intent and environmental conditions.
a) under the premise that the quality management system is established according to Quality Management System-Requirements (GB/T19001: 2016);
Observation and maintenance on rectified defect found during bridge appearance inspection shall be strengthened to ensure good operation.
All employees shall attend the initial speech lasting for about 45 minutes; after that, all employees are required to attend follow-up lectures lasting about half an hour each month as deemed necessary by the Environment Control Officer (ECO) during the contract period.
EN 61078: Reliability of System Equipment and Components-Technical Guide for Block Diagram
C. PRP is established to prevent and/or reduce pollutants in products, product processing and working environment (including food safety hazards);
During removing the steel formwork, the tie rod and support shall be removed first and then the side and bottom formwork.
Rehabilitation of Kyrgyzstan Toktogul Hydropower Station
1. Description:﻿ electrical piping_x000D_
There are 21 items in total subjected to the spot check, and all the 21 items are conforming and 0 item is nonconforming.
Steel structure works: 1144.71t; Reinforcement quantity: 1752t:
The main construction content of the project is the road and outdoor pipe network engineering of the new campus of Qinghai Normal University.
CRH380A cab employs the arrangement of single driver system. Two cabs, which have the same structure and functions, are provided at the two ends of EMU. The train operation is controlled by the cab at activated end.
Total staffing of the whole line and staffing per kilometer of main track
Use visual drive software to invoke VP configuration files and render scenarios.
RT: wallboard T ≥ 15mm; lower four layers: 122 pieces;
ZT-01 General Layout Plan (Multi-purpose Wharf)
4. Test results of labs at construction site and mobile labs shall be sent to the Supervisor for approval timely in accordance with relevant regulations.
MVB: It has the MVB EMD interface communication. MVB conforms to IEC61375-1, with the maximum transmission rate of 1 Mbps;
1.1.9 Specifications for Construction Quality Acceptance of Building Decoration Works (GB50210-2001);
If the Contractor shall fail to remove any excessive Plant, goods, materials as required pursuant Sub-Clause 33.1 within such reasonable time after completion of the works as may be allowed by the Engineer, then the Project Executing Agency may:
4. According to the requirements, the table of doors and windows in the construction drawing shall indicate the air tightness of the outer windows and other parameters.
Check if the production of components and vehicles is carried out in accordance with the drawings;
5. N8-1 is arranged in the range of N6-1 and N6-2 with a longitudinal spacing of 100cm; N8-2 is arranged in the range of N4 and N11 with a longitudinal spacing of 100cm.
Within the design range, the retaining wall is 1.5m~7.0m high, the wall top is 0.5m wide, the wall bottom is 2.245m~7.49m wide, the wall back gradient is 1:0.05, and the wall surface gradient is upright.
According to the previous chapters, the predicted traffic flow according to Highway Capacity Manual (the U.S.) and functional positioning of the project, the number of lanes in each section of the project is drawn up, thus the width of subgrade cross section is determined.
The configuration of "one set of electric equipment equipped with one knife switch, one leakage protector and one switch box" is not employed for the distribution box.
Numbers 1, 2 and 3 are used for distinction and controlling purposes only.
IEEE1613 (substation), EN50121-4 (rail transit)
Content in label box on the surface of motor field operation box AC0473EL03
According to the project contract and relevant documents, take charge of analyzing the timeliness, advancement, scientificity and feasibility of the corresponding standards as well as taking the lead in formulating the comprehensive standardization requirements; being responsible for and assisting in completing formulation of relevant design specifications and product standards; preparing the standardization review reports and the standard review of documents and drawings.
(5) Obvious traffic signs, safety signboards and alarm lights shall be provided on construction roads, mixing plant, tunnel portals, construction sites and junctions of provincial highways. The warning signs shall be placed at 500 meters of up and down lines of openings.
According to the features of the project such as much co-working of multiple types of work and high requirement for technology, and the requirements for the construction period by the owner and the contractors, and in order to take good advantages of our company in professional construction and group operations, it is proposed to roughly divide the project into five phases.
Yes (Home officepayment as per ratio ) No
7. Decision on Further Acceleration for Control of Soil and Water Loss and Eco-city Construction;
Figure 4-73 Interaction for Primary Support N-M of Shallow Buried Tunnel
(3) Calculation of auxiliary circuit load and battery capacity;
All kinds of permission procedures need to be handled, and it takes a long time.
Each guide surface, sliding surface, taper whole, lead screw is without pulling or bumps.
Refer to table 11.3.7-3 of Design Specification for Highway Alignment (JTG D20-2006).
After dust removing process, the dirts are uniformly collected and slightly stored, to eliminate the concentrated dust falling phenomenon in the dust remover, and then subject to the dirt processing system, which consists of 2 spin vibration sieves.
9. Speed limit signs are set at starting and end points of the Project.
Project Chief Engineer and Deputy Project Manager: Assist the Project Manager in construction management in terms of construction production and technical support respectively to ensure smooth construction.
Radiated, Radio-frequency, Electromagnetic Field Immunity (horizontal direction, 1.4GHz-2.1GHz)
HV: the power supply and distribution system, the power distribution system, the lighting distribution system and the lightning protection and grounding protection system
The track maintenance engineering acceptance team of Wuhan-Huangshi Intercity Railway and Wuhan-Huanggang Intercity Railway is comprised of Wuhan Railway Bureau, Hubei Intercity Railway Company. as well as Supervision Company, Consulting Company, Designer and Construction Constractor.
1) OUTDOOR REFRIGERANT PIPES SHALL BE INSTALLED WITH SPECIAL PVC GROOVES OR PIPE GROOVES FOR PROTECTION AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO SUN PROTECTION, WATERPROOF AND ANTI-TRAMPLING MEASURES.
To test whether the electromagnetic compatibility for radio-frequency disturbance of the EMU to the outside meets requirements of the evaluation standards.
It is provided with the function of holding braking. In case of startup on ramp, the holding braking is released after the starting tractive force overcomes the downward slipping force of the train, to prevent the train sliding back at startup.
Effectively solve the problems of ballast track such as poor stability, heavy maintenance and repair workload, and flying ballast on HSRs.
Ground 1: cement mortar ground (in the design of ordinary ground, no consideration is given to the traveling heavy-duty vehicles. If necessary, the parties will negotiate for a separate design).
Roof: aluminum, galvanized and aluminum-plated steel, micro-concrete roofing tiles and other approved materials.
Prestressed concrete continuous girders and continuous rigid frames constructed by swing method
② The acceptance for processing size and model of reinforcement shall subject to design drawings.
The unauthorized personnel must not stay in the hazardous area of the wet spraying trolley.
At 6: 40 on October 27, a returned China-Europe block train from Novosibirsk, Russia arrived at Haicang Station in Xiamen with 45 containers.
76~98dB(A); instantaneous sound level of sudden blasting up to 130dB(A)
(1) For soft soil layer: the pile foundation goes through the soft soil layer and enters the lower supporting layer.
Temperature and pressure of the circulating water at the inlet / outlet of the steam condenser; Temperature and pressure of the circulating water at the outlet of the steam condenser;
The average ground horizontal illuminance for evacuation lighting: ≥5lx for horizontal evacuation passages, ≥3lx for walkways, and ≥10.0lx for staircases, and the continuous power supply time of the battery in emergency state shall not be less than 30 min.
In the event that a single material meets the fire prevention performance requirements, the components and installation methods shall be checked to make sure whether they are in line with the vehicle installation drawings.
2.The protection light is clearly visible at a distance of 200m from the end of the vehicle.
10. The Contract (including contract document materials such as contract annexes) has two originals, and each party shall take one with the equal legal effect. The Contract has 10 copies, and each party shall take 5 copies.
During operation, ONNUT Domestic Waste Incineration Plant will have personnel quota of 80 persons according to handling capacity of ONNUT Domestic Waste Incineration Power Plant of Bangkok, with technical personnel of more than 90% total employees, and educational background of above junior college for production employees.
When there is any power outage for vehicles, the emergency lighting in passenger compartment must be turned on immediately.
The number of lanes for the main toll station is changed from the current "3+5" to "4+4" and 2 toll islands are reserved at the entrance and exit respectively, namely "6+6".
The accurate position of fix point shall be found out and hole shall be drilled at the position of fix point with electric drill or percussion drill and the diameter of hole shall be just large enough for embedding of tube expanding part of metal expansion bolt in the wall and the hole shall be straight instead of being askew.
Installation of Equipment Cabinet of TCC Primary Master Clock (Including GPS Receiver and Control Equipment, etc.)
(1) For the working at height, a solid and reliable footing shall be provided. Safety net, baluster and other safety facilities shall be provided in accordance with requirements to prevent the falling of workers, tools or objects, materials.
Do a good job in status identification of special process, key processes and subdivisional and divisional works;
Specify reasonable welding sequence and welding direction.
In the case of access to extremely sensitive computer system, special person must be arranged for accompanying the third-party visitors operating the system;
Unevenness on outer surface of welds or weld ripples on inner wall (if approachable) and outer wall of repaired welds can be removed using any appropriate method, so that surface irregularity does not shield or confuse any discontinuous images on the film.
h) Responsible for the maintenance and maintenance of equipment and facilities, the operation control of environmental factors and occupational health and safety risks as well as emergency preparedness response within the production and operation sites under the jurisdiction;
It has been mined for many years, with abundant reserves. The production capacity is 150,000t per month, and various specifications of crushed stone and machined sand can be provided.
1 Glass shall be selected in accordance with the Technical Specification for Application of Architectural Glass(JGJ113-2015), and the Management Regulation on Building Safety Glass (FGYX [2003] No. 2116) and relevant provisions set by local competent departments;
The preset reverse arch of pedestal shall be determined by the chief engineer according to the construction drawings and the actual conditions of the production site.
Type of rolling stock: AC-DC driving DMU
Technical Support and Maintenance Project for National Passenger Ticketing and Reservation System Test Engineer
Layout of unwheeling and rerailing points, the operation method of equipment and the interface to the vehicle;
5.3.2.3 See the Drawing Album 11G101-1 for details of the length of reinforcement connection section.
Unit: pairs/day New Railway Carrying Capacity Demand of Design Year
5.3.4.2 Issuance and implementation after modification:
The capacity of power distribution shall be designed based on the maximum long-term load, with certain allowance reserved.
After the Seller's personnel arrive at the work site, the on-site representatives of both parties shall negotiate and determine the general work plan and monthly work plan, and carry out the work according to the work plan agreed by both parties.
Training and examination will be carried out in the respects of major processes and work types, and only the qualified personnel can take their posts with certificates. New employees or the staff changing his job should be treated with pre-job training as required.
By the end of 2017, There will be 5 round-trips operated each day.
η—— charge efficiency of battery: 0.90;
Construction of the manhole shall not bring any influence for the pipes.
Waveform anti-collision fence set on the right side of No. 5 and 8 piers and the left side of No. 9 pier is 20m long.
Investigate road conditions in construction sections before work, repair some accesses as necessary and set clear directional signs at key junctions, to ensure that roads are smooth.
N:3791567.50 E:482857.18 GK41+600.00 center
5.3 Prefabrication of gearbox baseplate shall be concentrated in the workshop of machine repair workshop and cut with oxygen propane, and bolt holes of baseplate shall be drilled mechanically.
7) The moving part of the flexible cable will be reliably fixed to the crane, steel cable or slideway separately.
2 drain pumps are located in the condensate pump pit near the condenser. The pit bottom elevation is -2.700m. The catchpit and discharge pump are inside the pit.
7.3.4.3Prior to delivery, Party B shall conduct comprehensive inspections and tests on the qualities, specifications, performances, quantities and weights of all goods, and perform the final assembly and test of the complete machine before delivery.
2) The transitional track can directly connect to the washing shed (through type or forward dead-end type) from the train route. A train stop signal is set in front of the shed, a shunting signal is set in the front end of shed line along the departure direction, and an end stop signal indicator is set at the end of the shed line.
(2) Inspect and set the technical parameters of the instruments according to the operation requirements. The elevating angle for satellite observation is set to 15°, and the data sampling interval is set to 15s, meeting the design requirements.
2) Mortar fullness of mortar joint of masonry shall be not less than 80%.
2.2.3Recommendations on Main Technical Standards for Design Line
Telecommunication outlets shall be built into walls at a height of 0.3 m from bottom edge to the ground.
Upon the expiration of quality warranty period as specified in PC Clause 18 "Warranty", the Seller shall provide the Buyer with such spare parts and wearing & consumable parts as spare or replacement parts required by the equipment and materials at the most favorable price at any time based on the Buyer's requirements.
Code for Design of Concrete Structures (GB 50010-2010), referred to as Code for Concrete in this paper
Size of P10 cushion cap detail drawing does not match the cushion cap plan,please define which drawing shall prevail.
(1) Examine the components of the liquid flow verification system, including the liquid circulation system, test pipelines, flow working standards, experimental start-stop equipment and control equipment, etc., and replace damaged parts if necessary;
Unless expressly stated in the bidding document or in any other part of the contract, in principle, the equipment shall be purchased by the Employer and materials shall be purchased by the Contractor.
The floor tile is hollow and damaged, remove the damaged floor tile and binding course, replace the floor tile, and decorate the finish again.
Due to exposure to the wind, the following design parameters shall be considered:
UI design specifications are displayed in uniform style and by the corresponding large screen, ensuring that the displayed style is uniform.
5 : double-hole heavy load of double-track operation+ longitudinal additional force (70%) 6.14mm
Water delivery pump (from water source to head tank): model D85-45 X 8, power 132kw, rotational speed 2950r/min, flow rate 85m3/h, efficiency 72%, lift 360m and weight 1525kg.
Terms and definitions specified in Quality Management Systems – Fundamentals and Vocabulary (GB/T19000-2008) and the following ones are applicable to the Standard.
Steel structure shall be used for the erection of reinforcement shed, fixed arch rain-proof shed shall be adopted at the top, with the enough height to meet the operating space of processing equipment, and lightning-protection and windproof measures shall be implemented. Gantry crane shall be installed in the shed for hoisting.
1. T1 tower and septic tank of podium building are close to each other. It is recommended to merge the both and the septic tank is not recommended to be located in the building room because it is considered to be emptied in the future.
The overlay structure for bridges with original deck pavement of asphalt concrete in good conditions: 4cm SMA-13+ waterproof bonding layer + milling of original bridge deck with 4 cm.
(5) The reserved terminal of junction box of fire-proof valve shall be one or two grades higher than the wire diameter of normal distribution capacity.
1) KCIC shall provide the EPC Contractors with the right of immobilization and occupation for each part at site within a period (or multiple periods) specified in the special condition.
When the amount of image data reaches the set disk space limit, the system shall be able to automatically delete automatically saved images according to the "first in, first out" principle.
5.2.2 HSEQ Policy shall be communicated, understood and applied in the organization, which can be available to the interested parties and the documented management shall be maintained.
Because of earthquakes, there were stone blocks scattered at the water inlets or drop wells, which blocked the hole. It is required to clean out the stone blocks.
Article 54 The Board of Shareholders of the Company reserves the right to interpret the Articles of Association.
US$ 173,850,817.87
7.9.2.7-2 Reinforced concrete anti-slide pile and diagram for bias of comprehensive treatment
: indicating the transportation volume of the cargo or the passenger, m between the beginning point, i and the final point j;
For the convenience of construction, the construction or replacement of drainage culvert should be conducted in dry season when the water level in the culvert is relatively low.
Project scale: new construction of one 330kV substation and 155km of 330kV single-circuit lines
Curve at filling section: in long and high filling sections, curve sections should be avoided.
3)The grounding mode of panels and cabinets shall comply with the design requirements; the bodies shall be reliably grounded; the grounding between panels and cabinets shall be connected with braided cable;
The 1st floor of the station is mainly the entrance/exit passage of the rail mass transit, VIP lounge, necessary office rooms and equipment rooms while the 2nd floor is main waiting rooms of national railway.
The rack installation shall meet the following requirements: the base of the rack is fixed to the ground; The rack installation shall be vertical and stable, and the vertical deviation shall not exceed 1 ‰; Several racks are arranged side by side, and the panels should be on the same plane and parallel to the reference line, and the front and rear deviation should not be more than 3 MM; The gap between the two racks shall not be greater than 3 MM.
Engineering geological axis cross-section: it shall mark the boundary line of sliding zone and dislocation zone of the landslide and the leap; direction of sliding and dislocation and location of the crack; the scale shall be 1:200~1:1000 and may be 1:100 if necessary.
Payback period of static investment for N years (including construction period)
⑤ Three-phase primary reclosing mode: In case of any phase fault, the three-phase tripping and reclosing will be conducted for the circuit breaker.
12.2 Outdoor and indoor exposed steel members and handrails shall be applied with antirust paint first and then alkyd varnish.
Because the detailed parameters of the locomotives in Mongolia remain unclear, the choice of locomotives in the design will be compared and selected according to the types of Chinese locomotives.
1) Code for Design of Civil Buildings (GB50352-2005)
(1) The general principle for building decoration in the depot shall be economical, practical, concise and elegant and can fully manifest the features of industrialized building and be in conformity with the ambient environment. The materials selected shall be durable, fireproof, moisture-proof, pollution-free and easy to clean and shall have sufficient strength.
The design scale is 100,000 m³/d, which is divided into two independent 2 spaces, and the scale of each is 50,000 m³/d.
8.1.11 Station Context Planning
5.3.5 The Brake Technology Research Institute shall provide the technical documentation required by the customer, such as the product instruction manual, in accordance with the specifications of the Bid or contract.
<5-4> Weakly weathered basalt: gray, brownish gray, cryptocrystalline texture, pore structure, with rock core in columns, hard, with a general segment length of 10cm-30cm, with developed joint fissures and rock core collecting rate of about 95%.
(3) The ground or elevated station shall be divided into fire compartments not greater than 2500m2, with 2 entrances and exits directly accessing to outdoors provided in each fire compartment.
2. Drip mold should be set on the holes of external doors and windows.
2) The width of station passenger is 6.0m.
The resident population was 2,099,400, including 823,700 urban population and 1,275,700 rural population. The urbanization rate of the resident population was 39.24%.
10.3.2 Countermeasures to Protect Subgrade Slope
10. Table 4-8 Calculation Sheet of Equipment Cost - (1) Calculation Sheet of Employer-supplied Equipment Expenses
The Tenderee (Tenderee's design institute) shall cooperate with the Tenderer to complete the system design, and duly provide the basic data required by the Tenderer for design. The Tenderer shall verify the consistency between the basic design data provided by the Tenderee and the project site.
The weight of wet joint of diaphragm of the National Railway of Nigeria is:
The transformation of Tongliao-Ranghu railway trams is the need to revitalize the old industrial base in Northeast China and adapt to the national energy development policy. It is also the need to improve the level of railway technical equipment, realize railway modernization, reduce operating costs, improve the benefits of transportation enterprises, coordinate the technical standards of regional road networks and increase the flexibility of arc road networks.
4) The sequence of the technical tender shall be determined according to the evaluation.
Summary of Test Results for Rock Mechanical Properties (Laboratory)
8.2.5 The preliminary survey stage shall initially determine the reserves and quality of natural building materials, and the determined reserves shall meet the engineering demand as estimated in the feasibility study report.
(1) Quality standard: the straightness of 10mm, the elevation difference between adjacent blocks of 3mm, the seam width of ±3mm, and the elevation of the top surface of the side stone of ±10mm.
4. The cylinder valves with components being inspected, cleaned and replaced shall be assembled and subjected to airtightness test in closed state, open-close process and full-open state. The test pressure is 2.1 MPa and the holding time is not less than 1 min. No leakage is allowed.
(5) 2 transport flatcars (transport under bridge) and 2 transportation trailers
2.2 Project scale: The route is 23.86km long, including such works as subgrade, pavement, tunnels, bridges and culverts, protection, drainage, disaster control, traffic engineering and facilities along the route.
According to the proposed construction scheme, the use ratio of Sri Lankan staff is as shown below:
Xiong Jie is responsible for allocating personnel and materials required for the implementation of plan.
5. To be responsible for VISION system management.
Water used in the production utility area is taken from the Owner designated source in the site. A brick reservoir will be built on the site to ensure uninterrupted supply of production water.
The portable verifying unit could be carried by station personnel of to check passenger tickets, which can provide assistance for solving ticket issues in time.
See the construction drawing of HVAC discipline for details of emergency exhaust system construction.
Changing Trend for Death Toll and Death Rate per Million Tons of Coal Mine Accidents in China from 2008 to 2017
Risk assessment shall be carried out for the hazards, and risks can be divided into the following classes according to the consequences brought about:
Sizes and boundaries of zones as well as scale and section parameters of road networks can directly affect the accuracy and authenticity of traffic model.
According to the new contracts concluded by the Company, the Construction Budget Department shall draft the project performance responsibility statement, communicate with the personnel of relevant responsible departments, and submit to the Company's leaders in charge for review and approval.
③ From the above test results, we found that the aging of recycled asphalt is serious, and asphalt becomes hard and brittle, easy to aggravate the pavement disease.
(1) In the project, it is required to apply to the radio management department for radio frequency resources of the wireless mobile communication system and conduct electromagnetic environment tests on the applied frequency band as well as clean the interfering frequencies.
Specific method for adjusting elevation of well cover: expose prefabricated reinforcement concrete well crib; determine the elevation of valve well cover;
This station is an underground two-story island-style station with a two-story and two-span rectangular frame structure, with a total length of 200 m, a standard section width of 19.9 m, a roof covering of about 3 m and a base plate embedding depth of about 16.5 m.
Treatment of Coming late, Leaving Early and Absence from Work.
A monitoring and survey group shall be established to carry out monitoring and surveying during the entire construction process of this tunnel, collect, arrange and analyze the data and advance processing schemes for the Supervision Engineer's approval and then implementing the schemes.
When the reducing air duct is made, the angle of the single-sided reducing type should be less than 30°, and the angle of the double-sided reducing type should be less than 60°.
The project departments shall set up a negotiation team of five or seven members, including the project manager, chief economist or deputy manager in charge, minister of industry and commerce, and project related experts, with one compliance expert, and technical and economic experts shall not be less than two-thirds of the total number of members..
1.2.9 Frame process for assembling rotor cores of alternators and auxiliary generators (depending on rotor structure)
The insulation of vertical air-conditioning water pipes may be re-set to reduce vertical heat loss.
5.5.2 Analysis of Impact on Plant Species
g. General construction schedule shall determine project composition by phase and batch; commencement and completion sequences of each batch of works and time arrangement; general preparation, in particular the contents and schedule of the first batch of preparation.
For the equipment and materials that are shipped under the liability of Party B, Party A shall file a claim to Party B in writing upon the discovery of shortages, mis-shipment or damage caused by Party B.
1. Establish a risk management system, and well conduct the risk prevention work.
The train PA system is provided by the vehicle supplier.
23.1. Test device of vehicle motor and electrical apparatus system
□ The noise outside of the enclosure of this Project should be not more than 70dB at daytime, and not more than 55dB at night.
The locomotive network control system is capable of self-diagnosis, and self-diagnosis information can be displayed on the driver's display.
(5) After the column reinforcement binding is accepted and the construction joint of column head is treated, flushed and cleaned, the column formwork should be installed.
1. The line crosses the river in upstream, requiring less bridge works and without super major bridge works.
1)During the test, the DC110V control power must be switched off before inserting and extracting the plugs on the panel of the control plug-in.
One week before the commencement of the project, the surveyor will be responsible for sending the measuring instruments such as theodolite, level gage, platform scale, and steel ruler to the statutory inspection unit according to the regulations, and which shall be only be used upon qualification.
"Retention Money" means the accumulated retention moneys which the Employer retains under Sub-Clause 14.3 [Application for Interim Payment Certificates] and pays under Sub-Clause 14.9 [Payment of Retention Money].
2.5 Chengdu Hongmin Adhesive Products Co., Ltd. (Printed adhesive tape for sealing)
Nr Professional Man-months Provided by
Blade washing of steam turbine set and oil cooler switching;
Among them, the fire control mode can be linked with the fire control system to send an alarm.
The Nile River and some of its tributaries are important shipping rivers in South Sudan. Juba has a cargo terminal along the White Nile, but it is basically at a standstill due to the war.
The proposed ecological protective and restoration measures in Project production include:
According to the geological data in the energy dissipation zone, there is no intense weathering rock mass basically at the position of scouring pit. The scouring resistance flow velocity is 4m/s ~ 5m/s. The particle size of the model sand is calculated as per the following empirical formula. The test actually selects the homogeneous dolomitic sand with a particle size of 7.0mm as the scouring resistance material of the bedrock. The empirical formula to estimate the scouring resistance flow velocity is as follows:
One soft copy of each document, no matter Word, Excel or Powerpoint format document - Chinese version
Material and equipment testing: The subcontractor must notify the engineer to take witness sampling according to the specification if required.
Special personnel are assigned to manage meteorological information, and to provide weather forecasts about heavy wind and heavy rain. Proper technical actions should be taken to prevent any accident.
The signal system should be provided with the equipment featured by high-level safety, reliability, easy maintenance and maturity.
(a) Main propulsion cylinder: 16*Φ300/Φ220-1,750mm; rated thrust:
Fire extinguishers who enter into the above-mentioned scope of area must wear insulating shoes and shall use non-conducting fire-extinguishing agent, such as carbon dioxide, 1211 and dry chemical power etc.
Article 9 Principally, at each directors' meeting, the Supervisory Board Office of the Board of Directors shall notify all the supervisors to convene a meeting at the same time.
Taiyuan Electric Power Equipment Factory of China Railway Taiyuan Group Co., Ltd. designs and manufactures ZY series electro-hydraulic point switches, with more than 20 years of experience in designing and manufacturing electro-hydraulic point switches.
Simulate signal output at a speed of 5km/h of EMU and close hood.
4. The automation level of main water supply stations for passenger trains shall be improved, and centralized monitoring system for water supply shall be set, to ensure the safe and highly efficient operation of equipment and achieve the goal of saving energy, downsizing staff, and improving efficiency.
After signing a contract with the subcontract team, provide it with a copy of Subcontract Team Entrance Notice.
Complaints Made by Employees 90
Asphalt mixture must be made in the asphalt plant (mixing plant or station) using intermittent mixers, transported by large tonnage dumpers, paved using asphalt mixture pavers and compacted using drum rollers and pneumatic tired rollers.
USD 240.0 X 6.8 X 2.0
Concession Agreement of Chengdu-Chongqing Expressway Second Line Project (Chongqing Section)
Berlin Shunting Locomotive Project For Germany (BR1004.5)
The specific model is shown in Table 13.4.2-3.
(1) Where the cable enters the building, tunnel, crosses through floor slab and wall.
Inspection department shall track the assembly test situation, and make the inspection records properly for traceability.
The unfavorable geological conditions in the surveyed section are bedding and karst. There is no distribution of special rock and soil.
The biding documents specify an internal space height of 1,965mm and an external clearance of 3,200mm. It is recommended to increase the external clearance to 3,335mm, which allows an internal space height of 2,100mm,.
2. Model: FXDP100QPVC_x000D_
When the existing gradient plus curve compensation exceeds the limiting gradient, the curve shall be compensated.
6. One drainage trough is set every 15m and is led to the drainage ditch. The drainage trough in the cutting section is assembled with 0.3m thick C35 concrete precast members. And the drainage trough is assembled with 0.3m thick C35 concrete precast members and the dimensions are shown in "Profile I-I".
Water content in primary structure or base course of coating engineering: The water content is not larger than 10% when water-based and emulsion thin coating are sprayed on concrete and plastering surface.
Phase-I Project is composed of 2 double-track super major bridges with total length of 1817.4m, 8 double-track major bridges with total length of 2374.1m, one 142.2m long single-track major bridge, 10 overline highway bridges with total length of 849.5²and 36 ross-line overpasses with total length of 2251.6m.
High-level talents shall be cultivated and excellent engineering technical personnel shall be selected and sent to receive education of the Master's Degree or the Doctor's Degree in a planned and step-by-step way.
Marks may only be affixed to the products which have passed inspection.
Table 1-1: Supply list of the processing equipment
Immediately after the base is covered with geotextile, sprinkle water and keep it wet during the whole curing period.
Track of the line: study the channel proposal of the line and level crossing and grade separation. Track structure (steel rail, sleeper, fastener, ballast and design of CWR), design of protection fences and investigation on removal of buildings.
XD/XKYX-QZB-0508(Ver. 6)-2017 Product and Service Requirement Review Management Procedure
(2) The stability of the excavation face can be effectively maintained, the disturbance to the surrounding land is small, and the ground settlement arising therefrom is small.
The train number uses different colors to display train early/ late information, which is directly generated by train diagram/ timetable.
Whether all suggestion has been archived by process safety management coordinator?
4) Wedge clamp (NUT-4) of guy wire is connected with bottom plate of guy wire by duplex plates, and bolts penetrate to the line side uniformly.
The loading deflection is not more than 4.0mm and the residual deformation is not more than 1.0mm.
The forms of refuse transfer stations are various, and their main differences are in the factors such as the process flow, main transfer equipment as well as its working principles and compaction degree on wastes.
During the installation, the inclination of formworks for pier stud shall be accurately controlled by using the theodolite and checked before placing of concrete.
Calculation of width of exit passageway: In the first floor, every 2 persons live in a room, every room has a door directly leading to the outdoor, the net width for evacuation is 0.9m respectively, the width of exit passageway satisfy with the requirements.
3/4 of that of the bell end overall insertion is not acceptable.
4) Voice quality, query of response time, input signal dynamic range, voice activated recording sensitivity
The Company also formulates the Job (Post) Description for each post in the Company Headquarters to clarify the post responsibilities and requirements for post ability, qualification, and working conditions, etc.
b) Real-time display and playback of test waveform data: track circuit test waveform and value, traction return current test waveform and value, compensation capacitor test waveform, balise test data, etc. are displayed with mileage as transverse coordinate axis;
a. The tiles shall be full-body tiles, and the matt tiles shall be wear resistant glaze on the surface with good gloss, and natural, fine and moist texture.
Figure 4-3-1-22 Change over Time of Feed-out Voltage Distortion Rate and Substation Actual Power Consumption at Mong Kok West Substation on 2017-07-29
Width of 9mXlength of 12mXdepth of 9m (transition pier for main bridge)
1. The lab is responsible for the inspection (test) results provided by it.
Contractor shall calculate the heat losses in chlorinator room and drum room and temperature in these rooms shall not drop below 17°C in winter.
According to the geological drilling data of this project, bored cast-in-place piles are used in this project.
For reserved, embedded, and buried lines threading pipes, determine locations in advance, make records, prevent omissions, and avoiding chiseling any cave on the walls to impact the structure quality.
Relevant content has been supplemented in "Para 11 - Housing Building 6, House Building Standards, Structural Types and Decoration Standards".
"Wrapping" refers to wrapping protection for semi-finished and finished products.
EN50215: 2009 Requirements
Acceptance of engineering quality of rotary bored cast-in-situ pile shall comply with the Unified Standard for Constructional Quality Acceptance of Building Engineering (GB50300-2013) and relevant provisions.
(2) Water conservation and environmental protection measures shall be taken across rivers. During construction, slurry steel boxes shall be stored and transported out timely. Slurry circulation shall be carried out by connecting steel boxes with pipelines to block leakage. Slurry treatment equipment shall be set up when necessary to strengthen construction monitoring measures and to ensure that the river water source is pollution-free.
For the two subjects for free exploration set up by the Laboratory, of which the subject name and the specific contents are not limited, the applicants can customize the subject name, research contents and objectives and so on according to the research fields and locating requirements of the Laboratory.
Do not quickly move gun nozzle (at a speed within 0.05m/s), or high-pressure air will tilt against the air fin of the oil cooler, which would lead to distortion of the air fin.
Standard for special labor protection articles; list of recommended qualified suppliers; manufacturer's "three certificates" (business license, production license, quality inspection certificate)
(1) When the implementation stage of the contracting project includes the Completion Test stage, the planned Completion Date and the actual Completion Date shall be determined according to the following method:
In the long-term after-sales service assurance plan, the Tenderer shall specify the detailed content, service standards, time guarantee, compensation for delay and charging policy of after-sales service and technical support provided during the service life of the AFC System.
5.3.4 The method for pouring and curing of concrete is the same as that for drainage works.
--- During welding, there must have measures to prevent splashing of metal slag and fire as well as measures to prevent scald, electric shock and explosion.
Prior to hoisting the bogie or locomotive, please check the functions of all devices for hoisting. When hoisting or transporting the bogie or locomotive, extra preventive measures shall be taken to prevent personal injury and damage to the bogie in case of falling off of the bogie.
② In the machining workshop, the unit frame is machined into a space quadrilateral through a jig frame, and the face plate is elastically formed with special tools.
3) Tripping position relay returning(TWJ = 0)
The IC card reader should have strong anti-electromagnetic capability, and the conventional use of other electronic equipment should not affect the card reader.
The road adjacent to the quarry is severely damaged, and ponding and pits exist on the pavement. However, there is no need to build any access road.
2. !22 combined hollow anchor bolts are applied to arch part, and !22 mortar anchor bolts to side walls;
The inner binding layer should be tightly wrapped, free of wrinkling and with even blank holder.
√The person neglects or ignores safety, not focused
2.5.3.2 Any equipment which may be touched by passengers, such as advertising lighting and movable power socket boxes, shall be provided with leakage protection, and the action current shall not be more than 30mA.
3~4.8m: grayish yellow slightly dense medium sand, saturated, C=0kPa, Φ=32°, Es=11MPa, fao=330kPa;
So far, only one mergers and acquisitions business has been completed by China Merchants Holdings (International) Company Limited; there is still no cases of mergers and acquisitions business conducted by Chinese-funded enterprises and impeded locally.
The equipment, technology, process, patent, inspection and claim documents shall be sorted by the organizer. The translations used at site, non-standard drawings, as-built drawings and design changes generated in installation and commissioning, documents formed in installation and commissioning, documents generated during the trial operation and maintenance, and project accident handling documents shall be sorted by the construction unit.
The steel pipes shall be tampered and pickled before being delivered.
Obtained the Safety Qualification Certificate of Sichuan Province in 2013.
③ The connecting end surface of pipe and pipe fitting must be clean, dry and free of oil.
Name of the Project: Procurement of DSA and Hemodynamic Recording System of Xi'an Central Hospital
9 Will Yanjiao Authority allow updating of paint spraying process?
Global Urban Traffic Mode Structures (%)
Comprehensive Assessment Committee of Intermediate Professional Technical Post of Deyang City
Fire resistance rating of main structure: The fire resistance rating is class I and the duration of fire resistance at least shall be 2h based on the RABT standard temperature curve.
Countermeasures: before installation, coordination with decoration teams and groups and civil team must be realized, to determine the installation position of blow-off pipes and sanitary ware. In case of staggering for blow-off pipe orifice, rework shall be done.
On December 5, 2018, Harbin Supervision Station of Engineering Quality Supervision and Administration Bureau of China Railway submitted the Report on Internal Supervision of Quality and Safety of Newly Built Harbin-Mudanjiang Railway Passenger Dedicated Line Project (TZJHZ [2018] No.005) and agreed to carry out preliminary acceptance.
2.Each set of high speed earthing switches shall be equipped with a mechanical open/close position indicator, and observation windows can be installed according to requirements, so that operators can check the opening and closing status of contacts.
Wheel diameter: (1) new wheel: Ф915 mm
It shall include the general structure, shape, technical parameters of escalator, etc.
It can be seen that the overall population tends to be aging.
1. Organization Setting, Total Staffing and Staffing per Kilometer of Main Line
Our company has adjusted the plan to replace the original outdoor oil separator with theindoor integrated oil-water separation device, and changed the sewage treatment equipment of the original podium building and tower into a sewage septic tank.
When water filling is complete, the speed for water discharging shall be controlled as per the regulations.
Control Procedure for Continual Improvement
(7) After the mixing is over, empty the water tank, additives box, cement, sand and aggregates hopper and weighing hopper, and clean them with water.
Coat and hat hooks can be set to move along the longitudinal direction of the vehicle.
During measurement, the potential electrode (P) shall be moved for three times near in the connection direction of the measured grounding connection (G) and the current electrode (C), and the distance moved each time shall be about 5% of Ac; when the error of the measurement results for three times is about 5%, namely the measurement result is the ground resistance value of the ground electrode.
Shenzhen Metro Line 12, with a total length of 40 km, starts from Zuopaotai Station and ends at Waterlands Resort East Station. The whole line is laid underground and has 33 stations.
The report without "special seal for inspection report" or official seal of inspection unit is invalid.
Hang plumb lines at columns of two entrance doors and the rear end wall of cab to ensure that the two side surfaces of cab is vertical to the upper surface of underframe with a deviation of not greater than 2mm and the rear wall is 3~5mm from the line vertical to upper surface of underframe (the cab bends forwards with the draw beam being 3~5mm lower).
2. Type selection of current transformer, relay protection coordination, meter type selection, master control room layout, etc.
1) Special persons shall be assigned to pull out the rubber pipe (plastic pipe) to prevent blockage before initial setting of concrete.
● All information such as manual commands and automatic command execution can be automatically archived for future reference.
For this purpose, emphasis is laid on input of mechanical and technical equipment in the Project to ensure that, in addition to the machinery required in the Construction Organization Design, input in the Project is increased when the construction period needs to be shortened due to the effect of non-human factors, so as to facilitate continuous operation of the Project and ensure timely completion.
2.6.2.4 Concrete Inspection
CRCEG won the bids for such landmark projects as Kenya's Ricky Complex and Uganda's Social Security Fund Building, which has further promoted the rolling development of overseas markets.
To ensure timely commencement of the project, preparation shall be made before construction. It shall be done earlier as per construction progress requirements, with the close cooperation of relevant departments of local government.
ISC and PSG have many plane trusses, and rolling boarding should not be adopted, and it is planned to lift to the ship by crawler crane.
b The welding materials shall be kept and issued by special personnel and registered during drawing and recovery. The damp-proof measures shall be taken in the welding materials room. The relative humidity shall be lower than 60%. The welding materials shall be kept by class and tagged.
List of project team members, covering name, post and work seniority of main participants in the Project;
23.6 m (2-way 4 lanes) /13.3 (2-way 2 lanes)
B. The distribution box shall be installed firmly and the contact parts of structures shall be treated with anti-corrosion.
The temperature of the pipe wall of the boiler and the economizer heating pipe other than the above is above the dew point, so it is not necessary to take measures against low temperature corrosion.
has been rated as the Business Enterprise of Observing Contract and Valuing Credit for fifteen consecutive years in the Business Enterprise of Observing Contract and Valuing Credits establishing activity of Kunming.
Strengthen the patrolling during rainy season and timely fulfill the solution while finding the problems.
Other than the CK270~330 section, the rest sections of the line reserve the conditions for long-term 160km/h.
Automatic sprinkling plan of T1 - Floor 22 - Floor 27
For such high slopes, it is customary to adopt the reinforced earth retaining walls in Europe, and the height of the retaining wall can be more than 30m.
Electric wire, wiring tube and galvanized steel pipe are measured in meters.
The passenger flow forecast data in the feasibility study stage is accurate ( the result of passenger flow forecast affects the project scale);
Copy of Record Registration Certificate for Entering Sichuan of the Construction Bidder Registered Outside Sichuan Province
Concrete and mortar coming out from the mixing machine should be used up in half-hour and 1 hour respectively.
Principal works include: 8,017,500m³ earth excavation, 1,041,000m³ rock excavation, 489,300m³ earthwork backfilling, 91,000m³ concrete work, 2300.19t reinforcement production and installation and 80,700m³ stonework.
3) Sidewalk width D should be determined in combination with line condition and maintenance condition.
Once an emergency occurs, under the leadership of the leading group, decisive measures shall be taken to deal with it promptly and effectively according to the following working principles::
―― The output voltage of electrospark leakage detector shall meet the requirements for 15kV leakage detection voltage.
Cabinet (PLC) 400x500x200mm
The scoured area at the top of culvert shall be rehabilitated with mortar rubble.
b. During or after the soil borrowing, second ploughing should be done timely, as well as the slope protection for the borrow area to avoid the formation of soil erosion or landslide.
Provisions of the Instructions on Active Promotion of Basic Construction Team Management Mode issued by China State Railway Group Co., Ltd. (TJS [2008] No.51) and relevant provisions of the Employer and our Company
Key points of quality assurance of reinforcement works include reinforcement raw material, processing, stacking, banding and positioning and reserving of openings for mechanical and electrical machines; reinforcement is prohibited to be cut randomly.
Electric traction is adopted by the adjacent Bao-Xi Passage. In consideration of the network formed by electric traction for adjacent railways and full use of adjacent railways and adjacent operation and maintenance facilities, electric traction is adopted for this Line, which will be beneficial to locomotive repair, use and optimizing productivity layout and increase transportation efficiency.
2. Flow of water supply system and pressure required: q=1.90 L/s, H=200KPa.
② It is good for the storage to use simple goods storage rack. During storage and handling, the plate shall be lift to side (it is not allowed to be flat to carry) to avoid plate deformation.
It is required that there is a certain sag for the electrical connection line between two messenger wires to ensure that the messenger wire can freely expand and contract when the temperature changes.
Real-time display of inspection data: speed, track circuit carrier frequency and low frequency information, time and mileage, signal machine position, etc.;
A large amount of construction slurry will be produced during project construction, especially in the rainy season; in addition, a small amount of oil-bearing wastewater will be produced during maintenance of the construction mechanism.
It shall be noticed that whether tests are not required for all the member functions inherited. For the parent class member function which has been tested, re-tests are required for the above two conditions in the child class:
The Seller shall, within 1 week after the contract is signed, provide the list of all technical data and the delivery schedule which shall be confirmed by the Buyer.
Table 2-3-19 Land Planning for Naivasha Industry Park
Refer to the reference drawings of this line for details on OCS mast platform over simply-supported girder.
Fig. 8-4 Schematic Diagram of Finalized Adjustment Coefficient for Shear-weight Ratio under Each Seismic Condition
(11) 1-1.5m long round pipe culvert at DK116+591.6 does not meet the actual traffic demand on site; it is recommend to be modified into 1-4m long frame culvert.
4. Connection: bonding_x000D_
It receives the section parking accident alarm via a train wireless telephone, monitors the operation of fire facilities to ensure that they are in good standby status at all times, and has automatic and manual control functions to meet the emergency needs of disaster relief. File management and equipment management shall be carried out for FAS data across the line.
Temporary drainage facilities can be in the form of excavating soil ditches, brick masonry, plastering cement mortar, stacking sand bags, etc.
See the bar chart of the planned commencement and completion dates and construction process.
Technical specification [_ name of software] [_ project name]
2.5.3 Non-destructive testing personnel shall perform corresponding operation as per the procedures and standard on the basis of the shape and features of the workpieces during operation:
(2) Each weld joint should be welded once, except for welding stopping in case of instant arc breaking. The busbar shall not be moved or stressed before the welding is completed.
Demolition time: For the side template that does not bear concrete gravity, it may be removed only after the concrete strength is strong enough that the surface and corner will not be damaged by the removal; for the beam plate and other bearing template, it may be removed when the concrete reaches the strength below.
-Electric shock threat from poor line skin while using electric tools
When the danger is serious to cause harm to personal or vessel, the captain shall ask the crew and all the operating personnel to prepare for abandoning the vessel.
Toilets, medical, first aid, police and other work and service facilities shall be provided properly.
With the increase of traffic volume, the traffic volume on the shortest path will also increase to a certain extent, thus the travel time on the shortest path will become longer due to congestion. At this time, the shortest path is not the shortest.
The internal wiring, control equipment, power supply, alarm and lighting circuit of all the instruments shall withstand 2000V power frequency AC voltage, and the return conductor shall be adopted with multiple copper wires with the cross section of not less than 2.5mm2.
1. Check whether the tightening bolts are not loose, and the locking marks are not misaligned.
Take charge of the disposal of general nonconforming products, and the quality acceptance and assessment after disposal.
The response analysis for urban earthquake disaster field is a typical issue of response analysis under earthquake for composite engineering system.
The successful implementation of this project will provide optimal solutions and best practices for a comprehensive eco-transport development, and assist to achieve the targets of resource-conservation, energy-saving and emission reduction set by GoC.
B1 Line is similar to that of T Line project scale, and its plane alignment index is high; the exit of the tunnel on T Line is connected with small radius horizontal curve, so traffic safety design shall be strengthened; the length of B1 Line tunnel is more than 4.1 km, the piers are higher than 90m, and the construction period is long.
Implement the Control Procedures for Identification and Assessment of Hazard Source.
The property right of the document is owned by China Energy Engineering Group Northeast No.1 Electric Power Construction Co., Ltd. Anyone shall not use, copy, transmit or disclose the document without written permission from the Company.
DS6-K5B Computer-based Interlocking System
5) Planning of emergency measures for sudden events, forming contingency plans for emergencies, safety and environmental emergency rescue plans, natural disaster emergency plans and other documents.
(1) Formulate the allocation plan of IT organizations, personnel, and software and hardware facilities of project;
Right circulating water inlet electrically operated valve of condenser is opened in place
Safety belts shall be worn before working at heights and be hung securely and reliably;
Where: V - Amount of filter media (m3);
The Employer has the right to impose a penalty of RMB 100,000 on the Contractor for every occupational death accident and RMB 20,000 for every serious injury, fire disaster or major engineering quality accident.
2) Towels over nose method: since the fire smoke is characterized by high temperature and poisonousness, the respiratory system will easily be burned or poisoned in case of inhalation of such smoke. In conclusion, wet towels or clothes shall be used to cover the mouth and nose during evacuation, to realize the purpose of cooling and filtration.
The contractor must build its own HSE system and formulate the HSE procedure. Contractor's HSE system and HSE procedure must satisfy the Employer's HSE requirements and shall be in consistence with the Employer's HSE system and HSE procedure.
Planned commencement date: ______MM____DD, ____YY.
During transportation, the driving speed shall be stable, and the packing and reinforcement methods shall be checked several times.
Generally, the joint shall be cut when the compressive strength reaches 5Mpa.
Piping and Instrument Flow Chart 1 for UF Device of Raw Water Preprocessing Unit (3107)
1) The installation height and location of the antenna should meet the design requirements. For directional antennas, orienteering compass shall be used to ensure correct pointing;
3) The floor area is 697.64m2, and the construction area is 1395.27m2.
(2) Articles marked by the asterisk (*) may be modified by the Company based on actual situation and reprinted into a new Articles of Association, given compliance with the Company Law.
SOHO China/SOHO Zhongshan Plaza Underground 1, 3Q Fine Decoration/PM/Excellent project management, granted with"Outstanding Project Award"
The poem "When can I sit by the west window to have a heart-to-heart talk with you while having a snuff trimmed off together with you? If that comes true, I will tell you how I have missed you on such a rainy night in the Ba Hill" depicts a sad but very appealing picture.
High-precision full temperature control tilt sensor (aerospace class), ultrasonic wind speed and direction sensor, settlement sensor, atmospheric temperature and humidity sensor, rainfall sensor and distance measuring sensor are applied to monitor the operation status of the communication tower.
6.1.3 After receiving the Level B and C information within the unit, each unit shall organize relevant personnel to analyze the existing problems and find out the reasons for the non-conformities (or unqualified items).
│ │ │ │ 47380.2 Newly-buried Pipeline Crossing Railway.jpg
Inquiry website: http://gxzs.nvq.net.cn/
The point for section T1-T2 is full mark; points for sections T0-T1 and T2-T3 will be deducted. The nearer to full mark section, the higher the point.
3. If the anchor rod system is adopted, exploration holes shall be set outside the basement to control the angle of anchor rod and ensure that the anchoring section enters a favorable stratum.
Based on the current design and production capacity, the ore in the mine area can be produced for 46.07 years in the alumina refinery.
3) Contact surfaces must be well protected from erosion;
Roof fan, air volume 11760 m3/h, air pressure 400 Pa
During commissioning and trial operation of the DCS, restoration of all DCS software should be completed by one special person assigned by the manufactuer.
(5)The indicator of the door unit is off when it is normally closed, is on when it is normally opened, and flickers during the process of door opening and closing.
River Bank Ditch Pavement within the scope of mh[3]+0.5m
For items which are within the warranty scope and content in the warranty period, Party A will inform Party B to make repairs and Party B bears the maintenance expense. Party B shall send maintenance personnel for warranty work timely as per requirements after receiving the warranty notice.
Whether the information collected during feedback is taken as potential input of risk management for monitoring and maintaining product requirements and potential input of product realization or improvement process?
The arrangement of tubes are 30, 60, 90 and 45 degrees, and floating head heat exchangers mainly adopt arrangement of45 and 90 degrees.
The following requirements shall be satisfied when the inspectors issue documentation concerning nonconforming products:
It shall carry out full and accurate investigation and survey on site conditions and geological data prior to the construction of ground heat exchanger.
The sections set with supporting structures shall be "capped" on their representative cross sections to determine types, lengths, and heights of supporting structures. And during the survey, cross and vertical sections shall be optimized under the cooperation with personnel specialized in route discipline.
Each car is equipped with an earthing socket conforming to the CEE 7 standard for 220 VAC /15 A.
3.5Deviation of measuring force indicating value of the dynamometer shall be not more than 2.5 %.
Inspection on the vacuum degree of the arc-quenching nozzle of circuit breaker shall be carried out by power frequency withstand voltage method. The voltage withstand strength of its fracture shall meet the product technical provisions.
The schedule shall be reviewed based on the following items:
When the switchgear is in local mode, it will be impossible to perform remote operation-closing and opening operation for the switchgear on the integrated automation platform of the substation.
Nigeria is the most populous country in Africa, and its population recorded 187 million in August 2017. It is also the largest economy in Africa. In 2016, the gross domestic product (GDP) of Nigeria (GDP) was USD 405.9 billion.
It is strictly prohibited to dismantle, move safety protection items and safety signs without permission. If found, each person will be fined $10.
Invisible indirect influences or other indirect influence, for example: changes weakening relieving factors between communities.
9.5.2.4.4. Main Duties for Informatization Work
The company should use unified registered brand and trademark for external relations.
③ The downlead shall be brushed with yellow and green color, and provided with signs;
All the above situations must be in written form and the copies must be sent to the Supervision Engineer.
First launch early preparations for the proposal and submit it to the Board of Directors for approval as condition permits. This is to provide reference for decision making.
Sodium bromocresol green shall be used as indicator, while anhydrous sodium carbonate used to calibrate the concentration.
The monthly fluctuation coefficient of number of freight trains is 1.1.
Disconnect cables at Point 7 to Point 10 of =73-A102-X1.
We undertake that we will not withdraw the tender documents within the validity period of tender specified in the tendering documents.
See Figure 8-4-3 for schematic plan of Zuunbayan South station.
There are 38 sets of the climbing frames in total, which are set and located in 3 zones: the first zone from No.1 to No.18, the second zone No. 19-24 and the third zong No.25-38. The climbing frames are erected and assembled starting from the fifth floor.
The drainage ditch receives the water discharged from the weep hole and discharges it out of the tunnel.
In principle, the newly-built KCR KCR is set up on the north side of the existing ML-1 through the channel of the old KCR. When the clearance and net width of the highway bridge over the railway meet the requirements, the way of passing under the bridges and culverts can be used, and roads intersecting with the line are all arranged in an over-crossing mode.
In addition, safety nets shall be set up during the construction of the superstructure, and safety signs shall be provided at multiple significant positions.
19.2 If the Seller makes no response within 30 days after the Buyer issues notice of claim, the claim mentioned above is deemed to be accepted by the Seller.
After the turnout test of the whole station is completed, the trailing indication lamp will turn off, the trailing bell will ring again, the drawable trailing button bell will stop, and the turnout trailing alarm will return to normal.
The available the Dar es Salaam's existing sewage treatment facilities are far from meeting the needs of its urban development. We need to ascertain whether sewage treatment plants and collection pipeline network are among the tasks of this project (if they are, the following information should be provided);
The rest radial bars shall be put in uniform distribution along radius R=9100
This Induction Guide is specially prepared to facilitate you to handle the induction procedure in the hope that this guide will help and facilitate you.
No.19 Xinghua Road, Xiqing Economic Development Zone, Tianjin
3) As for the plastering of the joints of different material bases and the trunking surface, the anti-cracking strengthening measures of hanging steel wire mesh used for building plastering shall be adopted, and the overlap width of steel wire mesh and each base shall not be less than 100mm;
Retention money: 10% left after the Client will pay the Supervisor 90% of the supervision charges with settlement audit price as the billing base is the retention money.
c) be responsible for provision of process program of procedure quality problems
The photos record the water flow and water droplets. These photos shall be added to the test report.
Third circulating water field: 40000m3/h
Records of closed-loop supervision on the treatment process of pollution incident
In such habitats, the forest vegetation and species are relatively simple, and the vegetation is resistant to dry and barren environment. The communities are low. The height of plants is generally only 3-5 m or even smaller. The community structure is simple, and there is only one layer. The shrub layer is developed very well.
Lot CGJL-4 of the New Chengdu ~ Guangzhou Railway Project (Leshan~Guiyang Section)Notification of Award
Figure 8.2-24 The Nighttime Vertical Noise Contour of K9+163~K13+748 Section in the Long-term Operation of the Project
However, when the acceptance results of concealed works or completion acceptance results between the contractor and the employer indicate that the construction subcontractor's construction quality is unqualified, the labor subcontractor shall be responsible for repairs without compensation, without extension of the construction period, and shall bear the related loss of the contractor occurred therefrom.
Production command, dispatching system and communication facilities inside devices have been running smoothly.
Stringer bead shall be even on the surface of weld, without any defects, such as cracks, slag inclusion, weld beading, burn-out, arc crater and needle lamellar pores, etc. and spatters must not be appeared around welding area.
1. After the train enters the static commissioning workshop, the maintenance personnel operate four HV boxes of the train to the inter-car position (with its normally-open auxiliary contact (BQS:SK1) closed);
The antenna hood is sealed, waterproof and UV resistant.
Straight angle pole: for pin insulator, wires shall be fixed in the trunking at exterior side of corner. And for porcelain cross arm insulator, wires shall be fixed within the first apron.
The new pipe culvert (excluding removal) for this bid section is 1190m long and the box culvert is 147m and the inverted siphon culvert is 276m.
The attitude of bedrock stratum at the exit end of the tunnel is N33°W/47°SW, with an angle between the stratum strike and the line of 51°, an apparent dip of cross section of 34° and an apparent dip of longitudinal profile of 40°, inclining towards the exit direction. Therefore, there is bedding of heading slope during excavation of the tunnel exit section.
4)Put the double heading switch on the cabinet door of cab console of I end of main locomotive on "main locomotive" position and; Put the double heading switch on the cabinet door of cab console of I end of assisting locomotive on "assisting locomotive" position;
The head of audit team shall organize the auditors to jointly audit the audit reports to ensure that the audit process can be clearly reflected and the audit evidence is complete and valid.
Party A promises to pay the contract price in accordance with the term and method agreed under the Contract.
Plastic case circuit breakers are all operated by electronic tripper and spring energy accumulation typed electric operation mechanism. The main technical parameters are as follows:
The height of Floor 1 and Floor 2 is 4.8m and 3.6m respectively.
www.zg.gov.cn/gggs_/-/... Baidukuaizhao
The clearance between the mandrel and the bottom of the groove must not be less than 0.5mm.
Wang Weiguo, male, born on April 26, 1964, majored in Civil Engineering for junior college students in Network Education Institution from September 2003 to January 2006 for two-year undergraduate program at our college, has successfully completed all courses required by the teaching plan with qualified performances, and hereby is qualified for graduation.
There are no suitable local factories of steel pile casings, formworks, and form travelers.
The modified negotiation application documents shall be prepared, sealed, marked and submitted in accordance with the regulations in Clause 3 and Clause 4 of this Chapter and shall be marked with words of "Modification".
Calculation Result for Number of Unidirectional Lanes in 2040 (design speed of 80km/h)
When the LV power supply distance is long, due to the potential difference between the neutral line and the PE line in the TN-C-S system or since the common mode voltage is less than the TN-S system, the TN-C-S system is superior to the TN-S system in terms of anti-common mode voltage interference of information technology equipment. In this case, the TN-C-S system should be adopted.
1) Waterproof Layer of Concrete Bridge and Culvert of Railway (SM-BG-09)
The site manager shall effectively communicate the HSE core value with the management personnel at all levels and ensure that they are fully recognized by the employees;
Specific construction measures are shown in Table 3.1.1-1.
The vegetation in the area is dense, and adverse physical and geological phenomena such as landslide, collapse and active gully are undeveloped.
Cable inlet and outlet shall be sealed and daub must not be used for sealing.
The contents of application include: location of the work, the number of workers, lighting arrangements, the operation time applied for, arrangement of the shift leader, and the technical disclosure of safety.
Performance 2: Liuwu 220kV Transmission and Transformation Project (Yangliu and Nieliu Line Works) and other 3 projects
Driver employment, vehicle inspection, maintenance, driving rules and traffic rules.
After reaction, the synthesis gas containing methylchlorosilane, chloromethane and so on are filtered by cyclone separator to remove dust, and the removed dust returns to the reactor system for circulation.
Thread the cable into corresponding hole according to the wiring point, reserve the wire length to make cable lengthened as far as possible with the overlength part tie to the pole of battery cubicle.
Passenger compartment shall be set with stainless-steel safety hammer, hat hook, curtain hook, etc., and 1 safety hammer shall be set in conductor's room.
2. This figure is used in conjunction with the *** tunnel Ⅳ[a] and Ⅳ[b] lining section, and is respectively applicable to the V-grade surrounding rock deep-buried sections and shallow-buried unsymmetrical load sections with the width added w=0.
To skillfully master the installation, configuration, debugging and maintenance of each application system.
Thefirefighting boxesshall be set up in the temporary power distribution area, distribution board and areas where electrical welding is used in the material station. Two fire extinguishers shall be stored in the firefighting boxes with obvious signs.
① The existing concrete prefabricated member yard and the bridge prefabrication yard can be reconstructed in the local area.
Do not chase or startle wild animals, and fully respect the natural habits of wild animals.
- providing inverted U-shaped round tube and possible accessories (screws and bolts, etc.)
The test run will be performed on Shenzhen Metro Line 11 or on the test line; the operation distance shall be over 200km.
b) Distance/time monitoring: The movement distance of door is divided into segments based on the detection of door position sensor; if the door fails to pass certain segment within a given time, obstacle detection is activated.
4.3 Determination of Scope of Management System 14
Please arrive at China Railway Real Estate Group (Wuhan) Co., Ltd. (Floor 2, Building 2, Shili Hefu Community, No. T5, Shilipu, Moshuihu North Road, Hanyang District, Wuhan City) (location) on 17:00 pm, January 15, 2013 to conclude the contracting contract with the tenderee after receipt of this Notification of Award, and submit the contract to the Bidding Administration for filing.
The unevenness of artificial fill is likely to cause the uneven settlement of base and the uneven collapse and slide of slopes.
The pre-pressure for pre-loading test on the foundation shall not be less than the total force imposed on equipment foundation when the equipment is operated in full load. Reference points for observation shall be free from the impact of foundation settlement. These points shall be uniformly distributed around the foundation and shall not be less than four.
Perform the preliminary acceptance inspection on the primary and secondary parts of product; correct errors and eliminate the defects.
⑦ Instrument piping shall not affect the removal and maintenance of instruments.
1 After the subcontracted works is confirmed, the Project Management Department shall organize the quality, safety, operation and management departments to participate in the confirmation of qualified subcontractors.
DC110V Connector Base (TKD-2Z-10L)
While calculating the vertical and horizontal pressure of the train vertical live load acting on the culvert, assume that the live load transverse distribution on the rail bottom plane is 2.6m wide, the live load diffuses in the railway ballast according to an angle of 4:1, and its diffusion angle in the filler is 30°.
The Vendor shall provide the installation scheme and the number of displayer in design liaison stage, specific technical parameters and display scheme shall be confirmed in design liaison stage.
a) specify the work scope of the Contractor and deploy relevant work;
The target velocity value of passenger train shall not be greater than 120 Km/h in the Line. The ground and vehicular equipment of the train control system shall be prepared in accordance with the CTCS0 level standards. The locomotive shall be provided with the locomotive signal and operation monitoring and recording devices of which the costs shall be contained in the acquisition expenses of the locomotives.
4.1.6.6. Post Responsibilities of Tester
B.Vang Meang No. 1Tunnel L-1983m
3.1.8 Do a good job in measurement and metering, use data as the basis, and ensure the consumption quota of construction materials.
Botswana: no direction connection, but indirectly to this country via Zimbabwe.
Compared with the domestic representative models ZDJ9 and ZYJ7 point switches, it has certain technical advantages.
1 Carry out design and integration for application of special-effect, power amplifier, sound and control equipment, and design construction drawings;
The major parts (such as spray arms and legs) on the equipment shall be welded by the qualified and authorized personnel.
5. Surfaces of steel products shall be subjected to anticorrosion and antirust treatment, with the coating system being: first two passes of special red lead phenolic (alcohol acid) rust-proof primer, with each pass 35um thick and the minimum total dry film thickness of 70um, and then two passes of aluminum graphite or grey micaceous iron alcohol acid top coat with each pass 35um thick and the minimum total dry film thickness of 70um.
2.Environment humidity: The relative humidity is less than 95% for indoor places at 45°C and that is 100% for outdoor places.
3.8.5 Publicity and education on quality and safety should be well done to implement safety and quality objectives and principles everyone.
The new interchange is built in consideration of the requirement of spacing with adjacent tunnel along the main line and in accordance with the requirement of the Guidelines for Design of Highway Grade-separated Intersections.
During the excavation, only after the upper bench excavation, the initial support bears a large force, there is a slight plastic zone at the arch foot on both sides. After the lower bench excavation, the internal force redistribution is significantly reduced and there is no plastic zone.
Review the pre-commissioning and cold (linkage) commissioning program, and put forward reasonable proposals.
The ventilation and air conditioning system of station shall be designed in accordance with design criteria for ground construction works; for public areas such as station halls and platforms of ground stations, natural ventilation without heating system is preferred.
(1) Prepare accurate material purchase and supply plan.
Tensile stress did not occur at the main beam during the construction; the standard allowable value is
14.1.3 Bill of Quantities for Big Screen Works of Control Center
Main routes for improving China's railway low carbon development include:
Weekly meal improvement scheme (3 points)
6. After setting out, the construction should be reviewed by the supervisor and relevant units; and construction of main structure may be implemented after confirmation of no error.
Strikes and labor disputes directly or indirectly dealed by the Contractor, other employees, agents;
1. Prior to construction, the design personnel shall give the constructors a design explanation to make them thoroughly understand the design purpose and design intent of the design personnel.
For the layout of the processing workshops, on-site office, equipment and warehousing, power supply, water supply, sanitation, living facilities, roads, fire protection and other facilities, refer to 1.5. Layout and Implementation Plan of Large Temporary Facilities.
Table 3 shows that the vertical ultimate bearing capacity of all piles for high strain testing under the natural state ranges from 4051kN to 4202kN, with an average value of 4105kN.
Then the bridge deck shall be laid (the bridge deck shall be made of anti-skid steel plates).
5. The basic dimension of the equipment in the drawing shall be determined according to the specific equipment documents provided by the equipment manufacturer.
Within 0.1s, impulse IF of tension;
DIN VDE 0298 (90°C column);
By using complete archives, it shall record each round of stress testing process, and guarantee the stress testing able to be retrospected and reproduced.
Conduct site first-aid, report to rescue center and Emergency Response Office
60E1-1/18/24 standard welded cast frog
Ⅱ. Design basis: 1. Related specifications, procedures
The on-site construction and lighting power supplies and wires are connected without permission or they are not overhead, or short-circuit protection is not provided.
3) All the conference places can be used as the main conference place where video conferences in different scales are convoked.
In the construction, the technical information of quality shall be collected, put in order and archived to ensure the completion documents authentic and complete;
Strictly implement relevant provisions on operation certificate management and implement operation with certificates.
This line is located in the north of Pakistan, where the tropical monsoon climate prevails, featured by four distinct seasons. Summer (May~July) is rainy with high temperature while winter (December~February) is mild with little rain. The overall climate characteristic is that rainfall gradually increases and temperature gradually decreases from south to north.
Supervision of Power Supply, Communication and Signal of Beijing Rail Transit Line 15
No power device (also called filter check valve, Figure 6-32) is located between the train pipe and the total air cylinder, so that the pressure air in the train pipe can enter the total air cylinder to supply air to the brake cylinder and realize the fire-free locomotive Brake.
The above scientific and technological achievements have been promoted and applied to the work of other workmates in the Institute, effectively improving the work efficiency in terms of the traffic economy of the Institute.
Storage center shall be established to meet the management requirements after the equipment and material arrive at the site.
To save various date collectively and release information to station subsystems
e) Communicating with the display card (DPU) to transmit the axis counting information of the local and adjacent stations and the running status information of the axis counting device.
T=60ms Contact of Front Automatic Coupler
If the required expenditure has a continuous range (or scope, the same below) and all the outcomes within this range are equally likely to occur, the best estimate is determined in accordance with the median of the range, that is, the average amount of the upper-limit amount and the average amount of the lower-limit amount.
To identify and trace the product quality control conditions, relevant process parameters and each batch (hearth) of products of each working procedure are noted down as per the production process.
Staggered branch pipes shall be lifted with supporting plates in the way of placing a straight, smooth and quality wood pole having a diameter of not less than 200mm and the same size with round logs horizontally on the trench.
(2). It is required to get familiar with the management procedures issued by HEI and ensure standard and procedural equipment management in combination with management procedures and operational documents of the Company to ensure Party A's effective control and meet HEI's requirements.
Note: The steel beam numbers that not indicated in the drawing are all GL3; and the steel columns that not indicated in the drawing are all GZ
Input current rating: AC 1A, 5A;
(8) The management and filing of procurement documents and information;
(The following 5 projects were inspected and on-site guidance was given to the Dubai Golf Project: the Dubai Deira Coastal Complex, the Dubai Hashiko Power Plant, the Dubai Photothermal Power Plant, the Vietnam Capitaland FEV and the Vietnam Suncity).
The project manager shall formulate the project change plan on the basis of requirements and the assessment results of various departments on the project change
Ajuba Nigeria Ltd. is planning to handle in this way.
Flaw detection should be conducted on the rotor shaft and no crack is allowed.
------ Checking calculation for permanent deformation of asphalt mixture layer ------
Hoist load combination coefficient for gravity load representative value effect:
Straightness of tower body and difference between maximum diameter and minimum diameter of tower body at the same section shall meet the drawing requirements.
(6)After the concrete strength reaches the formwork removal requirement, the removed formworks are shrunk and then moved to the next construction area.
Water pipe for 8.5KV thyristor DC converter valve
MIN Mz -8.333 0.000 -75.000
Nadapal-Torit-Juba Highway has a plain design speed of 100km/h, two lanes in two directions and a subgrade width of 11.0 m; Kaya-Juba highway has a plain design speed of l20km/h, two lanes in two directions and a subgrade width of 11.3 m.
23.3.Test device of pantograph
3.2.3.1 Container Train Composition
The railway is started in Nairobi that is a political, economic and cultural center of Kenya, and also an important transportation hub in East Africa, and is terminated in Malaba at the border between Kenya and Uganda.
If the water sample is turbid or colored, a small amount of active carbon could be added into 100mL water sample in advance. Shake the solution adequately for 1 min. adopt medium-density dried filter paper for filtration. Then conduct measurement.
Installation Works of Mengguan Water Plant Project (Ductile Iron Pipe Package, Ductile Iron Pipe and Ancillary Pipe Fittings of Different Specifications)
SH-04-H04, Page 1 of 1
Table 1 Requirements for the power line to crisscross span or reach the electrified railway
GB/T 17626.4-2008
(11) When the prefabricated bridge deck slab is lifted, it shall be lightly lifted and lightly dropped, and shall not be subject to collisions. Special attention shall be paid to the protection of the shear keys at the edge of the prefabricated bridge deck slab.
For division of a Highway steel box girder, see Fig. 3.1-1.
The wind speed in the tunnel should meet the wind speed of diluting the peculiar smell, and the air changing velocity is not less than 3 times per hour, and the longitudinal wind speed is not less than 1.5m/s.
b) Follow up and supervise the process of repair, rework and separate use, strictly control it (inform customers when necessary), make re-inspection, fill in the Nonconforming Product Disposal Re-inspection Report, and submit it to the nonconforming product audit team.
Inspection method: visual inspection, or using magnifier, weld gauge and steel ruler, in case of doubt, leakage or magnetic particle inspection should be used.
In 2015, it is expected that the market scale of domestic aviation maintenance industry will exceed RMB 45 billion, and over 24,000 new maintenance technicians are needed. Airlines' need for aircraft maintenance will rise sharply, and the aviation maintenance industry will face a big challenge.
(2)2 Q medium-coarse sand, grayish yellow, slightly dense and slightly wet, \U+03C3=220kPa.
 Processor: more than 4 cores, basic frequency ≥800MHz;
Type tests and ex-factory tests of traction motors will be conducted as per IEC60349-2.
After an injury accident, make an emergency call to the hospital as quickly as possible.
However, the data for arrangement of work safety in winter is only available in the Natural Gas Branch, Wuhan Drill Bit Factory, the Material Supply Management Center, the Technical Center and the General Manager Office, and the rest units haven't provided any.
The project started in the national capital of Ethiopia in the west and ended in the Djibouti Port in the east;
Lane the width of the lane: tangential path 3.75m
84% of the power generation in Egypt depends on natural gas (60% of the natural gas consumption). In addition, there are two hydropower stations (the Aswan Hydroelectric Power Station in the upper reaches of the Nile) and some solar, wind and nuclear power stations.
During the construction period, toxic materials, waste water and the three wastes shall be prevented from be discharged into rivers and eventually into Shweli and Nan Wan River and being a new pollution source of water body.
29) Design Guide for Guangzhou Green Buildings
The embankments constrained by buildings or influenced by landforms should be enclosed by retaining structures such as retaining wall.
The PIS system connects to ECN switch ports of MDS via its switch, and transfers PIS system (this group and other groups ) information and video data information in real-time by connected MDS system.
Perform quality veto and confirmation right according to the terms in construction contract, and require the unqualified construction to be done again.
Except for the provisional price, the rest will be used by Party B, and Party A will pay in installments according to the progress and corresponding provisions of the contract terms.
Clause 74Termination of Contract for Project Executing Agency's Convenience
Procurement Work Specification Followed by the Project
At present, pulse speed sensor and balise are widely used for train speed measurement and positioning.
10.1.2 During the construction in work areas with gas, organization and corresponding management system for ventilation inspection and gas detection/monitoring shall be established and the meteorological parameters and the airflow velocity, airflow rate and gas concentration etc. shall be measured.
Note: A copy of the Letter of Acceptance or the Contract Agreement should be attached to this form.
Motor vehicles (excluding motorcycles) shall enter the company with a pass and waybill; other motor vehicles having no connection with production and no operation tasks are forbidden to enter the production plant area and tank area.
When undertaken by double track, the constraint is symmetrical in length direction.
When the speed sensor is installed on SC2-1 and SC3-1
49. K1539+742.9:
Applicable to tDriver-EL7 Depot Power Cabinet .
Income tax concerning foreign-invested enterprises and foreign enterprises.
Contract 15.2.7.6.3 Commissioning document
After the ship survey, the inspector shall organize to make the ship survey mark, that is, mark classification society mark, ship survey date and ship survey number at the designated position, and after checking, rub (or take pictures) for future reference.
——The Bidder should provide in detail the inlet and outlet dimensions.
Till 2017, PE import volume had reached 11794kt/a, while the export volume dropped to 247kt/a, which was much smaller than the import volume.
4.1 The allowable temperature rise of each component of the motor is as follows.
2.2.2 Analysis of Reasons for Shortage of Joint Accessories
Approval No.: (89) JGSZ No. 001
• To form an overall network system for construction and project management
Ethernet standards-based data dump interface is provided, and security code and dedicated key are set. By installing special software PTU, the maintenance personnel having permission to download can download all the data files in the event recorder data storage unit.
Anyone who does not handle reimbursement in the financial department for no special reason for more than 30 days and within 60 days of the time limit;
2.19.2.The vehicle in returning operation shall be able to pass the railway rolling stock clearance and shall not pass the hump. Vehicle tenderers shall check it.
In case of any particular occasions in the construction, e.g. the concealed works have been arbitrarily closed or covered up without being inspected, engineering materials without the certificate of quality have been used, or the materials have been replaced arbitrarily, the Chief Technical Engineer has right to issue an order of suspension of work to the Project Manager.
12.1.10 The drawings of the Tenderer shall be provided to the Supervisor Company, Design Institute and the Tenderee who have the right to use the drawings, while the Supervisor Company, Design Institute and the Tenderee shall only use them for the completion, operation, maintenance, adjustment and repair of the Project.
1. DN900 raw water pipeline laying project, including excavation of pipeline foundation trench, construction of foundation trench cushion layer, outward transportation of surplus soil, fabrication of steel pipeline elbow, external anticorrosion treatment of steel pipe, and pipeline installation
2) No green light if the person involved and the masses are not educated;
Table 2.6.1 Test Item of Weather Routing Workstation
During the cohesive soil backfilling, the laying thickness of each layer of soil should be 20%~25% less than that for normal temperature construction and the reserved settlement allowance should be larger than that for normal temperature construction.
JG/T 223 Polycarboxylates High Performance Water-reducing Admixture
ACC system can simultaneously feed back relevant original transaction data (valid data and invalid data, transaction data of transit smart cards and rail transit tickets) to all relevant service providers.
Other precipitation is lost in plant interception, depression detention, infiltration and .
For the cables horizontally laid along the bridge, they shall be laid in a single layer and arranged neatly, without crossing. Laying at the corners shall be based on the allowable bending radius of the cable with the maximum section. For the cables laid in a bridge, tray or trunk, each cable shall be fixed with a tie on the bridge, tray or trunk.
Safety Committee Office is set under the safety committee of the project to serve as a daily administrative body of the committee.
It refers to project documents, including bids, contracts, engineering technical requirements, minutes of important meetings, drawings, and notices. These documents are time-based and only related to specific works, and are transformed into record archives from executable documents along with the completion of project.
Completion data must meet the requirements on consistency between texts and illustrations and consistency between illustrations and actual conditions, and shall reflect the construction process and the actual conditions upon the completion of project.
3.0.2 The possible earthquake impact on the place where the railway engineering is located shall be described using the ground motion acceleration corresponding to the seismic fortification intensity and the characteristic period of seismic response spectrum.
Works Scope Diagram of the Road KC4 of Kampong Cham
More than 3 years of experience in special welding techniques of CNPC major projects and quality management
China Gezhouba Group Co., Ltd. /Contract Section 6 of Yunnan Xiaomo Expressway /Quality Engineer /Length of the contract section: 4.915km, with 75,446m3 of subgrade earthwork, 203,260m3 of stone excavation and 245,589 m3 of subgrade filling.
6.1.1.10 Documents shall be marked with different issuance number (for paper versions), with "Controlled" or "Uncontrolled" seal stamped on the cover.
The first lifting point is set at the lower part of the framework, and the second lifting point is arranged between the middle point and upper ternary point along the length of the framework.
Integrated waste water treatment unit: Performance load is 150t. The unit is set at the top of discharge tank.
Guangzhou South Station (formerly known as New Guangzhou Station) is the origin station of Wuhan-Guangzhou Railway, Guangzhou-Shenzhen-Hong Kong Railway, Guangzhou-Zhuhai Intercity Railway, Guiyang-Guangzhou Railway and Nanning-Guangzhou Railway. It is the most important passenger station in south China. It is a large modern transport terminal integrating various modes of transport such as railway, urban metro, bus and taxi.
Technical preparation before internal installation is preferable for the installation quality control, such as construction organization design, preparation of standard documents for steel structure installation, testing of item technique and preparation of installation sequence list of construction flow sections.
M 1521 (double-swing door) access control (magnetic lock)
Emphasis shall be put on the overall design of the station buildings' layout. The architecture style shall be in harmony with the decorative colors as a whole so that "individuality" and "general characteristics" can be brought together in harmony.
Table 6 Distribution of Teaching Weeks for Railway transport operation and management
A local equipotential bonding (LEB) terminal box shall be provided in the toilet and welded to the steel column as the down lead through two -40x4 hot-dip galvanized flat steel.
Company Name (Seal): No.3 Communications Construction Co., Ltd. of Zhejiang Communications Construction Group
Make sure that before strips are in touch with quenching water, the temperature drop shall be ≦6℃ (at the constant temperature of 500℃)
Relationship of variation of goaf collapse ground movement area, variation of movement of fissures on the ground surface and their characters with the slope; surface deformation and displacement observation shall be carried out if necessary;
Lay the 24-core communication optical cable between the access points in the station site.
Overseas layout of consultation and design agency shall be improved to make consultation and design enterprise in line with international level in terms of professional ability, operation mechanism and brand management.
Table 4-1-5-13 Additional Time for Starting in the down Direction at Athi River Station
In principle, the one who requests a sick leave shall provide the pathography, medical invoice provided by the hospital; and in principle, the one who requests a private affair leave shall provide the proof of the private affair.
Moving block is also a block technology adopted on the premise that CTCS has been equipped.
The construction of flexible busbar is a key procedure in the construction of substation. The workers of this Project are very experienced. Before construction, they will choose operation areas first. Then, they will prepare construction tools, check and clean wires, metal fittings and insulators. Finally, they will conduct grip test on test specimen and withstand test on insulators and ensure such tests are successful.
Operations such as shortening of posts or site hole-burning are not allowed even if the posts fail to be driven to the design depth.
[Attached Drawing-1] Layout Plan in Construction Stage of Dynamic Compaction
(20) Signature records on disclosure of safe construction measures.
HEC-700 (with 10 magnetic cards)
When the main air supply unit shuts down, its oil drum and pipeline are hot. Do not touch them for the avoidance of scald. Operate 30min after shutdown.
The on-board host computer picks up information from the driver operation buttons of the driver desk, generates route information and then sends it to the switch control subsystem via the train-to-wayside transmission system, and finally when the switch control subsystem receives route request, it completes switch control.
Brick, tile, sand, earth, lime, slag, etc.
Extruded aluminum alloy sections shall be assembled according to size of signs to keep flat and smooth of the board surface.
5)The high-priority insertion shall not have errors or lack practicability;
3.2 The cofferdam shall be dismantled with machines with removed earth and stones transported to specified places;
POST shall communicate with the Central System to check and confirm the Ticket has been generated by the Ticketing System. POST shall allow operator to retrieve Ticket data with one of the following methods for voiding Ticket:
Organizing inspection and acceptance of middle and small-size mechanical equipment entering the construction site.
We will submit detailed construction drawing to the Engineer for examination and approval after approval of proposed waterproof system and before commencement of waterproof Works.
[1] Study on Comparative Analysis between Numerical Simulation and Actual Measurement for the Whole Process of Deep Foundation Pit Excavation in Certain Project [D]. Minghui Ye. Qingdao University of Technology 2018
Equipment procurement cost (the standard and basis of the original price of adopted facilities)
There are 11 sensitive points of acoustic environment within the scope of project evaluation. According to the environmental characteristics such as the distribution of sensitive points along the project, the terrain and the relationship with the highway location, and the existing noise pollution sources, six representative sensitive points are selected for monitoring the present situation of acoustic environment.
This procedure is applicable to the production process control of optical fiber cables; the production process control of other produces shall refer to the respective Working Instruction.
When the Company is carrying out quality-specific review and quality supervision of the supplier, it has found major quality hidden troubles
4.2.3 All safety management requirements at the project location and those specified by the owner.
The shoulder elevation is 984.67m, and its design water level meets the requirements.
The lathe control system consists of four functional units, i.e. the CNC (computer numerical control) system, the PLC (programmable logic controller) system, the servo drive system and the MMC (man machine communication) system. With the application of bus connection, the lathe control system has an enormous interactive data access capability.
6.1.5 To ensure the solemnity and strictness of project establishment, principally, the application for procurement not included in the annual investment plan will not be approved.
Licensing system for construction, review and inspection entering floors or rooms.
Split mounting type steel formwork will be used. Side formwork will be made of 6 mm thick steel plate. Back rib will be made of 10# angle steel and bottom formwork will be of concrete terrazzo. The foundation will be tamped before fabrication.
The Tenderer shall discuss the measures for completely emptying the chilled water in detail. At the same time, the surface cooler shall be provided with the air interface for blowing chilled water, the interface for filling antifreeze and the detachable interface sealing device.
10.5.2.Establishment of Early Warning Mechanism for Ticket System
(10) Quality warranty (Refer to Chapter 10: Quality warranty in Technical Specifications in the separate volume)
Fig. 4.13 Electrostatic Discharge Immunity Test of Battery Electric Engineering Vehicle of Xiamen Line 1
In October 1964, Shinkansen in Japan, the world's first high-speed railway, was officially opened and achieved tremendous economic and social benefits.
Multistage centrifugal water pump, ≤54m3/h-64m
Vulnerable families are entitled to be free from the land adjustment within the village after land acquisition to prevent their normal production from being affected.
Frame figure of concrete road (G is road width) (unit: mm)
1) Interface design liaison plan should meet the progress requirements of both the vehicle supplier and the signal system supplier.
During the term of copyright protection of a given piece of software, after a change has occurred in the organization which holds the software's copyright, the succeeding organization legally will enjoy alltherights to the software.
(1) The provisions of "Bridge Limit -2A and Bridge Limit -2B" in "Structure Gauge for Standard Gauge Railways" (GB 146.2) shall be adopted for crossing this line.
AK180+000 ~ AK259+000
CRRC ZELC is located in Zhuzhou City in the east of Hunan Province. The city is located in the west of Luoxiao Range, an inclined section ranging from Nanling Range to Jianghan Plain in the downstream of Xiangjiang River.
Fig. 7.10 Functional Block Diagram of 3AC 440V Circuit
Temperature of precipitation mother liquor at the inlet: 50~55℃.
3600-MOV-0039, 3600-MOV-0040, 3600-MOV-0130, 3600-MOV-0157,
Isolating switch: vertical scaling and horizontal opening isolating switches are selected as 220kV isolating switch.
The water consumption for circulating in the Steam Turbine Room is about 14000m/h
The project contents of the Civil Lot C of Chengdu-Chongqing Double-line Expressway (in Chongqing) shall include the work contents of the Lot specified in the design documents in expressed or implied way as well as the project modifications approved by the Employer.
The installation location and routing of the equipment shall be in accordance with the relevant instructions in the construction drawing.
(See Sections 2.10.3 and 2.10.4)
Testing Unit: SHAN DONG ZHUO YUAN DA ENGINEERING TESTING CO., LTD.
1). Emergency preparedness and response leadership group for overturning accidents of the Project Management Department
Analyze the following issues: there is a prominent hazard in a known construction task; what are the complexities of the construction task; how to identify unknown or hidden hazards; good cooperation between operators is required.
No.1 sand paper shall be used for polishing after drying, putties and marks shall be flattened and polished, and then wall surface shall be cleaned.
6.3 Main contents of the summary report include:
Welders may only engage in the welding types covered in their welding qualification certificates;
A warning sign saying "Attention! Engine May Start Operation Automatically Without Warning!"shall be written in both English and Arabic, with the front not less than 50 mm.
Number-reinforcement or material number and material list number in the drawing
2) The anchorage length of reinforcement must conform to the specifications and design requirements.
Temporary: Level 0.2 for secondary winding (for metering), level 0.2 for tertiary winding (for measurement), level 3P for remaining voltage winding, specifically determined in the technical liaison
3.2.1 For confirmed qualified suppliers, the review shall be organized according to the interval specified in the procedure documents.
3.10 Atmospheric pressure in summer (Pa) 895.9
Your Inn (Xi'an) Hotel Management Co., Ltd.
Standard of Construction Safety Inspection JGJ59-2011
When the air ducts pass through the firewall, the fire dampers on the two sides of fire zones shall be no more than 200mm from the wall surface. After installation, the joints between the wall openings and fire dampers shall be sealed by cement mortar.
Putting drilling machine in place → drilling and slurry injection → placing casing (sleeving) → checking quality of finished hole → hole bottom cleaning
(3) Subgrade cross-section of town sections (LK0+000-LK2+200 / LK49+500 - LK50+517.5)
4.1.2 The Quality Management Department is the centralized management department of product inspection status identification, and shall be responsible for identification and inspection of inspection status identification.
Registration rate of special equipment reaching 100%; regular inspection rate reaching 100%; serviceability rate and utilization rate of HSE facility reaching more than 97%; certification rate of personnel managing special equipment reaching 100%;
When one continuous pouring exceeds 1000m3, the sampling shall not be less than once per 200m3of concrete of the same mix proportion;
Work of acceptance and line opening will be carried out after the completion of the relocation work; the original road will be dismantled after the acceptance is qualified.
3.3 Party B shall be entitled to reject new bookings from Party A, until the losses caused to Party B by Party A due to any booking abnormalities have been settled.
(1) The integrated touch display must pass the 3C certification, UL, CE and FCC certifications, and conform to the lead-free ROHS standard;
Coverings are required during transportation to prevent rain, sunlight and high temperature.
3. The toilet is provided with ventilator, which is mounted in the ceiling. Exhaust duct uses plastic hose and is connected with the ventilation louver to the outside. The outlet is provided with rat proofing mesh.
1) Location and quantity: one set in car washing line.
Enugu, Makurdi, Lafia
1) Before construction, re-inspection shall be taken to the original ground to verify whether the designed drainage position on the drawing meets the actual situation.
With the use of roof overhangs, built on stilts and set-back models, the green base is formed in podiums, the pleasant medical environment being created.
7) Feeder grounding shall meet the requirements. The upper layer of tape wrapped on feeder grounding clamp shall press 4/5 of the lower layer, with both ends exceeding at least 5 cm, and the last layer of tape shall be wrapped from bottom to top.
(1) As for internal partition walls, except those of rooms with water and toilets are 200mm clay brick walls, those of various rooms in Floor 1 to 9 are 200mm hollow clay brick walls.
The welding for steel structure shall be in the charge of the welders with a certificate of quality.
JB/T9874-1999 Metal-Cutting Machine Tools Assembly– General Specifications
The cubes for testing upon delivery shall be randomly taken from the same truck, and the concrete cubes shall be taken from 1/4 and 3/4 of the unloaded concrete during unloading;
Rest room lighting source WL1: WDZD-BYJ-3X2.5-P20-WC/FC
(4)Field intensity of operation: 3.5V/m≤ E≤ 60V/m;
The total cost of ownership shall be determined at the product design phase, and the verification procedure shall be specified.
Reply: According to the experts' opinions, we have added such requirements as type an quantity of plants, excavation sizes for planting holes and spacing of plants into the design drawings.
8.2.1 The daily average handling quantity of containers received, containers dispatched and containers for transshipment in the container transfer area shall be determined according to the annual handling quantity of containers received, containers dispatched and containers for transshipment as well as the fluctuation coefficient of receiving-departure volume of containers at the railway logistics center, and can be calculated as per the following formula:
Before the test, the working performance parameters of the vibratory roller including vibration frequency, vibration amplitude and pressure of the vibration-damping pneumatic tire etc. shall be checked.
Before marking off, bending rise within 1m of each steel plate shall be no greater than 1mm. If greater than 1mm, the plate-leveling machine shall be used for leveling.
2. The engine emergency start function is required when verifying that the clutch or brake pedal signal is abnormal.
Sampling and testing should be done in the presence of the Contractor's authorized representative and the Monitoring Consultant.
Assist in customers' financing – the non-secured financing behaviors that assist customers in borrowing money or getting credit cards from banks or other non-bank financial institutions. The assistance in financing that requires bearing liability to guarantee shall not be executed until it is approved by the Financial Department of headquarters; the assistance in financing that does not require bearing liability to guarantee shall be reported to the Financial Department of headquarters for filing.
The Contractor shall, during the concrete pouring, make arrangements continuously at a steady rate for the delivery of ready-mixed concrete to ensure proper compaction of time between each batch mixture. Whilst the interval of delivery time for each batch mix must not be too long.
CPU Intel Core i5 dual-core 670;
6.13.4.3.3 At least one lift sub shall be installed in each floor and the installation height shall be 1.5~1.8m above the ground.
New materials (provided with special accessories and construction tools) and technologies are used to accomplish a higher efficiency than before.
1. Strictly abide by various management regulations on safe fire utilization, working at heights, construction power consumption, operation in limited space, fire and explosion prevention.
The AFC system has a five-level structure: the central clearing house system (CCHS), line central computer system (ATC central control station), station computer system, station fare collection equipment and ticket system.
Passed the Test for National Supervision Engineer and obtained the National Certified Supervision Engineer Certificate in 2010.
(4) Imperfect earth of the metallic equipment in the workshops may result in electrostatic accumulation and even a fire due to a certain degree of ignition energy the electrostatic discharge reaches.
The edge of the window glass is the black screen printing to reduce the UV radiation.
3) Upon the receipt of accident reports, the Management Department should immediately convene members of the emergency rescue leading group and initiate the emergency plan and members of the emergency rescue leading group should follow the regulations of the emergency plan and under the leading of the guidance personnel, carry out the work as per their responsibilities.
According to the height of every formwork and the chimney shaft slope, the sheet of cylinder radius and elevation construction dimension is compiled.
Contents of services to be provided: All work related to the structures of Commercial and Residential Buildings1#, 4# and 5.
Pipe resistance curve changing, resistance increasing and the fan working point changing.
11.1.27 Pile body concrete of pile foundation shall be continuous and complete.
The main lines and connectors below are installed: three-phase AC380V main power supply line and KC20A power connector (dual-circuit single line); DC600V main through line and KC20D power connector (dual-circuit dual line, power source not onboard); 39-core main line and connector.
α - the intersection angle (degree) between the plumb line and the back slope of the retaining wall is positive counterclockwise and negative clockwise;
INFRASTRUCTURE INSPECTION RESEARCH INSTITUTE, CHINA ACADEMY OF RAILWAY SCIENCES BEIJING IMAP TECHNOLOGY CO., LTD.
GINA gasket is hoisted by truck crane, crawler crane or gantry crane and paved with manpower.
1~3 piles and side piles of the strip pile foundation along the vertical axis direction and in the pile group foundation.
Telecommunication cabinet 800x1000 42U with indication of door opening zones
October 2002 - September 2005 Reconstruction and Expansion Project of Nanjing Railway Station Technician
Classification scope of three categories as the "critical", "important" and "general" and material test items whose test reports are required to be issued are listed as below.
The hand brake shall be good in braking, releasing and adjusting.
Technical director: senior construction engineer.
4) Two sets of rectifier units shall be provided in the traction substation to form the equivalent 24-pulse rectifier and supply power to conductor rails, for the purpose of the reduction of harmonic injecting into power supply system.
Mark out the position line of the door frame opening on the ground according to the design requirements.
① The trench shall be backfilled immediately after the pipeline is laid.
5.15.2.5Installation Requirements of Power Distribution Box
The second floor of Emergency building is 15-bed internal medicine observation room and 20-bed surgical emergency room, the second floor of the outpatient building is the functional inspection and inspection center, the logistics functions and green set-back models are set at the east side of second floor of, with a building area of 3730㎡ on this floor;
The new software of the TVM provided by this bid is designed by OO method, so that the provided TVM can provide very flexible business, and limit the changes of new business to a limited extent. In this way, local changes do not affect the whole.
4. Fixing by fastening, splicing and tile paving, fully sticking, nailing for ridge tile and cornice sealing.
After reaching the customer's site within the specified time, he shall be registered at first time by the site service team leader
Of course, we also respect the decisions made by the general contractor and subcontractors based on their own interests and principles.
Normally, action like addition of a proper amount of admixture (fly ash, slag powder, etc.) and additive for concrete workability improvement is taken to improve water retention, and thereby to reduce bleeding.
Record the fault information of the monitoring object and display it on the display screen in the cab.
4.1.7 Hinge the hinge head at the long end of the stay bar with the hinge seat of the stand, and insert the split pins for locking.
The installation position, clearance and mechanical action of the above items shall be inspected, and adjustments that do not meet the requirements shall be made in a timely manner.
Portable toilets will be set for construction working faces and full-time staffs will be appointed to clean the toilets.
The requirements for fire prevention, flame retardancy and toxicity of the selected materials and components shall conform to the corresponding grade of EN45545, and certificates demonstrating that the selected materials meet the corresponding fire prevention requirements shall be provided.
Section No. 2.7.3.2 Description Electrical Works
Refer to the construction of smeared waterproof layer of the end wall of precast reinforced concrete box culvert and pipe culvert.
Absence of safety signs at construction sites or improper arrangement.
(5) It is required to amend and improve survey reports and design documents according to review comments of the Consultant, the Employer and the superior department in charge, submit 10 copies of final draft for survey report and preliminary design documents respectively as well as 10 copies of final draft for construction drawing design documents respectively for each contract section;
Reinforcement Methods of Binding and Fixing Steel Sheet Piles with Common Stay Wire and " Y" Type Stay Wire
b) If the inspection items need to be inspected with inspection equipment, the debugging, calibration and appraisal of inspection equipment shall be made in advance, such as the intelligent torque spanner, tonnage compression equipment and circumscription.
The roads for motor vehicles are built along buildings to meet the requirements for fire protection and transport.
3. The scale in the drawings is 1:2000.
A. If the abutment front conical slope is available based on terrain conditions, when the filling height at the bridge head is ≤ 6 m, the pile abutment is set up; when the filling height at the bridge head is > 6m, a spill-through abutment is set up.
For example, require the original copies of data for verification during MSA, log in the supplier's website for query, and invite a third-party agency to verify, etc.
In overall consideration of the structural type, project scale and other characteristics, for the construction of Joint Workshop A and Joint Workshop B, no tower crane will be provided. Instead, auto cranes will be used for hoisting of materials such as reinforcement and formwork, installation of steel structure, and transfer of materials.
See Figure 6.9.4.4-1 for construction process flow of drainage pipes.
Fabricating and spreading false information via the Internet to influence secuirities' and futures' trading and the disruption of the financial market;
Registered capital of the Company is RMB 23,338,335,563.
The bearing is 16.5cm high, the bottom of bearing shall be filled with M 50 hard dry non-shrinkable mortar (which is 2.5cm thick), and the bearing pad stone 16cm high.
The connecting line of ICD railway station yard starts from the western throat of Nairobi South Station and parallels the existing line towards west. The station is designed with 4 loading and unloading tracks and 1 locomotive running track, of an effective length of 900–1,005 m.
It is strictly prohibited to stack materials and tools on the scaffold, and the safety net shall not be removed at will, and the scaffolding board shall not be removed and sawed off at will.
2.7.6Local equipotential connection plates and grounding devices shall be provided in weak electricity rooms, fire control room and shower rooms.
Carry out hole drilling until the drilling completion conditions are met, and then insert the jet grouting pipe.
6.1.1 The policy of ""prevention foremost, combination of prevention and extinguishing should be implemented, the principle of "linear responsibility and territorial management" should be adhered to, the management system of unified leadership, responsibility division for functional departments, joint involvement of employees, hierarchical fire risk control, and emergency rescue resource sharing of the Company should be implemented.
The elevation of the pump station for tailings delivery in the concentrator is 4515m, and the elevation of the intermediate pump station for tailings delivery is 4885m, which is arranged beside the San Antonio TSF. The tailings are delivered to the tail of the TSF in the form of ore drawing at tail.
In principle, the design liaison will be prepared twice, mainly before the equipment is put into production or before the equipment is installed.
(2) Combine the principle of Party management of cadres with the Executive Director's legal selection of managers, and with the managers' legal exercise of their rights of selecting and appointing personnel.
The supply chain logistics management requirements and all the deliverable requirements related to products.
(a) Fault code: BGDU, BGOH and BKMF.
When hot work such as welding is carried out above the grille, in addition to taking measures to protect the grille, fire prevention or other measures shall be taken below it to prevent fire or burns to personnel.
Device for protection and outgoing line on the axle head of the instrumented wheelset.
Obvious traffic signs, safety signs and alarm lights shall be provided in construction site. The signs shall be seen at night to ensure the safety of construction machineries and personnel.
Table 3-10-3 Synchronization/No-voltage Mode of Reclosing
Grounding resistence of buildings, structures and equipments at connection of run-through grounding cable in integrated grounding system shall not be larger than 1Ω.
4.2.1.3 Measure the current rail temperature with the thermometer, and open the expansion joint to the clearance corresponding to the current temperature according to the temperature- clearance table.
The energy efficient engineering measures adopted by the design line and traction power of the project are as follows: the alignment is selected according to the natural conditions, topography and geological features along the line. After multiple schemes selection and optimization, lines with straight alignment and small height shall be selected while taking into account the dense traffic points along the line, to reduce the energy consumption of the locomotive.
For these four categories of waste, if necessary, the picture of waste that can be placed in the garbage can shall be pasted on the garbage can.
a. Conduct the test in strict accordance with the design documents and work procedures.
It is necessary to timely report the non-conforming information to the owner or suppliers, and discuss for treating methods.
Organization Name: China Railway 18 Bureau Group Co., Ltd.
The housing of the multi-screen of the Overview Projection System shall be marked with the manufacturer's name or registered trademark, model or description, rated voltage of power supply or applicable range of voltage.
Figure 10 Macro Appearance of Fracture on One Side of the Head of Bolt E
Parameters (including left cone, right cone and keys) of completed tunnel segments designed to show different kinds of building blocks.
Check whether the contacts are loose and prevent additional noise.
As the sole person in charge of all contractual obligations, the Contractor shall always ensure that necessary capability to perform the contract object is available.
Passenger compartments should be provided with adequate pillars, handrills, strap hangers and other devices.
Schedule 2 Schedule of Verification Test Pit Workload within Section
The cement delivered out of factory longer than 3 months must be sampled for physical test and can be used only after the physical test is passed.
The side slopes shall be provided with complete protection according to the design requirements.
The abutment is provided with large combined steel formworks and reinforced by scaffolds.
Information assets: anything valuable to the organization.
Refer to attached Table 6-4-10 Construction Schedule of Information Works for detailed construction schedule of information works.
Main arrangements for construction period: 8 months for subgrade treatment under the roadbed, 6 months for the subgrade bed sub-base; 6 months for the bed surfacing, 3 months for settlement after the work, and the total construction period is about 23 months.
Interference free performance for the communication media between equipment houses shall be improved when they are not placed in close proximity.
American Northeast Corridor EMU: Each group of winding has three output contacts (AC25kV/AC12.5kV for switching).
The weight of T1 slab in track and field stadium is within 16t, and the weight of T2 slab is within 10t. The maximum installation radius is 33m.
The location-based land prices for land acquisition in the whole area have been agreed by the people's government of the autonomous region and is implemented as of January 1, 2020. The original uniform average annual output value compensation rates for land requisition shall be simultaneously suspended.
6) Hole spacing on flange plate: hole spacing on a single flange plate is ±0.7mm;
Maximum eccentricity of pier body : 1.1329 (2.7202) m Maximum compressive stress of concrete: 2.933 (15.3400) MPa
Dual-EDRMs redundancy; in this way, data and faults are recorded synchronously, and a single fault will not affect the recording function;
The fastening element of bolt clamp fastening can be the type Ⅱ spring rail clips. Height-adjusting pad, rubber and rubber-plastic insulation tie plates can be placed under rails and iron tie plates.
In case that there is no APS sending "parallel success" signal within time limit, TMS identifies the situation as external short circuit and disconnect two parallel contactors.
The rated number of personnel in the locomotive depot is 26, which cannot meet the requirements.
4.The performance and use of riveters and hydraulic systems shall be in line with the Technical Specification and the relevant national technical and safety standards.
Therefore, the contractor is required to explicit the procedures and check system, etc. of the quality monitoring in the process quality control plan, which is used for basis followed by the supervision company and the contractor.
27.3.2 Seller shall at its own cost make necessary change and remediation on such conflict, error and omission, and modify the corresponding files, drawings and documentations. Seller's performance of obligations hereunder shall not alleviate and release any liabilities under the contract.
The compressed air pressure of red line TOP of each user is notless than 0.5MPa.
5.2.2.3 Technical Requirements for SAM Key System
1.5 thick CPS reaction sticking type high polymer wet laying waterproof coiled materials (double-sided adhesive: reaction bonding sealant+crossing strong film)
HSSE Director: daily emergency management work and directly organizing and commanding the rescue team to implement rescue, organize accident investigation and summarize experience and lesson learned.
Since July, China Railway Kunming Group Co., Ltd. has increased the transportation capacity for three times to meet the travel demand of passengers and strive to maximize the efficiency and benefit of train operation during the summer passenger rush.
Electrical room, steel rolling finished product analysis station and sulfur print station are of reinforced concrete frame structure and raft foundation. Electrical room before the furnace is of strip foundation.
3. The gas detector around the compressor shall be placed near the platform of the compressor and near the sealing.
2The monorail beam is small in width and the beam column is narrow, with less land occupied , less space blocked and a small impact on sunshine; it can match the surrounding environment.
Construction Schedule Bar Chart of Power Supply Project for Laos-China Railway (Package 2)
The structure form of the proposed project is relatively single. There are 4 bridges with total length of 285 meters and 603 culverts along the whole line of the project.
The rebar fabrication plant shall be a light steel structure plant, and meet the production process and use requirements. Steel fabrication and storage of raw materials, semi-finished products and finished products shall be clearly divided into areas, and all kinds of marks and boards shall conform to regulations.
2. Markings such as passenger service, guidance and safety shall be further improved, especially the safety warning markings;
Outdoor: HDPE double-deck twisted pipe; indoor: UPVC pipe
For large equipment and newly purchased equipment required for the project, negotiation and purchasing shall be made immediately once bid winning is confirmed, to determine the time of mobilization.
The PIS exchanges information with other systems via the external interface. The main interfaces are as below:
The first-class and second-class face-to-face seats are easy to set, and the waste container can be emptied without any tool. These seats and the waste container are not easy to destroy intentionally and remove by passenger(s).
For overseas projects requiring local construction subcontracting resources, the general contracting project department shall conduct special investigation and put forward special subcontracting implementation plan after discussion and consultation with the project management center, regional companies and the accounting center.
3. Scope of works: totally 210.598km (main track kilometer) of communication, signal, information, electric power and auxiliary works, large-scale temporary facilities and transition works within the section from Xilinhot-Duolun complex line K6+600 (Xilinhot North Station, the intersection of Xilingol-Ulanhot line and Xilinhot-Duolun line) to K204+053.
Personnel engaged in inspection and testing shall have the corresponding qualifications and obtain a certificate of approval.
7. For the stirrup (N16) in the top slab of framework, the length and number listed in the reinforcement list only includes that of the outer stirrup of slanting rib.
When the transformer is at the position of each tap, the transformer should be able to withstand the dynamic and thermal stability of sudden short circuit of end terminals without causing any damages, deformations and looses of fasteners.
According to the provisions of EN12663 and UIC566, the allowable stress of load condition 1 is 0.5S, the allowable stress of load conditions 2-4 is S, and the fatigue strength load condition 5 is its fatigue strength limit.
Please refer to Method Statement of Bent Caps of Transition Piers of Main Bridge and Approach Bridge for details.
3.5.1.2 Check the fuel volume of the fuel tank.
As for the protection, measurement and control devices of 11kV line, the integrated device of protection, measurement and control has been adopted by measuring the position status of 11kV line current and line voltage, 11kV line switches and knife switches and the relevant state variables of 11kV switch cabinet.
The route position crosses with A1, B1, B3 and urban roads along the linr for many times, and is limited by terrain conditions. Therefore the route is in different forms when crossing over the highways.
According to investigation and analysis results, the per capita net income in 2017 is increased by RMB 7450.01 compared with that in 2015.
5 Reinforcement is accepted in batches in terms of levels, grades, specifications, and manufacturers, and separately stored without mixing, each with clear signs.
b The protruding parts such as reinforcing mesh shall be cut and leveled with a hammer, and be plastered with mortar and plain lime.
Risk assessment shall be conducted before the change is implemented.
At the joint of pipe sections, a 15 cm wide mortar band shall be plastered with 1:3 cement mortar, and then 2 layers of asphalt shall be applied to ensure that no external water can permeate into the culvert pipe.
Rainsheds covered by waterproof cloths shall be provided for yards stacking hygroscopic material.
The MVB cable above has 4 cores, and only red and black cable cores are used. The pin configuration of the connectors are shown in Table C.1 and Table C.2:
10. Upon construction, N1 steel bar should be bent along the discharge slope surface to ensure that protective layer of N1 steel bar at the discharge slope top is not too thick which may result in cracking of the beam top.
Measuring points 1-2 are arranged on both sides of the vehicle and parallel to the side wall of the vehicle, with a distance of 7.5 m from the longitudinal axis of the vehicle and a height of 1.2 m above the road surface.
10.4.5.5 Safety Measures for Finish Works
Located in Pakistan, this project is to reconstruct the existing railway line to a light rail transit. Existing railway station is used and corresponding reconstruction is made. New railway stations are built along the line and interchange is achieved with intersections.
The ore produced from Xiushuihe iron mining area is put into the market after dressing in its self-built ore dressing factory. The extracted ore grade is 20.58％(TFe%), and the dressed ore grades are 54.00% for ferrovanadium concentrate and 42.00% for titanium concentrate.
Equipment access doors shall be closed and locked for revenue operation.
Bearing NU313Q1/P69S0
For track circuit section, the overhead catenary system discipline shall provide with the signal discipline the location of signal choke transformer that connected by boosting cable.
Underfloor wheel lathe and rail-road cars project for Huaihua passenger train servicing subdivision
7.1 Top-mounted valve body structural design: Internal parts of valve can be replaced and repaired online by removing the valve cap instead of removing the valve from the pipeline.
Electric interlocking shall be adopted between the isolation handcart and circuit breaker handcart.
Cross section: two-tube and double layers; outer diameter: 15.2 m
The party subjected to losses may appeal for the default events;
Additional two rows of consolidation grouting will be set 3m upstream and downstream of dam axis.
With an insulation washer (Item 1) placed between, the carbon brush yoke (Item 5) and the mounting rack (Item 2) are connected with double-thread screws.
We encourage all employees to take full advantages of the system to find any human error and correct it before the products are returned to the customers.
Check actions (EBK action and lowering down the pantograph) of the mushroom push button when it's still.
Safety warning railings or signs shall be set near major construction sections.
This Project is located at the special LNG area (Berth 3) of Qimu Island port in Longkou City, Shandong Province. One special LNG jetty is constructed, with the unloading ship type of 80,000 ~ 266,000 m3 LNG ships and the loading ship type of 10, 000 ~ 180,000 m3 LNG ships.
Both ends of the roof gutter shall be connected with the drain ditch to form a complete drainage system, or the water shall be led to the side far away from the line (reverse slope side).
Emergency braking deceleration: 1.2 m/s²
Those who violate the principle of keeping oil, water, tools and accessories off the ground during the maintenance will be fined RMB 50 per time;
Timely inspect the transmission parts of machines, repair and adjust if defects are found.
When the brake system is assembled, the fasteners such as bolt, nut, washer, split pin, round pin and pulling rivet as well as the brake pipe hanger surface must be subject to anticorrosive treatment. After being assembled, the clamp ends of brake pipe hanger must be pinched.
The train is moving slowly because of the rainstorm.
8) When digging the cable trench, if the soil is soft or deep, set a slope appropriately to prevent landslides.
After the collector head of pantograph is lifted, it contacts wire and and collects the current from overhead contact system, and transfers the current into the electrical system inside locomotive.
1. Select the low-pollution device and install an air pollution control system;
Table 12 (Continued 3) Load Combination of Main Load Conditions for Simulated Running (Rolling Factor )
In cases where a 2 m length of the discharge return cable is insufficient, (e.g. for tall EUTs), a length not exceeding 3 m may be used, but compliance with the waveform specification shall be verified.
China has helped Kenya build this railway to which China's standards were applied. It is the largest infrastructure project that have ever been built since Kenya became an independent country.
Design works: by the end of June 30, the design works of the Contractor is basically completed.
The windscreen wiper is electric, which is installed in the front of the cab and used for scraping rain water and other coverings (such as mud, insects) that need to be scraped.
The main lakes within the scope of the railway is Lake Victoria and Lake Naivasha, both of which have a little engineering influence on the railway because they are far from the railway route.
The exposed metallic conduit is coated with part 15 (heat preservation material).
(1)Under the condition of AW3 load and with 1/4 power loss, the train can normally operate throughout the day without limiting the speed basically.
There are many villages and tribes distributed along the line. The poor condition of road has caused a lot of trouble for the people and severely strained the exchange and development of economy and culture, and the stagnated social and economic development thus result in poor living standard.
When the reinforcement of the foundation beam crosses horizontally, the reinforcement of main beam shall be above those of the secondary beam.
The clearance from the bottom of the lower chord of the main truss to the bridge deck is 5.5, which allows transfer and possible temporary storage of girder sections on the deck.
The annual average concentration of the basic pollutant evaluation project of the project is calculated by referring to the air quality data of Yongfu County Ambient Air Monitoring Station.
See Table 3-3 and Figure 3-17~ Figure 3-47 for details of culvert construction joints and segment joints through inspection.
1) Do not pollute equipment or building materials when passing through the line. Keep the surrounding environment clean.
Lines must not be equipped with pressure relief equipment in principle, such as electric reactors, arresters and electromagnetic voltage transformers.
◎ Different from: simple vehicle manufacturing enterprises, survey and design enterprises, the EPC enterprises and operation and maintenance enterprises.
Project tailoring table, technical specifications and T5 checklist.
Seat area without reading lights: at 0.8m above the floor, the mean illuminance is ≥150Lx;
The design contractor shall follow the project design quality assurance program for the design process planning.
(1) The Contractor shall be fully liable for the applicability, reliability and safety of all the site operation and construction methods.
Environmental Testing for Electric and Electronic Products--Part 2: Test Methods--Test Db: Damp Heat, Cyclic (12h+12h cycle) (IEC 60068-2-30:2005, IDT)
The hinged channel includes the hinged module and the gangway.
2.5.5.2 Provide the report on results physical and mechanical property test for each batch of steel.
5.1.2.6 Attention shall be paid to the weld spacing during the pipeline prefabrication.
Table 3-10 Construction Progress Indicators of Tunnel Lining
Collection refers to transport the urban waste at its source to the waste collection station or concentrated transportation place; collection and transportation to the transfer station refers to transport the waste in waste collection station to each waste transfer station with collection and transportation vehicles; waste transfer refers to transfer the waste to transport machine of large capacity in the transfer station and transport to waste disposal plant.
This code defined that the design service life of railway concrete structure is divided into three levels, i.e. 100 years, 60 years and 30 years, in accordance with the main contents of the above specifications and in combination with the actual railway engineering conditions.
The Bidder shall propose detailed training suggestions in bidding according to the requirements of the Tenderee.
The Document is applicable to the Additional Nine (9) Sets of New 4-Car Trains and Other Related Works for Monorail Line.
These Terms of Service may be revised when necessary with relevant announcements posted on the Website. The modification will take effect immediately after the announcement is made.
The bridge and its substructure are already compatible with freight requirements.
Stumps are digged out by an excavator, moved, and buried into a prepared ditch, which is backfilled later.
The training rate of the persons in the construction production site operation should be 100%;
For options, please refer to Tab.3 of 5.8.2.
During the process of hoisting, it is required to strengthen the equipment protection and guarantee the staff safety on the principle of safety first.
Table 4.2.3-4 Score of Frequency of Exposure to Hazardous Environment for Personnel E
In case of sudden power off, all the controllers must be switched to zero positions and the main power supply must be cut off. Measures must be taken to lift the heavy objects down to the earth.
The on-site binding of reinforcement is conducted according to design requirements and before binding, rust removal measures shall be conducted to reinforcement.
1)It is advisable to use standard library functions and public functions to the largest extent;
The real-time information is collected in each system through different forms such as front-end sensor or the gateway interface; the logic control is realized with the local controller; and the corresponding functions are finally be integrated into the platform of the upper computer.
Is the battery voltmeter (=72-P101) reading greater than 84V
(7) Other events to be treated as major social security incident.
Required Carrying Capacity in Study Years (Unit: Pair/Day)
The construction of guide wire and ground wire shall be carried out with guide ropes (South Korean silk ropes) laid by unmanned aerial vehicle, traction ropes laid by one-to-five method, and four-bundled conductors laid by one-to-four method.
Output method for the design and development shall be applicable to validation of inputs of the design and development, and shall be approved before release.
In order to ensure smooth falling of waste on its own weight and maintain the negative pressure of the incinerator chamber, the design adopts measures as indicated below:
Doc. No.: AHK JL TTRC-QM
4.2.4 The GMO shall be responsible for the maintenance of fire-fighting equipment, fire extinguishers and fire safety signs of the Company to keep them sound and valid, and ensure the evacuation passage and emergency exit are unblocked.
Rivulet: with top width of 6m, water surface width of 3m and water depth of 0.5–1m; slow water flow, clear water, bedrock outcrop in the middle of the riverbed; grain size of 0.5–1.5m and heights of slopes on both banks of the riverbed of about 2–3m; the surface layer of auburnish yellow silty sand and silty find sand with thickness of 1.5–2m.
5.2.5.7.2.All microcomputer systems and input/output (I/O) modules of the train shall have their own independent power supply units with redundant structure. When one I/O module or control object is short-circuited, it will only cause the failure of the local operation , but not the failure of the whole system.
Total contract price (in words): two million one hundred and fifty six thousand yuan only (RMB 2,156,000)
1) Before aligning the sockets of cast iron pipes, the foreign matters in the sockets should be removed. When aligning, 1-2mm expansion gaps should be reserved. The annular gap of sockets should be consistent.
Scientific and technological innovation, scientific management, high-quality and high-efficient and customer satisfaction;
fcu,k——Concrete cube compressive strength standard value;
The collectively-owned land under temporary occupation is involved with 13 groups in 5 villages of Dongxi Town, and thus the temporarily occupied land of 108.00 mu is required. The temporary occupation will affect 575 persons from 137 households (among which 441 persons from 105 households are affected by the permanent land acquisition).
Strong wind force (strong wind over 10 is commonly seen in all over the year), mountain pass of abundant sand source (including exposed sand and concealed sand) and the regions of gobi wind-drift sand with the annual sediment yield over 10m3/m in unit length.
3. The layout of breadth is applicable to continuous T-girders.
4.6.High-speed circuit breakers or electronic switching devices
(1) Structure self-weight: The unit weight of reinforced concrete is calculated at 25kN/m3, and the self-weight of the haunched part is simplified to uniform load within the haunched range.
The switchback verification processing shall be part of the switchback process and shall be completed within the switchback time requirement.
guide, supervise and check weekly HSE activities and deliver a guiding speech before each shift working.
Product damage due to inadequate packaging strength or cost waste due to excessive strength shall be avoided;
Marking materials should be given an overall consideration, with the longer matching with the shorter, the larger first and the smaller later or should be carried out based on complete set of materials; the components with lots of joints or requiring more processing shall be marked first; If a certain component requires ingredients, such materials for ingredients must be marked at the same time.
Supplementary report in case of new situation after reporting of the incident.
Properly protect the ecological environment and natural feature outside the quarry area, take corresponding water and soil conservation measures on the land used to prevent soil erosion from causing water loss and soil erosion.
The horizontal span of bridge deck slabs is great, so the stress is more unfavorable, and transverse rebars are many; transverse prestress is applied when necessary.
Xiamen- Anxi Intercity Expressway (Yunbu- Tiancuo Section) A Contract Section
35. Environmental Factor Identification and Assessment Training – Provide environmental factor identification and assessment training for members of the implementing team.
Technical Specification for Equipment Purchasing (GC-1-6)
No. 1 Tunnel is located in the territory of Ngong Town of Nairobi Region, and has mileage of DK34+826-DK39+333 and total length of 4,507m.
(3) If the blade is more than 1m long, it shall be made by sections, and supporting and reinforcing measures shall be adopted between the valve and blade axle;
7.Onboard LCD display screen (dynamic map)
Prepare special constrution organization design for power utilization, report it to competent department and the supervisor for approval and then put it into practice.
The fronts of cabinets (frames) should be flush, and the vertical deviation should not be more than 1‰ of the height. When adjacent cabinets (frames) are close to each other, the gap betwen them should not be more than 3 mm.
2) Review the design and construction drawings before construction, and ask the Chief Engineer to make corrections if any errors are found.
Instillation of pipes based on laying method can be divided into installation of buried mains and overhead mains.
The "online" indicator is on, indicating this set as the main channel; the indicator is off, indicating this set as the subordinate channel.
The column grab rails shall be made of stainless steel and the surface can be brushed.
Whether construction safety responsibility system, safety management regulatory system and safety operation rules conform to regulations;
See table 3-25 for result of the screening analysis on April 19, 2016.
Our PSMS software was certified by national computer software copyright in 2009, and received the computer software copyright registration certificate of comprehensive service platform automation function testing software of PRC National Copyright Administration. The certificate is as follows:
Tests Bb, Bd, and Be are similar. Differences are noted in 5.2.2, 5.3.2 and 5.4.2. All other portions of the tests are the same, starting with Clause 6.
First, the peripheral structure of the subway station is split, to form sub-unit components with the profile steel made temporary structure.
5) Technical Code for Projects of Municipal Solid Waste Incineration CJJ90-2009
According to installation drawing for wire arrangement equipment in cab and Bill of Material, allocate the cable duct and fastener assembly, and install the parts in place respectively as per the drawing requirements. Note: install framed protective strips for protection at the end of metal cable duct and the cable outlet as per wire arrangement requirements.
At the same time, the operations such as large rubber pads distributing, lubricating of screws and application of insulating and anticorrosive paint shall also be completed.
(2) In-situ foundation treatment: remove topsoil, shrubs, weeds and silt; cut down trees and remove roots; properly handle pits and graves, fill them in layers and compact them to the original ground elevation; treat special foundation with gravel pile, CFG pile and cement injection pile;
1. Change description of M-DORM-S-008: Adjustment is made for structures at axis 14.1 layer to axis 30 of No.5 Building according to the architectural requirements.
A new freight traffic management system shall be set at the industrial park station.
150#concrete support(m3/m)
DR.KARNTHIP CHATIVONG DIRECTOROF THE BUREAU OF PRIVATE VOCATIONAL EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION, THEOFFICE OF VOCATIONAL EDUCATION COMM, MINISTRY OF EDUCATION
Wet joint concrete pouring shall be completed at one time. After formworks are installed in position, purge dirt in them and remove the water at bottom. Wet joints shall pass self-inspection first and then be rechecked by the supervising engineer before concrete pouring.
Water-interception ditches are provided on the stages of excavated slopes and constructed together with the skirts for shotcrete with wire mesh. See the design drawings of shotcrete with wire mesh for details of the dimensions.
15. Highway Bridge Expansion and Contraction Installation (JT/T327-2004);
The container flat wagon is used to transport two 20-feet international standard containers on a 1, 676mm railway in Sri Lanka and it complies with the clearance in Sri Lanka.
Range of operating environment temperature: -10 ℃ -60 ℃;
The Contractor shall be consulted with in terms of changes that affecting their occupational health and safety.
Review the project quality report and report it to the superior quality management department in a timely manner;
After the concrete is solidified, 2cm of polymer water-proof cement mortar is used for wiping the surface, and the composite waterproof layer is laid on the surface. Segmented construction is used in the tunnel portal wall. Water permeable filler of artificial symmetrical lamination is used vault backfill, with thickness of not more than 20cm for each layer, small machines shall be used to compaction.
Short-term stage: within the pilot areas, preliminarily select some residential quarters, government agencies, schools and representative scenarios in the pilot areas to perform the pilot work of domestic waste classification, and establish supporting classified collection and transportation system, resource recovery system and terminal disposal system.
Insulation Co-ordination Part 1: Definitions, Principles and Rules
Correspondingly, the model covering wide-range of main river network at Pearl River Estuary, which is established in this study, is capable of reflecting the influence of the upstream runoff/flood dynamic conditions on project area effectively.
Test Item of Cement Stabilized In-situ Cool-recycling Raw Materials
No. 12 movable point speed-up turnout (GLC(08)01) shall be adopted for turnout on the main line .
(3) If EMU is late for over 15 minutes, the train conductor shall understand the reason of delay and announce to the passenger, and make apology to the passengers on behalf of the railway.
The block layout and local practices during masonry construction shall follow the relevant provisions of the specifications.
Failure to recover and pay compensation in time will lead to conflicts between stakeholders and the Construction Contractor, and even hinder the occurrence of social stability incidents such as thwarting the construction.
Train inspection shed (see Figure 1ETAA502-C-JDGY-02-02)
First branch: heat is absorbed and taken away by smoothing reactor, and then output after it is pressurized by ventilator unit. Position 1/2(5/6) traction motor is cooled by two air ducts. The air is exhausted from non-converter end of traction motor into atmosphere.
Figure 13 Trend Graph of the Relationship Between Betweenness Distribution and Degree Distribution
3. To review the annual and special risk management report of the Group;
B. All the full-time translators will sign confidentiality agreement with the company, get confidential allowance according to confidential requirements and regularly participate in confidential education.
After the concrete is accessible, water will be sprinkled for curing. If the temperature difference between inside and outside exceeds 25℃, heat preservation materials may be added.
The efficient heat insulation and sound insulation measures should be applied for the train body.
6) Peripheral coordination: Establish contact with the neighborhood committees of the project location in advance, and perform preliminary communications for noise, air pollution and other interference caused by the future construction and the measures to be taken, so as to study and solve the problem of disturbing the people.
The repair of non-conforming products shall be carried out by professional technicians in accordance with the repair plan confirmed by professional engineers.
Formwork, scaffold abandoned, office paper, steel bars, water
Meanwhile, the mid-span support is considered to be constructed together with tie beam synchronously and arch rib support is reserved for beam for column holes.
The LV power distribution discipline shall supply the power supply (including cable laying, and the cable length shall be provided by the designer) to the inlet end of the equipment distribution box, and the Tenderer shall be responsible for the cable and power distribution device from the outlet end of the distribution box to all the electrical device.
Check if all of the installation documents are provided (e.g. Installation figure, certification, and user installation etc.).
According to the description of key activities in Chapter 3, Article 2.4.2
Other pile foundations of pier and abutment are all designed in accordance with friction pile.
Plan of LABU-INDODE No.4 Double-track Major Bridge Site
Electrolytic Aluminum ProjectJob Number: DG0505BE-ED-0000AU-0080
Bank account: 0100003822677V. Dual Responsibilities5.1 Party A's responsibilities:5.1.1 Party A shall assign a representative to communicate and cooperate with Party B, provide Party B with necessary documents and other materials on schedule, and ensure such materials meet the producing requirements.
On-site staff should try their best to guide passengers who have not yet entered the station to the adjacent station.
Fig. 3 Load Diagram of Beam Transport Condition of TJ165 Bridge Erecting Machine
Particle size of filler in transition section shall be less than 15cm.
Manufacturer/Client: CARS-Shougang Track Technology Co., Ltd.
During the painting of interior wall, the ground internal corner shall be of a right angle.
(5) Drinking water source will be periodically monitored according to national drinking water management standard to prevent construction activities from polluting drinking water.
Plastic drainage manhole 0.7*2.0m
1)Training on basic knowledge: the training will teach trainees basic knowledge about rail transit and automated people mover system, and the trainees shall be all the employees.
The 3 boilers are equipped with 1 belt conveyor. The slag from roller slag cooler enters the conveyor and is sent to the slag storage by the belt slag conveyor.
The Tenderer shall submit RAM certificates and plans, including relevant RAM tests and demonstrations for vehicles and their subsystems.
3. In case that Party A returns the equipment in advance during the lease period, Party A should pay rent to Party B according to actual lease time.
Painting requirements: beam shall be pained with inorganic zinc-rich primer for 2 courses, with epoxy intermediate paint for 2 - 3 courses (75 - 100 mm + 75 - 125 mm) and aliphatic polyurethane top paint for 2 courses (50 μ m).
The construction of subgrade protection works shall follow closely the excavation and filling processes, and shall be protected while excavation and filling, so as to shorten the exposure time of construction operation surface.
"Costs" in the Bill of Quantities refer to the all expenses reasonably occurred or to be occurred within or out of the site, including administrative fees and other costs and profit drawings that shall be reasonably allocated.
TB/T2673-2002 - ZY Electrohydraulic Switch Machine
The insufficient transport capacity, low efficiency and service level of this area has become a major bottleneck to the economic development of Kenya.
The slag discharged from the incinerator and the fly ash collected by the dust collector should be collected, stored and transported separately.
Special Seal for Contract of Harbin-Mudanjiang Passenger Dedicated Railway Co., Ltd. (seal)
Driving Regional Development of Al Wafaa W Al Amal City
Jacking pad shall be set at the side beam at the end and within 2m at both sides of body bolster of underframe.
Review all changes and modifications made by the contractor during the construction process to ensure the control of total cost of Party A.
The Company has decided to hold an annual working meeting on January, 30, 2018 (Tuesday). The details are as follows:
1* signal control line RVVP 6C*0.75 (from HUB1-1(1/D)15) (147 m)
(4) Party B is prosecuted according to the law for criminal liabilities, re-educated through labor or forced to drug rehabilitation.
Table 2.8.4-2 Parameters of Composite Lining of 160km/h Single-Track Tunnel
The technical specification is applicable to the products of CRH3 EMU Optimum Program designed and manufactured by Tangshan Railway Vehicle Co., Ltd.
② Aba~Owerri~Onitsha, the length of the line is about 136.876km;
3. Mechanical emergency manual control: In case of fire in the protection area, if the fire extinguishing instruction cannot be implemented due to power failure or failure of automatic detection system or control system, opening the heptafluoropropane storage cylinder in the heptafluoropropane cylinder storage room can release the heptafluoropropane fire extinguishing agent.
8. The Contractor shall commence work as per the Supervisor's directions. The construction period is 36 months.
Other Staffs: Yang Jingpeng (Senior Engineer), Zhong Xuhua (Engineer)
Prior to work, the construction personnel shall strictly inspect the safety protection appliance. The construction personnel shall be checked regularly and unqualified personnel shall be replaced.
There shall be no crack or leakage at 5.0 MPa circumferential stress (0.40 MPa test pressure) /80°C/1000h.
Establish a cleaning benchmark as a standard, with focus on making the site present a state of no garbage and no dirt.
(6) Do well in the test and inspection of materials.
When magnetization by electric current testing is carried out, the alloy steel and high carbon steel shall be prevented from local overheating.
Eddie Wong, the Chief Creative Officer of Innocean
Unify height, material and form: simple and elegant.
Based on the specific position of the clamp (T-type or equipment clamp), install the clamp onto the wiring board of equipment. Use a steel tap to measure from the clamp port; observe the radian and reserve a proper margin; finally, determine the length.
According to the station distribution at capital area, the junction point can be selected from Sebeta, Labu and Indode stations for the line.
The estimated construction output in the next month will be also reported, so that Party A has sufficient time to prepare progress payment.
The skid baseplate shall be installed on the foundation provided by the Owner, foundation bolt and the grid plate on the skid body shall be provided by the Supplier.
The dispatching manager on duty, operation dispatcher, depot dispatcher, equipment dispatcher, and electric passenger train driver will be allocated and trained beforehand to ensure commissioning coordination and certificate obtained prior to trial run.
Professional Type: Construction Engineering
2. If it is a single-span beam, the number of span can be omitted.
Process trends, Product Inspection and Testing, which shall be provided by the Quality Control Department;
When the construction of divisional and sub-item works is started, retest the construction safety risks, define the final risk level, and take corresponding risk management measures of construction safety so that the risk management requirements can be implemented in each operation according to the actual situation.
Upon spanning larger river, the larger spanning beam, namely 24m beam shall be adopted in general.
1. Compact and float finish 6 thickness 1:2.5 cement mortar.
Two water tanks are installed to ensure the drinking and living water and each one can fill with the water that can be used for a week by 100 people.
Inorganic aggregates include the heavy aggregate (barite, magnetite, etc.), ordinary aggregate (sand, pebble, crushed stone, slag, etc.) and light aggregate (ceramsite, perlite, vermiculite, etc.).
D10@100 Two-layer and two-way steel concrete awning reinforcement
2) Excessive alarm, power failure alarm and communication interruption warning of the leakage cable loss;
 This project represents the needs to optimize the hub layout of Pakistani railway network and enhance the service quality of passenger and freight transportation of Pakistan Railways.
The hydrophobic rock wool plates shall be laid evenly and arranged tightly. There shall be as few gaps between the plates as possible. The larger gaps shall be filled with the chippings of same material and the height of the two adjacent plates shall be the same.
Project description: The foreign-funded Contract W4 of the Second Railway Line Built out from Liupanshui-Zhanyi Section of Guiyang- Kunming Railway, in total length of 13.288km, is a comprehensive project with significant ratio of bridges and tunnels. The bridges are in total length of 12.811 km, accounting for 96.4 percent of the total length of the line.
Legal Representative: Zhong Fangjun (signature)
Records in the form of audio tapes, video tapes, photographs, disks (electronic versions only), etc.;
The running/ failure signals of patrolling inspection system shall be submitted to the fire control center.
Based on the analysis of reasons, fly ash contains a large amount of spherical particles, which can play a certain role of ball bearing in the concrete; the early activity of fly ash is very low, so when a large amount of fly ash is mixed, the working performance of fresh concrete can be significantly improved, and the fluidity of concrete gets better.
1) Hole locations should be correct, length, width and height meeting requirements. Grey point should be used as center around which digging downwards should be conducted. Size of hole should be subject to rooted ball specifications and root system conditions.
Detailed Rules for the Implementation of "Three Majors and One Large" Decision-making System of CNPC Greatwall Drilling Company
Providing lubricating oil, grease and various reagents and chemicals and the like for the fist test run;
Port Harcourt Station is located in Port Harcourt, i.e. the capital of Rivers State, and is the second largest port of Nigeria.
Primary-A and design running speed of passenger trains of 120km/h (120km/h in sections with necessary conditions).
Vehicles of the company should be regularly maintained according to the regulations; in theory no vehicle shall be dispatched during maintenance.
The Site HSE Department shall be responsible for registering the identified startup operation risks into the risk register for dynamic management.
The national economic evaluation of a railway construction project is to investigate the price (cost) to be paid by the country and the contribution (benefit) to the country from the project from an overall perspective of the country, for the purpose of judging the economic feasibility of the project.
11.5 Civil construction shall be carried out in close cooperation with various types of work, noting openings to be reserved and built-in fittings that and shall not be drilled afterwards.
Organic silicone materials have good physical and chemical properties. With the increasing cost advantage, the substitution effect on traditional materials such as natural rubber and petroleum-based materials is gradually emerging.
1) Information lawfully and properly obtained from other person by one party in a way that does not violate the confidential obligation;
DK239+148.70 1*35m Steel Plate Girder Bridge (double-track)
Right Diagram:Limestone Outcrop of the Northern Plateau Tableland
4.2.7 Fine-grained dense hot-laid asphalt concrete layer with a thickness of 40: transport to the construction site by dump truck. Pave and level manually with small excavator, and roll and form with heavy vibrating roller.
The flat steel bars shall be placed side by side because the drift resistance is small.
TQF-881Polyurethane Waterproof Coating:
The balance of medical personal account is 23440.26.
19.2.5 County Labor and Social Security Bureaus
A Control System for Backward Sliding Prevention of Rail Car and Methods of Making the Same
Fig. 10-8 Contour Plot of Stress Under Bottom Plate Compression Load Case
Within 5 seconds after the passenger opens the door, when the door area passenger detection system detects that there are no passengers in the door opening area, the door will be automatically closed;
Construction contractor shall carry out procurement on it own according to design requirements; the self-procurement shall be also be monitored by project company or supervision institute and comply with relevant laws and regulations.
(13) Damage and loss of the mortgaged article or the pawn for guarantee purpose, which has endangered the credit safety of Party B;
If quality problems are discovered during this period under unopened condition, the factory is responsible for repair or replacement free of charge.
SQS100-A, DN100 (2430?180?000)
4. Prepare and submit measuring and payment report and track the whole process, and keep and timely update corresponding records.
The route length is appropriately extended and the length of the sufficient grade section is obviously shortened, which are beneficial to the operation. Meanwhile, the controlled engineering tunnel is provided with the double spur grade slope, and the construction conditions are good.
Double-bus wiring shall be employed for 110kV lines which employ 2 circuits main transformer incoming line, with 6 circuits of outgoing lines for short term design and 8 circuits of outgoing lines for long term design; double-bus operation in parallel manner shall be employed.
Return wire works reduces investment about RMB 103 thousand;
Make sure the coupling is in good state and return to the test train.
Quality Record Control Point (referred to as Record Point).
The construction teams or groups shall organize the construction strictly as per the construction drawing and technical disclosure and record the dimension deviation of components.
The tensioning of the prestressed steel tendons is under double control, which is, controlling the tensioning force and the elongation of the tendon. While focusing on controlling the tensioning force, the difference between the measured elongation and calculated elongation of the tendon shall not exceed the allowable deviation.
"No Construction Under Five Conditions" means no construction without technical disclosure; with no certificates of materials and test failed; without inspection and acceptance of the previous working procedure or finished and semi-finished works;without the inspection and certification of concealed works by the Engineer; with no clear drawings and technical requirements .
The construction disclosure divides into three levels: the design disclosure of the organization of construction (general); the disclosure of the work plan ( work instruction); the technical disclosure of sub construction.
Implementation of the construction tendering and signing of the construction subcontract
9. The roof is made of colored metal double-layer plate; the color steel plate is connected with GL3 with M10 rivets.
When poured, foundation concrete is immediately covered and watered for curing.
Layout of the derrick on the iron tower: A ratio of 7:3 shall be kept between length of exposed, erected tower section in the derrick and the length inserted into the upper plane of the erected tower section.
New lines in 2018 were 728.7 km long.
There is simple highway in mine area, indicating convenient traffic conditions, but the highway has poor road conditions, indicating difficulty in driving in rain season.
Please strictly comply with the safety requirement defined in Section 2.1.1.
6.3.10 The established or updated List of Applicable Laws, Regulations and Other Requirements and List of Applicable Standards shall be issued by the heads of relevant centralized management departments, and corresponding obsolete documents shall be withdrawn.
Electronic access card is a component part of corporate security system and acts as the credential for employee to access to office area of the company, so it shall be well kept as important things of the company.
Fig. 6-5-6-24 Schematic Diagram of Support for Beam Formwork Support
Each saloon door shall be provided with local opening/closing button. With the driver's permission, the crew or passenger may open or close the door locally with the button.
In construction period, the smoke, dust and exhaust gas generated during the processes like mechanical agitation and transport, earthwork excavation, blasting, material stacking, blending and spreading of filler and living in the construction site, which will reduce the ambient air quality; pitch-smoke containing benzo (a) pyrene and other toxic elements is discharged during the pavement spreading process, which will do a harm to the human body directly.
Leader team of environmental protection of the Project Management Department→Leader team of environmental protection of the plant area
(4) Land utilization for traction substation, switching station, section post and switching station of overhead contact system.
b. The ground shall be watered first before sowing to keep the soil wet; after being dried slightly, the surface soil shall be raked for sowing; seeds shall be covered by 3-5 mm thick soil uniformly, pressed slightly, and then watered.
3.2.1 Construction of earth-rock works of artificial excavated pile
Vehicle coupling includes the mechanical connection between a train and another, the mechanical connection between a car and another, air pipe connection, electrical connection, and gangway.
The combustion performance of steel-frame walls lined with stainless steel sheets shall reach Grade A.
Treatment to fire hazards and various personal injury incidents (such as electric shock, special equipment injury events and tank explosion);
Table 18-2-1 and Table 18-2-2: Table of Estimates of Operation Revenue, Sales tax, Additional Tax and Added Value Tax
The project site has relatively flat terrace. As long as discharge ditches are arranged around the foundation pit, the site will not be flooded, and big rain and flood will pose no threat to the construction site.
2. The levels of this layer foundation and ground beam concrete shall be C30.
The Quality Assurance Director shall be responsible for directing the management of product consistency.
We provide two independent Ethernet cards on the MMS host as the data communication interfaces with ISCS. The two interfaces are in active-active redundancy mode.
The negative test lead of the specified dc voltmeter shall be connected to the reference electrode lead wire.
Speed limit alarm in on-board dynamic detection of track;
Method to distinguish the left and right parts on both sides: The casting near the side of 1# feeding trolley has the code of SITY158A and the casting near the side of 4# feeding trolley has the code of SITY159A
5. The prestressing tendon pipe is fixed with positioning reinforcement, and the positioning reinforcement should be used for fastening and tightly welded on reinforcement framework. In the case that the pipe position collides with the framework reinforcement, remain the pipe location unchanged and move the reinforcement slightly.
The control mode of circuit breaker shall be of local and centralized.
Code for Design of Electric Power Supply Systems(GB 50052-2009)
Maritime transport risk control: provide staff to work at the site of corresponding port to supervise and direct the shipping operation in accordance with HSEQ standards and project logistics system requirements of Sinotrans.
Exposed surface within the permanent land shall be covered with vegetation, and the temporary land shall be tilted again with its exposed part planted with the grass or trees.
Primer shall be applied when the roughness exceeds the requirements.
Date of acquisition: December 31, 2012
The surface of contacting different metals should take electrochemical corrosion prevention measures.
For equipment and cables unannotated with the quantity, the quantity is 1.
Meanwhile, actively coordinate the arrangement of users, establish good communication relations with them, and regularly report work to Project Manager.
2. The canopy tube guide wall shall be provided at CH384+988~CH384+989, and see the drawing "CD/ECRL/C/ML/TUN/SEC3.6/CT015/30030" for the design details of guide wall.
d) Install the cushion, liner band, and glass in sequence.
3.1.3.1.5 Project quality plan
Subproject 2 - Detian-Shuolong Highway is the dedicated road planned for Detian Waterfalls Scenic Area. It consists of two parts: the line and the intelligent transportation module.
TBM single shield operation cycle: boring → retracting of auxiliary cylinder → segment erection → re-boring. See the schematic diagram for principle of the single shield boring mode.
1) For the time being, 2 control signal panels will be set up in the depot and 1 control signal panel will be set up in other stations.
Single-track (The Sebeta ~ Ejaji section is designed of single-track, with the conditions for double-track provided)
(3) Winter construction requirements are more detailed and meticulous than normal temperature conditions, so the technical requirement and cost of implementation are also high. Once the program is not well planned, or applied with improper measures and poor construction management, it will cause unsatisfactory working speed, and the completion time will be delayed, or to be resulted with serious quality accident that is difficult to handle and big cost waste.
3. For weld joint marked with a "**" (Item 4), segment welding interval and length can be reasonably adjusted in consideration of the location of sidewall stiffened plate.
It is recommended to adopt standard prefabricated reinforced concrete (pre-stressed) concrete hollow slab girder (box girder) in China.
According to the different ways of inquiry, the inquiry and interview method can be divided into two types, i.e. individual inquiry and collective inquiry.
Concealed channels can be seen at the bottom of the shaft (see Figure 5.3.6). There is running water at the bottom of the concealed channels and they are not supported with a height of about 1.0 m and a width of 0.2 ~ 0.4 m.
The overall project quality of the Lot is evaluated to be acceptable according to JTG F80/1-2004 Quality Inspection and Evaluation Standards for Highway Engineering.
│ │ │ │ │ 216200 Bridge Work Spot - Profile.txt
③ Settlement reaches the maximum (accumulated –20.55 mm) in 1-3 days after TBM passing through, and gradually stabilizes later;
DN1800 reinforced concrete pipe (rainfall)
The engineering range of this project is: the project includes line model selection, providing all design proposals, documents, equipment, materials, labors and miscellaneous for smoothly completing the project according to the contract, and all works and documents for completing all design work contents and requirements of the owner.
We will carry out re-check system for survey. Field survey mateirlas must be re-checked by another person, and indoor surveying results must be separately calculated by two persons and proofed mutually so as to ensure correctness.
There should be no sags, cracks or obvious bends on the bending part of the threading pipe.
(1) Establish the quality accountability system, the quality leadership life-long responsibility system from the Project Management Department to the engineering construction team shall be implemented.
3.7.3.3 Maintenance of Arbors and Shrubs
5. Re-inspection by project management department (second-level inspection): Professional engineers should conduct the second-level inspection, submit quality self-inspection records, construction records and entity quality for re-inspection and third-level inspection.acceptance.
(This page contains no text, and it is left for signatures and seals of the Contract)
90° elbow, dn150, 0.6MPa
The bank on the southwest of Hulhule side is a regularly-shaped right angle and the south and west banks both have a smooth line. No concave bank defects are formed here by collapse, landslide or others.
There is no detailed surveying and mapping data at this stage. In the study, the existing planning data and Google Maps are used to perform the alignment fitting.
If no information is received from the balise at the departure side when siding departure is launched, LKJ executes control based on closed Advance Starter Signal as shown in Fig. 5-18:
1. Finished giallo gold granite carved flowerpot (polished surface) 1000*540
Carry out the routine appearance inspection on the circuit breaker to confirm that there is no damage or deformation.
(2) The components of pole/tower shall be assembled securely. At intersections with gap, washers or pallets of appropriate thickness shall be provided.
Technical Problem Handling Report in(Month)(Year) for Petroleum, Petrochemical and Special Valve Division
All smoke exhaust ducts inside the suspended ceiling shall be provided with the 50mm thick rock wool boards for thermal insulation. The capacity of such duct shall be 48kg/m3 and the exterior shall be packaged with non-combustible materials.
The spray flow of the sprinkler is 2L/m. According to ARGE Guideline-Part 2, the fire extinguishing system shall meet the requirement of spraying water for 10 minutes.
2) For goods and materials with traceability requirements (such as steel, cement), the batch number, test sheet order and used part shall be available.
Gross floor area: 72769.6m2
The Tenderer shall list the content of the following relevant trainings (including but not limited to):
U158 swiveling waste conveyor belt – left switch plate of operating cab.
(5) Use oil materials such as kerosene, gasoline, rosin water, acetone, etc, and wear protective equipment. No smoking.
5.1.5 Special operation measures shall be made for each item as per quality index and requirements. Such measures shall be issued in the form of operation guidance and strictly implemented during construction.
Using welded reinforcement to bind bridge deck reinforcement. Cast-in-situ span by span. First period wet-joint construction. Cast-in-situ continuous pat and flange plate. Wield or bind middle cross beam and flange plate span by span. Cast-in-situ continuous part and concrete of flange plate.
According to the ABB motor optimization and modification schedule, the master schedule of the traction system of Melbourne Project (tentative) is adjusted as follows:
For each season, the procurement operation department must report the unsolved complaints, which will be further distributed to relevant operational buyers and suppliers for following.
Been listed by the Supreme People's Court of China in the "Credit China" website (www.creditchina. Gov.cn ) or the credit information sharing platform at all levels;
19.2 Any dispute on project quality between the Parties shall be subject to verification by the project quality inspection institution agreed by the Parties. The costs and losses thereof shall be borne by the responsible party.
(1) Natural compensation: that is, adjusting the shape of the pipe system (its basic form is the same as the steel pipe) so that it can absorb thermal expansion through the flexure of the pipe itself.
(2) Recruitment through influential local radio or television;
Clean the friction surface of the steel beams and install mounting bolts and junction plates
Each main door shall be equipped with an intercom system with an embedded camera.
The company shall properly identify and control the original documented information required to determine the planning and operation of the management system from the external, such as applicable compliance obligations.
As shown in the figure above, measure W respectively at the place 160mm down from one end of the running surface and the place 1085mm down from the former position.
Drying and heating system for reclaimed asphalt pavement (RAP) shall be added when batch-type mixing plant is used and the admixture of reclaimed asphalt pavement (RAP) is greater than 10%.
<13-1> Clay sand: grayish yellow, dense, slightly wet, with gravel content of 45% and grain size of 4.75~40mm, hard, subangular, with sand content of 48% and grain size of 0.075-4.75mm, with clay and silt content of 6%.
The powerful and user-friendly maintenance software for the air conditioning system is provided, which enables independent function testing and fault diagnosis of main components of the air conditioning unit.
Axial force: 216.1 Bending moment: 110.3
Railway loans have greatly increased the repayment pressure of the government. It is suggested that Tanzania formulate detailed repayment plans and guarantee measures to avoid increasing financial burden and affecting economic development.
Bind the cable symmetrically with two white cloth tapes after the cable is rolled, then place it to the designated location neatly.
To prepare and review the construction scheme and work instructions of this project, and supervise them.
As the subgrade works continue, the outgoing lines shall be arranged in time so as not to be buried. After the subgrade is completed, the outgoing line ends shall be exposed on the surface. During the next cable trough construction, the outgoing lines shall be introduced into the signal cable trough from the reserved hole at the bottom of the trough.
4. Each enterprise of the Group shall organize inspection and evaluation of the operation of the safety risk management system on a quarterly basis and make continuous improvement.
Sweep and inspect water pump, water pipe, water tank cock and radiator.
Note: Engineering design output is not limited to the above details and shall depend on the contract condition.
2.2 CRCEBG - Comprehensive Strength
2) The motor bearing casing and end cover are not assembled properly;
The Standard is applicable to the civilized production management for production places, production buildings, control rooms and spare parts warehouses in wind farms of PowerChina International Group Limited.
(4) Party B has taken delivery of the goods under the presentation on the basis of the delivery security issued by Party A.
Heilongjiang Jinfeng Engineering Management and Consulting Co., Ltd.
Hardware facilities mainly refer to devices installed on the waste bins and collection vehicles.
- total traffic volume of proposed project under "project scenario" (vehicle/day);
Based on study on and comparison between alternatives of single-shaft-tower monobox spatial-cable suspension bridge, A-tower monobox spatial-cable suspension bridge, and H-tower planar-cable suspension bridge, we developed the solution of H-tower planar-cable suspension bridge[12].
When the elevator lift height of the adjacent two floors is more than 11m, a safety door to the shaft shall be set, and safety windows shall be set at the top of all cars for convenience of rescue.
Stress status in the case of no counterweight for underframe
For other works, the foundation trenches (pipe trenches) will be excavated and buried first, then the structures and equipment will be installed, and finally the equipment will be commissioned.
1) The power panel should be intelligently designed so that it can monitor the working status of the system in real time, display monitoring parameters and fault alarms in time, and have fault memory function and query function.
7.5.1.1 The Company establishes and maintains procedures to continuously perform hazard identification, risk assessment and implementation of necessary control measures.
For the cutting slopes on the right side of DK12+310.20 ~ DK12+680.00 section and DK12+720.00 ~ DK12+880.00 section, 6X3m herringbone water-interception skeleton with vegetation protection, which is built with M7.5 mortar rubbles, is adopted for slope protection.
a) Auxiliary Converter Inverter
2. Survey and Design Contract for Preliminary Design Stage of Up-gradation of Main Line-1 and Establishment of Dryport near Havelian under China-Pakistan Economic Corridor signed by and between China Railway Eryuan Engineering Group Co., Ltd. and Pakistan Railways;
After sampling analysis proves that the steam quality is qualified, air release valves in the following systems will be gradually turn down, the generated steam will be led to the superheated steam system and the pressure will be control at 10.29Mpa.
6.9 Undertake standardized management in the construction and operation periods of the wastewater treatment station; ensure safe work; cover insurance for relevant personnel and machine.
4. Visual Assessment of Rusting Grade and Derusting Grade of Steel Surface
5.1.3.2.3 Facilities of Labor Safety and Health
The moving distance of vibrating rods shall be less than 50cm, and the vibration at each vibrating point shall last until the laitance appears on the surface.
OLT equipment (including equipment cabinet) for optical link terminal of access network
4. When regular reinforcement of girder body collides with pipeline of pre-stressed steel tendon and drain water pipe, the location of regular reinforcement can be moved or bent properly.
Main energy-consuming points on the Railway Line include Dabaodang Junction Station, Delivery-receiving Station and Chemical Park Station.
The purchased materials are not allowed to be subcontracted or transferred illegally.
Abundant covering materials for thermal insulation need to be utilized in the construction in winter. The majority of materials are subject to stringent requirements on firefighting, and combustible material easily give rise to fire in winter.
Section 4a-4a (main building) close to Jinxing River, where foundation pit is 6.0 m deep: supported jointly by selective grading + φ630@0.8m support pile + dual-row deep mixing piles + soil reinforcement for deep mixing piles in the pit + additional selective grading;
Rotate switch b600, the rotating conveyor belt is able to move towards left and right.
Constant potential rectifier: the constant potential rectifier transfers AC to DC, with the current output thereof controlled by the reference electrode. The cathode cable and zero position - cathode connecting cable are welded on the baseplate of the storage tank by exothermic welding, and the anode cable connects the metallic oxide to the anode network.
2) The maximum voltage or charging voltage within the specified temperature range is appropriate:
If there is objective evidence of impairment of loans and receivables or investments held to maturity at amortized cost, the amount of loss is determined by the difference between the carrying amount of the asset and the present value of the expected future cash flow.
In the south are the four Kalimantan Provinces of Indonesia: East, South, Central, and West Kalimantan.
A magnetic plug will be provided in the gearbox to trap magnetic impurities in the gearbox lubricant.
(4) The final toe level of the pile shall be checked by measuring the depth of the base, and the result shall be verified by the client representative.
Automatic monitoring system shall be installed and maintained according to the requirements of the environmental protection departments.
9.2.2 A list, giving full particulars, including available sources and current prices of spare parts, special tools, etc., necessary for the proper and continuing functioning of the goods for a period to be specified in the Bidding Documents, following commencement of the use of the goods by the Bid Inviting Party.
Human resources scheduled according to the construction stages of the Project (persons)
Simply-supported bridge, continuous girder or continuous rigid frame, cable-stayed bridge, steel arch bridge, steel truss girder bridge, tied-arch bridge
Mass of the grain with the size over 2mm covers more than 25%-50% of the total mass
The old man witnessed and experienced the flood.
The sub-slab reinforcement cushion block is of granite cushion block, arranged in the plum flower shape with spacing ≤ 1000mm; the top elevation of the cushion block shall be leveled by pulling a line to ensure accuracy of the block elevation.
2. Sleeper appearance quality and dimension of various parts shall conform to relevant regulations; out of tolerance is not allowed for Class A; for Class B, single item unbalance rate for of out of tolerance item points is no more than 10%; for Class C, the unbalance sum for each out of tolerance item is no more than 20% of total inspection item points of Class C.
10.7.12 Based on the relevant technical standards, debugging the indoor covering wireless field strength, and the results shall comply with the requirements of the design document and the relevant technical standards.
Shotcrete: C25(the 24h strength shall not be lower than 10MPa)
Temporary fencing, temporary construction access, temporary guard house, truck washing site, temporary office, temporary worker toilet, temporary worker rest and smoking site, material yard and processing yard, construction signboard, people / material, etc. are included in the drawing.
In case of double or multi-layer arrangement of longitudinal reinforcements, reinforcements of the same beam width and length with diameter of 25 ° shall be placed between the two rows of reinforcements.
Since the passenger capacity is low and the speed of 120km/h for narrow gauge is not standard (which is pointed out in the problem chapter); it should be determined based on speed standards of the near section railways, with different plans of target speed value compared.
Zhang Jianzhong, Lv Shubao, Wang Chuan, Wang Zhigang, Deng Yuanxing, Yao Xuefei
Associate Director of Water Supply and Drainage Design Institute, Senior Engineer, Registered Equipment Engineer
The strata in bridge site area are mainly composed of fill soil from Quaternary Holocene deposits, and alluvial silty clay, silty soil, fine and coarse round gravel soil, cobbly soil and boulder soil from Upper Pleistocene deposits.
Rizhao Port Group Co., Ltd.
After passing the inspection, the formwork is erected immediately, and combined steel formwork shall be used as the formwork.
(1) Purchase mechanical equipment and transportation equipment (vehicles) with good performance and low noise to minimize noise.
A circulating cooling waterway is reserved for the bearing, that is, the bearing is cooled by circulating cooling water, and lubricated by thin oil.
The inspection hole for fire damper must be located at an accessible position.
20.4 Clause 20 of the general contract conditions above cannot change the commitment made before contract signing for confidentiality to any party related to supply or other parts.
Solve the effluent short-flow problem in the ICEAS tank.
This index refers to the time from planning to completion of the project.
6.3.4 The Business Unit/Company/product line shall identify the processes and activities related to reliability based on the control of key quality points and the specific requirements of project reliability, and shall include them in other management processes. The reliability plan shall be prepared and implemented.
The construction scope includes civil works, steel structure works, decoration works, water supply and drainage works, fire fighting works, HVAC works, electrical works, etc. of the painting workshop and body marshalling station.
Prepare a brochure on earthquake prevention and emergency measures, one for each person.
Grid limit frame, ∠40X4X458
The connection of draining stand pipeline with beneath horizontal pipe or leading-out pipelines is generally made by two 45º elbows or 90º elbows with the bending radius less than 4 times of pipeline diameter.
The BS 6853, NF F16 series, UIC564-2 and TB/T2640-1995 specifies requirements for the fire protection design and installation of heaters (including heating devices and cookware).
Sealing strip of 22E traction blower
Design normal tension : N=7000N
TA disconnection report generated, blocking the differential protection
After the employee prepared all relevant materials and filled Chengdu Housing Accumulation Fund Withdrawal Certificate (Accumulation Fund Form 13) in duplicate, the unit will preliminarily review and then issue review opinions and affix the unit seal of housing accumulation fund transaction authorization.
Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE) standards
It is planned to arrange one building construction team to carry out the construction.
It shall meet the requirements of traffic distribution, pipeline installation, and flood control and drainage;
Protection of the track parts shall be strengthened during construction of the ballastless track bed, so as to prevent pollution caused by concrete, cement-emulsified asphalt mortar, etc.
Fig. 11Each Speed Component of Train Induced Air Flow at 1.44m to Height of Rail Surface in Conditions of Speed at 200km/h, without Cross-wind
Unless the overall project plan has changed dramatically, the payment of the project shall be based on the total contract price temporarily determined in the contract (the cost for the materials supplied by the Issuing Party shall be deducted), and adjustment shall not be made to the payment basis of the progress payment during the implementation process due to local changes in the project quantities.
5.2.4.5 Through the review, study, confirm and document the manufacturing feasibility of the expected product, and conduct risk and opportunity analysis to minimize the existing risks and monitor the possible risks to ensure the company's interests.
(3) Participate in contract review and organize and carry out cost budgeting, planning, accounting, analysis, control and assessment;
DMTO Unit and Auxiliary Facilities for Qinghai Salt Lake Metal-Magnesium Integration Project
Carbonation reaction and a certain part of nitration reaction are mainly performed in O1 pool.
5. Number of grass bag cofferdam is calculated based on construction at dry season. Stone steps are to be paved from river bank top to lower water intake.
Keep a balance between root and crown while pruning and cut cracked, sick and overlong root.
C30 concrete, containing 100KG/m3 steel bars
It mainly undertakes the maintenance task of freight trains including detached temporary repair and auxiliary repair.
Worst Values at "S" Point and "R" Point during Delivery Inspection and Engineering Acceptance
6. The counter-force of supports of pier cap beams,as a result of the effect of vehicle load transmitted to these supports, is loaded based on the counter-force values aroused by orthogonality.
GGD fixed-type low voltage distribution panel is employed by 0.4kV low voltage distribution unit.
When transfer of financial assets happens to the Company, if the Institute has transferred to the transferee almost all risks and rewards from the ownership of the said financial assets, the financial assets should be derecognized; if the Group has retained almost all risks and rewards from the ownership of the said financial assets, the financial assets should not be derecognized.
The foot plank shall be bound with #16 double-strand iron wire in a parallel manner with 4 points, which shall be the four ends of foot plank, which shall also be fastened firmly and free of protruding board and spring board.
1. The traction power technical index of Fuxing EMU is 7% higher than that of the existing EMU, reaching 10,400 kilowatts.
6. At the sections with developed groundwater and at the side slope with swelling soil, supporting sewer or upward oblique drain hole should be supplemented by reference to the subgrade discipline.
d) When the results from monitoring and measurement shall be analyzed and evaluated;
Note: 1. A copy of the Letter of Acceptance and a bid opening record form are attached to the bidding project.
Base on the new CRH380A EMU technology platform, continue to employ two-axle light-weight bogie without swing bolster, H-shaped welding structure, tumbler type axle box positioning, air spring, single traction rod and traction motor suspension.
During construction, building, structure, water, electricity and decoration disciplines must be closely cooperated with each other.
5.4.1 Reporting time: in case of occurrence of above personnel avoidance relation, the officer himself / herself shall report before related employment or business. In the case where he / she knows nothing about such personnel avoidance relation and where employment or business is performed, he / she shall timely report after awareness of personnel avoidance information or occurrence of personnel avoidance relation.
Spacing: 800mm for straight line and 400mm for corner
Switchgear of Electric Hot Plate (Selective Switchgear of Bogie Lamp) = 32-S73
5.1.7 Implement the approval system of commencement report.
Fig. 30: Test Curves of Dry Heat Tests at 45°C and 70°C
Address: 5th Floor, No.65 Chifeng Road, Shanghai, 8th Floor, No.291 Tianmu Middle Road, Shanghai
The radial clearance and axial overlapping length between the air inlet and the impeller cover shall meet the design requirements.
Due to the high water temperature, when the air conditioning water valves are fully opened, the temperature difference between the supply air temperature and the water temperature is small.
The concrete of abutment will be transported to the site with a concrete mixing truck, and be pumped into the formwork by concrete pump car or delivery pump. Continuous pouring shall be conducted horizontally in layers until the concrete is shaped.
Paint points of the same color as the final lines and marks shall be used for the setting out of lines, symbols, graphics or marks.
The zinc rectification system is planned to be at the utmost east side of the plant and the residue treatment system will be at the north of existing sulfuric acid plant.
Luggage information system will be provided for the line, including luggage management information system and luggage service information system.
Irregularly organize and hold special environmental management meetings and social management meetings.
14.1.3 Great attention shall be paid to personal hygiene, to avoid inhalation of and contact with dust. Smoking is not allowed.
(1) The power factor of the low-voltage side of the substation can be above 0.9;
Embed two rows of five SC150 incoming steel sleeves
relevant personnel shall be carefully organized to check the design documents, make clear site conditions, and determine the excavation slope, supporting scheme, excavation scope, waterproof and drainage measures according to the site conditions before construction.
Hence, the Supplier shall take it into account at design stage of system to ensure that each sub-system is designed accordingly.
In node areas, the mechanical behaviors are complicated and stress concentration may exist. Different types of design constitute a key factor affecting the node performance, so it is planned to carry out model tests and refined finite element simulation analysis for the key node forms shown in Fig. 4, so as to determine appropriate node forms.
Equipment packaging must meet the requirements for long-distance ocean transportation. For specific requirements, please refer to the relevant provisions of the equipment contract of CCECC.
The embankments on both sides of the river are about 2.0 m wide, and the angle between the line and the Kaskelen River (right front angle) is 102 °, and the flow direction is from left to right.
Du Yinguang (Project leader, Chief engineer, professor-level senior engineer of Zhejiang Communications Construction Group Co., Ltd);
Non-compliance with equipment and personnel requirements described shall not normally be a ground for bid rejection and such non-compliance will be subject to clarification during bid evaluation and rectification prior to contract award.
After the completion of on-site testing, the on-site Technical Director shall calculate and analyze the testing data, and prepare reports in accordance with regulatory requirements.
Upon the completion of a large amount of drilling works, map plotting was performed as for the occurrence of ore veins, which indicates that the inclination of the quartz veins is 151° in average and it tilts westwards at the angle of 61°.
During the validity period of the Contract, the Employer will assess the Contractor based on its implementation of project maintenance at the end of each year, and reward and punish the Contractor as appropriate according to the assessment results. The upper limit of reward and punishment amount shall be 1.5% of the maintenance settlement price in the current year. Specifically, the Measures on Reward and Punishment subsequently formulated by the Employer shall be followed.
6.6.1 System Functions and Technical Indicators
(2)the charger output voltage and switch frequency.
2. Use Software for Design of Independent Foundation, strip foundation, Reinforced Concrete Foundation Beam and Pile Foundation and Raft Foundation-JCCAD of PKPM series and 2010 version to perform elementary calculation.
When pipes go through floor and wall plugging holes, they must be tightly blocked with pisolith concrete, and must not be filled with waste such as crushed bricks. The strength of concrete used for plugging holes must not be less than that of floors and walls.
Repeat the above filtration procedures till the remaining sediment solution in stainless steel container is about 300mL.
Reaction effluent/hot hydrogen-crude oil mixture heat exchanger
The products provided by the seller to the buyer shall conform to the buyer's requirements:
General Tolerances - Part 2: Geometrical Tolerances for Features Without Tolerances Indications
The Company has trained emergency personnel. See Compilation of Contingency Plans for details. The abstract is as follows:
Net spacing of the main framework shall be 6m and that of branch framework shall be 3m. C15 concrete shall be used for casting. Bushes and grasses shall be planted in the herringbone water resistance framework for slope protection.
The products damaged or deteriorated during transport shall be disposed as unqualified products.
Small resistance 95.26Ω, 200A
With the strong support of Xiong'an New Area in Hebei Province, works such as Daxing Airport-Xiong'an New Area section and Xiong'an Station building of Beijing-Xiong Intercity Railway have been fully resumed.
It intersects with the Line at Mengtun (Chainage
Railway greening shall be carried out with reference to China's "Rules on Technical Management of Railway Forestry", in order to ensure the traffic safety and operation of railway.
At the beginning of drilling, properly control the drilling footage to make the initial hole forming vertical and smooth, so as to prevent the hole site from being eccentric and the hole opening from collapsing.
Construction and linking of divisional and subdivisional works shall be organized properly with flow operation properly inserted to ensure the contract duration.
Document inspection is a task and approach of determining and organizing the identification process. It is a way to prove that a batch of cars is up to specification.
Two charts and six signs shall be set on site: two charts: general construction layout and responsibility chart of safe production and civilized construction; six signs: project overview sign, safety discipline sign, safety slogan sign, safety record sign, civilized construction system sign and fire prevention guidelines sign.
(5) The diversified payment platform subsystem should be based on network, and the electronic tickets sold by it should be universal in the network, and do not interfere with or affect the use of traditional IC ticket cards.
It shall be ensured that the system can shutdown normally with all stored data remaining intact in case of sudden power cutoff.
There are large-scale forests on the hillside on the left side of the main line. Surface runoff is not found at the two small-span bridges. The river surface under the reconstructed bridge at 55km of the existing road is frozen.
2.Both Parties guarantee to keep, maintain and protect the confidential information provided by the other Party in a proper manner.
6. Window management: There is no definition function of pre-sale period;
The single pile is provided with two rows of anchor cables, the lower row of anchor cables is set at the original ground line, the upper row of anchor cables is set 2m away from the lower row of anchor cables. The length of anchor cables is 25m ~ 29m, with 15m ~ 19m of free section and 10m of anchorage section.
1.13.7 General Description of Inspection, Testing and Commissioning Activities
The depth of the measuring electrode inserted into the ground shall not exceed 0.1a.
4.4.1 The installation discipline shall provide records of inspection of the works to be handed over.
Place the sample into the glass sand funnel dried at 105°C±5°C in advance to the the constant weight for air suction and filtration.
Battery parameters: lithium ion battery, the continuous working time after charging shall not be less than 4 hours, and the standby time shall not be less than 6 hours.
● Minimum illumination: color ≤ 0.01Lux; black and white ≤0.001Lux;
Combination of BIM Technology and Curtain Wall Plan, Junjun Li, Technical Director, ECO Face
4. The main reinforcement is HRB400 reinforcement, and the ratio of elastic modulus to concrete deformation modulus n is determined according to other structural items in Table 6.1.3 of Code for Design of Concrete Structures of Railway Bridge and Culvert (10 for C35 concrete).
Get ready for construction(set up the Supervision Department, prepare the supervision plan, take part in the first regular project meeting, review the construction schedule, construction organization design etc.)
Outdoor cables through the distributing terminal board for the 78# turnout are incorrectly distributed.
a. Norms, standards and regulations that shall be followed in valve design and manufacturing;
After the concrete is pumped into the construction surface, it is distributed in all directions through the central bucket, and then enters the formwork through the chute and the tumbling barrel. The distance between the discharge opening of the tumbling barrel and the pouring surface is controlled within 2.0m to prevent concrete segregation due to large concrete drop. The distance between adjacent laying-off points shall not exceed 3.0m.
These itemized quotations are used for comparison by buyers for bid evaluation, and not restrict buyer in selecting terms for signing the contract:
(3) Access: Generally, one station should be provided with a pair of access. For stations with small passenger flow, such pair of access shall be integrated into one. The total width of access shall meet the demands of passenger flow, disaster prevention and evacuation.
The train control and management system is mainly composed of the following subsystems:
According to the unified organization by the Ethiopian Light Rail Project Officeof CREEC, the fare collection system will be tested without load. Ensure that all the equipments in fare collection system are in test run only under required environmental conditions, in order to find out whether the contract requirements being reached or not.
3. The elevation of track top is indicated on the grade post of the drawing and the pavement center mileage is indicated on the station road.
At present, the Company's suppliers can undertake procurement product supporting with annual output of 350 locomotives. The restructuring enterprise of the Company undertakes 60% of total varieties for procurement products. Such suppliers serve as the main force of the supply chain and they can implement and meet our company's procurement demands steadily through years of cooperation.
SUCTION FLANGE (CLASS 150)
(2) During government acceptance, any items that do not conform to the national standards or to be rectified as clearly required by government departments, the Tenderer shall complete the rectification within the time required by the Tenderee to ensure that the equipment meet the requirements of government acceptance.
At the same time, students are trained to analyze problems, solve problems and deal with problems.
Reserve the place for post-cast strip according to the design drawings and corresponding sample(s).
From the table, the partition wall can reduce the noise of 33 ~ 34 dB in both situations.
Unlawful Acts and Quality and Safety Responsibility Accidents in the Latest Three Years
2. Prior to welding, all mono-units are required to be flat and smooth, and burrs and rust shall be removed;
Within the area, flood flow consists of mountain rain water washes the basalt formation in rainy season and thus formed river channel which has a high flow in rainy season and low flow in dry season.
Noise produced by vibration of trains shall be reduced as much as possible. In design of horizontal and vertical sections of lines, architectural complex, especially the places below buildings, shall be bypassed to the greatest extent. There shall be a certain depth of overburden for the major structure of underground sections of light rail.
3.2.3.3 Magnetic particle inspection device: DC (or AC) magnetic particle flaw detector.
Respect the national conditions and customs of Eritrea, save energy and water resources, and make rational use of mineral resources.
The covering layer in survey area is thicker and formation lithology is partial covered with the quaternary artificial filled soil (Q4ml), plain fill on the surface and the quaternary alluvium and diluvium (Q4al+pl) silt, silty clay, silty sand and fine sand below.
Yin Qingling 13087721709
After the water under treatment is led through mixed ion exchange bed, generated H+ and OH- will generate the water with very low solubility, and will rarely generate counter ion during cation or anion exchange.
The experts in the Bid Evaluation Committee (including the experts from Laos) shall be selected as per the necessary qualifications of the experts who are selected into the experts bank as specified in Interim Measure for Management of Bid Evaluation Experts and Bid Evaluation Experts Bank and strictly implement the avoiding policy.
Proper measures should be taken in the places which are unable to approach the bolt head to prevent rotating bolt head when screwing down the nuts.
The waveform is 1.2/50s-8/20s 2Ω combination wave
Organize personnel to formulate and approve the management system related to the Company's monitoring and measuring equipment; approve the Company's monitoring and measuring equipment allocation plan; monitor the acceptance, calibration, safe use, withdrawal and storage of monitoring and measuring equipment.
53 box culverts with a total length of 2063m will be built, involving dimensions of 6*5m, 3.5*2.5m, 3*2.8m, 5*2.8m, and 2*2m
Survey of the construction base surface: as per design.
June 2017The project of the Provincial Department of Transport "Evaluation on Asphalt Pavement Maintenance Technical Measures of Zhejiang Province and Research on Their Applicability" passed the appraisal and the achievement was evaluated as reaching the domestic leading level.
The completed project will strongly drive the economic and social development in Port-au-Prince, even Haiti, and serves the country.
The 36V cap lamp shall be used for lighting inside the hole. The wires and cables used shall have sufficient strength and insulation performance.
High-quality recommendations are beneficial to achieving such basic purpose.
4) Assignment Book - Feasibility Study of New Expressway Construction Linking Vang Vieng to Boten, Lao-Chinese Border Project issued by the government of Laos.
b. During construction, coarse aggregate shall be classified into the following grading according to the grain size:
3.1.4 During the contract performance, if the standards or specifications referenced in this project are revised or newly issued, the tenderee shall decide if other new standards or specifications are adopted in addition to the implementation of the compulsory standards of the State and China Railway Corporation.
The length of the newly constructed main line is 418.1km; the length of the new bridges is 0.854km; the bridge ratio is 0.204％.
8. For grillage crane, lifting crane, construction elevator, scaffold and other sub-divisional works with high hazard degree, it is necessary to prepare specialized method statement and perform construction by the construction procedures, construction methods, operation regulations and safety actions prepared by the method statement.
(5)Timely analyze the situation of safety production of this enterprise, carry out research, deployment and guidance of safety work, and research and solve major problems in safety production.
Insulation resistance; dielectric loss and capacitance value of non-pure porcelain bushing of 20kV and above; AC withstand voltage test
The bottom full-length reinforcement of KHL18 is changed from 5|25 2/3 to 6|25 2/4; the support reinforcement of KHL4 is changed from 7|22 4/3 to 6|22+2|20 4/4;
Remove the XP171.3(F) plug of A train ② car and B train ③ car. Use rescue cable to connect the XP171.3 (M) plugs of A train ② car and B train ③ car.
2016 and 2017 shall be the construction period, and the Project will be in operation since January 1, 2018.
Schematic drawing of reserved profile of OCS trench (F3/F4) in double-track tunnel
The section shall not be too short, or the running speed of trains may frequently change, which may bring up insecure factors in operation and may increase the kinetic energy loss, and lead to increment of energy consumption and transportation cost.
6.1.1 The Human Resources Department shall establish various posts according to the post needs in the Company's business activities, define the post quality requirements, and prepare the post responsibility descriptions. The Human Resources Department may also revise the post responsibility descriptions according to the operation and development conditions of the Company.
1) Rotate the rotor manually to check whether the pump is free of friction, jamming and other abnormal conditions;
The packing method should ensure the re-use of the recoverable and repairable goods.
5) Laying personnel shall lift them at an interval of 10 ~ 15m in sequence. Any optical cable shall not be dragged on the hard ground;
(3) Selection of fuel, power and consumption quota: the consumption varieties and consumption quota are determined according to the funds provided for the process and related design specialties, and the price and other data are as follows:
(3) Be responsible for preparing the construction network plan according to drawings, materials and equipment arrived, and organizing review and approval.
The terrain is high and has large relief with a gradient about 10%.
The relevant appendixes, qualification certificates and test certificates must be complete.
Licensing conditions for operation are set for each individual control object, so as to avoid unqualified operation, an "action interlock" is also provided to make the equipment trip under dangerous operating conditions.
b) The quality inspection personnel shall carry out inspection and test according to product standards, technical quality requirements and relevant inspection and test specifications. If necessary, the Material Procurement Department and the Supplier shall assist the inspection personnel in unpacking, sampling and testing;
3. The system completely satisfies full color sample detection of forme and is able to conduct precise guilloche pattern detection for full color samples on the banknote paper.
The COMPANY and the superior unit shall review the OPERATION OF HSE system of the project according to the implementation of the Project.
The Contract will become invalid after all works are completed and pass the handover acceptance and after the defects liability release certificate is issued when the defects liability period expires.
- uniform surface load in kN/m2;
b)Remove the fixed bolts of sampling plate, voltage changer and current transformer;
Properly enter relevant information into the air waybill, or ensure that the information is properly filled in (only for freight forwarder or operator's employees);
Pure suffocation will be caused when nitrogen concentration rises and oxygen reduces relatively in operating environment.
This contract takes effect with the signature of legal representatives or authorized agents of both parties and the official seal, and is invalid after all works are completed and accepted as qualified.
Installation Specifications for "Foundation Pad Box" of Steam Turbine and Its Ancillary Equipment from DFSTW;
•HSE management measures which are taken for project's risk;
In Section 4.9.1, for the constraint locations, please specify to restrict at one coupler end or both coupler areas.
2.4 Mortar blended with foaming agent shall be mixed strictly in accordance with the instructions.
③ Measured total elongation of the reinforcement at the maximum tensile force shall not be less than 9%;
3.2 Check the parts and components for damage visually.
Carry out daily quality management, organize and coordinate the inspection and integration of quality management activities of departments at all levels, and provide quality information feedback.
The existing signal at the station is of the semaphore signal, and the turnout is of the manually operated turnout.
The operation signal (used to give command on the driving and braking of train lines) is also interrupted.
After the arch crown is anchored with the rock anchor of working platform, the tunnel face ahead can be continuously tunneled.
5) Measures shall be taken during the installation of steel structures to prevent damage to anti-corrosion coating;
Tel: (0532) 82732969 13506489318
Settlement at each point of the subgrade cross-section upon the completion of pavement (with the centerline as the origin)
④ The sealing gasket of the operating mechanism box shall be complete, and cable pipe openings and holes shall be sealed. Paint shall be complete, and a reliable grounding is ensured.
The 2 products, selected in random by your company from our warehouse in September, 2015, were be conducted with salt spray test in accordance with the previous order condition, and no rustiness was occurred in the process of the test. The test result proves that our products conform to your order requirement.
The concrete is pumped into the formwork with pump trucks.
(9)It is configured with USB communication interface;
Force-bearing characteristics of concrete sleeper: Sleepers are short beams on elastic foundation. Under loads, the bottom surface of the sleepers generates a counterforce against the sleepers and each cross-section of the sleepers are under bending stresses.
Special works of expressway in the operation period refer to the repair, reinforcement, upgrade and improvement for general wear and local damage of the expressway and its ancillary facilities as well as the preventive maintenance for extending the service life and improving the service level of the expressway.
All technicians attending the liaison meeting must be proficient in technical work and in good health.
The tread-type unit braking device shall be adopted to ensure that the tunnel cleaning vehicle can brake and park on a 38‰ ramp without rolling.
1) Roughen the surface of bearing pad stone at the intended location of the bearing, remove foreign matters in the reserved anchor bolt holes, and erect the formwork for grouting.
Sealing parts, pressure switch, pressure sensor and solenoid valve
(1) The foundation bed surface course of subgrade is designed to be filled with Group A fillers. The surface course filler and the lower filler of the foundation bed shall meet the requirements of the specification. When they do not meet the requirements, the foundation bed surface course shall be provided with a double-layer structure with different particle gradations, or geosynthetics for anti-filtration and isolation shall be laid on the surface of the foundation bed base course.
5.4.1 Main Method Statement of LOT01
The existing bridges are 3714.34m in total length, accounting for 2.1% of the total length of the line.
Parameters for the radiated interference test are as shown in Table 5:
4) The main line slope at the throat area of ​​stations should be consistent with the slope within the effective length of the receiving-departure track; under difficult conditions, the slope of the originating station should not be greater than 2.5‰, and the slope at the intermediate station should not be greater than 6‰.
If current indicated rises suddenly and the transformer under test makes discharge noise, it indicates that the transformer under test is broken down.
a) Kampung Telut Borrow Area: the formation lithology is mainly of amaranth pelitic sandstone, completely- or moderately-weathered, argillaceous cementing, with low strength and weak resistance to weathering, vulnerable to hammering, which can be used as B- or C-type filling material.
Support virtual host resources to scale dynamically and rapidly;
The station shall be provided with air-conditioning and ventilating equipment inside to keep a comfortable environment for passengers. When a fire accident happens in the station, the above equipment can be transformed to exhaust smoke and supply new air, thus ensuring safe evacuation of passengers.
The layer thickness may be measured not by leveling but by core drilling in sample pits at locations approved by the engineer.
4.4.1 In accordance with requirements of GB/T19001, GB/T24001 and GB/T28001, the Group Company formulates management policies and targets, and establishes the Quality, Environment, Occupational Health and Safety Management System and makes it into written information for implementation and maintenance, and continuously improves its effectiveness.
(4) High-quality high-speed rail asset's management benefits and spillover effects continue to emerge.
After confirmation by the operator, POST shall allow the operator to insert the Ticket at TIM (which can already be inserted as part of previous step). The POST, together with its TIM, shall complete the following operations:
Optimal process parameters shall be selected through process test to guide construction, and on-site process parameters shall be subject to test and control, and data shall be reported in time to guide construction with data.
After formwork removal, clean up the formwork. Before being stacked neatly in the light of the layout plan, coat the cleaned formwork with the release agent.
Therefore, we recommend the overground solution for the Jounieh intersection, which is the only solution compatible with freight traffic.
Connecting cable of equipment, L=500 10mm2
It can be concluded from Fig. 9 and Fig. 10 that construction gauges in the mainland China section and Hong Kong section are the same (Construction gauge of tunnel portion in Hong Kong section is invaded by the passageway; refer to Section 7 for checking of gauge at Hong Kong section when passing through the tunnel).
Enterprise Culture is Most Important Invisible Power of the Enterprise to Foster Talents
● Backrest adjustment function: Adjust the left position, with an adjustment range of 80°+41°
(2) Pipeline laying, pipe drain excavation and well chamber construction
Industrial safety, environmental protection and emergency plan.
Enhance market research, expand the building material supply channel, ensure to meet the requirements for construction progress, and intermittently optimize the construction scheme.
Reply: Chinese specifications use the theory of Elastic layered continuous system under the double circular vertical uniformly-distributed load for calculation and the standard axle load is 100KN, so all heavy-duty vehicles have been converted to standard axle load in accordance with the principle of deflection equivalent.
During the construction of tunnel, advance geological prediction and forecast works shall be done to the geology ahead of the excavated cutting face, and the support system inside the tunnel shall be monitored. The lining support measures shall be adjusted according to the advance geological prediction and forecast results and monitoring results, to ensure the safety of construction and structure.
100% needs to be reworked off line and accepted
The station monitoring network is equipped with station machines and acquisition equipment. It is provided with interfaces with such systems as the CTC, axle counting system, computer-based interlocking system, and intelligent power panel to collect information.
The contractor of the AFC system and the integrated supervisory and control system shall provide relevant interface functions in accordance with the following list of interface requirements.
(2) Human-machine complementation: when the recommended parameters differ greatly from those based on the experience of the boiler operation engineer, the boiler operation engineer can adjust the boiler parameters according to his own experience to avoid accidents;
Strengthen inspection before and during use to ensure that the protection null line is not mixed with the working null line, that the leakage protector of the switch box is sensitive and reliably and that the parameters of the leakage protector are matching. Implement the requirements of "one machine, one switch and one protection" strictly.
CPU of the workstation: Intel Xeon CPU
Main converter block 1 =11-U01:WF
│ │ │ EMU Right Track DCYK.han
Therefore, the railway line team should minimize the bridge elevation, and do not use or minimize the high fill and deep excavation works.
Professional engineering modeling team: to complete model deepening according to the requirements of AAHK BIM technical specification, to meet the construction needs.
4.1Substrate cleaning: Nitrocellulose varnish has quite strict requirements on the substrate. All additions that may affect the coat quality must be removed.
The relative height difference along the line is generally ranged from 3-10m, with a few sections higher than 15m.
Railway Applications - Structural Requirements of Railway Vehicle Bodies
Name of assignment or project: Northwest Existing Railway Reconstruction Project in Nigeria-Location Survey and Construction Drawing Design.
— Preliminary estimation of direct economic losses;
Supply line of automatic fire alarm system and interlocked fire control line shall adopt fireproof copper core wire and cables; transmission lines including alarm bus, fire emergency broadcast line and fire private telephone shall employ fire-resistant wires and cables.
With a center mileage of YDK14+830 and a length of 60m, this station, as a ground station having intersections with the existing highways, will be constructed mainly by filling according to the line laying method, with the maximum filling height of about 0.5m.
Reliable non-action value is changed to 0.95 times of the constant value.
When signing the contract, the Procurement Department should make requests on packaging according to the product characteristics, (including packaging form, packaging material, packaging specification, identification and container), and on the information contents and format requirements necessary for the delivery list;
(10) Turnouts: No.9 wooden sleeper turnouts for meter-gauge railways shall be used for all the main tracks, receiving-departure tracks, other station tracks and secondary station tracks.
(2)The internal arrangement of the unit should have sufficient space to ensure maintenance of the air conditioning unit.
During the construction of the steel frame structure, the steel truss floor deck materials are mobilized to the site in an organized manner.
Side ditches: rectangular ditches are set in the excavation sections, with the bottom width of 0.4~0.6m and depth of 0.4~0.8m, built with 30cm-thick M10 mortar rubble; one expansion joint is set at the 10~15m depth, and 1.0m-wide platform is set up outside the ditch.
Used for storing the train door leaves in a centralized way, with carrying capacity ≥500kg, capable of placing 10 door leaves; provided with small wheels with self-locking brakes under the storage rack and lifting lugs at the four corners, so as to facilitate the lifting and conveying.
Be able to complete regular item maintenance and common fault overhaul of the overhead line system and substation
The Project Supervision Department will, as per the procedures and requirements as below, conduct acceptance inspection of the materials, components and accessories and equipment to be mobilized :
For the goods produced in the People's Republic of China and imported into Nepal from Tibet Autonomous Region of China based on a letter of credit procedure, for the tariff rate less than 30%, 5% will be refunded; for the tariff rate more than 30%, 3% will be refunded in Nepal.
3.4.2.1 Principle of Construction Site Arrangement
Note: The shackle shall be selected for use according to its specified usages and rated load in the mark, which shall not be exceeded generally.
3.6.2 All connecting conductors and terminal strips shall be marked with wire marking signs which shall be clear, firm, perdurable and complete.
1) Digital video storage hard disc/memory device.
Description of sub-item in the bill of quantities (unit): diesel generator unit (Nr.)
1.1.36 "Launch date" means the first day of the month after the date when the Contract is signed and becomes effective and the Seller receives the advance payment of the amount agreed in Clause 10.1 (subject to the bank receipt).
Detailed design of embedded iron parts, formwork drawings, base slabs, etc.
Borehole parameters, borehole distribution and breaking sequence shall be determined according to the actual situation of the breaking target (material type, steel bar configuration, rock character, breaking or cutting lumpiness, etc.).
1. For karst springs or water-gushing holes above the subgrade, drainage ditches shall be set to intercept the water to the outside of the subgrade, and culverts or blind ditches shall be set to drain water from karst springs or water-gushing holes located at the base of the subgrade.
The invert, the tunnel bottom filling and the side wall foundation are poured successively prior to the lining structure to facilitate the overall stress and civilized construction of the supporting structure.
The overall dimensions (with enclosure) and load of rectifier cabinet shall be proposed by the Tenderer in the Tender Document and confirmed by the Tenderee.
(2) Before hoisting, safety education and safety technical disclosure must be provided to operation personnel and employees;
4-Brightness regulator (=52-A53)
Power line: the line connecting the wheel sensor and the indoor equipment shall be able to go through 5 impacts by 5 KV and 300 us positive and negative waveforms respectively at an interval of 1min, and the performance shall reach A.
As agreed in the contract, the departments and wind power plants under PowerChina International Group Limited shall install the facilities, measures and other items for safety and labor protection provided by the contract-issuing party as required by the contract.
At present, there are 14 CRE train routes leaving China via Alataw Pass border station, carrying the goods such as daily necessities, digital products, clothing, shoes and hats, etc.
If it remains unable to reach the target value, the Bidder must take corresponding measures for processing,.
The access road is 7 meters wide, with a 2.5% transverse gradient, and a temporary triangular drainage ditch shall be built on both sides of the access road.
Members' Rights, Obligations and Available Services
According to the design documents, the main structure of buildings of this project is a reinforced concrete frame structure system, and the construction scheme is proposed as follows.
Guidelines for Enterprises to Develop Emergency Response Plan for Work Place Accidents (GB/T29639-2013);
The Employer should advise us the code of the standard based on which "daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly"inspections are required. CRRC Changchun will study the standard, establish new requirements for its own and the sub-suppliers' design, inspection and maintenance, and adjust the inspection intervals and items.
It is planned that ETS works would be completed by June 13, 2015; while only 60% of total ETS quantity has been completed by Jun 20. The ETS works construction is behind schedule.
Each duty spot is equipped with the facilities such as track gauge, electric wrench and chamfering device.
Fig.28 Monitoring Touch Screen (used for existing project, for reference)
3. Allocation of railway maintenance machines and line inspection equipment
The positioning and design of general lighting and sockets are finished in the second decoration. The Design this time only includes reserve lighting of the distribution box, socket circuit and reserve cable tray routing.
All the scaffolds in the Project shall be steel pipe scaffold.
Based on the complete vehicle traction/braking characteristics in the above,:
The manual distribution numbers differentiates the controlled version from the non-controlled version.
During the test, the motor performs no-load running at the rated speed and shall be capable of normal operating, with the commutation spark not more than Grade 1.
According to the local lighting standard for highway tunnels, high pressure sodium lamps are used for lighting in the tunnel, which are arranged in a staggered way and are supplied by the outlet substation via the lighting distribution box in the tunnel.
3) Porcelain installation: insulation resistance shall be measured with a 500V megger before installation, which shall meet the requirement.
Through sufficient mixing, all component material of the concrete shall be uniformly mixed and be with the same color. This applies also to high-strength concrete and stiff concrete.
TB/T2820. 8-1999 Evaluation Standard for Degradation of Railway Bridge and Tunnel Buildings – Bridge Crossing
"Two checks in two countries" means that the entry-exit people, vehicles and cargoes should be subject to inspections by relevant departments as per relevant customs inspection standards in an designated place at the bordering area of a country; meanwhile, a same inspection area should also be set up inside the territory of another neighboring country, and therefore the entry-exit people, vehicles and cargoes should be subject to two inspections.
to offer itemized quotation and total fixed lump sum for each kind of work under the overall design.
Before filling ofembankment, silt, compost soil and cultivated soil shall be removed.
b) Obtain, collect and evaluate the laws and regulations and other requirements of the Company, and manage the Company's important environmental aspect.
Client satisfaction degree: is the quantitative description of the client's satisfying degree, and the results of comparing of the actual feeling of client accepting products and services and expected value.
3 The anti-sway hanger should be used when the direction of trunking changes or at the corner.
The new supporting port joint inspection facilities of China and Laos need to be constructed, which involve many departments of both nations such as homeland security, customs, frontier defense. Therefore, the project scale and difficulty in the overall promotion are large.
1. The purchase of nursery plants shall strictly follow the specification of the list. The nursery plants with flourishing roots, robust trunk and branches, beautiful shape and no diseases and pests shall be selected. Lopping shall be minimized during the transplantation of big seedling. Branchless trees are strictly prohibited. The main branches of arbor shall not be less than 4.
Plain fill (Q4ml): varicolored, mainly composed of rock fragments and a little sandy soil, of 2cm - 5cm in particle size of crushed stones, uneven, filled manually, and with the asphalt on top of about 30cm in thickness.
CEG hopes to communicate with relevant water environment protection enterprises in South Korea, to learn their advanced technologies and managerial experience in water supply and drainage, waste-based power generation, sludge disposal and basin treatment, and to discuss the possibility of cooperation in local water environment protection projects.
After the completion of confirmation, the route is then issued to the autonomous computer and used as the one in the shunting plan to be executed
Control all elevators to descend to 1/F or elevator transition layer.
If any department requires adjusting the audit date due to work demand, it shall notify the audit team three days before the scheduled audit date for adjustment of this schedule.
Application of Business Continuity Management (BCM) and "Scenario Building" Technology in Emergency Management
During masonry, it is required to erect height poles, clean the base course, water the bricks for moistening in advance, and lay the bricks according to the determined masonry method. In case of walls between windows and dimension appropriate for the amount of brick formwork, 7/10 long bricks or header brick shall be used for arrangement. The part that is not obvious shall be adjusted.
Organize the completion acceptance and account settlement work of all stages of the Project;
3 The requirements of allocation of vehicles, loading, transportation, release, unloading and timeliness shall be met.
Average load of freight car: 56.865t; average deadweight of freight car: 22.133t
The drainage system shall apply the separate drainage mode and mainly consist of waste water system, sewage system and rainwater system.
9.4.1. Basic technical parameters of door:
Disconnect cables at Points A1 and A2 of =45-P226-P1, and place them in control circuit.
3.4 Click the green train route after the current date to enter the order filling page.
The internal information is consistent with item information, with data conforming to product standard and standard information.
j) Documents to be retained in the development of product quality shall be specified and filed according to applicable requirements.
Pneumatic tools shall be provided with safety retaining rings to make sure the tool heads can be securely connected when installing and using them.
② Combination switchgear, multi-core control cables, protection and indicator cables should be directly connected to the electrical plate.
Overload AW3 (7 persons/m2)
The serial number of the observation points at centerline of the line is 00, the serial numbers at its left are odd numbers (01, 03, 05, 07 and 09) and those at its right are even numbers (02, 04, 06, 08 and 10), which increase in sequence from the centerline to outside, as shown in Figure 8-21.
The later stage is the key period to control the progress. When the progress cannot be completed as planned, analyze to find out the reasons and take measures to improve the process, implement flow three-dimensional crossover operation, increase personnel and working faces and strengthen the scheduling.
According to the scope, drawings and specifications, place the column at the final position in the structure, including the placement of corresponding elements (supports) not required for connection through other elements.
The decision making level includes competent leaders of headquarters of the Company, enterprise experts, functional management personnel of headquarters, contractor, the Owner and Supervisor etc.;
The following EMC measures are taken during cable wiring and connection for the complete vehicle:
Pre-processor of axle 3/4 (T-W)C4
7. The base of this culvert is on the schist W4 layer. 25cm thick crushed stone bed course shall be laid and compacted by layers under the C30 concrete bed course of culvert body in a way that the design requirement is satisfied.
Major international airports: Kiev Boryspil International Airport, Lviv International Airport, Odessa International Airport, and Simferopol Airport.
d) Requirements and suggestions of relevant parties on quality, environment, occupational health and safety.
For reservoir with small capacity, water taking for construction is to be avoid as possible.
2.4 Main Performance Parameters of Low-power Diesel Generator Set+Battery Hybrid Power System Power Package
Operations between final limit cam of elevator car and limit switch are coordinated and reliable.
Energy-saving running speed: 0.13 m/s. When no paccenger is on an escalator, it antomatically enters into energy saving state, runs slowly, and reduces abrasion.
The concentration of outgoing sludge shall be controlled by adjustment of the sludge inlet flow and revolution speed of screw.
Before the internal audit of the management system, the audit team leader is responsible for preparing a detailed Audit Implementation Plan according to the requirements of the audit scheme, specifying the audit purpose, content, audit team members, audit basis, audit date, etc.
Keep an eye on the whole preheating process constantly till the specified preheating time (press the stop button of the stopwatch, confirm the time and fill it in the sheet), take out the weld torch from the sand mold. At this moment, the rail head and web shall be in red.
4. Thickness of concrete cover of main reinforcement: 40mm for independent foundations.
(2) Build pre-reinforcement pile and implement back pressure backfill.
Riverway with sand content >1000kg/m3 in flood period
These channels shall meet the transmission demands of video and telephone conference systems along the whole expressway.
Asset-related government subsidies are recognized as deferred income, and equally distributed and included in current profit or loss within the service life of related assets.
Be suppose to take samples from intermediate products as per the stability study protocol and to submit them to QC.
The pier is designed of round-ended solid pier and the foundation is designed of bored cast-in-place pile, with pile diameter of 1.5m.
the Contractor does not receive the amount due under an Interim Payment Certificate within 42 days after the expiry of the time stated in Sub-Clause 14.7 [Payment] within which payment is to be made (except for deductions in accordance with Sub-Clause 2.5 [Employer's Claims]),;
Joints shall be sealed to prevent slurry from leaking.
(4) The ticket is out of the blacklist where the ticket is non-refundable as stipulated.
Shielding can control and reduce electromagnetic interference to a certain extent, but it has obvious limitations, that is to say, shielding can only weaken the interference inside and outside the shielding layer and has not effect on the interference source in the shielding layer.
The Wire Train Bus (WTB) is a real-time and high-reliable onsite bus developed for recoupling of locomotives (vehicles), and especially appropriate for open trains requiring dynamic marshalling (also for closed trains of fixed marshalling). It has following features:
The surface shall be of the same color and free of such visible defects as pores, scars, upset fins and burrs; the riser shall get rid of main stress positions of the insulation block.
1 locomotive standby tracks are provided at the end of mainline, with an effective length of 50m.
5.1.5 Political examination materials: materials on joining the CPC, Communist Youth League and democratic parties.
Steel pipes and upright poles of scaffolds shall be placed vertically and firmly on skids.
Under the consent of the Client, the actual cost necessarily incurred by the Supervisor for business trips and retests of materials and equipment can be reimbursed by the Client within the budget scope.
Responsible for improving the civil works model and deepening it based on the three-dimensional model of the Designer; further checking the design drawings; comprehensive coordination of BIM models of various disciplines (pipeline integration, disciplinary coordination, etc.); project information management.
The anchorage length of the lower tensile reinforcement of the stair slab stretching into the support shall be 15d and shall not be less than 150.
New fasteners must be used in case of replacement.
Research on intelligent data key technologies of wireless sensors based on rail transport
Outdoor equipment installation and foundation construction are greatly affected by the rainy season. The following measures are proposed to ensure that the time limit for a project is not affected by the rainy season:
(4) File legal proceeding against the directors or the senior executives who violate any laws, administrative regulations, or the Articles of Association during duty performance;
Monitoring and diagnosis system should be provided with functions of time correction, wheel diameter calibration and operator login through the display screen.
In special terrain and geological environment such as the very soft and single foundation with no transition layer and the sloped weak foundation, it is necessary to carry out checking calculation of transverse overall stability and take measures to enhance the transverse stability of pile-net structure subgrade.
The lithology in the vadose zone at the site of Shenhua Ningxia Coal - SABIC Joint-ventured 700,000t/a CTO Demonstration Project is mainly the silty soil, sandy soil and sandstone, with a thickness of 7.6~27.0m.
Accumulated depreciation _ Accumulated depreciation - Office equipment _ Accumulated depreciation - Office equipment - Increased in the year
The project is of regular rectangular plane and the overall dimension of axis is 90.0mX32.0m.
Specifications of Drainage Design for Highways (JTG/D33-2012)
The assembly shop is 662m long and 48m wide, with a parapet height of 16.5m and a cornice height of 14.45m.
Now, SIYUAN has become the design institute with the greatest workload in terms of large-diameter shield tunnels crossing the Yangtze River, accounting for about 60% of the total design volume.
Boulders exist upon backfilling for foundation of the building of swing rooms of Dawanle Station; construction unit is urged to pick out the boulders; compaction of small size rollers is not dense.
Organize and participate in the preparation of project quality target plan and potential risks identification plan.
Each application department is in charge of repairing, maintanence, review and daily management works for technological equipment.
1. Golina Super Major Bridge at DK28+371.72
Cable EKB-DPL-P-04E
, , - Solar radiation intensity of roof, side walls and floor, W/m2;
Continue to increase the pressure at 0.15MPa differentials step by step, maintain the pressure for 3min after each increase, and increase the pressure again after it is confirmed that there is no the system abnormality or leakage, till increasing up to the test pressure.
The internal wiring is arranged neatly without sheath damaged, the terminal of each part is not loose, and the connection is firm etc.
Certificate of Engineering Investigation (Class A) No. 220011-kj
Highway R4 mainly aims to satisfy the requirements of waste disposal for excavation of the diversion tunnel body, outlet and the dam foundation. The highway starts from the river bend of the right-bank downstream middle-line highway and ends at the right-bank downstream waste disposal area.
7) Each system equipment and system shall be installed as per requirements and accepted to be qualified and the records of installation technology shall be complete;
(6) Applicable concrete strength test record to confirm the concrete quality.
To realize display of external system information in PIS system and report PIS equipment situation to related system
The weld joint thickness shall not be less than 0.3 times of the diameter of the main reinforcement, and the weld joint width shall not be less than 0.7 times of the diameter of the main reinforcement.
Address: No. 619 Shuguang East Road, Wenling Economic Development Zone, Zhejiang
The track lifting device consists of lifting cylinder 10, supporting axle 12, center sill 6, guide post 23, side beam 18, full clamp device 4, rear clamp device 3 and supporting connectors, etc.
All machines and tools shall be in the charge of a specially-assigned person and operation shall be carried out against rules.
Tel.: 13585177245
2. Check the abrasion of grinding wheels before work to ensure that they are in good condition
Ban Lad Han Mekong River super major bridge at DK143+655
Suggestion on the form of sulfur produced in "Contract Area" shall be made in accordance with all applicable Chinese laws.
On May 24-30, 2017, the Employer entrusted Yunnan Haochen Environmental Protection Technology Co., Ltd. with the monitoring works for atmosphere, surface water and environmental noise in the project area. See details of monitoring sites sketch map in Attached Figure 12. Monitoring contents and results are as follows:
Unless other certain causes have made construction impossible to be implemented, the Contractor shall not arbitrarily cease the construction of works involved in the Contract without consent of the Employer.
The installation of equipment shall be carried out in accordance with plan, elevation, equipment body drawings and process pipeline drawings. Check the installed position and elevation of equipment. Mark elevation, position and benchmark used during installation on the equipment.
The outer railing, the platform board and the radiant beam, the first platform board and the first radiant beam shall be removed. Tower crane shall also be used to transport these to the ground, and cutting tools shall be used to cut off the supporting rods one by one, and at the same time the slip-form operation platform shall be cut off and lifted in sections.
1. The dimensions and chainage elevation in this drawing are in meters.
Dynamic Acceptance Record of (Project Name)
3 Pile class in terms of pile integrity, as well as position, extent and degree of defect.
Embedded bolt 4-M30, with head exposed by 120, full thread
Date: _____________________________
8.2 Surface soil layer and underlying weathered bedrock layer are thick, so the bridge foundation should be placed into the weakly-weathered bedrock. Pile foundation is recommended for bridge, with length and diameter determined after computational check.
1. The constructor shall check and accept planting materials, soil, fertilizer, etc. in batch according to their specification and quality, and report to the supervisor and test instructor.
Granite: Brownish yellow above and brownish grey below, completely-weathered (W4); most minerals but quartz deteriorated and weathered into earth; core in chunk or pie shape, fragile to pinch; recovery percentage: 100%.
GB50411-2007 Code for Acceptance of Energy Efficient Building Construction
The hoisting height is divided into three levels. At the first level, the hoisting height is 10 cm, with the foundation, the mechanical properties of crawler crane, and the connection of hook, wire rope and other components checked, and the hoisting of the next level can be carried out after passing the check.
1. The meeting shall be convened and presided over by the general manager. The general manager, if absent from the meeting for special reasons, can assign the deputy executive general manager to convene and preside over the meeting.
The shaft head and the bracket are permanently connected. The bracket and the yoke are connected by bolts and can be disassembled.
Cambodian National Highway Project of "Phnom Penh-Siem Reap-Poipet" is in line with the investment direction of Yunnan Overseas Investment. We pay high attention to this project, and hope to contact and cooperate with your esteemed department for this project.
Note (1): The temperature is within 10°C~52°C. In case that the temperature is within 5°C~10°C, the minimum penetration time shall be 20 minutes.
Hire migrant workers to load and unload crushed stones.
Track and manage the whole process of purchase order until all purchased items are received and accepted.
Written explanation to the Bidding Committee of the Company was required for bidding projects by means of request for proposal. And bidding was required to be performed following the open, fair and transparent principles, with the most suitable contractor selected.
Conductors at both ends of HT+ and HT- on BV11, BV12, BV21 and BV22 of voltage sensors
2) 1 score deducted for each finding of a failure to pass the acceptance inspection at one time.
For train and railway systems, a total of 7 quantitative criteria and 6 qualitative criteria were applied on the diesel and electric options and further between sub-urban "Extrapolis train" and inter-city "Corradia trains".
(3) During the handling of traffic direction change, if the section directional arrow flashes red after the AuxDpt button is pressed at one station, it indicates that the signaling equipment has a fault and this handling shall be stopped.
Double-track Tunnel Supporting Parameters Table 9-2-2
The total 316L stainless steel (containing 1.5% of welding line weight) in the expansion joints of non-vehicle crash guardrails of whole bridge is /kg
Uplink returned to the depot at Sanlu, and the backup T0105 took place.
<27-1-W4> Conglomerate: brownish yellow-brown, rudaceous texture, sandy-argillaceous cementation, with most primary rock structure destroyed and cemented conglomerate blocks observed locally, with rock core being loose or in earth-pillar structure.
2. The stairs construction drawing of this project is drawn with the plane integration expression method, and should be read in conjunction with the national standard collective drawings 11G101-2.
In order to ensure the quick start of the park and achieve established goals, the municipal finance bureau will annually integrate the funds of RMB 10 million and continuously provide for 3 years to support the infrastructure construction of Kunming Liangwangshan Modern Agricultural Park.
Final assembly process procedure and PFMEA completion
Meanwhile, the site personnel shall analyze and demonstrate local accidental factors at the site and promptly adjust corresponding blasting parameters in a safe manner; if most blasting parameters at site are found to be discrepant with the design, the construction shall be stopped and the Chief Engineer shall be notified for blasting scheme adjustment.
January 12, 2023 - February 15, 2023.
The local supplier takes charge of the PIS after-sales service and maintenance.
CEC-CEDA website: www.cecceda.org.an
b) Contact rated current (Ie): 1 A
Among them, Derun Enviroment shall be paid at 8% of management fee by CR according to the construction and installation engineering fee, and be paid at 5% of management fee by North China Institute according to the design fee.
The main defects of the culvert are that: The water inlet, outlet and culvert is blocked and deposit appears in them; no obvious defect is found in other structures.
In addition to meeting the basic requirements of ticket making, the function of the BOM has more functions that conform to the characteristics of usability, reliability, convenience and accessibility.
Power of Motorboat: 15 kW (20 hp)
Disconnect/connect X6 plug of REP module in CEC cabinet
Note: Immunity and emission levels cannot guarantee the satisfactory performance of the apparatus integration.
SIPAX processes various railway ticketing modes in two kinds, i.e. the middle and long distance railway and the regional railway, with the seats assigned for the former and not assigned for the latter.
The lifting screw rod and lifting nut shall be lubricated with oil and electrified to make the lifting frame run at least 5 strokes in the handling frame for running-in, and check whether the running condition is normal and whether there is abnormal sound during running-in process.
In case of any quality problem encountered by Party A due to its inappropriate usage or natural disasters or beyond the warranty period, Party B shall repair with corresponding charges and instantly assign special persons to arrive on site for repair after signing the Supplementary Agreement of Non-gratuitous Repair.
After all the image signals of the toll collection station are transmitted to the equipment room of the toll collection station, images are uploaded to the video matrix of Yicheng management center through the video optical transceiver. Then, the matrix is switched out 8-circuit images to upload them to the Linfen area center for monitoring.
From August 2016 to April 2018, worked as the Test Engineer in the Project for construction of Liuwu 220kV Power Transmission and Transformation Project (Yangliu and Nieliu Line Works) and Other 3 Projects
Install a new steel ball in a φ5H8 hole, punch it at the original punching point with a spherical punch (SJ/0005) to lock the steel ball, and ensure the flexible operation of steel ball with an operating stroke of 0.5 ~ 1 mm.
The Seller's commissioning personnel must understand the equipment structure and performance, master the operating procedures and methods.
Scissors-type lifts (2): machines for aloft inspection, maintenance and other works, consisting of working platforms, lift devices and other components.
(4) Assemble internal and external forms and ensure geometric dimensions and formwork gradient.
In accordance with the requirements of "six-in-one" management document, it is required to boost information construction step by step by determining different emphases, avoid information management to become a bare outline and image project, and offer strong guarantee for subsequent information management.
Temperature measurement system is established for construction at site in winter. Temperature measuring personnel will be responsible for recording the measured temperature values.
③ Light curtain protection for door: Infrared light curtain should be installed on the door for closing security.
(3) The earthworks excavation shall be carried out from the upper side to the lower side according to the design drawings, and deliberate excavation and over-excavation are not allowed.
No records relating to assessment of HSE objectives were found.
Article 6 LCRC, cooperative banks and construction contractors shall sign a tri-party regulatory agreement to specify the regulation content, method, duration, operation mode and the rights and obligations of all parties.
Batching shall be paved after acceptance of earthwork in the channel slot and channel slot shall be kept wet before paving.
IEC61373 Railway applications-Rolling stock equipment-shock and vibration tests
 The other container or pressureless container should be subject to 24-hour water filling test, and the pressure-bearing container should be subject to tight water pressure test according to regulations.
Figure 6-7-3 Diagram of Intersection Point with Hanoi Rd
To ensure the thickness of the protective layer, the thickness of the prefabricated cushion block shall be accurate and the strength shall be guaranteed.
5.1.3 Establish and enrich the databases of textbooks and resources for internal training to provide sufficient resources for subsequent training.
Lack of patent technology, proprietary technology or new technology; To avoid risks in project implementation;
Aperture: 1-4.0m, Skew Angle: θ=45°?
At the end of the year, there were 3 domestic securities companies and 256 securities business offices (including business offices in Shaanxi of non-local companies), down 2 over the previous year.
1) Inspect and repair main throttle valve, bypass valve, steam extraction valve, extraction check valve, and speed-governing valve.
• Elastic KCV value (impact) at -20°C: ≥35 J /cm²
In order to improve the travel safety of resident, the 34 pedestrian level crossings at the sections are changed into overpasses.
Under the fallback mode, the operation of SECM Sub-system shall be the same as that in normal operation, while the operators shall be notified that the system is operating under the fallup mode. The operators shall also be notified when the SECM sub-system is recovered to normal operation.
Cement is from large factory, and unqualified materials must not be used.
The filtering geotextile shall be protected against fire, sunshine, damp and mechanical damage during transportation, storage and paving, without being punctured or torn.
Breaking the certification policy barrier of each province and highlighting the guiding function of the state.
Mechanical mixing of crushed stone asphalt concrete Medium-grained type LH-20
For the tender quotation that is higher than the maximum tender price specified in the Tenderding Document;
2. Considering that there may be earthwork stripping at the inverted slope of the tunnel crest. The distance between the inverted slope toe to the portal end wall back shall not less than 1.5m; the portal end wall crest shall not be higher than the inverted slope toe by less than 0.5m; and the height from the tunnel portal end wall and the ditch bottom of the inverted slope to the upper edge of the tunnel lining arch top shall not be smaller than 1m.
6.2.4.2 Sample products of the supplier must be provided with report documents which shall contain dimensions, materials and experimental data.
Average acceleration (0→26km/h, AW2, half wear) ≥0.6m/s²
The Project Manager, Huang Haixu, quited and Xiang Lin is appointed to take over his tasks as Interim Project Manager and to undertake all corresponding responsibilities at the same time of being Project Civil Engineer.
Unified Social Credit Code /Registration Number: 91320191663764650N
Abstract: An evaluation system and method for synergy between dispatch systems of high-speed railway and conventional railway was developed based on the scheduled train graph and actual train graph data to ensure efficient and safe train operation on the railway network.
According to the study and evaluation report of railway project, the frequency of freight and number of opening passenger line are as follows:
After normal operation, it is proposed not to add chlorine water recovery pipe since presently the water quality is under strict control.
During normal drilling, drilling parameters should be adjusted reasonably.
After the scheduled booth dismantlement time, for those booths that are still not dismantled without keepers or have not been granted with overtime work procedures, the Organization Committee of the Exhibition will organize persons to clear it and the booth garbage deposit of relevant booths will not be refunded;
4.3 Invited tendering: the procurement behaviors of sending the invitation for bid to specific suppliers without issuing the bidding announcement, and selecting the supplier offering the reasonable minimum price by limited technical and commercial bidding.
It refers to a substance that is flammable itself and can generate flammable gases, vapor or mist.
A single product or a batch of products shall be separately identified. The identification shall be put on record.
4.3 Steel: Section steel and steel plate are made of Q345B and other unspecified steel structures are made of Q345B steel.
Pre-stressed Steel Tendon Layout of Box Girder of Indus River Super Major Bridge at DK1608+964
The communication pipelines should be set at the median strips and be constructed simultaneously with the civil works of the highway.
Surface water: once every quarter, one day for each time; once in the morning and once in the afternoon.
For the subgrade bed, the compaction coefficient of surface layer shall be: K ≥ 0.95; the compaction coefficient of bottom layer shall be K ≥ 0.93; the compaction coefficient of embankment under subgrade bed shall be K ≥ 0.90.
Installation of surface waterproofer made of "ТEKHNOELATOMOST" - а - roll waterproofing polymer bitumen material brand or equivqlent Б 4.5mm thick according ТУ 5774-004-00287852-00 "SOYUZDORNII"
2) Prepare solution in pure water with temperature of 30 ℃ ~ 50 ℃ with a proportion of one liter of pure water to 300g ~ 500g anhydrous sodium sulfate (Na2SO4) or 700g ~ 1000g sodium sulfate decahydrate (Na2SO4•10H2O).
The shunting signal will be cleared from far to near in the long-distance shunting route;
The quantity of subgrade outside the tunnel at this contract section is small. Therefore, the construction shall be arranged reasonably according to the construction development situation of the tunnel. Protection and drainage engineering shall be conducted timely along with the construction of subgrade. Greening of subgrade section and environmental protection engineering shall be constructed after the completion of subgrade and protection engineering and during the season that is suitable for the growth of plants to decrease the water and soil loss and protect the environment.
Safety and technical essentials of general workers must be explained according to the construction progress and characteristics, and safety tips must be frequently delivered to ensure construction safety and engineering quality.
1. The monthly assessment coefficient is directly linked to the green plant rent service fee, and the monthly fee payable = monthly contract settlement amount X monthly assessment coefficient.
2.2Project sponsor: Luoyang Metro Group Co., Ltd.
Changning-Menglian-Kengtung-Chiengmai ophiolite belt
Pave one room once while paving floor tiles. While constructing a large area, tiles shall be paved by different sections and positions.
Transverse passages (8 in total) are set every 480m at both tracks of the tunnel, being concurrently used as special chambers and rescue accesses.
Level 1~3: Reserved (line and network dispatcher);
The brake of trailer is realized by connecting the brake pipes at the end of the trailer and relief locomotive.
◆ For concrete with the accelerator, the early curing shall be strengthened to ensure the hydration reaction progressing smoothly, so as to minimize the reduction of concrete strength in the later stage.
Construction surveying and setting-out shall be strictly controlled. After trench excavation starts, the trench shall be re-tested carefully and the pipe shall not be laid until the trench is tested qualified.
The technical review is intended to review the completeness, accuracy and effectiveness of project archives. Specialized technicians from all construction participants shall take responsibility for:
Concrete voids and pits, S=5.3m2
Body support frames (24): support frames for supporting the body lifted from the beam.
Annual average relative humidity: ≤95% (the lowest average temperature of the current month shall not be lower than 25°C);
7 : relative maximum concrete stress of pier bottom: 4. 77MPa [σh]=17.70 MPa (OK)
Liaocheng City Environmental Protection Agency +Gas Station of Luxi Chemical -Fixed Station 1
According to the presumption of guilt of Chinese law, any leakage will be deemed as guilt, while the presumption of innocence is followed in foreign countries.
Alt+ S+1 Order and book the fast train through ticket
To the left side of IIDK10+755~IIDK10+973, 218m; to the right side of IIDK10+755~IIDK10+973, 218m. Part of the rock slope of the cutting shall adopt C15 concrete for paving and protection.
(3) When the alignment of upper and lower piles is acceptable through inspection, first perform positioning and spot welding. In the case of spot welding, the welding material used is the same as that for formal welding. In case of defects, the spot welding shall be timely removed.
4. Try incorporating all kinds of problems related to project management into the scope of contract management as much as possible, so that any party involved in the project construction can enjoy rights and fulfill obligations on the basis of the contract, and jointly ensure that the Project is smoothly completed and put into operation.
Tianjin Expressway system engineering has a design mileage of 200 km.
Plastic adhesive tape (0.18mmx25mmx10mm)
A margin of 20~50 mm shall be left depending on the form of overlap and the amount of expansion and contraction.
The number of interfaces must meet the interface capability with other equipment of the Integrated Supervisory and Control System and the system, allowance shall be reserved. For the number of interfaces, there shall be ≥12 gigabit ports (which may be optoelectronic multiplex).
Components that can operate in the external power mode:
When it comes to an urgent task, and it is necessary to temporarily assign a person who is a person not in the department to perform a joint task, you can dynamically set up a dynamic group, choose the required calling number to join the dynamic group, and the dynamic group will appear on the terminal. When the task is complete, cancel the dynamic group.
14. After each inspection and maintenance, maintenance personnel must conduct a comprehensive inventory check for on-line monitoring equipment and facilities in the station building, handle relevant matters, and timely complete a variety of statistical work and report and file as required.
The following products are provided with optimal fire behavior and thus no further test is required:
2)Each train is divided into multiple MVB units, and each MVB unit is equipped with 2 EGWM modules which are mutually redundant heat standby; in normal conditions, one of the module is selected as the bus master of each unit to control and manage the MVB bus, and the other module will used as a standby in hot standby state.
The requirements for different grounding are different, so the grounding construction shall be decided according to the design.
Any lamp part requiring protection shall be coated with paint and the paint shall conform to the requirements of Technical Specification for Corrosion Prevention and Surface Treatment of Vehicles (PM059096002).
2=1650*1*0.85*1.87*0.8*1=2098 pcu/h (Bi-directional and four lane)
The construction and domestic wastes generated during the construction period shall not be piled or abandoned randomly and they shall be piled and collected at the fixed place and cleared in time.
The lower reinforcement of the cast-in-situ slab shall not overlap in the midspan, and its anchorage length in the support shall not be less than 10d, and shall extend over the center line of the beam.
Responsible for bituminous macadam sealing course and other construction operations of pavement work of this whole section for this project
Serious accident: the accident with direct economic loss between RMB 3,000 and RMB 50,000 (RMB 50,000 included) or with work resumption time of more than 3 days after personal injury to employees, but without death.
220kV substation outgoing line structure position and outgoing line structure height
When the geological conditions are good, only support with bolts, wire meshes and shotcrete is needed. The workload of support is small and the speed is fast .
The cost incurred shall be included in tender price.
h) Assume full responsibility for the product quality, service, environment and safety of the Company.
Fig. 6-5-6-28 Schematic Diagram of Reinforcement for Opening Formwork
The Contractor shall formulate detailed construction safety and fire safety solutions during the Project.
The car body and interior decoration is composed of bearing structure, interior decoration (including floor, roof and wallboard), equipment (including door, window, seats, armrest and stand column), interior lighting, train broadcast and display device, air conditioning plant, etc.
Report of the performance acceptance test shall be prepared by the Seller with participation of the Buyer, and the conclusions shall be confirmed by seals of the both.
77.6 km of track laying for the main line of the Mine Area Railway Project in Indonesia.
Legal representative or authorized agent: Lei Dechao (seal)
Where the material quality changes, double the sampling quantity for testing and report the testing results to the Engineer. Select a new supplier according to the procedure described above when necessary.
2) Joints of adjacent vertical poles shall be arranged in different pace in a staggered manner. The extending parts of big cross bars shall be arranged in different vertical distance of vertical poles in a staggered manner.
The air supply system is equivalent to air delivery system and air supply unit as for the definition.
30. If there are grounding requirements of the pipes, the multi-core conductive overline must be connected between flanges.
The person in charge of site construction is the project manager. Personnel responsible for specific implementation include the foreman, quality inspector on site, material man, documenter, machine man, and logistics manager. Foremen plays a major role in construction management.
If the negotiation fails, either party may apply for mediation or arbitration to the contract management authority stipulated by the country, or directly bring a lawsuit to their respective local people's courts.
First clean the foam filler or other materials, temporarily locate and fix the connections between distribution boxes and tubing, build the surroundings by masonry materials and conduct plastering by providing steel screen for the back wall thickness is insufficient to build blocks.
The project unit will require the construction unit to abide by the construction principles as follows:
Estimated Price for Subcontracted Items (Unit: USD)
The topographic alignment shall be planned to scale, showing all features and engineering traits within 100 meters (each side) of the canal center line, as well as the location of each cross section and the datum point for measuring the vertical coordinate of the cross section;
The author will give a brief introduction to the work result. Concentrated meeting is not necessary for implementation of walkthrough and other methods such as Email and countersignature can be adopted;
Lift the beam body onto the layout instrument worktable, with upper cover plate upward.
Fire Alarm System Diagram of 2# LV Distribution Room of Ew Plant
Organize functional departments (the Safety Management Department, the Quality Management Department, the Engineering Management Department, the Planning and Finance Department, the General Management Department and the Materials and Equipment Department) to regularly organize the management and inspection of construction teams, organize special meetings of construction team management and coordinate the arrangement of construction team management.
1) The processing of cable conduits shall meet the following requirements:
A safe distance shall be established by installing fixed protection device, concave corners, encircling rollers or pulleys and belts that are able to be maintained remotely, providing interlocks, etc. to prevent workers from contacting dangerous components of the conveyor.
In the comparative section of the Scheme of Connection Nairobi South (CK0-CK51), the main line of Nairobi~Malaba Railway is 51km long and the bridges and tunnels are 16.8km long.
3. Strengthen the transverse link between beams.
b. When the groundwater is plentiful and cannot be drained or drainage costs are expensive, and when drainage is not allowed, grouting and water blocking measures are applied.
7.3.7.3 The design can be validated by one of the following ways:
Settlement joint is set up to prevent the structure from deformation and fracture caused by local uneven settlement. It ensures that the structure has room for deformation up and down, left and right.
Raw materials should be tested for various indicators in strict accordance with the specifications, and the construction mix proportion should be strictly controlled.
Power supply device (UPS) itself has bypass function. When the rectifier and inverter unit of power supply device are under fault condition, bypass can be realized manually/automatically, with power directly fed by external (220/380V) power supply.
Complete a series of commissioning and debugging work in compliance with the contract conditions, start the trial operation and commissioning with the inlet natural gas of pipes, station yards and individual system and complete the trial operation and commissioning by increasing the pressure to the pressure approved by the trial operation and commissioning scheme for 72h continuous and safe operation.
Where it is necessary to obtain the production license for special equipment in China in accordance with relevant regulations, a permit shall be obtained.
Awash Bridge: with the construction period of 23 months from October 1, 2012 to November 1, 2014003B;
4. Prior to construction of staircase, setting out at 1:1 according to the construction drawing shall be carried out and laying off can only be carried out until setting out is confirmed to be correct after calibration.
Company name (Seal): Wuxi Jianeng Construction Machinery Co., Ltd.
In design, the land-saving principle shall be followed and the plan shall be made reasonably. Comparison shall be made for schemes of excavation-for-filling and centralized earth borrowing (spoil) in economic and technical aspects.
9. This Agreement is made in 2 originals and 8 copies, with each party holding 1 original and 4 copies.
2 The installation position of the dropper shall comply with calculation requirements, with the allowable deviation as ±50mm; Provisions in Paragraph 2, Article 7.14.6 in the Technical Specification for Construction of High-speed Railway Traction Power Supply System (Q/CR 9609-2015)
Commencement date: subject to the date approved in the commencement report
All procured raw materials, semi-finished and finished products shall be accepted by professionals before entering the site, and the quality certification documents and data shall be verified. For the unqualified semi-finished products or materials without complete certification, acceptance and entry of the site are not allowed. All materials shall be identified immediately after entering the site, to avoid misuse and mixing use.
After being inoculated with the vaccine, the human body will plevleruce the corresponding antibody, this antibody ( )
For the prestressed tendons in concrete structure, stressing force control method shall be adopted, and the method of controlling the cold drawing rate should not be adopted in case of the hot rolled reinforcement furnace batch cannot be distinguished.
(2) The area of individual some shape shall be counted as per the calculation method approved by the Supervisor.
The total station and the theodolite are used for paying-off the pile position, and the hole protection pile is embedded.
According to the present resource condition, we can realize the relevant projects in C852 contract.
XW2-1, equipped with louver and steel base, made of stainless steel
During the biochemical treatment, the substrate degradation is exactly the process of organisms utilizing and converting nutrient substances in wastewater and converting complex materials into simple materials.
Self-constructed temporary houses are adopted for the living and production house of the project. The specific plans are as follows:
DZ-2.5, air quantity: 1000m³/h, rotation speed: 1450r/min,
Keep records and make adjustment in time according to joint review of drawings, design clarification and alteration to drawings.
3. The sewage pipe/sludge pipe/dosing pipe shall be UPVC pipe, the underwater aeration pipe shall be ABS pipe, and over-water aeration main pipe shall be Q235A pipe.
h) Electrical room for cement packing: one transformer, and one set of MCC.
Designer: Yunnan Nengyang Water Resources and Hydropower Survey and Design Co., Ltd.
To January 2008 when construction of the Beijing-Shanghai high-speed railway began,
25. The GIS shall be installed according to the following requirements:
During the risk management and operation specification execution, the Contractor shall predict and analyze other residual risks that may occur and formulate measures to control the risks.
K112+200 15m hollow plate
In 1970, Japan stipulated that: Truck railway lines for which trains travel at a speed above 200km/h in main sections are called high-speed railway. In May 1985, UNECE specified the maximum speed of high-speed railways as: 300km/h for railway line for passenger traffic and 250km/h for railway line for mixed passenger and freight traffic.
The maximum spacing: 6,000~8,000 mm (connecting channels should be set as far as possible for platforms between adjacent equipment and between equipment and frame).
With reliable measurement of the expenditures belonging to development stage of the intangible assets.
Overall dimensions: W2900*D600*H2100 (mm)
Reduce the possibility of accumulation of combustible materials (garbage, grease, etc.).
(4) The Tenderers shall submit two electronic documents of every training material. The name of the Tenderers, catalog structure of electronic documents, and names of main documents shall be clearly indicated on the cover.
Then, the relative displacement between rear adjusting nut 14 and lead screw is f which is just the abrasion value of brake shoe.
Pulley of vertical tension device should operate flexibly within sliding rail. Counterweight should lift smoothly in rail or shaft and be free of jamming. Barriers are required around the holes of vertical tensioning device.
b Products and services are provided directly to customers by external suppliers on behalf of the Company.
6.4.1.10.24 Flat Car Without Power
8 Issue the testing report after the auditing of the measuring result shows there are no errors.
During the installation of steel wires, if steel wires with defects such as bending are found, they shall be picked out and replaced in time. As the steel bars in the Project are processed and formed at one time and no repeated operation shall be carried out. The picked out steel wires shall be transported to the unqualified area in time and scrapped.
The Agreement becomes invalid after all completed works pass the completion acceptance and after the defects liability release certificate is issued when the defects liability period expires.
Air cleaning equipment: Fan filter unit (including two-stage filter)
The laboratory establishes Procedure of Ensuring Impartiality and Integrity so as to prevent the organization from involving in activities that may impair the ability, impartiality, judgment or operation integrity of the laboratory and to ensure the authenticity of test works and test results.
Relevant results will be input (loaded) into HSE information management system by each unit.
1st floor: the main building is equipped with an entrance hall with special visitor reception and VIP rest hall and independent stairs and lifts so that people can directly visit yet not disturb other work in this building.
6.6.6 The Operation Department produces the required quantity of spare parts according to the Product Configuration List and provides the spare parts to be handed over by the After - Sales Department or to be delivered to the customer on site.
The outer doors of office area are aluminum alloy glass vertical hinged doors, and the inner doors are finished solid wood doors. The secondary rooms are equipped with plywood-faced doors.
Figure 6.1.2-3 Schematic Diagram of Anti-Slipping Stability Checking of Sloping Base
The site administrator could not started the train after boarding, and T0104 wasdisconnected from T0111 to evacuate passengers.
Nitrogen, steam, blast furnace gas and compressed air are from the plant pipe network. No flow meter is installed within the area. Refer to the general drawing for the detail of connection points.
Inspection Report of WJ8-I7 Insulation Block
The Management Manual, as the experience gained since HPP carried out the malaria programs in China, is used as practice code and work instructions for HPP working personnel to deal with China Global Fund NSA Malaria Program.
A set of soft switching core equipment (SS) is set up in the control center of Line 1. The interface capacity is initially configured according to 12,000 users (including Line 1 and Line 2), which can be smoothly expanded to 50,000 users. It has the ability to control and process the Luoyang Urban Rail Transit Line Network.
The switchback processing shall include, as a minimum, verification all accounting period data and traffic data and related data with MOR, OCHS, payment gatewayandgenerationofaccounting,operational and switchback reports.
2) The course will improve the comprehensive quality of students and focus on the cultivation of cooperative spirit, innovative consciousness and entrepreneurial thought;
Fig. 4-1 Comparison Between Original and Optimized Routes near Super Major Bridge over Indus River
easily deformed, belong to mollisol, recovery percentage 85%.
Both the oil color and the level of transformer are abnormal. In addition, the oil quality cannot be accepted;
8.2.2 Transportation and storage shall comply with GB/T 9768.
Ultrasonic inspection of the steel member welding by the third party;
The design institute is currently preparing a special report on the optimized scheme. It will take about 50 days from the preparation to the completion of review of the report. The estimated time requirements are as follows:
Strengthen the fire safety publicity and education work for construction personnel, train electricians, electric welders, painters and personnel engaging in the operation and storage of flammable and explosive materials and ensure that they take up their posts with certificates.
Design machining process as per bogie parts drawings, do basic bench-working operations; use and maintain tools and measuring tools; read instruments and meters.
During excavation, if soil property changes or bad soil property is found out under the subgrade excavated, the Engineer shall be informed in time for disposal of the problem.
Address of customer: No. 88 of Jinhong Road East, Chengyang District, Qingdao City
Transport to the installation site with automobiles according to the transport route investigated on site.
No.302, Unit 1, Building 2, No.199 Kuixing Road, Yueyang Town, Anyue County, Ziyang, Sichuan
a) Document identification and description (e.g.: title, date, author, number, etc.);
Form and Grade of Embankment Slope Table 13.9.1-3
4.6.2In the calculation of the construction load, the relevant safety factors can be respectively used according to the specific situations.
Sheet layout and position adjustment shall be performed in strict accordance with the requirement of drawings and standards. The straightness of the sheets shall be 10mm, which is the biggest deviation for a single span. Sheet staggered joint is required to be <5mm and shall not be connected with the main beam until after inspected qualified.
Comprehensive construction technology research of pre-stressed cast-in-situ T-girder dedicated for railway
Table 4.6 Waste Bin Type Selection for Category A Residential Quarters (1,800 Households)
4m\U+00D74m low ground; thickness: -0.3m
WF series single-stud/ double-stud terminal connection
6. Planning of resource (labor, machinery, materials, methods, environment and quality inspection) demand
d. Application of one course of plain cement mortar (mixed with 5%-water construction adhesive)
Urban rail transit is the backbone system of urban public transport. At present, in some cosmopolitan cities, rail transit generally bears more than 60% of the bus turnover.
Complete the preparation of the detailed scoring sheet for development of safety production standardization
Where the Employer disagrees the change, the Supervisor shall notice the Contractor in written form.
Housing Construction Design Drawing for Track Car Shed of Dawanle Station
Closely pay attention to the market dynamics of some related resources, especially the material market, and foresee the supply capacity of the market. For the materials with high consumption intensity, in addition to a certain amount of on-site reserves, the suppliers must be required to provide the supply guarantee.
Apply the level to import the elevation control points in the work shaft.Taking the known benchmarks around as the basis, set out two elevations at upper part of the work shaft, and then import the elevations to the temporary benchmark set at bottom of the work shaft by using the method of hanging tape, where the imported elevations shall not be less than 2 points in order to carry out review and measurement.
(4) Power supply and distribution, automatic and instrument system for steel making
Figure 9.3.3 Temporal Curves of Deformation and Stability Determination
Rain Washing of External Side at Subgrade Excavation Section of No.7 Branch
During construction of tunnels in shallow-buried sections, fault fracture zones or sand-mudstone sections, the tunneling method of "short drilling footage, rapid cycling, weak blasting, little disturbance, and fast closure" shall be applied. Lining and protection should be strengthened timely. Ventilation and monitoring on harmful gas shall be enhanced for tunnels to ensure safety.
These laboratories have all passed the laboratory accreditation of China National Accreditation Service for Conformity Assessment (CNAS) and the metrological accreditation of Certification and Accreditation Administration of the People's Republic of China (CMA);
Pouring method: the "forcing method" from one end. The concrete, according to the beam height, is poured to be layered stepped appearance, when it reaches the slab position, the pouring will be carried out together with the slab concrete.
7.2.1 Main technical conditions of telephone switching system
100 thick C15 concrete spacer;4. Pavement thickness, width and material variety:
Remove foreign matters in the foundation pit before pouring the base plate. Treatment for foundation bottom should meet the requirements of the design and the supervisory engineer.
1. It shall be subject to acceptance strictly following the acceptance criteria. Non-conforming sections shall be treated till they meet requirements.
The area of the attraction areas covers 6.80X104km2, and the total population is 2,209,000 along the line in 2009 with the population density being 32.5 persons/km2. GDP has realized 2.16 billion USD, with per capita GDP being 978 USD.
Set the control center according to specific requirements and implement centralized management control.
Review whether the contractor have specific goals of safe and civilized construction.
1~2F commercial smoke exhaust room staircase exhauster room
National, local and industrial laws, regulations, documents and standards on quality, environment, and occupational health and safety.
Technical Code for Glass Curtain Wall Engineering (JGJ102-2003)
During the first layer coating of deck waterproof paint, a certain amount of surface active agent solution shall be mixed within the paint for dilution to promote the paint soaked into base surface capillary pores so that the bond strength and shear strength of waterproof paint can be improved.
Testing description: the testing shall be carried out after software and hardware integration. The software shall be compiled and entered into microprocessor AT89C52. Its functional integrity shall be tested using overall testing.
Not less than 20 times the outer diameter of the optical cable during laying.
All filling base or contact surfaces will be prepared in accordance with relevant specifications.
­ Cost control risk: capital budgeting management mechanism.
(14) The shunting route button indication lamp shows stable white aspect, indicating that this button is used as a(an) button and the relay is energized.
Regularly or irregularly, we shall disinfect the kitchen, tableware, housing, and clothing. If necessary, we shall disinfect the air with ultraviolet rays or spray.
Among the three roads, the Project + 34A road has a significant advantage with the shortest driving time, lowest transportation cost and lowest total driving cost.
8.1 Review flow for document inspection of safety inspection documents
Attachment 1-Table 7: Quantities Resulted from Additional Water and Soil Conservation Measures in Temporary Earth Stacking Yard
3. Width, location and structure of deformation joint
The safe operation supervision department as well as the office shall organize the initial training and re-training of dangerous goods. Such matters as arrangement of training expenses, traffic and accommodation shall be made by specially-assigned personnel from relevant departments;
All possible measures must be taken to prevent damage by human or natural factors.
Test class: ±6kV for contact discharge and ±8kV for air discharge;
Shall include agreements on safety production, security and fire prevention, environmental sanitation, etc.
The acquisition and discounting of bills receivable must be approved in writing by the supervisor other than the one keeping the note.
Chapter 10 Passenger Information and Video Surveillance System
Elevation measurement is carried out by optical level gauge.
Awaso is a southwestern city in Ghana.
It is prohibited to mix the available elements and mucks during handling and stacking.
Table 2.5.4-5 Deviation for Installation of Foundation Section Steel
b)High strength, anti-impact, impenetrable and pick-proof hardware;
The top layer may be plastered the following day after the bottom layer is plastered.
1)The total running time from I3 station to Y3 station is 1339.91s (with 11 stations and the average station time is 133.99s), and the average running speed is 53.44km/h (excluding turn-back time interval).
Small letters are used for distribution box (cabinet) equipment code or machine room location code.
Select materials and components not using prohibited substances.
The charge coupled device-camera (CCD) with functions including automatic gain control, backlight compensation and electronic high brightness control.
Press key if need to record coordinate data in the working document, and input following data.
2. Have metal roof as anti-lightening arrestor, and -50x50 hot dip galvanized flat steel as anti-lightening down lead. All the upper ends of the down leads shall have reliable electric connection to the metal roof and the Lowe ends shall have reliable electric connection to the grounding device.
22.2. Plan to be submitted by the Tenderer
c) Drawings, technical conditions and etc. provided by the design and development department;
The average loading age of concrete is calculated as 7d, and the final age is calculated as 3000d.
Client: Chengdu International Railway Service Co., Ltd. (seal)
Contract name: Construction of Avionics Industrial Park Base Project (Bid Section 3)
6000mm (three-way and five-way turnouts)
For foundation with good conditions, side slope gradient of embankment shall be taken as per those specified in the table.
AN INTEGRATED SOLUTION PROVIDER IN INNOVATIVE FINANCE AREA
Dissolved measured heat result of the hydrated cement sample is not conducted in accordance with dissolved heat result of the unhydrated cement.
Influence of underground water and soil parameters on support force was analyzed and significant results were obtained.
12.1.6 During construction in sections of special rock and soil and unfavorable geology, the design technical measures shall be subject to a dynamic assessment and analysis for reliability in combination with the actual situation of tunnel construction, and on such basis, optimized and recommended schemes shall be proposed timely.
The system is based on meeting the requirements of high-definition video access, forwarding, storage and decoding, etc., and also the suitable promising network technologies are selected to fully meet the demands of the monitoring system business in the next five years.
② Copies of the letter of acceptance, the contract agreement or the corresponding documents reviewed by the competent national department shall be provided.
Inspection method: Carry out visual inspection and measurement and check the construction records.
2) There is no need to remove any part of step chain when replacing it, and the step chain wheel is an external device;
Product publicity is an important way for target customers to obtain products' information. The quality of product publicity will directly affect the target customers' initial impression of those products, and further affect their recognition of JV.
7. A sump well shall be built at 0.5m outside and outside the entrance and exit on both sides of the tunnel.
1 Regularly check the material storage of construction contractors;
Joint drafting of specification for subsystem and participation in document review.
The surface course and base course shall be firmly installed. Bonding materials and dry-hung fittings must meet design requirements and specifications of relevant existing standards issued by the state. Steel fittings need to receive rust and corrosion resistance treatment.
So a AW4 load train of 4M1T formation can start on a 40‰ slope when the power of one motor car is lost, and the acceleration of the train is over 0.1 m/s2.
Environment---The events will not be announced by the Management Office or go against the permissive conditions.
Foundation Layout Plan Equipment Foundation Layout Plan
If errors and omission occur in the training records and report forms, points will be deducted as per consequences.
8. Bid security in the amount of(8000 Euros of bid security) issued by (\.
Before installing doors and windows, the line shall be snapped and aligning shall be made. During installation, the front and sides shall be perpendicular, the connection with the wall shall be firm, the contact surface between the sash and the frame shall be flat, and the finished doors and windows shall be well protected.
1. Evaluation and rectification of over-water operation and working at height.
The circuit breaker cannot be closed when the handcart is between the service position and testing position.
Clause 12.2.5 of EN 50155.
For the offer, the bidder shall offer according to the service content respectively in accordance with the Party A-supplied materials defined in Bidding Document (including budgetary quantity and budget amount):
G218 Line -Regiment 72-G316 Line Highway Project of Agricultural Division 4 (Lot I)
1.Reassemble releasing piston valve to ensure the distance from piston tail to bushing end is 7.5mm.
2) For tunnels with requirements on water environment protection, the full water head can be taken as the external water pressure of lining structure for calculation when the initial water pressure is less than 0.5 MPa.
Sandy soil liquefaction in the site shall be determined based on the 2 methods mentioned below, and the specific formulas are as follows:
(5) In the direct feeding system, these data of OCS artificial short-circuit test show that the data meets the requirements of distance measurement of fault location of traction power supply, and the relay protection device of traction substation functions correctly.
(1) If standard products are required to be adopted such as guard rails, steel wires, steel plates, rolled shapes and pipes and such items are marked in standard specifications (unit weight and section size), such marks shall be deemed as the measurement standards.
Be able to process the failure of circular cooling device of main converter and its auxiliary equipment;
Longitudinal span: 6.4*2m+8.4*6m =63.2m
To prevent the impact on steel bar position accuracy and the bonding strength of new placed concrete and steel bar by heavy wind, 1~2 ring bars shall be bound at 1.5m above formworks.
2. This drawing is applicable to start point - K14+000.
2) Thread the upper pin roll (1) of leveling bar through the bar end knuckle bearing (2) and secure the roll on the starting bar of leveling valve.
In view of the particularity of triple-locomotive traction, safety measures on long and large slope have been formulated to prevent the five major safety risks, namely train levitation, suspension, separation, stopping on slope, and detachment of large parts, so as to ensure the transport safety in high slope sections.
2.2.5.6 Optical Fiber Cable and Cable Wiring of Trackside Wireless Access Equipment (AP)
10.2 This Agreement takes effect after it is signed and sealed by both parties. The Duration of the Agreement is 10 years.
If the materials are overlapped, excess feeding materials shall be considered as accident.
Providing special training for hidden risk control during safe production video conference of the company
Control power cabinet and marker lamp key-lifting switch hardwire interface
(1) Displacement monitoring value of retaining structure top: 3.0cm, alarm value: 2.4cm.
Besides the self-raised investment of China Road and Bridge Corporation and the funds of Nigeria Government, Harcourt-Maiduguri Railway Company, as the main body of the project, can consider financing through bank loans, bond issuance, investment funds, and other means.
As the starting of electromotor, the voltage fluctuation caused by power distribution system shall not interfere with the operation of other electric equipment.
The spacing of wire clamps and the tightening torque of connecting bolts shall meet the design requirements.
He studied and worked in Frankfurt, Dresden and Sevilla from 1989 to 1999 and joined HPP in 1999 where he worked in Leipzig Branch, Dusseldorf Branch and Munich Branch for German and international projects.
Safety inspection manners mainly consist of daily, seasonal, professiona (special), comprehensive, and similar-accident elimination for potential hazards, as well as elimination before important activities and holidays.
When installing the 1# floor structure, two outdoor SCD200/200 construction elevators shall be installed in order to solve the vertical transportation of masonry, decoration and installation materials.
1) The quality assurance measures for subgrade filling construction in rainy period are as follows:
7) The concrete surface course is of the 28d bending tensile strength not less than 4.5MPa, the maximum water-cement ratio of 0.5. Its mix ratio design is detailed in Section 4.1 of JTG/T F30-2014.
The DRS shall provide facilities for manual switchover activities with minimum steps and manual interactions.
The increased cost for super elevation constructionThe eave height m ≤50[unit price*0.6, comprehensive cost*0.6]
A wood-working machine has a cracked blade or its accessories are not compatible with it.
The sheep shed adopts a semi-open design with a wall of 0.9 meters high to provide good ventilation in the shed. The ground in the shed is low in front part and high in back part, and the back end is 0.3 meters above the ground outside the shed. According to the living habits of sheep, the sheep sports field is between the two sheep sheds, the drainage ditches are arranged between the sports field and the sheep sheds, and the slope is to be formed in the middle.
7) After completion of levelness and verticality adjustment, tighten all fixing bolts.
6)The light strip shall be of the combined type high brightness LED, and it is normally on during the train stop.
M10 mortar rubble is adopted for auxiliary works of bridge and culvert. C30 concrete precast block is adopted for areas with serious water shortage and stone materials.
Figure 9-2-3-4-1 Arrangement of Cuplock Full Cast-in-situ Support
CAD setting out and programming, numerically-controlled precision cutting and blanking.
Clean the equipment foundation reserved holes, polish the foundation face with polishing machine and make it level with a horizontal ruler. The levelness deviation is within the permissible range.
This product is easy for operation of the maintenance personnel, due to the simple removal/mounting and wiring, with the operation instructions and warning signs attached.
In case that the design progress is lagged from the delivery schedule;
(7) Project investment estimation and economic evaluation: completed from 175th to 200th day.
Suggested value of permeability index parameters of subsoilTable 4.4.2.3
04.02.2 Environment, occupational health and safety objectives
Considering the mixed operation, it is based on road current conditions to determine whether the curve superelevation is set.
The model of MVB connector used by DCU control chassis of traction system is shown below:
2 rearview cameras are installed on the outside of each cab for monitoring platform.
1+u=1+0.8X6Xa/(30+L), where a is taken as 2 and L is the calculated span of beam.
2) Installation requirements: never weld the embedded casing to the structural main reinforcing bars directly, and weld or bundle the embedded casing properly after fixing it with additional rebars.
Backfilling of foundation pit shall be performed after the construction of foundation concrete is completed and the concrete reaches the design strength. Gravelly soil is employed as the backfilling materials. During backfilling, the backfilling materials shall be compacted layer by layer, and the compaction thickness of each layer is 15 cm.
6.6.4 The installation of turnout with adjacent track beams shall be confirmed by joint consultation of these two contractors and shall meet requirements of technical standards.
The Tenderer must organize professionals for supervision and guidance of installation of on-site equipment.
5.2.5 Complete production, product assembly, testing and process monitoring
Road reconstruction work of Yanghe Middle Road in Jiangbei District of Chongqing
Shanyang County earnestly implemented the main functional area planning for national ecological construction, and built the three-level environmental gridding supervision and management system.
OPGW optical cable，24 core，G652,150/182/123，aluminium-coated steel
Consumption structure of domestic LDPE in 2016 and demand forecast are shown as follows:
Risk retention is generally used to deal with the risks with small probability and low loss extent.
Attachment 4Delivery Schedule and Project Schedule
In principle, the optical cable trenches shall be excavated through mechanical and manual methods. For key sections, underground pipeline detectors shall be used to verify the underground pipeline conditions of the trench path. Locations with underground pipeline shall be indicated as key locations. Double-line path shall be marked with lime.
For relevant treatment measures, please refer to the above-mentioned contents.
(3) Take back guide channel on the right: open the shut-off valve ○2 (handle is located at parallel position) in the Fig. 2, and close the shut-off valve ○1、 ○3 (handle is located at vertical position) in the Fig. 2.
Tensile force ((kN/m)) at 2% horizontal elongation
Adverse impact of construction activities on the environment shall be minimized.
Jungar Banner Guanniuju Trading Co., Ltd.
12.3.4 For the electrical method, the resistivity method and induced polarization method can be selected according to construction environment and detection requirements of TBM.
When a record has to be released, the Record Release List.
Legend: 1 - air handling unit; 2 – flexible connection; 3 – shock-absorbing spring for fan; 4 - shock-absorbing rubber pad
① Dig a pit of 600mm x 400mm x 550mm (length x width x height);
3) According to the characteristics and distribution of the materials, different hoisting methods shall be chosen.
The loading is performed simultaneously with 5 actuators in the loading frequency of 2.5-3 Hz, as shown in Photo 3.
Except for the ceiling sprinkler and sprinklers installed under the ceiling, the distance between the splash box of such standard sprinklers as upright sprinklers and pendent sprinklers and ceiling shall be no less than 75mm and no more than 150mm.
Fuming sulfuric acid is colorless or brown oily thick liquid, which can emit free sulfur trioxide at normal temperature with strong pungent odor.
6.3.3.8.2 If the above-mentioned situation occurs in cross-department proposals in a month, the handling principles shall also apply.
In order to ensure that students can obtain the professional certificate of intermediate Assistant Attendant or intermediate Railway Attendant successfully, the following courses are provided in the professional talent training program:
Feature information in the track image can be stored in a network database and a local database, while supporting network access and local access.
Because part of bearing layer may be lower than the designed elevation of foundation base, local over-excavation is allowed.
Assemble Item 4 and Item 17 as per the size in drawing AJC1019019A, and after ensuring the size and verticality as correct, conduct positioned welding for 50mm.
In road applications, asphalt mixture should be able to maintain its good performance at different temperatures and traffic conditions throughout the year. In fact, the remarkable thermal sensitivity of ordinary asphalt hinders the good performance of asphalt mixture at high and low temperatures.
(5) The traffic coordinators shall obey the orders from the traffic safety personnel, provide various complete traffic signs, boards and other facilities as per requirements of national standards and traffic guiding scheme, and place various facilities under the direction of traffic safety personnel.
1 The driven pile can be used for slightly-loose to medium-dense sandy soil, silty soil, and liquid-plastic and soft-plastic cohesive soil. The vibrosinking pile can be used for sandy soil, silty soil, cohesive soil and macadam soil,. The explosion expanded pile can be used for hard-plastic cohesive soil, medium-dense and dense sandy soil and silty soil.
Prior to subgrade construction, surface drainage and unwatering and leveling of ground should be completed, to eliminate shrub and cactus on the surface; in addition, backfilling and compacting should be implemented as per regulations and the compaction standard should be the same as the requirements on the subgrade.
4.4 If the plan needs adjusting due to some reasons in the process of production, the General Planning Department shall put forward written report and make adjustment after the report is approved. Written approval shall be obtained from the user if necessary.
Before welding, the axis of two pipelines shall be centered. Weld securely the end parts of two pipelines. Make three points of spot welding for pipeline diameter below 100mm. Make four points of sport welding for pipeline diameter above 150mm.
a) Take charge of the management of auditing non-conforming products;
Gluing shall be carried out after painting is finished. After gluing, the colloid shall be full and smooth, with a height not lower than the adjacent weld. The colloid length shall be greater than and completely cover the non-welded area.
Convulsion, constipation, coma and death due to overdose; infection may be caused, such as infection with hepatitis and AIDS virus due to needles.
The effective length of arrival-departure track of the Ethiopian railway is 850m.
During comparative test, the distance between holes shall be no more than 2m and the sounding shall be carried out before other explorations and tests.
Calculation of width of exit passageway: In the first floor, every 2 persons live in a room, every room has a door directly leading to the outdoor, the net width for evacuation is 0.9m respectively; There are 4 persons in the second floor, the required width of exit passageway is 0.04m, the evacuation width of the stair is 1.05m>0.04m, the evacuation width satisfy with the requirements.
Authorization Certificate No.: (E)FJ (2013) No. F001
The culverts are mainly concrete structures, and the bore diameter is 0.6-1.0m. For the sampling inspection results, the culverts are in good conditions.
19059DV-14-04 Plan of Roof Air Conditioning Pipeline
The Contractor shall bear the costs for clearing and recovering the works;
Build a construction access road that can reach any site without any danger, risk or accident, maintain the construction access road on a periodic basis and repair it if necessary.
 Dynamic range ≥ 90 dB (1KHz at Max dB SPL).
Each leak that is discovered within the defects liability period stipulated in the General Conditions shall be repaired by and at the expense of the Contractor.
Distance h (m) from rail top to bearing padstone = rail structure height+beam height+support height =0.773+1.35+0.21=2.33m
and discipline inspection and supervision agency or department may carry out inspection regularly or occasionally as the case may be,.
Welding line feasibility/man machine engineering problems settlement
The underground building components shall be of the combustion performance conforming to the requirements of fire resistance rating I, and the fire wall shall be of the fire resistance duration not less than 3 hours.
1.2.4 The borrowed funds of the Project shall not be higher than 75% of the approved budget, i.e. BT Project Company (Department) shall raise the rest construction funds other than the project capital fund through various legitimate channels.
8. Columns and walls without eccentric dimension indication in the drawing shall be arranged by axis centering.
The assistance objective of this project is to make the inspection station put into operation as soon as possible by treating the geological disasters found near the Tatopani Inspection Station arisen from the 4.25 earthquake in Nepal and completing subsequent construction and reconstruct the trade corridor between China and Nepal to facilitate the trade between the two countries.
Disconnect cables at Points 1~8 of =45-P223-P2, and connect them with electronic circuit.
If the performance is free from any deviations, the buffer pie can be loaded after re-lubrication (buffer area), and head of the buffer pie shall be lubricated after loading.
The attitude of rock stratum at NE wing of this syncline is N56°E/22°SE while that at SW wing is N81°W/32°NE.
The land use right shall be amortized at average as per the years of transfer from the date of transferring the land use right; patent rights, non-patented technology and the like shall be amortized at average as per the shortest of the estimated service life, benefit year stipulated in the contract and effective service life stipulated by law.
Impact energy: 1000 J @ 0-32 kV
Prior to testing, the sample is kept in such an environment with the temperature of 23±2℃ and the relative humidity of 50±6% for at least 3 days.
Installation preparation → retest of steel structure and building elevation before installation → transportation of top plates (transported to installation working plane) → paying off of reference line → installation of first plate → review → subsequent installation of top plates → self-inspection, renovation and application for inspection after installation.
An R&D, manufacturing platform and technical system for large maintenance machinery has been established to realize the automation of infrastructure inspection and monitoring and the mechanization of maintenance.
Calculation span L=4.0m Section height h=1000.0mm Section width b=1000.0mm
│ Tehran-Qom Left Connection Track.zzz
2. Selection table of bearing capacity under different spans of space truss with section 300mmX300mm
(7) Temporary enclosing wall: the existing temporary enclosing walls at the construction site shall be adopted.
The underwater part of the power house is massive concrete structure and the length along the flow direction is about 67m. Its width is determined by the casing size and the height of main power house is about 25m.
2. The flexible connection is used between the fan and the pipe, and the micro-perforated plate silencer or the silencer static pressure box is provided for air pipe connected to the ventilator to reduce the noise.
Yunnan Demeng Expressway Investment and Development Co., Ltd.
0-4.0MPa，two-wire system，4-20mA output
Disadvantages: The option requires a large amount of investment which makes fund raising more difficult, large temporary facilities with high cost and tight material supply.
17 Technical Code for Underground Construction Moisture Prevention (GB50108-2008)
* After HSE accidents take place at the construction site, every employee of the company shall have the right and liability of timely reporting them and preventing the event escalation.
In the energy-saving mode, the illuminance uniformity decreases because half of the lamps are turned off.
It is planned to commence construction in January 2021, and to put into operation on January 1, 2024, with a total construction period of 36 months.
1) Unconditionally cooperate with inspection and verification.
Specification and dimension of front panel (except for driving position)
This stratum has a loose structure, and is easy to collapse with excavation, which even cause landslide.
Technical Code for Fire Protection Water Supply and Hydrant Systems (GB50974-2014)
Modify and improve the inspection plan in accordance with the specific conditions of equipment on site and with relevant laws and regulations, to determine and implement the inspection and test items.
For the cable bent tower, the elevations of pile cap top, tower base top and tower top are +4m, +7m and +273m, and the tower is 266m high in total.
6.2.7 Before overhaul, the operator must shut down the unit according to the normal procedures, carry out necessary process treatment, take safety measures, and finally transact the affairs necessary to issue a safe overhaul handover certificate.
In November 1998, LMP won once again during parliamentary election and organized the new government in January 1999.
(1) by taking action to eliminate the detected nonconformity;
MRI has its originality in displaying congenital anomaly of spinal cord, syringomyelia, myelosclerosis and spinal canal cicatrix.
Specifically, the deviation between the position of each rebar and the center line of the rebar framework is ±10mm, and the number and type of rebar should be correct.
Due to inconformity between CAD and scan drawings, it is only possible to conduct safety checking calculation for the structure currently, but there are still demands for information like construction material and geological exploration data.
The graphic layers of flood risk map are generally divided into such types as the graphic layer of foundation base map, the flood control engineering information graphic layer, the flood control non-engineering information graphic layer and the risk information graphic layer.
2) Geological conditions of waste (block) dumping site;
3.7.11 The control manager shall organize the design manager, procurement manager, and construction manager to jointly prepare the project communication management plan, which shall be released after approval by the project manager.
In case of damage or loss of labor protection articles within a specified period of use, such articles may be re-distributed with certain expenses paid.
Normal water inflow Q=2.74X0.20X151.1X0.8≈70m3/d.
It consists of frame, adjusting lever, hydraulic jack (30T) and adjusting device.
The onsite director (or dedicated person) of the construction unit is responsible for the traffic safety onsite, coordinating with the law enforcement personnel, and communicating with the law enforcement personnel and department at all times, in order to ensure the traffic and construction safety.
(2) The stable framed green text "management right of vehicle base" below the route of transitional track (TZ1) disappears, and lamp of stable green direction arrows at the vehicle base side is off.
4.1.1 Door structure should include PSD, emergency door, end door, fixed door, top box, doorsill, upper supports (for full-height PSD) and fixture side box (for half-height PSD).
2) For pipe installation and wire laying, trepanning and slotting shall not be allowed until the wall masonry mortar reaches above 75% of design strength.
Accrued tax - Income tax payable - Individual income tax
The temporary power will be self-generated and used via the existing distribution room.
The maintenance of the relay valve must be completed by professional staff.
(8) It shall be avoided to provide the same culvert segment on the two types of foundations significantly different in hardness. If any, replacement shall be made.
1. The pending cable shall be place in the designated area as required;
The confirmation of technical documents and drawings shall be implemented in accordance with the business contract of vehicles.
Before and after form removal, water spraying, film covering and curing must be carried out.
Dianxi Railway Co., Ltd. keeps a separate account for the Project and prepares relevant financial statements as per International Accounting Standards.
6-TM-60Battery Rectification Program Verification Test for export to Cameroon
Establish project progress record, check visual progress of the works, and report the implementation of the construction plan, construction progress, and existing problems to the Employer on monthly and quarterly basis.
The construction personnel shall abide by the laws and commit no violation of any laws or regulations;
Effective area of membrane: 77m2/Nr., material of membrane: PVDF
Each train is equipped with a single-phase AC 400V/AC 230V transformer (power from AC bus), which can provide AC 230V/50Hz voltage for single-phase loads, e.g. convenient sockets.
After determining the elevation of the branch pipes in the suspended ceiling according to the construction drawings, cut the pipe groove along the wall after the sanitary ware is positioned, apply the prefabricated pipes in the groove, and fix them with hooks and screws after the pipes are leveled, aligned and located.
Coordination at the construction site and control of the general control schedule, as well as closely cooperation between the Employer and the Supervisor are required to be enhanced to create favorable construction conditions for subcontracting, ultimately, to ensure the realization of the general control schedule.
4.1 Annex 1: Table for Classification and Filing of Project Technical Data (C-DR010204C) - Annex B
For business partners involved in the above compliance issues or risks, CR5 does not necessarily refuse to carry out business cooperation with them.
A.0.1 The shear wave velocity of different rocks and soil may be taken in accordance with Table A.0.1.
As one of the biggest construction project contractors worldwide, CREC has been listed in the Fortune Global 500 for consecutive 14 years. In 2019, it is ranked 55th among the Fortune Global 500 and 12th among the Top 500 Enterprises of China.
The line simulation calculation is required for determination.
Mainly test that the invalid seats of trains in operation are inquired and learned.
It is suitable for use as a finish coat or as a wear resistant base.
The major importers, import sources, places of receipt and trade mode of PP in China in 2017 are listed below:
(15) Accident handling decision, reply or closure notice;
In Chapter 13 "Prevention and Treatment of Down-hole Accident", the section "General Specifications" is added;
China-Nepal trade totaled 23 billion U.S. Dollars in 2014.
3.1.1.1 Ditch wall trimming: Before paving and pouring, side ditches and drainage ditches shall be trimmed and the ditch bottom elevation and section dimensions shall meet the drawing requirements.
During independent braking action, the train brake is in "releasing position" or "working position".
⑤ Accurate location of the vertical main reinforcement of abutment body shall be marked out prior to embedding; and location verification shall be performed by making use of the vertical and horizontal cross curve at the center of abutment body and the outer contour line during binding.
⑦ After the arched framework is poured, the slope shall be leveled manually, and the concave part of the slope shall be filled and leveled.
The seats will be installed to the side wall, and the handrails and partitions will be fixed on the position more than 200 mm above the floor for convenience in floor cleaning.
Welders who weld the pressure-containing components, pipes and pressure-containing vessels of boilers must pass the basic and supplementary examinations in accordance with the requirements of the Supervisory Specification of Boilers (examinations for welders) and hold a work permit.
9) Post safety, traffic safety, fire safety and anti-terrorism safety education shall be performed for administrative staff;
3. Total foundation height H=h1+h2=0.400+0.400=0.800m
2. The fire control management in office and living area shall be strengthened; electrogas welding, cutting machine and grinding machine shall not be used in inflammable area and personnel concentration area without control measures; the employees shall not do the cooking and boil water with naked flame.
Installlation of the reinforced concrete poles of the overhead lines 10 kV, with traverses, with double attachments, single-column, with one strut, type PUP10-1
Γ——Drift angle of wind/flowing pressure (°), which is taken as 10°;
Self-recessed landscape: self-recessed landscape is a kind of concrete products with special requirements in shape. Accordingly its role is to provide structural stability weight and granitic landscape.
Within the time specified by the parameters (which can be set), if no passengers pass the automatic gate machine, the gate will be automatically closed.
)Generally, the pressure of pipe valve shall be maintained through automatic control of the booster pump by the air pressure tank and the pressure switch. When the pressure of pipe valve is too low, the main pump shall be started up directly;
3.9.6 The embedded pipeline trenches, integrated grounding body and OCS mast foundation built on the subgrade shall be constructed simultaneously with the civil works.
When the reinforcements with different diameters are lapped, the lapping length shall be calculated as per the reinforcement with smaller diameter.
There shall be no less than 15 parking spaces.
1) The roof of the fabrication workshop shall be made of color steel tiles, and the wall shall be made of fire retardant laminboards. The structure, electrical setting and fire protection of the workshop shall be specially designed and meet the relevant requirements.
21.2.6Luoyang Metro Line 1 is powered by DC1500V OCS, with traction substations, step-down substations and main substations along the line set along the line. Measures shall be taken to limit the interference with electromagnetic sensitive equipment of vehicles.
(2) The power supply and environment centralized surveillance system of the information machine room of this line shall be carried by the network of the office information system.
(3) Installation of indoor and outdoor signal equipment: January 1, 2022-April 30, 2022 (4 months)
4. Refer to detailed architectural drawings for construction methods of roof drainage gutter and PC board fusible roof.
Participate in the unit project evaluation organized by the Owner's Project Department
Torductor is used for continuous measurement of torque and shaft speed of upper transmission of revolving shaft, mainly including the following parts:
(8) The operation team shall establish and implement the technical disclosure system, in which the technical director makes written technical disclosure of project working procedure to the foreman and shift leader and the materials for technical disclosure shall be classified and archived for future reference.
Information and electronic file for management of production process,such as material list,procurement specification and so on.Word/Excel.or access/relational database electronic files,such as SQL server shall be offered;
Overall Dimensions: 2130x970x664
Any work assignment in the meeting (if any) shall be clearly stated in the meeting minutes by the convening department with the time limit, responsible person and responsible department indicated,.
Subgrade made of sand cushion materials shall be compacted with the vibration device.
Separated subgrade is used for the Kafulafuta–Luanshya Road, and the single subgrade width is 9.8 m.
Hengkeng Vehicle Yard is set in the northeast quadrant of Renmin Road and Meiguan Highway.
Data on the four existing bridges on the tramcar passage: Blue Nile Bridge, Al MkNemer Bridge, White Nile Bridge, and Victory Bridge.
The concrete ground is considered for sand setting of the grit chamber and the temporary stacking site of the dewatered sludge to prevent the pollution of groundwater.
After reactive power compensation for Qjs=930kvar, the average CosΦ is greater than 0.9, and Sjs=2047kVA
Plastic steel door and window shall be attached with protective film. Caulking shall be carried out by using the materials according to the design requirements. The polluted parts shall be wiped clean after caulking. The residual mortar on door and window frame shall be cleaned in time.
During the construction, a stay wire shall be used every 15 meters to control the space position of the top surface and slope foot of side ditches, so as to further control the elevation and thickness of mortar rubble. After construction, ditches shall be straight and their size shall meet the requirements of design specifications.
Main accessories (indicating devices for isolating switch position)
Assist SLR in migrating from the current system to the new RTRS system.
Box-type substation is arranged with 11kV loop-network switch cabinet, and surge protector is set for LV incoming circuit breaker.
3. The quantity and scope in the Contract are tentative. See the detailed design drawings confirmed by the Designer for the actual settlement quantity and scope and based on the actually completed quantity and scope by acceptance up to the standard.
IP rating Front: IP65; back cover: IP42
c) The power line of welder should be no more than 5m and must be elevated.
(5) Fixation of box body of exposed distribution box (panel): Fix the box to the fasteners according to different fixing modes.
7 bytes time +4 bytes K1 value +4 bytes K2 value +4 bytes B value
The asphalt distribution truck is used for paving on site. The paving volume of permeable layer oil is 0.5-1.0L/m2, the paving volume of bonding layer oil is 0.25-0.55L/m2; the paving should be uniform, excessive oil should be avoided to prevent forming of oil film.
5)Put all the switches of the non-operative end of main locomotive and both ends of assisting locomotive on "off" or "neutral" position;
Safety management should be enhanced for prevention and reduction of work safety incidents.
2) The mixing pile machine shall be allocated in place and leveled, and the drill bit shall be aligned with the pile position.
Special adhesive tape shall be pasted to the joint and shall be prevented from falling off.
To earnestly implement the operating procedures, and popularize the safety and technical knowledge education.
Less environmental friendliness: Some inspection vehicles are power supplied by generators, which may result in serious environmental pollution and sound pollution; therefore, they are less environmental friendliness.
6.1.1 The proprietary information disclosed by the Disclosing Party is valuable business secret;
Install and mount movable carriage for axial flow fan, and mount #-shaped scaffold by use of the φ48X3.5 steel pipes in the area in which equipment and pipelines are densely arranged, and fully lay the foot planks for construction.
DC3230/TXY3-10 type, 0-10mA
Non-metallic materials should be in accordance with relevant content in section 20 of the technical specification for HR4000 project in Los Angeles.
Based on the temperature conditions of previous years, formulate a reasonable and effective "personnel work-rest schedule" to avoid construction operation during the period under highest temperature of the day (10:00 - 15:00).
Hex triple combination bolt M6*16 \Grade-8.8\color-zinc plating\72H, a total of 4, torque: 10N.m
The tunnel barrel surrounding rock is dominated by the moderately-weathered granite, relatively intact - intact.
9.3.3.5 All interested departments are responsible for taking corresponding corrective actions on problems proposed in the Management Review Report.
(4)Post tape inside or outside gauges as per actual condition.
--IP packet forwarding delay of 512 bytes is less than 3ms;
Those parts seriously endangering safety shall be equipped with automatic protection measures against harms like high voltage.
If not agreed or unclear, it shall at least conform to the general functions of such products.
④ The thermal insulation material should be so laid that the longitudinal and transverse joints are not overlapped.
4. All locating pins shall be fastened symmetrically, and the force shall be uniform and proper without deforming the widow frame;
The pipelines shall be blowed and washed while the steel pipes and accessories in the lubricant pipelines shall adopt acid-washing;
Proper fire prevention measures shall be taken and corresponding fire-fighting equipment provided for any room and warehouse used to store the common flammable and explosive materials like the oil, explosive and timber.
As large scale excavation depth is deep, site is large, support excavation form is adopted at time of excavation, and local grading slope is set as 1:1.5.
Adhering to the HSE management policy of "Life Care, Environmental Protection, Harmonious Development", we establish the required project HSE assurance system to eliminate potential accidents, prevent accidents and ensure the safety of employees, machinery and equipment.
1. Visual inspection: The surface shall be smooth without any pore, shrinkage cavity, crack, blister, layering, looseness, chipping or other defects.
h.The parties shall strengthen management and control, information exchange and communication in accordance with Q/ZJG12-08 Safety Management System of Related Parties, inform related parties that may be affected of possible accidents, consequences and emergency measures of important hazard sources and comply with the safety site regulations.
(3) Stress method is used to measure rail dynamic bending stress, bending moment of sleeper, etc.
Charging time: 15 min (RAL1)
In this option, the frontier inspection yard and receiving-departure yard of the station are arranged in a longitudinal type, so the division of work is definite; trains leave the country through the station and the frontier inspection yard successively, so the operation is smooth; trains enter the country through the frontier inspection yard and the station successively.
Step 3: After the spot welding, the qualified pipes will be sent into the workstation for automatically backing weld through the transmission device;
All conduits in ceiling must be inspected for acceptance and must pass the bulge test before installation of the veneer.
2.2Consortium Project Team
RP1B1.1.1.3.1.4mortar rubble
Build reinforcement fabrication yards for uniform blanking and fabrication.
A prism centering device for monitoring the track deformation of high-speed railway
As market competition intensifies, the rule of law improves largely, supervision grows more strict, and overseas business booms, a slight carelessness will result in a devastating blow to enterprises.
In order to further understand the supply of goods for this route and the railway operation organization, we look forward to your assistance in the following matters:
3. Preparation of Construction Schedule and Construction Scheme
1.2 Main work completed in the survey includes: geological mapping and survey: 1.8km2 and drilling: 47m/3 holes.
Valid until: December 17, 2017
6.1.12 At any junction of two different primary structures, steel wire network shall be plastered or alkali resistant glass screen cloth polymer mortar reinforcing band is used. Lapping width between reinforcing band and primary structure shall be less than 300mm.
Figure 4.21-11 Scatter of Vertical Acceleration of No.2 End Carbody Where Car 1 Is in Up Direction in Changyi Section of the Shanghai-Kunming High-speed Railway
For long-term equity investments acquired through debt restructuring, the entry value should be determined according to the fair value of the debt waived, taxes generated from such assets and other costs, and the difference between the fair value and the book value of the debt waived should be included in the current profit and loss.
73) Training and certification of permit approvers and supervisors.
Approval No.: (87) JHZ No. 800
In design stage, the staffing of inspection personnel can be determined according to the number of freight cars being repaired per shift (12 hours).
Decide whether the occurrence of major emergency accident is possible; require emergency service organization provide help and implement the emergency plan; carry out direct control in the place not affected by the accident.
One air supply outlet and one return air inlet of the air conditioner will be respectively set at the bottom of air conditioning unit, so as to ensure more uniform air flow in the driver's cab, with an air supply amount of 800 m3/h. Meanwhile, in order to renew the air circulation in the driver's cab, a fresh air filter is added outside the air conditioner, with a fresh air volume of 60 m3/h.
Why is the special capacity of 8.5 persons /m2?
Name of assignment or project: Yizhuang Tram Line T1
Station distribution along the line is mainly controlled by long-term demarcation points.
New cement brick factories are set up to meet the demands of this section of the Project.
1) After software system is installed, site acceptance test shall be conducted to check whether or not the system and software meet the technical requirements.
15.1.7 After the works is done, the construction site shall be cleaned up, with all waste removed.
Tables shall be formulated and completed according to archives management standards, must be printed using laser printer, and must be completed using carbon black ink or blue-black ink meeting archives management standards instead of pencil, ball-point pen and other pens and inks which do not meet archives management standards,.
⑥ No operation is allowed when safety protection appliances for machinery and electrical equipment are not complete.
China Building Technique Group Co., Ltd., supervision engineer of electrical discipline
2) The parts in linear reciprocating motion pose the risk of hitting and squeezing personnel.
13.3 Negative Impacts and Risks of the Project
A 400V power center (PC) cabinet and a 400V motor control center cabinet (MCC) are included.
12. Undertake daily management work required by financial department of the branch company;
Mud on tires of vehicles must be cleaned when vehicles leave the site.
Install the illumination facilities as per the illuminance standard of the design specification. However, during the operation, adopt the energy-saving operation mode to turn on part and turn off part of the illumination lamps to save the energy in different functional areas such as waiting hall, station area, platform area and operation area.
14.3.15 The allowable deviations of the appearance quality, duct position, and retraction at tensioning end of prestressed tendons shall be inspected according to Articles 7.3.3, 7.3.4, and 7.4.6 of Standard for Acceptance of Concrete Works in Railway (TB 10424).
2. Single interface, type 86, steel, with cover plate. See the design drawing for details.
Fig.5-10 Side View of Dynamic Model of Track
The GSM-R core network equipment is set in Najaf dispatching center.
Plate heat exchangers, air coolers, evaporative coolers, closed cooling towers and displacement heat exchangers.
2) Reduce the suction lift to reduce pipeline resistance.
③ Test preparation: in the section of utilized volume, the soil samples shall be selected with the frequency specified in the technical specification, and the tests such as detections of natural water content, optimum water content in utilization earthwork and earthwork from original ground as well as CBR values of standard-compaction test section and sub-grade material, liquid plastic line indicators and particle size analysis of soil.
The interlocking logic operation layer adopts a double 2-vote-2 safe redundancy structure and is fail-safe.
The report of concrete mix proportion will be prepared according to the sources of raw materials and construction environment, presented by laboratory and can be implemented only after being reviewed and approved by the Employer (the Supervision Company).
Standards EN 50125-1 and EN 60721-3-5 (refer to 14+15)
The Employer shall provide technical parameters and detailed conditions of the off-orefield transport facilities. The Contractor shall obey relevant traffic rules, strictly follow the requirements on load limit of road and bridges and provisions on speed limitation, traffic control and overload prohibition, and accept supervision and inspection from the traffic administrative department.
Main ship routes: Europe, Mediterranean Sea, Black Sea, Africa, North America, Caribbean, Middle East, Red Sea, India and Pakistan and other routes.
Examine if the temporary construction plan for the project implementation is reasonable, and propose amendment suggestions if not.
Distributed over the surface layer of this station, it is about 0.8m thick, slightly wet, and slightly dense – dense, with tuff as the major component. The rest is filled with clayey soil. Major component of clay is strongly expansive black cotton soil.
All the devices and facilities of the project shall be easy to maintain;
2. For the equipment that has the vibration isolation foundation, such as water pump, etc., the position limiter shall be added to prevent the pipeline twisting and even equipment overturn due to excessive movement of equipment during the earthquake.
The anti-pollution barriers are released, spread and recovered by boat.
The design treatment capacity of sewage treatment plant for short term is Q=150m3/d, and the land for future development is reserved.
The employer shall first submit an application to the authorized local authorities, and the latter shall forward the application to the Ministry of Labor of Tajikistan after checking the relevant documents.
The engineering geological investigation of harmful gas in the construction stage shall include the following contents:
On both sides of IIDK94+930~IIDK96+120, 1190X2m long, overhead ditch shall be provided at the top of side slope of cutting. Side ditch and overhead ditch are cast in place with C15 concrete while the drainage ditch shall use the soil ditch with geomat turf protection. It will be designed as per Design Reference Drawing of Subgrade Works.
Tax Registration No.: 340504610400837
Drawing of 32DFJK smoke exhaust fan control box system
These cost estimates will be established on the basis of the open book principle:
3.3.4.1 The NDT personnel shall be certificated and qualified in accordance with the Qualification Management Regulations for Nondestructive Testing Personnel Testing Civilian Nuclear Safety Equipment (HAF602).
The main workshop shall be equipped with an air conditioner to the conditioning effect with temperature of less than 30°C below 3 m.
At present, the existing capacity of the railway channel cannot meet the demands of economic development and mass travel.
6.2.4.6 The supply list of equipment of each subsystem shall include a detailed list of the equipment to be supplied by the Seller, material names, specifications/models, units, quantities, origins and manufacturers.
Employer (Full Name): Ordos Government Investment Project Infrastructure Construction Leading Group Office
Compiled and printed by Quality Safety Master Supervision Station of Shaanxi Construction Engineering
3) Construction such as hoisting shall not be carried out when the wind force exceeds Grade 5.
Including three units of 220kV-substations power supply in Yajiang, Gangkou and Lanping, which are basically all surrounded with corresponding substation for power supply.
Single-storey buildings: foundation pit excavation → groove clearing for foundation base → cushion construction → independent pile cap and foundation concrete → earthwork backfilling
Refer to the table below for treatment measures of railway noise at each acoustical environment sensitive spot of entire line.
According to the principle of site selection of designed district stations in China, the scale and location of district stations shall be determined in combination with the division of work with neighboring district stations, reasonable organization of traffic flow and other factors.
Fig. 8 and Fig. 9 show the nephograms for the vertical displacement and horizontal displacement of surrounding rock when the fault fracture zone is penetrated.
The end face of the anchor pad is kept perpendicular to the end axis of the steel tendon.
2 Gombak-Serendah single-track (standard gage); Serendah-Gombak double track (one meter-gage and one standard gage).
Ensure that the concrete pouring for the wing plates is completed, timely leveled and properly dried before the concrete of the web is solidified.
2. The rail, guardrail, lighting post and kerb alighment shall be smooth and continuous, without any bending.
The training test platform can test circuit boards of access controllers, etc.
3.3 The cable support shall be fixed on the wall pillar with angle steel, and the insulated rubber chushion shall be provided between the cable and the angle steel. The cable shall be bound and fixed with insulated wire or plastic tie.
(4) Positioning and line snapping: A paving datum line parallel to the roof ridge shall be snapped.
The braking device is divided into two parts, i.e. electronically controlled hydraulic brake and magnetic rail brake.
The financial statement shall be signed by the following principal:
It will be calculated by multiplying the consumption based on rating statistics and the difference between the preparation period price and base period price.
D. During the placing, steps will be installed and will not be treaded before the concrete reaches the specified compressive strength.
Technical Specifications for Static Synchronous Compensator (STATCOM)
The mechanical transfer of traction and tension field adopts the "Loop the loop" method: calculate the strength and pay-off speed of various construction equipment and tool materials; The communication equipment is arranged, and the tension field and traction field are equipped with one walkie talkie respectively, and the signals of all walkie talkies in the anchoring section can be clearly heard.
Figure 3Relationship between the vibration acceleration of axle box and noise
(1) The Project Manager takes the lead in organizing the preparation of the overall completion acceptance plan;
2.2.2 Party B shall submit four copies of the written survey results (including electronic documents) to Party A.
See the Interlocking and Protection Test Card of Turbine BPS (final edition) and the List of Setting Values (final form).
The station platform and concourse also feature video conversion allotter whose function is to convert the optic fiber signals into the HDMI signals that could be received by the LCD displays.
2. Reply: through verification,the maximum height of slag retaining wall is 5 m.
Disassembly of all assembled components of passenger train and trailer for overall inspection and repair, to eliminate the fault and defect to affect the safe operation, and to perform overall recovery of basic performance of trailer.
Article 31 If the impediment or delay of the supervision due to the Client or the Contractor results in generation of additional services or extension of duration, the Supervisor shall promptly inform the Client of the situations and possible impacts.
The design of environmental compatibility shall meet requirements in 3.8.9 of 0207A002006 General Technical Specification for DB Shunting Locomotive.
Hazard source/environmental factor identification, risk assessment and risk control knowledge training;
Surface water: A small amount of ditch water or water in the hollows appears after rainfall. After dissolving the soluble salt, the rainfall is corrosive.
After the system pressure test is qualified, pipelines shall be flushed with water by segments, and water shall be drained out after flushing.
Code of cause is a field of line items when information on vouchers is recorded in the SAP system. The code of cause is mainly used to count the cash flow items occurring in the actual business, and this is convenient for producing the cash flow statement.
1-16+1-25+1-16mhollow slab girder
1. Finished squatting pan, basin, toilet mirror, urinal, urinal diaphragm, hand dryer, soap lye separator and tissue holder shall be purchased for the toilet.
In terms of the perspective of landscape aesthetics, the high-span ratio of the bridge should be coordinated.
Surface defects on the rail bearing surface under the iron pad (air cavity, sticky skin and pitting, etc.)
Graduated from Fushun Petroleum Institute in 2000, majoring in Industrial Automation
The foregoing sections refer to implementation of reliability design of products. Now, it is elaborated as follows.
3)Software integration test specifications shall satisfy the requirements on readability and traceability;
(1) Jointly with the public service agency for employment, the government of affected area and project employer provided free policy consultation and employment training for land-expropriated farmers to create employment mechanism and environment conducive to land-expropriated farmers.
3.2 Seat width analysis
6-7-3 Medium Sand (Q3a15): The thickness is greater than 3 m.
Organize to prepare the working plan for bridge maintenance and management within the jurisdiction, and supervise implementation of the plan.
The project includes road main works, municipal water supply and drainage works and greening works, with a total contract price of 88,649,273.51 US dollars. The project was started in August 2008 and was completed in October 2012. The project passed the acceptance.
Pile (Diameter d=1.25m) Body Reinforcement Quantity List (Twisted Bar L≤40m)
5.2.2 Methods for ventilation, air supply and power supply of tunnel
Main system/component manufacturers and service suppliers selected by the Seller must be approved by the Buyer.
Asphalt mixture will become asphalt pavement after paving and compaction.
1. Get into the excavation chamber and check the wearing of all parts of a cutting wheel and the excessive wearing of wearing strips and wearing-resistant grates on a periodic basis. When necessary, give a repair welding.
In 4.4.2.3, the unqualified materials procured by the Refactory Plant shall be disposed by the Company in accordance with relevant regulations of Detailed Rules for Procurement Control and Management.
Ethernet is adopted at the physical layer, IP protocol is adopted at the network layer and TCP protocol is adopted at the transmission layer.
In the circuit, after the main filament of the second yellow light is burnt, the auxiliary filament is still ON and 2DJ is energized. After the 1st set of front contacts of 2DJ is checked, DSJ will be energized while giving an alarm for the main filament burnout of the second yellow light.
For a straight-line segment: NMV < 2.1, NMVY < 1.5 and NMVZ < 1.1
Motor current at full load (A) (120Kg/step)
8) All paintings used for restoring, including the primer and de-rusting materials.
3)Operate the control valve box from either side of the car;
The traction end of optical cable shall pass through the pulley under the supervision of construction personnel.
Signed at: No. 20, Wannan Road, Chikan District, Zhanjiang City
3) The constant temperature and humidity laboratory is equipped with air conditioner and dehumidifier.
All sleepers in the station are steel; for maintenance and track creeping, both ends of the sleepers are featured with more serious deformation; the sleepers are featured with uneven spacing, deflection and rust, and the fasteners are severely missing and failed; the whole track bed has a very high pollution rate and it badly settles. Some of the station tracks have no ballast and are covered with mud or weeds.
9.6 Protective Measures for Completed Works and Equipment
In case of unavoidable natural disasters, network plan shall be adjusted, thoughtful organization and reasonable arrangement shall be performed, and input shall be increased to prevent key processes from being affected.
A leading group of incorrupt government will be established as a team of professional, high-quality and skilled supervision and inspection of incorrupt government construction, and an incorrupt government management system that combines full-time and part-time jobs with "line to network management".
This contract shall be valid from December 5th, 2018 to the completion of the rights and obligations of both parties.
a) ensure that the Quality, Environment, Occupational Health and Safety Management System of the Group Company can be realized with expected results;
(11) Both parties involved in the construction shall jointly maintain the work environment in the same area, and effectively strengthen the fire, guard, public security and civilized construction management on the construction site. The construction site must be civilized and tidy, and the materials shall be piled up neatly, stably, safely and reliably (anti-collapse, anti-skid and anti-rolling measures must be taken).
Examination shall not start until the gear hub and axle are cooled down to room temperature.
2.2.11 Management, Spot Check, and Filing of Traffic Products Entering the Site
* Result documents shall be formed by omnidirectional control of project survey, design, bidding, equipment procurement, site construction, equipment installation and commissioning training, etc.
Employees shall receive training about security affairs, coordination, HR and other capacities based on the responsibilities of the Department.
Plywood fixation: the traditional method for formwork supporting is to nail up the plywood with iron nails and wooden keel nails.
The type, specifications and installation mode of the installation installed on the turnout shall meet design requirements.
During January-June 2018, the Company has no serious injury and above personal injury and safety production accidents such as fire and explosion.
Code for Design of Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning GB 50019-2015
Beijing-Kowloon Railway is a great railway project with the longest dual line solely built by China. It was open to traffic in September 1996 and praised as one of the greatest Chinese projects in the 20th century.
This certificate shall not be used for social insurance relations transfer.
It is known that three students made the sketch map of T2-L figure line shown as a, b and c in Figure 3, among which, a and b are parallel, both b and c pass the original point, g value which is corresponding to the figure line b is most close to the local gravitational acceleration value.
(15) Accomplish other jobs assigned by the project manager.
3.2.2 Before coordinate system conversion, the spatial conversion relationship between the source coordinate system and the target coordinate system shall be built.
When the cable trench is 800mm deep in soil zone and less than 500mm in stone zone, protective measures shall be taken.
During the construction process, rainproofing measures shall be taken properly.
JD1 I-77°10′05.7″(Z) R-65 Ls-55
4.4.1 The reinforced concrete pipe and joint materials shall conform to the design requirements and national product quality standards with respect to type, specification, model, and pressure level.
A The Seller will send its personnel to instruct the commissioning upon receiving the notification from the Buyer. After the commissioning is completed, both parties will sign or stamp their names on the "Commissioning Acceptance Report".
The Procedure specifies the protection method of equipment and materials, and the method of controlling the entry of employees and visitors into the site of the HCC Project.
After receiving the demand plan from Market Department (Marketing Service Center), the Production Management Department shall, after being confirmed by the industrial units, prepare the production plan of the Group and distribute it to all industrial units.
Since the materials supplied by Party A is not indicated in Civil Work Contract, the Contractor may raise an objection;
The following suquence of priority shall be considered by the incident respondent and handler when the security incidents are handled:
Implementation conditions: after mobilization of the Construction Contractor, personnel organization information is initialized, implemented synchronously with the electronic construction log system after EBS decomposition and included in information assessment items for inspection.
With the collapse of the "Islamic State", the Iraqi government plans to construct a new railway line and upgrade the existing railway line to provide convenient and low-cost passenger and freight services, stimulate economic recovery and improve the travel quality for people.
Guangzhou-Zhuhai Railway (since 2009)
Address: Rooms 402-413, Main Office Building, No.9, Kangzhuang Road, Huangcun Town, Daxing District, Beijing; Post code: 102600
When establishing a composite shunting route and changing its routes, the shunting signals that protect each basic route must be opened in close proximity to each other in the direction of travel.
The lowering movement at any height within the range of operating height shall be quick without clamping stagnation.
⑤ Valve packing leakage, flexible operation of operating mechanism;
3. Before construction, any capping mass on the ground shall be cleared, the ground shall be leveled, and drainage facilities shall be constructed.
The two ends of the protective baffle, metal bridge railings and galvanized steel strips should both be interconnected and should be connected to the earthing electrode not less than 10Ω.
Clearing service fees paid by the service provider to ACC system;
Standard penetration test should first use rotary drilling rig. When drilling to 15cm above the test elevation, drilling should be stopped. During drilling, the water level in the hole should be kept slightly higher than the groundwater level in order to prevent soil gushing from the bottom of the hole and intensify disturbance of the soil layer below the bottom of the hole.
6.30m~7.0m to the left side of culvert
Replacement period: on-site office shall perform road condition prospection.
Centering on the customers, CRRC ZELC has comprehensively collected and fed back the customers' opinions, and created the procedure file Investigative Procedure of Customer Satisfaction.
General principles: In radial power distribution, wires shall be selected for small current, and
4.3.6 Passenger Emergency Alarm Function Test
3.1Both the sealing and unsealing shall have the inspection personnel involved, and the sealing and unsealing status should be recorded in detail.
Grayish white and grayish brown, slightly wet and slightly dense, 80% pebbles with the sizes of 20-200mm, 5% boulders of strongly weathered tuff, and sandy soils filled with.
2) Technical Code of Urban Rail Transit (GB50490-2009)
Calculated in cubic meters of cement mortar masonry with different strength levels and grades, according to positions and section sizes as shown in drawings.
Notes: The filling height is over 8m and 2 side slopes will be employed.
During talents introduction, for those who have spousal relationship, lineal consanguinity, collateral consanguinity within three generations or close affinity with the candidate, carry out the avoidance system.
The quality control of outsourced parts will be implemented according to the quality management system.
The section access layer uses the newly laid 72-core optical cable to open the MSTP 622Mb/s transmission system and, together with the station access layer transmission system, constitutes 3 section protection rings, wherein one ring is established for one set of transmission system of the section base station, one ring for another set of transmission system of the section base station, and one ring for the electrification station.
The light-emitting unit of LED signal mainly consists of LED light-emitting tube dot matrix and anti-interference threshold, in which the LED light-emitting tube dot matrix consists of 109 LED light-emitting tube in series-parallel connection, with light-emitting diode and current-limiting resistance forming the series branch while the LED light-emitting dot matrix formed by series branch after parallel connection.
for the purpose of reducing settings of maintenance personnel for each station.
6.2.4.8 Back-end Dedusting Process Design
6 The front and rear crane carriages shall return to the tail of the girder- erecting machine and the traveling track for the rear gantry shall be paved. The safety protection hoop of the oil cylinder of the front gantry shall be released. The roller wheel of the front gantry shall contact with the bottom of the main girder. The supporting oil cylinder of the rear gantry shall be retracted to make the traveling wheel contact with the traveling track. The girder- erecting machine shall be prepared for passing span.
6) Organize, supervise and urge all supervision project departments to prepare the reports on their supervision work and summaries on their project supervision work;
1. Participate in the formulation of project construction scheme, schedule, major technical measures, resource allocation plan, ensure sharing of materials and equipment and ensure normal construction;
Article 33 Generally, the board meetings shall be held in the form of on-the-spot meeting.
The production sewage from the rolling stock depot and EMU depot of Kathmandu Station (being a district station) should be pre-treated via the regulating oil-separating tank, and then treated by means of air flotation and filtering up to the primary standard specified in the Integrated Wastewater Discharge Standard (GB8978-1996) before being reused for surrounding environmental greening or road flushing, or discharged into existing drainage outlets.
We will uphold the principle of "safety first, prevention as the primary instrument, comprehensive treatment, all staff participation and nip in the bud".
First-level warning (company level) reporting procedures: the person who found signs of accidents at the site shall immediately report to the head of the production field team or the branch plant (workshop) director as well as the Emergency Response Command Department (by the means of field report or via mobile phones or fixed-line telephone).
During construction, records of tests and inspections shall be made and submitted to the Supervisor and the Project Team for review.
Team members should be responsible for orderly rescue or treatment in case of emergency accidents; administrative staffs and support staffs of construction team should assist Production Leader with relevant ancillary works.
Allowable deviation for static (straight direction) eveness of ballastless turnouts and inspection method thereof shall comply with Table 13.3.6.
On the management workstation, the operators can see the operation conditions and network states of the automatic Ticket inspection systems of all railway administrations and stations on the clear and user-friendly interfaces through WEB browser. They can also set system operation parameters and adjust alarm threshold.
Unscrew the clamp nut sticked to access door behind the compact lock, and take off the gasket between nut and access door so as to smoothly take off the defective compact lock;
Concrete voids and pits, S=3.9㎡, as shown in Figure 3-1
Skirtboard meets the fire protection standards of DIN 5510.
Belt conveyor, ring network, 4-core (middlings heap - MT25-MT76)
Applied by ________________________
3) The equipment shall be able to display information related to ticket checking and inquiry.
For joint commissioning and commissioning, the Bidder will provide active coordination according to the commissioning plan prepared by the Bid Inviter during joint commissioning, commissioning and performance assessment.
Be responsible for organizing the promotion of new technology, new process and new materials for the project and create conditions for the safe and civilized construction.
The connection joints between sections and frames must be covered and sealed with silicone sealant, which shall keep the elasticity under long-time pressure. Curtain wall system will have rain seepage only under positive wind pressure.
9. The Contractor shall commence the works as per the Supervisor's instructions, with delivery date of April 30, 2011.
The maintenance of the brake system shall be free of restriction.
(1) Determine the national coordinate system (including plane datum and elevation datum systems) in current use by Republic of the Union of Myanmar and its coordinate system parameters.
Scaffolding should be provided with guard rails and covered with large boards.
1) Error prevention measures are to eliminate the possibility of errors in terms of structure.
The loan agreement was signed on January 19, 2012 and came into effect on May 28, 2012, with a loan amount of USD 150 million.
9. The heat tracing pipeline adopts single-loop air supply or water supply, and the heat tracing systems shall not be connected in series.
Complete the services contained in the contractincluding technical guidance, technical cooperation and technical training
After ballast cleaning and tamping from bottom of ballast bed of a railway track, the track bed is not compact and the lateral resistance and stability of the track is still poor.
4.3.3 Check and implement the environmental protection construction system and make written records for future reference.
All the interfaces with the manufacturer are the external walls of the building. The manufacturer will be responsible for the firefighting system within the building, and providing equipment list and material list, drawings, process calculations and other documents of the internal firefighting system.
The earth excavated shall be loaded and disposed of in a timely manner. The earth stacking shall have a height of no more than 1.5 m, and shall not be away from the edge of foundation pit by less than 1.5 times the depth of foundation pit.
-- Do not encrypt, with source code program;
Most of the landslides currently interpreted are basically in a stable state, and some landslides are mostly denuded without harm.
The Employer shall develop the Project reasonably, follow the management regulations of "Three Simultaneities" and earnestly implement various environmental protection measures, ecological restoration measures, risk prevention measures and accident emergency measures proposed in this report, to minimize the adverse impact of the construction and operation of the Project on the environment along the line or make the impact acceptable.
(2) If the supporting measures cannot meet the load requirements, and large-scale collapse events may occur.
Noise suppression is used for echo smoothing.
The core wire shielding layer shall be extended to the connection terminals.
R40: Maximum tool feed value for lathe machining (diameter: 8mm)
Schematic Diagram of Inlet Header Connecting for Two Compressors
The warning label is durably kept on each surface of sun visor at the occupant side. No matter the sun visor is opened or closed, at least one warning label on the sun visor can be seen at any time.
All maintenance operations shall be deemed as daily maintenance except for the following situations which shall be deemed as equipment overhaul:
The construction personnel of the special working procedure must disclose the details step by step and notify the supervisor to be present to witness.
(3) The full-time electrician disconnects grid electricity at the general distribution box, and install the generator power delivery line.
Sign the materials supply contract to ensure timely supply of materials.
A.2.3 Sufficient quantity of RAP shall be acquired based on test needs.
intellectual property of the customer, including scope, patterns and technical information provided;
Meadow, scattered with arbors, with pond on the right side.
Check the fixing of the base plate and the foundation and level it
No bedrock outcrop is observed at this point, where is covered by silty clay and silty sand from Quaternary alluvial-proluvial and lacustrine deposits.
(5) For unspecified fillet weld, the dimension of its weld leg h shall be equal to the thickness of the thinner element. Weld shall fully cover the whole overlapping length of the element.
After completing his work at the Postdoctoral Research Station, Dr. Zhong Li chose to return to his hometown and continue to engage in relevant teaching and research work at Lanzhou University of Technology.
Treatment of reserved holes: The formwork shall be closed and installed firmly, and the elevation position and its reinforcement shall be checked before the formwork is closed at the reserved holes.
The formation lithology of KCR circular mainly consists of Quaternary Holocene artificially filled soil layer, Quaternary Holocene/Pleistocene alluvium sandy soil, silt, clay, soft soil with thickness of 2~20m.
195-PLC:15 to black probe
Pour the pump inlet pipes, and open the vent valve during watering to prevent pumping the air to the pump;
Electric tools are not used as required, the metal casing is not grounded and the related personnel do not wear insulation glove.
Changes in laws and regulations related to occupational health, safety and environment management;
Reconnect cables at Points A7~A8 and B13~B14 of =27-A204.
Housing provident funds of office management personnel, financial personnel, labors and network personnel
The Supplier shall purchase a proper insurance for the possible damage and loss due to execution of the Contract.
In order to find nonconforming products as early as possible and prevent batch nonconforming products, inspectors should take the initiative to conduct process inspection during production.
When pressing the reinforcement, it is necessary to hold the pressure for a few seconds and then release the operating lever to avoid joint misalignment or bad joint.
2) The drainage condition of the construction site shall always be good. Some temporary drainage channels with sufficient drainage sections shall be built and connected with permanent drainage facilities without causing siltation and scouring.
G. The switch box must meet the requirements of national standards and have mounting lugs.
Mirrors in the compartment become "magic mirrors" with touch control and internet surfing.
This test is carried out as per the standard ISO 5658-2:2006+ A1:2011 "Reaction to fire tests—Spread of flame; Part 2: Lateral spread on building and transport products in vertical configuration".
For the contract reported to be signed by project competent department with the qualified contractor or supplier as the other contracting party, Planning Section will review the contract as well as the other contracting party.
drying this part after soaking time ends, and applying oleum sesami, menthocamphorate, badger far or others onto this part, without bandaging.
They shall pay close attention to display status of such parameters as flow, pressure, temperature, humidity, current, and voltage of equipment at the test site, as well as change of sound and vibration waveform of test pieces. In case of any exceptions detected, inspectors shall take effective measures in time according to the operation guide to avoid worsening of situation.
- basin concentration area (km2) when the maximum peak discharge is formed;
Shandong Sanwei Construction Project Management Co., Ltd. Weifang Branch
In this section, the allowable deviations, inspection quantities and methods for all works must conform to related requirements in Section 4.4.4 of Standard for Quality Inspection and Waterway Engineering Construction (JTS257-2008).
The materials and tools to be used shall be put into a tool bag and carried around without throwing.
12.1.3 Signs and markings shall be accurately located, with clear images, correct direction indications, and conspicuous letters as required by the design.
2. For the cutting slopes on both sides of section DK4+625.00~DK4+700.00, vegetation protection between drainage channels is adopted for slope protection. See the general design drawings of subgrade for details.
The first batch of secondary flexicoil springs shall be subject to the fatigue test in accordance with provisions in TB/T 2211.
Denpasar station (included) to Alampura station (included)
The scope of responsibility of key personnel of the Project is shown in the table below:
Escape car window is made of aluminium alloy profiles and manufactured as an entirety. The window frame is attached on the car body structure by using structural adhesive. Armored glass is installed on the window frame by the method of compressing the hinge and adhesive tape. In case of emergency, armored glass can be opened to get an escape access of relative big opening.
a. The water supply unit is composed of a clean water tank, a water injection device, an overflow device, a water supply device, and a liquid level display device.
Maximum operating height (start from contact strip surface at pantograph-down position)2,150mm
2. The employees must fill in the information by contrasting the Specifications of System Information Filling item by item under the whole-process monitoring of HR personnel
Management Representative of the Company is responsible for the planning and each department is responsible for the implementation of monitoring, measurement, analysis and improvement in order to guarantee the quality, environment, and the management system of occupational health safety, the process, product and service, and management performance meet the requriments.
1. Be good at the configuration, debugging and maintenance of DCS, SIS, ITCC and PLC control systems.
2. Who supervises the train production? How is the train production supervision managed;
14.14.3The Vehicle Contractor will submit his software quality plan for review by the Employer's Representative before work commences on software design.
Cables shall be laid off the ground and shall not be placed on the ground and dragged.
5) Fuses shall be determined according to the equipment capacity and the fuse elements shall not be substituted with other metals;
In this section of highway, roadside emergency call service system shall be set which consists of roadside emergency extension telephone and emergency call service desk.
Table 1-1 Macroeconomic Aggregates of Papua New Guinea in 2011
The horizontal failing load of long positioning ring should be no less than 9.0kN, and the vertical failing load should be no less than 14.7kN.
A07 Shipment, R09 Reservation, Reservation Number, Type of Movement, and click Enter
See Drawing CN0428DD0410EL2-15 for Terminal Wiring Diagram.
Second layer of plate could be laid out only after approval for the installation of the previous.
The effect coefficients of the bearing capacity of eccentric compression member of masonry:
He has served as the chief engineer of the curtain wall construction contractors in many major projects at home and abroad.
Disconnect points 25 and 35 of terminal block XT1 of door controller 5 +133=82-A105
It will not only effectively serves the construction of Lekki Free Trade Zone, but also take into account the planning of Lekki Peninsula on the west side of the free trade zone, serving both through traffic and the trips of local residents.
Ambient air temperature shall be -5℃ ~+40℃, and the 24h average value shall not exceed+35℃;
All the indicating labels, markings and drawings shall be clear, complete and correct, and shall be affixed firmly.
4 If quality of rail joint gap after completion of works is inspected in sections, the section length should not be more than 1 km.
The broadcast signal of OCC (Operation Control Center) can be sent to the broadcasting system of the train through the on board radio devices to carry out the audio broadcast to the passengers.
Ventilation and Air-conditioning Work
The main strategic goals of the long-term development of Kiev are: improving the living standards of residents, promoting urban economic development and prosperity, and protecting the long-standing historical and cultural traditions.
Insert total price of each item (CIP project site)
Kso: cretaceous marine environment sedimentary rock and volcanic rock, mainly silicalite, siltstone, limestone and basalt;
Geotechnical engineering investigation focuses on Anhui and includes provinces and cities such as Jiangsu, Zhejiang, Jiangxi, Xi'an, Sichuan, Chongqing, Xinjiang, Guangdong and Henan. It targets at integration of geotechnical engineering investigation, design and consultation.
NetEase Cloud Music Winning 2017 Greater China Effie Awards Gold Award
The main unfavorable geology of subgrade is frozen soil, soft soil and saline soil, of which the soft soil subgrade K302+100-K302+600 section mainly adopts the construction method of digging out soft soil and replacing seepage soil.
­ Information Technology -- Telecommunications and Information Exchange between Systems -- Near Field Communication -- Interface and Protocol (NFCIP-1) (ISO/IEC 18092)
Henan Yaoshan-Luanchuan-Xixia Expressway Construction Co., Ltd.
It usually involves the principal, trustee, financier, guarantor and other subjects.
The potential indicating device shall be able to correctly and reliably send the voltage or no-voltage signal on the cable side and output it to the protection and monitoring device in the form of hard contact as the logic condition for judgment whether there is voltage or no voltage at the cable side.
6Selection and Analysis of Key Devices of Traction System
From 2001 to 2002, the Ministry of Railways conducted extensive demonstration on GSM-R system, and finally decided to adopt GSM-R system and incorporated it into the railway technical equipment policy;
Entrance boundary mileage between the open cut tunnel and the underground cut tunnel: GK24+760
① Modify the design to eliminate or reduce the failure effect;
The crew working system of urban rail transit usually includes assigned and pooled crew working systems.
The welders inside the tank should perform welding by always keeping 1m ahead the welders out of the tank. For root pass, backstep welding or skip welding is performed.
Temporary repair shed is of waterproof and insulated pitched roof, with 18º roof gradient, which is made up of colored-steel laminboard.
Detailed Rules for the Bidding Management of Engineering Technology Market of CNPC Greatwall Drilling Company
Stone requirements: The stone shall be uniform, hard, not weathering-prone and free of cracks.
Sea bed evolution is closely related to erosion and siltation of sediment.
17 sets of ZPW-2000A frequency shift track circuit training system
4.2.2.3 Organize maintenance groups, prepare materials, tools, devices, etc. required for the maintenance. After the establishment of the lighting equipment, set up the scaffold or lifting platform inside the boiler.
Do a good job in the acceptance of equipment and devices after maintenance, and make records;
The loss of ore body roof is 0.1m; when the thickness of the surface soil stripping layer is lower than 0.1m, the layer can be completely mixed in, but when the thickness is larger than 0.1m, 0.1m should be mixed in.
If the specified time is exceeded, the Common indicator is off and the pressure in train pipes becomes normal.
1. 300x600x8 (thickness) grey anti-slip tile with pitted surface, wiping joints with white cement
As to first article inspection of the Supplier's product, main contents of the physical article quality review shall include but not be limited to the following items:
• Domestic water of the Project comes from the deep-well pump station, with the pipe diameter of DN100 and the water pressure of 0.20MPa.
The Seller shall be responsible for providing the cable between the reader-writer and the antenna, as well as the serial cable, network cable, USB cable and power cable between the reader-writer and the upper computer of AFC equipment.
If the product fails to reach the specified technical parameters due to Party B's responsibility, or if the product has quality problems due to its performance, poor workmanship and materials used, Party B shall be responsible for repairing and maintaining the product free of charge and compensate for the losses in full;
Technical measures adopted in reducing investment during construction include technical and economic analyses and the determination of the best construction plan.
Method: Inspection per four months--visual inspection and mark; annual inspection--measuring with torque wrench, and randomly checking 1/3
1. Type and specification of reinforcement: HRB400 with diameter of φ28mm
3-2-11 Carry out the preliminary design, the construction drawing design and the self-inspection of the Project based on results of the professional investigation and the engineering survey.
c) Time and manner of each department taking part in or leaving the project team;
which is designed as 60% MCR for the consideration of waste collection status of Guangde County and the equipment operation performance.
2) The number of soundproof windows shall be based on the actual number of houses.
(2)The security guard shall adjust the sliding doors and guardrails to the open position and replace them with warning tapes 15 minutes ahead according to the power outage notice,.
Section A1 of Ningde Zhangwan – Lianjiang Pukou Expressway (Fuzhou Section) of Shenyang Double-line Highway
i) Take responsibility for the maintenance and management of product toolings and dies as well as the routine maintenance of production equipment to keep good working environment;
The route design is made on the basis of coordinated plan, profile and transverse section, to minimize the embankment height and collect earth in centralized manner. The earth slope of subgrade is provided with grass planting and greening measures to prevent water and soil erosion.
The site acceptance test includes independent test of system equipment and interface test of system equipment.
Be responsible for the internal investigation, analysis, handling, statistics and reporting of safety, environmental accidents, public security, fire and traffic accidents, and establish and improve relevant standing books;
Reasonable cost includes customs declaration fees and fund possession costs of the quality guarantee deposit and the performance security, etc. Customs declaration fees include China's export duties and Laos' import duties. China's export duties are charged by export declaration forms, with RMB 300-400 per form, and Laos' import duties are charged by cars, with RMB 500 per car.
8.1.1.1.3 Number of Train Pairs and Cargo Flow Density in Sections
Passenger and Freight Train Pairs and Carrying Capacity Required in each Study Year
Water tank size: 4000mm*3500mm*2000mm(H)
Second, standardize the contract text by reference to the unified model text prepared by China State Railway Group Co., Ltd. (formerly China Railway Corporation).
To ensure the project quality, construction can be commenced only after the successful discussion and assessment of the safety supervision and quality supervision department.
The inspection shall be carried out according to the following specifications, data and technical standards.:
Double strap seam is used on the waterproof board, the width of seam is 10cm, and it could be gummed or hot welded.
3. The traffic around the project is restricted, which directly increases the investment in construction roads and the difficulty in the management of construction vehicles.
3. The height of the antenna from the ground is not less than 1.9 meters, and the outgoing space of M12 connector is about 200 mm.
Testing shall be carried out in accordance with ATP testing instructions, and records shall be kept according to the test record forms.
Table 5-11 Technical Requirements for Emulsified Asphalt for Tack Coat
December 2008 - June 2009 Changsha EMU Servicing Depot Director of Technology Department
20 "Construction Site" refers to the place offered by the Employer for the construction of the Project and any other places to be used during the construction specifically designated by the Employer in the Drawings.
After triggering the manual broadcast function, the emergency broadcast will be interrupted, and the manual audio announcement begins to play.
The maintenance of construction access road shall be strengthened to facilitate smooth traffic flow during rainy season construction.
(4) Check whether the minimum distance from traction device to rail surface exceeds the limit
5.3.8.2 Design Scope and Contents
(1) The protection for the screw thread portion of the anchor bolt is shown in Figure 15-3-2.
According to survey, it is known that there is no regulation depreciation, considering that the selection of equipment at this time shall refer to the domestic regulations, and shall have adaptability to operation overseas, the depreciation at this time shall be calculated referring to the domestic regulations.
The rubber hose with bumps, cracks or gas leakage cannot be used; when the rubber hose leaks gas, its broken part shall be cut off; the patching or wrapping method cannot be used; the distance between every two oxygen or acetylene cylinders shall be at least 10m
After departing by the siding and LKJ receives no message from the balise at the starting signal, LKJ-monitored train will stop before reaching the signal in front and when the train speed is lower than 25km/h, LKJ provides conditions to switch to manual driving mode;
Short circuit, overload, aging and breakage of electric wires and switch sockets
(Rendering of the skirting line shall be about 5mm deeper than that of the wall..
4 Index and date of change of actual controllers during the report period
The main clutch is one of the important components of the transmission system that is connected to the diesel engine through the main clutch. Main functions of the main clutch are as follows:
The transportation department of the government is responsible to organize the designer, constructer, supervisor and other related organizations to form an acceptance committee to conduct acceptance of the project and submit the completion acceptance report to the superior competent department.
The train is activated, and the cab of D1 car is occupied. Turn on MCB switch +115=27-F102 of brake monitor of D car, and connect all brake release bypasses +115=27-S101 of D1 car
12Mm embedded steel plate 200\U+00D7200
Note: The trailer bogie has no traction motor and coupling installation; and the motor car bogie has no troubleshooting devices.
In the administrative logistics management work, anyone who completes the task and achieves good effect through his/her creative work while the condition is incomplete or the task is arduous;
Single board 50-channel specification, all-in-one machine can expand up to 300 channels of transcoding, screenshots, video quality diagnosis and cloud access.
The labor protection supplies shall be provided and reasonably used according to relevant provisions. The bitumen handling personnel shall not work with bare feet or short sleeves. The trouser legs and sleeve openings shall be tightened. The bitument shall not be directly contacted with hand. The contact with poisonous materials requires wearing of masks and strengthening of ventilation.
7.5 The barrier-free ramp shall be set up with handrail, which is consistent both in ramp and rest platform.
Responsible for designing media formats and uploading to the PIS Content Manager system for release after design
A connecting plate is arranged at the downlead point which is 0.5m away from outdoor terrace and such a plate may be used for measurement, artificial grounding body connection and equipotential connection.
Zhejiang Engineering Co., Ltd. of China Railway 24th Bureau Group
6) The lines of different systems, voltage classes and current categories shall not be installed in the same hole of the same pipe or cable tray.
The completion acceptance report shall be signed by the legal representatives (their entrusted agents) of and stamped with the official seals of the employer, the survey institute, the designer, the construction contractor and the supervisor before taking into effect.
The smooth blasting blastholes shall be inclined blastholes drilled on the side slope designed along the new line, with the same row spacing as that of the side blastholes.
When the subgrade filling is completed, the subgrade should be trimmed. Among this, top levelling and road camber cutting should be processed by motor grader, and slop processed manually.
CSR ZELC have formulated disposal procedure to dangerous in Administrative provision for Dangerous chemicals Concluded in Collection of Administrative provisions on Environment/safety Management System are as below:
After the diagram adjustment, 263.5 pairs of passenger trains will be added to the national railways, reaching 4816.5 pairs, which will significantly promote the railway transportation capacity, laying a solid foundation for the spring festival transportation in 2020.
For key equipment that cannot collect complete spare parts, emergency measures under emergencies(such as replaceable equipment, maintenance plan, optional supplier, etc.) shall be determined, to ensure that the company could fulfill the delivery time requirement of the product on schedule when accidental equipment shutdown occurs.
Then, the thin wire is crossed at the distance of 15mm from the insulation layer on the thick wire, and the end of the wire is wrapped around the (single root) end of the thick wire for 5-7 turns, and the end of the thick wire is folded back and pressed on the thin line.
The line has a total length of 33.72 kilometers, with an estimated investment amounting to RMB 4.69938 billion.
Forced air cooling is adopted for IBBM module. It has the merits of no absorption circuit, compact structure, small size and light weight.
5.6.3 See Page 61 and 66 of collective drawings 11G101-1 for the structural requirements of longitudinal reinforcement for the details of the column connected with beams and shear walls.
An independent coordinate system is used for measuring the upstream and downstream arch axis.
The stress of each measuring point shall meet the requirements of the fatigue limit diagram of the steel with a tensile strength ≥420 MPa
Provide key information of the vehicle required by ISCS.
Fourthly, send exported revisable translations to reviewers in case CAT tools are not available for them. Reviewed translations can be imported in CAT platform and confirmed by translators.
There are two numbers of 2-4 and 0-6 for 50kg/m rail, and only 2-4 for 60kg/m rail.
1.3 Its form includes the annual inspection of higher authorities and SEI, as well as the daily intrinsic safety inspection conducted by each specialty office.
Adjustment and calibration of elevation: After the steel column is in place, adjust and calibrate the distance between the elevation lines of the upper and lower columns to S value.
3) Code of Design for Sprinkler Systems (GB50084 -2001) (Edition 2018)
The design scope of this contract refers to all design and services related to this project (including access roads, water supply and drainage, off-site power supply, carbon dioxide workshop), except for the main units and the sewage treatment process package.
The cement-stabilized macadam base course shall adopt the mixtures mixed at the central station, and shall be paved by a paver.
Add a contact stroke switch and in parallel with the existing lock-in-position sensor and detect the opening and closing status of door;
For these operation and activity tasks, the Company should implement and maintain:
11.3.2 The welding of cutter head shall meet the following requirements:
10.6 Safety Process Control of Important Construction Schemes and Special Construction Procedures
During transportation and installation of materials and equipment, properly carry out product protection, select suitable binding points, handle carefully and prevent the equipment or materials from damage due to rough construction.
Handrail Angle Steel3 ∠ 75*75*6
Cement mortar floating ground construction: waterproof layer; protective layer; 20-thick foam rubber shock absorbing gasket; 100-thick cast-in-situ reinforced concrete; 20-thick 1: 2.5 cement mortar plastering.
4. In view of the turnover of large quantities of materials, it is necessary to deal with the sovereignty, navigation, customs clearance and other issues between China, Laos and Thailand. There are many uncertainties which may affect the construction period control.
The sound absorption materials in the elbow muffler / plenum chamber muffler shall be non-combustible and meet the requirements for purification.
Lifting can be conducted only after the concrete of pile body meets the design strength, the lifting method is decided by the construction organization itself through checking calculation and hanging rings and lifting holes shall be preserved based on the lifting method;
Fire automatic alarm and fire linkage control system diagram of6~36/F of Tower A
The LV automatic switch must comply with IEC 60898.
It shall be consistent with national security, fire-proof, explosion-proof provisions, and it shall meet the needs for site construction and management.
The height of passenger platforms is 0.55 m, and the width is 8 m.
Support for beam formwork shall have an arch of 2-3%, and holders made of steel pipe shall have enough stability, rigidity, and strength.
The Engineering Department and safety and Quality Department are responsible for establishing standardization management system and system of shop drawing review, key design scheme, construction organization management and safety and quality works. The company carries out point-by-point inspection in each quarter to ensure that the quality safety progress on sites is controllable.
4.2.1 All units in the system shall organize relevant personnel to review the execution of schemes according to planned time nodes.
Employer: Zhejiang Jingwen Expressway Co., Ltd. (Official Seal)
A method statement for rainy season, emergency preventive measures and tools for special circumstances shall all be prepared according to the actual situation on site.
The MV switchgear is made of metal armored and air-insulated handcart type switchgear with protection class IP41 and vacuum circuit breaker.
Reduce the oil level of 306-V01 、306-V03 as far as possible
As the critical core component, the coupler and draft gear device must be returned to the original manufacturer for major overhaul.
Regarding on the Definition of Types and Specifications of Interlock Blocks at the Sidewalk in Embankment and Breakwater Construction
18)For grounding bolts/nuts, stainless steel must be used, and the earthing electrical connection surface shall not be painted.
The operation drilling is conducted to check the operation organization and coordination capacity and the effectiveness of the operation procedures.
The maintenance operations of all bag dust collectors equipped in the production line.
Our quotation for general contracting risk fee is based on our analysis on the risks mentioned above during the implementation of the Project as follows.
The design drawings have fulfilled the specified depth requirements, and the main structures of cast-in-situ box girders are safe and reliable. Second review has been carried out for the modified design documents, and the shop drawing design documents are approved.
At present, the most-talked-about option in the industry is crossing the sea via tunnels for HSR trains.
Management fee - Accumulated depreciation expense - Vehicles
The displayed dot matrix is 64X128, the dot spacing is 4.75mm, and the average luminous intensity is ≥ 4000 cd/m2;
Giving practical and reasonable suggestions, acquiring economic benefit above RMB 100,000 and achievements recognized by relevant department;
It is required that the Construction Contract shall submit the best spoil treatment scheme to the Company in order to address the abovesaid problems, facilitating the Company to contact , negotiate and make a decision with Boten Economic Development Zone.
Ensure the establishment, implementation and maintenance of the procedure needed for the management system.
(1) Structure: split type, including electromagnetic flow sensor and transmitter
2.1.2Proper gauge aprons shall be prepared according to Clause 1.2.
Finished product protection is not only the crucial part in enhancing construction management executed by contractors, but also the important precondition to guarantee project quality.
8.1.3.3.1.1 Divide phases according to product and development process as well as implement graded and phased design review, process review and product quality review.
Make sure the neighbouring (structures) buildings, underground pipelines and roads around the foundation pit are safe. During earth excavation and underground construction of foundation pit, the deformation, depression, collapse or displacement of soil body won't threaten their safety.
Tax preferential policies are the specific tax means to regulating economy by the state. The state can supports the development of some special areas, industries, enterprises and products by means of tax preferential policies to facilitate the adjustment of industrial structures and harmonious development of social economy.
Key construction technology research for tunnels among hills in complicated karst regions
1.7"The Goods" refers to the equipment, the related software and Technical Documents (inclusive of technical data), etc. furnished by the General Contractor to the Buyer as per the requirements of the Contract.
In France, it is customary to employ double block sleepers on high speed railways; nevertheless, the majority of countries in the world uses monoblock prestressed concrete sleepers.
The user's field commissioning and testing are mainly classified as follows:
3) Interchange wiring is coordinated with natural conditions such as site topography and ground features.
Organizing the compilation of a set of construction progress schedule to conduct site construction under the leadership of deputy general manager in charge of construction, as well as reviewing and approving the construction subcontractor's construction progress implementation schedule and making adjustment to such schedule.
The emergency stop request shows at the interface of NC/PLC (V 26000000.1).
14.3 Equipment and materials used for the Project must be provided with the inspection certificate issued by a national-level testing center and must meet relevant national standards. For power supply products, relevant network access licenses shall be provided.
ATO mode: ATO automatic driving mode fully protected by ATP.
(2) Refer to page 39 of 12ZG003 (for masonry parapet wall) for the setting of constructional column of parapet wall.
The groundwater level measured during the survey is about 0.5~4.4m .
6.3.1.5 Disassemble and check the bearings.
In the environment dominated by chloride salt corrosion, the corrosion of chloride salt on concrete is mainly steel corrosion.
Any modification of interface problems shall be confirmed by the Employer, the Designer, the Supervisor and the construction contractor of civil works, especially the content that requires the change of equipment and materials.
The hydrochemical type is Mg·Ca-SO4 and PH value is 5.38.
3.7Structural Design and Safety Protection of Railway Crossing Bridges
8 vent valve installation plate
For binding of rail transit vehicles, and the components and accessories thereof, the technical requirements specified in DB standard series Ril 951.0040Z01 to Ril 951.0040Z06 and the universally acknowledged technical regulations specified in the appendixes of these standards shall be conformed to.
Water and power supplies for construction shall be arranged as required by the tenderee.
Research conclusion: There is no significance to construct the railway special line. It is recommended to meet the transport demand of KenGen industrial park by construction of transport corridor such as highway.
9. The pile foundation of pier and abutment is designed as cast-in-situ bored pile and the length of pile is calculated as frication pile.
Collect and arrange work quantities and cost information relevant to the Project and cooperate with the Project Manager to make final completion settlement.
Vegetation is developed in a "V" shape with a direction of N67°E. The gully has a length of 480m, a width of 25~50m, a cutting depth of 10~25m. It has regular flowing water. The bottom of the gully is debris soil rock of the Quaternary System and is generally scoured by undercutting.
Schedule of Bid Price of 2016 Shenzhen Metro Headquarter Uniform Procurement Project (for customer service staff, package A)
Technical Specification for Laying of Mineral Insulated Cables JGJ232-2011
The incineration mechanism of fluidized bed incinerator is similar to that of coal-fired fluidized bed. The large heat capacity of bed material is used to ensure the burning and combusting of wastes. The bed material is usually heated to about 600°C and then put into wastes, and the bed temperature is kept at 850°C.
6.8.2 After issuing the sheet of design change, design personnel shall notify the model design head or project design assistant about the major content, number, issued date and possible cost of the design change, and summarize them into the summary sheet of design change.
Measure the resistance of the wheelset (1, Fig. 1-1, Fig. 1-2) between the rims of two wheels (3), which shall not exceed 0.01Ω.
The Ministry of Construction is responsible for the management and interpretation of the mandatory articles of this Code. The Ministry of Railways is responsible for the daily management. And the China Railway First Survey and Design Institute is responsible for the interpretation of specific contents.
EN 60309-1: 1999 + A2: 2012 Article 19
7) It shall comply with the requirement of urban master planning and coordinate with the surrounding environment and landscape.
2. First prize of 2014 Green Construction in China's Construction Industry BIM Model Invitational
Under the emergency situation, the Buyer has the right to hold the temporary interface meeting;
Examination, Signing and Approval Procedures for Product Drawings and Design Documents
If necessary, the Property Owner may be invited for on-site confirmation and the construction may not be commenced until comments of the Property Owner are obtained.
③ Apply an appropriate amount of lubricating oil on the guide rail as required.
2.3 Establishment and improvement of subcontract management system and accounting.
D For the longitudinal splicing of the box iron, the channel steel is connected and fixed with bolts in the borehole drilled in the steel plates by welding steel plates on the connection of the channel steel.
3. When a position conflict happens between the ordinary steel and prestressed steel tendon, the location of steel can be adjusted appropriately; the ordinary steel that needs to be cut off temporally must be welding for restoration.
Identification 2; protein; moisture, content; related substance
Due to pavement cracks and some pits, the road surface is very coarse.
Strict custody control measures shall be taken for toxic raw materials and semi-finished products, and the registration system shall be strictly implemented so as to prevent the outward exile and diffusion of toxic substances.
Vietnam 14t axle load meter-gauge bogie is researched and developed based on the combined traffic demand of Vietnam national meter-gauge railway, with the track gauge being 100 mm, load capacity being 40t and maximum operating speed being 80km/h.
The survey crew identify the accurate location of the well chamber, lay and cast the formwork of cushion course.
The work procedures for issuing materials shall be followed, and the material requisition and issuing shall be completed in one time as soon as possible timely and accurately.
1) Prestressed steel, anchorage and bellow shall be inspected in strict accordance with the quality standards, and shall meet the requirements of the quality certificate.
After alkali-aggregate reaction test, the test piece prepared by sand should be free of cracks, fissure and colloid spillover, and the expansion rate within the specified test rage should be less than 0.10%.
≥16 (RISC) or ≥8 (EPIC)
However, no research on hazard analysis of industrial explosion has been seen.
The indoor cabinet, construction reinforcement and ground wire are used to form a "Faraday cage" for EMC protection and grounding.
Competition and interference may occur from similar projects or investments of other countries during the implementation and operation of the project.
(2) Steel pipeline connecting switch handles and (or) signal turnout is shown in Figure 16-1-4.
13. Electromagnetic compatibility test-Electromagnetic radiation disturbance; 14. Electromagnetic compatibility test-Disturbance voltage at mains terminal; 15. Power supply over-voltage test; 16. Surge (shock) immunity test
Therefore, the transition curve shall be a curve with variable radius (with curvature radius varying gradually from to R) on the plane.
MB value of manufactured sand ≥ 1.4 or unqualified stone powder (% by mass)
Toyo Tunnel is 9,740 m long in total now, and is planned to be completed within 6 years.
(1) Installation and acceptance criteria for grounding system:
Six bored piles with a diameter of 120cm are adopted. Reinforced concrete wall protection is necessary for earth excavation construction for piles.
In case there is a fire, the smoke detector shall alarm, and the fire control center shall start the smoke exhaust fan and smoke exhaust entrance at the fire area, and start the 280℃ smoke exhaust and fire-fighting valve and the smoke exhaust fan at the entrance. When smoke temperature exceeds 280℃, the smoke exhaust fireproof valve in the entrance of smoke exhaust fan shall close, and the smoke exhaust fan shall stop running and feedback signals to the fire control center.
2.24.2.4.Each lighting system shall be able to calculate and record the gross energy consumption of the lighting system of the previous day and the cumulative gross energy consumption of the lighting system.
1 Borrowing includes special borrowing and common borrowing.
<16-1-W3>Conglomerate: grayish yellow, highly-weathered, conglomeratic and massive structures, argillaceous cementation, fragmented rock core mainly in block shape and partially in short column.
Use deconvolution processing to compress wavelets and improve resolution of radar profile; by compress the length of reflected radar pulses to improve the resolution of radar records and further estimate reflection coefficient of reflecting surface.
Construction and living water shall be supplied by wells drilled nearby and transported with watercart. The ground water shall be supplied to the living and office areas through the pipelines and used after the water shall be filtered and purified.
Water for construction and living: The project area has sufficient water in rainy season to meet the needs of the project.
(18) Provide the automatic storage tiering function with full capacity license to realize tiered data storage. The system automatically moves hot data to high-speed disks, to solve the performance problem of hot data. No additional license is required for subsequent scaling;
The Safety Checklist method was used to evaluate the surrounding environment and site selection subunits.
It can also be seen in the above figure that the velocity of a large region in the rear locomotive is rather low. The causes for it mainly include two categories: 1) due to the influence of the upstream pantograph, the boundary layer on the surface of the rear locomotive is apparently thicker than the same on the front locomotive; 2) the wake flow region of the rear locomotive is a wake space, and the pressure at the rear nose cone can be recovered to some degree.
PX-220, Q=55 m3/h
Astern speed 10 km/h
General Structural Chart of Integrated Underground Pipeline Application System
(13) For bricks that are already in place, grouting must be carried out at vertical joints immediately. Temporary stable supports shall be provided on the poor-stability wall between windows, independent columns or parts largely protruding wall surfaces to ensure stability.
HB1D1.1.1.3P Welding at the base
Silty clay: grayish yellow, hard plastic, with high content of sand, and a small amount of gravels.
In the on-site inspection of depot at INDODE, the Detailed Rules for Depot was only in electric version, without paperback version or issuance records, which should be inconvenient for technicians to read and to keep up to date of the regulations, also, it is inconvenient for on-site operators to use.
Where the curve length is more than or equal to the freight train length: △ix.
For the sections that cables should be buried directly, use the underground pipeline detectors to find out the conditions of the underground pipelines along the cable trench path in critical sections, mark the double-line path, and highlight the location and length of the underground pipelines.
No. 12.6 channel steel is adopted on track. See Figure 3-5-111 for the parameter of section.
8)All service desk engineers and IT support personnel involved in handling the event / service request shall write, their results of investigation and diagnosis and solutions proposed on these grounds, into the event / service request.
(7) During the rolling, the elevation of the pavement shall be inspected from time to time, and adjusted immediately when it is not satisfactory.
50t crawler cranes, four 25t automobile cranes, four pile drivers and one profiled plate production line.
a. Steel pipes installed with mechanical tee and mechanical cross shall be tapped with a tapping machine at the joint branch pipe location.
The side of main corridor must be aligned in a line, with deviation not more than 5mm; adjacent racks shall be placed closely to integrate a whole; the entire surface shall appear in a plane without unevenness.
All water supply system including pumping stations, water reservoirs shall be controlled by PLC.
In case of abnormal rise of oil temperature, the problem shall be reported to supervisor promptly, and actions shall be taken by instructions;
Review the quality certificates with respect to the rails, sleepers, rail fastenings and joint accessories, guardrails and their fastenings, turnouts and expansion joints.
Since the intensity - earthquake disaster relation is known, aAJ and bAJ are known values.
Scoring rules: The scores for the reduction rate of the total installed capacity of lighting system shall be in accordance with those specified in Table 5.2.4.
Car parameters: length about 8.5 m, width about 2.5 m and height about 3.1 m
(5) The contents of the above three design liaison meetings could be adjusted appropriately according to actual progress.
Standard EN 50125-1 (applicable to altitude A1 level) and standard EN 50155 (temperature grade T3) apply.
Business management, power plant operation, thermal power, electrical, etc. More than 6 months.
3) The excavation width of the trench shall not affect the adjacent pipes, roads, buildings and traffic safety.
The external pressure waves must be prevented from penetrating into the car through the piping system at the fresh air inlet and the exhaust air outlet, so as to ensure the riding comfort of passengers and the safe operation of various devices in the car.
ZSZZZ SWY200701047
The emergency lighting and emergency exits designed for the fire pump house shall meet design requirements.
Salary level or grade of employees will take the starting salary as the reference in accounting. The company will not compensate for or ask the recommending employee to refund for the difference of salaries caused by promotion or job relocation;
4)Wires and cables from the station to the station-to-station connection passage or the station-to-station water pump house shall be laid below the platform board with rail-crossing embedded pipes after passing the stairs at both ends of station.
Part of falling rock groove has been set at the left side of this line by Iranian party, but falling rock groove has not been set at the entrance of the culvert at the left side of this line and the top of part of cutting.
1. We will warmly welcome the China-ASEAN interview group of domestic and foreign media to come to our college for visiting!
Check the dropping speed of pantograph. Refer to 7.1.8.
B. The suspended ceiling with a span greater than 15m shall be located on the main channel. A large channel shall be added every 15m, which shall be
The reinforcement must be provided with the ex-factory conformity certificate and the raw material test report and retest report. If there are mechanical connection requirements for reinforcement, the team should perform the pre-shift connection test and the shift connection test; only after the pre-shift connection test result is accepted, can the team implement the mechanical connection. The team members should have relevant certificate before the start of work.
Certificate No.: Yu AQB500109JXIII201600512
1)Prevent the train from operating at speeds higher than the highest speed allowed of the operation zone;
When the welding is adopted for nodes, the original connection welds may be lengthened by enlarging or increasing gusset plates, or heightened, so as to satisfy the requirements of node connection.
When two bogies fail, that is, 33.3% of power of the bogies is lost, the train shall be able to operate normally for 1 hour and the temperature of the components shall not exceed the limit value.
The investment of the master step-down substation of the mine is included in the Project investment based on the additional reserved production scale of 3000t/d;
GB2951 -- Test Method for Mechanical and Physical Performances of Wires and Cables;
Return visitors shall inquire comments and suggestions of the owner and the construction contractor on the use of the products, and ask for comments of the owner and the construction contractor on the quality of products, completion warranty and after-sales service.
Be responsible for the inspection and acceptance of concealed work and issue the qualification certificate only after it is identified that all the requirements for technology and quality are satisfied.
The Contractor will carry out the hazard analysis and FMECA for the following equipment / sub-systems / systems:
Vehicles used in Teheran Metro Line 6 Project satisfy international and domestic general standards including UIC, IEC, ISO, GB and TB in following aspects:
The verticality control shall focus on the first pile section, and the deviation of verticality shall not exceed 0.5% of the length of the pile.
Contractor (full name): China Railway First Group Co.,Ltd.
Material: U71Mn, U75V, U71MnG, U75VG and other special rails
3. Specification: DN16_x000D_
9. Click the [Vigilant Test End] button on the [Vigilant Device] interface of HMI display screen.
The feeding of the pusher shall be even, without incline and blockage during the feeding.
2. The bottom of the conduit in the lower borehole shall be 300-500mm away from the bottom of the borehole, and records shall be made.
Table 1.4.5-2 Main Technical Parameters of Alternating Beam Turnout
The operators of shaft or lift hoisting equipment, shall be trained and authorised by the Contractor and shall be in communication with the top and bottom of the shaft and each intermediate landing at all times.
Issued by: Yiwu Communications Investment and Construction Group Co., Ltd.
The Project Implementation Agency has performed all administrative approval procedures agreed in this Agreement in time, and obtained the necessary approval for the construction of the Project, so that the construction has a legal basis;
The Contract is for WP07 section, including construction projects of subgrade, pavement, bridge, culvert and traffic safety facilities and road maintenance projects.
Note: When checking the position of the axis, measurement shall be carried out along longitudinal and transverse directions and the larger value shall prevail.
Apply tools with sunshade heat isolation measures to transport concrete and shorten time for concrete exposure to the sun.
Affiliated and relevant subgrade works are arranged for construction in the construction principle of "subgrade protection at the same time of forming".
Report and analysis data storage time processed by network management;
Check whether the treatment of foundation base complies with the design and specification requirements. If the next process cannot be carried out in time, corresponding protective measures shall be taken.
Example 3: A three-phase smoke extractor exhaust fan is 18KW. Calculate the line current, determine the
Department of Converter Control Platform of Foundation and Platform R&D Center of CRRC Zhuzhou Institute
On April 10, 2017, granule workshop
7.6.4 The entrance/exit located on both sides of the road shall be parallel or vertical to the boundary lines of roads. Setback from boundary lines of roads shall comply with the requirement of local planning department. Where the entrance/exit is open to urban arterial roads, feeding and distribution square shall be built in front of the entrance/exit.
c. Height difference between track box and rail tread;
The Employer at his discretion may also consider deputing a team of engineers (around six) to the Contractor's design office or at Sub vendor‘s office for requisite duration with a view to expedite finalization of designs.
Laying of current equalization/return cable (1X150mm2) (including longitudinal connection cable for rail)
Great improvement has been made for out of plumb of the settlement joint for the culvert.
The internal distance shall be designed to meet the dose requirement of 80t of TNT equivalent.
The construction department of the Tenderee to be responsible for organizing the parties involved to conduct the transfer of the "three rights" of the system to the operation department, including the handover of equipment and data.
1. Sort out, confirm and register the design documents received, and file the original documents;
The erosion resistance and strength of the spacers shall be higher than that of the concrete.
3. Analyzing meteorological and geological data, subgrade, tunnel and bridge conditions of this line, and raising relevant methods for disaster management, control and equipment early warning in combination with local environmental characteristics.
The rated current of the distributing terminal is not less than 24 A.
1.Perforated strainer for gutter (3mm thick punched aluminum veneer)
6) The equipment shall have a complete system protection function and be able to shutdown immediately in case of any fault with acoustic and optical alarm given and fault information displayed.
Installation, interconnection and supply of permanent materials mounted and interconnected on the drilling hydraulic-pneumatic safety control panel.
4——Relatively small possibility or influence;
The product shall be equipped with mechanical or electric interlock devices to prevent opening or closing the disconnecting switch and mistakenly closing grounding switch.
Review comment: (3) The types and quantity of existing rolling stock as well as the existing installation conditions for locomotive-mounted equipment shall be further verified in the next stage; the operation and maintenance management mode shall be implemented; the design scheme shall be improved.
(3) Cable corners and branches shall be neat, clear and tidy; and cable marker pegs and plates shall be clear and complete.
Area of reserved installation interface at pressure relief opening of heptafluoropropane fire-extinguishing system: 0.041m2
The engineering geology conditions of the three schemes are almost equivalent, all with poor construction conditions. The ravines in the study area are narrow and the slopes on both sides are steep.
3. Attention shall be paid to water and soil conservation as well as environmental protection in the design of subgrade works.
11~28.3m: bluish gray, silty clay, soft plastic, locally plastic, with smooth section; 28.3~40.5m: limestone, steel gray, dark gray, developed karst cave; 29.9~31.2m: karst cave, locally containing dolomite particles, rock core in long column, hard rock, with crisp sound heard by hammering.
d. Shanghai-Hangzhou-Ningbo-Fuzhou-Shenzhen PDL.
3) Choose the HD web cameras that support the wide dynamic range at the entrances and exits of the halls.
Before subgrade construction, the route restoration, boundary designation, site clearance, subgrade setting-out, construction of temporary facilities and other preliminary works shall be performed.
After tendering, China Railway Fifth Survey and Design Institute Group Co., Ltd. was selected to undertake the survey, design and technical work of Major and Medium Repairs and Upgrading Project (maintenance works within the jurisdiction of Suning Branch) in 2016. The project site is within the territory of Shanxi Province and Hebei Province. This Contract is signed and executed jointly by both parties through consultation.
E. Cables shall be laid in ‘S' or ""bend when passing through settlement joints of buildings.
(6) Carry out a comprehensive inspection of the drainage facilities on the construction site, and perform the dredging and completion as required, to ensure the organized discharge of rainwater and unblocked roads on the construction site.
In the construction, properly handle the relation between the schedule-related parties, especially the relationship with the local government and mass.
Annex 10: Schedule of Sleeper Pre-casting in Laos-China Railway Project
The voltage sensor SV11 detects the three-phase rectified voltage of the charger circuit (intermediate voltage);
3)National Standard of the People's Republic of China (GB);
Table 7.4-8 Number of Allocated Vehicles of Line 3B
Distribution box for emergency guidance lighting in section of station NS24
1) The line for installation position of the door frame is set out on the bottom of the opening.
At the same time, due to axle load limitation, the passenger capacity is 528 in AW4 state in this scheme.
(4)In principle, the explosive items used in the blasting construction shall be used up in days. If there are any remaining items, they shall be returned to the warehouse and the procedures for returning to the warehouse must be strictly handled.
When resources of Project Team is required, such resources must be determined within 8h; when resources of consultant are required, such resources must be determined within 12h; when senior consultant resources or external resources are required, such resources must be determined within 24h.
4) The sediment thickness at the bottom of the pile should not be more than the minimum required in current specifications, and should not be more than 150mm generally.
In 1995, the former MOR set up the Beijing-Shanghai HSR Construction Office to organize technical exchanges, efforts for technological breakthroughs, scientific experiments, and carry out major HSR technological researches in all aspects.
The слой Прилуцьк is the residual and alluvial layer at the bottom of the third super flood plain terrace of Dnieper River.
Reply: The seat layout at the windscreen has been adjusted, and the adjusted seat can be facing away from the windscreen.
Execution procedures or use permits shall apply to the Contractor's works.
Silencers or other protective measures shall be taken if the permissible noise limit is exceeded.
2)When arranging the motor controller, enough space shall be reserved for the maintenance, ventilation and heat dissipation. According to Figure 4, the specific requirements are as follows:
2.Certificate of Legal Representative or Power of Attorney
Geometric dimensions of turnouts (rail expansion joint)
Establish a remote access security system to protect remote access to the system boundary
4.5.3.4 Each course shall implement management files such as Discipline Coordination Project of Production Design and Hull Protocol Diagram Flow, must take positive measures so as to ensure smooth coordination.
① Formwork support for box body shall be erected at first to erect inner formwork for box body.
Build sand walls in front of the construction site to separate from other sensitive regions during construction of the project, for the purpose of deflecting and absorbing noise, so as to reduce the noise level in such regions;
7) Expense of the project construction supervision is calculated according to the provisions of FGJG [2007] No. 670 Regulations on Charge Management of Cost of Construction Project Supervision and Relevant Services.
For product sampling, the sampling rate is 30% of the number of products sampled.
Secondary dead loads of the bridge deck are considered as 167kN/m.
In order to meet the transportation requirements, TRUSS C is shipped in bulk form. The single upper chord member is divided into 10 segments and the single lower chord member is divided into 7 segments; the whole segments of the web member are transported in bulk.
On October 17, 2016, the Railway Bureau set up a Preliminary Acceptance Committee, with the Deputy Director of the Railway Bureau as the chairman, and the Division Director of the Construction Management Division and the Commander of the Directorate for Reconstruction of Harbin Terminal as the Deputy Chairman. The committee consisted of the relevant business divisions and offices of the Railway Bureau as well as relevant stations and depots.
It mainly includes the electro-pneumatic brake control simulation unit (B13) and auxiliary control unit (B7) controlled by microcomputer. The electro-pneumatic brake control unit is of such functions as service and emergency braking control and anti-skid control of air braking.
Party B:Caledonian Cables Limited
The net pass width of the side door for the driver's cab shoud not less than 560mm, and the hight thereof should not less than 1800mm.
Press the bearing (155) into the bearing chamber of the fixed shade assembly (160), press the bearing (145) on the journal of the gear shaft (150) and mount in the housing.
The principles of traction main circuit are as shown in Figure 7 and 8:
3. Compile detailed demand plans and procurement plans; and purchase materials and equipment in strict accordance with technical parameters specified in the Contract and design drawings, so as to ensure the quality of supplied equipment, and make sure to meet construction requirements of the Project.
Computational domain in established model will be expressed by dozens of, hundreds of or thousands of separate nodes which are connected by a consecutive triangle element mesh.
PTS shall support multiple enquiry requirement for different train services. PTS shall provide notification and message if the enquiry information is outside of the SOD configuration.
The hostile routes shall be handled one by one, and the relevant signals shall not be turned on.
0.5 score will be deducted once if the drilling is not conducted as per the site disposal flowchart on a monthly basis
As to those cannot be included in files, the competent unit shall still take certain actions to ensure such knowledge can be exchanged between and understood by relevant personnel.
Conduct safety and environmental protection inspection at least once a month for the leading contractor; Carry out safety and environmental protection inspection on the construction site at least once a week to eliminate potential accidents in time.
Tighten the mounting bolts with torque wrench. The torque shall be MA=200Nm. Then make locking marks and apply rust-preventative oil on bolts.
Plain fill: varicolored, loose, slightly wet, mainly composed of granite fragments, with the general particle size of about 5.0 cm and the surface layer being 5.0cm-thick asphalt pavement.
Complete and adequate mechanical equipment shall be prepared according to the task quantity and construction period. Compulsory measures shall be taken to reduce intermediate steps, so as to improve the efficiency of decision making and working.
Install warning signs where required, in accordance with other management plans (e.g. Traffic Management Plan).
The parameters selection for this forecast when using the estimation model are as follows:
4.2. The damp-proof course at the indoor terrace level change point shall be overlapped and vertical damp-proof courses shall be laid on exterior wall body where height difference exists.
Model of traction motor: JF204c/ZD106B
Provide proper remuneration and subsidies to the people and workers of the project department who will work overtime on holidays in strict accordance with the local labor law, so as to improve the enthusiasm of the involved employees;
Be able to contact/access ordinary secret information and information for internal use only of the company.
Active Implantable Medical Devices - Part 2-1: Particular Requirements for Active Implantable Medical Devices Intended to Treat Bradyarrhythmia (Cardiac Pacemakers)
The battery products to be used by the Tenderer to response to the tender shall be provided with operation performance within five years (from January 1, 2014 to the present) in at least 3 urban rail transits, and the use proof of the products for responsing to the tender issued by the corresponding Employer.
10.5.2.3 Staff for Secondary Software Development
Nigeria's modern railway, Lagos–Ibadan Railway, coastal railway
The safety protection facilities at the construction site shall be complete and effective, with obvious warning signs.
The data logger can record and store the data within 3s before and after major faults (level 1 or level 2 faults) occur, with a sampling period of 100ms and no more than 50 variables recorded (not repeated with the operation data variables).
Whether it is required to notify Lilly China (please click): Yes ( ) No ( )
Control water supply of foam tank, with electric signal output when it is stopped
The control working condition of seismic calculation is not the internal force or the deformation shall be taken into the transversal calculation.
Small prefabricated pieces can be put into scale production only after the acceptance, with smooth and bright concrete surfaces in uniform color, without honeycomb surface.
35kV Xiushuigou General Step-down Substation Standby Line Capacity Expansion and Reconstruction Project of Yiliang Chihong Mining Co., Ltd., Site Manager;
6.5.2 Operation and Maintenance Instruction for Bogie
2) The vertical and horizontal spacing of tie members are controlled in two steps and three spans respectively; The tie members must be set from the longitudinal horizontal tube at the first step of bottom layer. If impossible, other reliable measures shall be taken for fixing.
5) The construction process, technical quality control index and standard construction method for the subbase shall be determined.
The exposed strata is Sinian slate, and the details of the lithology are described as follows:
The ground wires for the control center, each station, depot comprehensive building, training center, maintenance center and testing line equipment in the Project are connected into the integrated grounding network. The ground wires for the signaling system equipment, including the working ground wire, protective ground wire, shielded ground wire and lightning protection ground wire, are connected into the grounding network of the integrated grounding system.
Potential emergencies, including but not limited to:
Comprehensive Environmental Management PPP Project of Xingye County, Yulin City
YDK17+400.00 Left 4.00
No-smoking area shall be clearly set in construction site based on the specific conditions.
4.6 The managers must properly keep the repository keys, report the key loss in time and take remedial measures. The keys shall not be lent or copied without authorization.
For Shanghai Metro Line 18 Fully Automatic Unmanned Vehicle Project won by our company in December 2017, Type A vehicles are adopted, with DC 1500 V current receiving by pantograph, and a maximum operating speed of 80 km/h. There are totally 50 trains/300 vehicles.
Train washing: existing train washing practices shall be unchanged.
Note: the report is made in five copies for the Employer, Supervisor, Contractor, Monitoring Agency and Filing Agency, respectively.
Manufacturing tools, especially those used for repairing parts, and a list of specific test tools that are used by the manufacturer in the production process may be handed over to the Employer to meet its maintenance needs.
5. Safeguard measures for the payment of equipment leasing: The company has complete constructional machines. Once the project comes into operation, the company shall transport all necessary constructional machines onto the field to meet constructional need.
xmax, x0 - upper limit input value and zero input value of transducer measurement.
Safety measures: Specific measures to prevent various injury accidents and specific measures for safety maintenance.
For assets lost in the centralized office area of the company, the person in charge should report it to the Administration Department of the company within 24 hours and get the police report of the police station under whose jurisdiction the centralized office area is. With the approval of the general manager of the Business Department and responsible president, the person in charge should go to the Administration Department to report the loss and cross off account:
1.4.3.2 Check that the coupling body, outer body and connecting screws should meet technical requirements.
The base channel steel shall be welded to the grounding wire either by woven copper belt or directly by flat and round steel.
3) The discarded solvent shall be collected for closed storage in time and disposed regularly. The disposed amount and disposition shall be recorded.
However, the valuable coastal resources are limited, and the overspreading urban area will bring a series of problems for urban development, operation and management.
The standard pipe joint length of each pipe is specified as 2~3m, the concrete grade is C60 grade, the anti-seepage grade is S8, pipe wall thickness is 250mm, and the connector is "F" shaped connector.
4.6.4 Construction Safety Prevention and Dynamic Control Measures
Overlapping shall be adopted for the connection of diagonal bracing. The overlapping length shall be 1m, which shall be fastened by 3 rotary couplers. The distance of the edge of cover plate of coupler at the end from the top of diagonal shall not be smaller than 100mm.
And there will be 24 new bridges with a total length of 24.25km and 6 new tunnels with a total length of 10.063km. The length of bridges and tunnels account for 9.98% of the total length of the line.
Temperature: 5℃~40℃, relative humidity: not greater than 80%.
2.11 Building scale: Total building area is 46.98m²
On April 20, 2011, Guizhou CCCC Guiyang-Duyun Expressway Construction Co., Ltd., as the borrower, signed a contract modification agreement with the loan syndicate composed of China Development Bank and Guizhou Branch of Industrial and Commercial Bank of China Limited.
Compared with the traditional method, the BVR UAV method can save 90% cost, realize a data acquisition speed 400-3000 times faster than that of manual method, and capture measuring points 15000 times than that of the manual method. At the same time, it eliminates the trouble of applying for land use right for survey.
Within 24 ~ 48h after the final tensioning is completed, check that the steel strand is free of slip or broken wires. Then, cut off excess steel strand, carry out vacuum-assisted pipe grouting, and seal the anchor after grouting is completed and all holes are verified to be dense.
When being laid, geo-synthetics shall be tighten, flattened, and not folded or damaged.
k1 – the length added coefficient is calculated and defined as 1.167 according to Table 1;
3) Precast concrete components: kerbs, access blocks, boundary pillars, kilometer posts, sign piles and sign poles at road edge.
The connotation of process control standardization: Process control standardization is to run field standardization management through the whole construction process and implement the whole process management via standardization.
2.2Motors shall be dismantled from the wheelset and traction motor assembly.
Dismantle the pipelines connecting to the motor; then block off and mark them;
3) Due to heavy rainfall in the locality, all field monitoring equipment shall meet the relevant protection requirements such as dust prevention, rain prevention, snow prevention, corrosion prevention and rust prevention.
The template processing adopts the software "xsteel" to establish the three-dimensional model, the block simulation and expansion is carried out to improve the accuracy.
During the construction process, the ambient temperature shall be detected before applying each paint.
5.2 The buyer is responsible for loading and unloading the contract equipment at the place of delivery.
This code specifies that the air content of water-reducing additive shall not be larger than 3.0%, which is to ensure that the process of defoaming first and then entraining air is adopted during water-reducing additive production.
See valve installation process for installing the fire hydrant and fire pump adapter.
The contractor's project schedule shall meet the project's critical nodes plan.
This conceptual study analyzes the pollution sources and pollutants produced in the process of underground mining, puts forward control schemes for the off-gas, wastewater, solid waste, noise and other pollution sources of the Project, and takes corresponding environmental protection measures.
Strictly control strong noise operation. Before using strong noise machines such as concrete pump and electric saw, noise insulation shed or sound insulation cover shall be adopted for noise reduction and blocking. When concrete vibration and tamping on site adopts low noise concrete vibrating bar, do not vibrate reinforcing bars and formwork.
(5) Items and requirements for electrical performance test of disconnectors, load break switches and high-voltage fuses shall comply with provisions of Electric Equipment Installation Engineering - Standard for Hand-over Test of Electric Equipment (GB50150).
8. Organization structuring, equipment configuration, and technical training on maintenance and operation dispatching shall be studied and determined as soon as possible.
Figure 2.1-1 Schematic Diagram of Layout for Wireless Telecommunication Intersection Site and Machine Room
2. Wiring must be clearly marked at both ends.
Based on main factors affecting the annual transportation capacity by passenger trains and the actual conditions in Nigeria, this study focuses on an ordinary fast passenger train fleet of 17 cars, including 13 general passenger carriages, 2 dining cars, 1 baggage car, and 1 camping car.
(6) Technical specifications (including related parts in the Addendum to Bidding Document);
The special zone allows to save the information, application logo of different users, as well as various application data, historical records according to the different types of tickets.
(7) Its numbering shall be in accordance with the TETRA standard.
② Auxiliary materials for waterproof: Base treatment agent, sealing paste, special membrane for additional layer, galvanized closing-in batten and the fixing screw
(4) The locomotive must not run in a speed over than the maximum operation speed 100 km/h and other limit speed.
The strength grade of autoclaved aerated concrete block for frame filler wall should not be lower than A3.5, and the strength grade of masonry mortar should not be lower than M7.5.
Each bearing assembly (including primary temperature measuring element).
Figure 5.2-1 Scheme of Port Harcourt Station
Temporary steel bridge will be dismantled in this project. A new bridge is built with bridge length of about 360m.
Name of Project: Survey and Design for Project of Dongzhou Xiangjiang Bridge at Second Ring Road of Hengyang
Ammonium vanadate (NH4VO3) solution 3g/L: weigh out 0.3g of ammonium vanadate into 50mL of water, add 50mL of 1+3 salpeter solution, and stir to dissolve it. Store the solution in a brown flask.
The two connectors can be arranged up and down or left and right. The arrangement shall be neat and artistic and shall reserve sufficient space for installation, wiring and maintenance.
Using hinged jack for deviation correction owns the characteristics of good deviation correction effect and strong flexibility, but the disturbance on surrounding soil mass is large when hinged jack is started, which is not conducive to ground subsidence control.
Calculate according to Fst2≥M2gXa+Wq2
The frost resistant grade of prefabricated bridge deck concrete shall not be lower than F250. Appropriate air entraining agent and water reducing agent shall be added. The air content of mixture shall conform to stipulations in table 6.13.3-2 of Technical Specifications for Construction of Highway Bridges and Culverts.
1) Maintain the order on the construction site, put more efforts in publicizing the safety management regulations and the common knowledge about protection of power plant facilities, and prevent and fight illegal and criminal activities.
As for external issues, the international, domestic, regional and local laws and regulations, technology, competition, market, culture, society and economic environment factors and hazards should be taken into consideration.
For super grade ballast sample, sieve five groups of samples with size of 63mm~50mm, 50mm~40mm, 40mm~31.5mm, 31.5mm~22.4mm and 22.4mm~10mm for standby.
Testing instruments shall be inspected and calibrated at regular intervals to avoid impact of instrumental errors on construction quality.
The whole-day passenger flow of the initial stage (2023), short term (2030) and long term (2045) is 133000 person-time, 187000 person-time, and 224000 person-time respectively.
9) It has multi-level password setting function. By setting different levels of management passwords for ordinary operators and system administrators, it can contribute to the safe, reliable and stable operation of the graphic supervisory control system.
The second is the correctness of signal line connection, polarity and correspondence (e.g. correspondence between input and output).
Sub-Min-D, 9-pole, female (9-pin interface)
2.2 The Materials Department is fully responsible for on-site mechanical equipment inspection, maintenance and management.
5. Project quality: the one-time acceptance rate of the Project shall be 100%; it shall be ensured that the quality of all works fully meets the Standard for Constructional Quality Acceptance of Railway Engineering and satisfy the requirements of design speed.
1. VRV central air conditioning system is used in the project.
The pile positioning procedures shall be completed in cooperation with the Employer according to the positioning coordinates provided by the Designer.
For connectors (such as articulated chute and chute) between different equipment in different floors, the drop of material shall be reduced as possible to avoid flying dust and unnecessary noise to pollute the environment.
The Design Dept. shall be responsible for determining the vulnerable and consumable components of products and proposing alternative solutions for spare parts.
General Layout for (NS12-NS11) No. B4 Pier ~ No. B12 Platform
(3) 7 Decentralized Rural Wastewater Pipe Networks and Treatment Systems
Among them, the mixed operation section of the three lines have a single-direction operation interval of 4min, and a transport capacity of 3585 person/h.
4. The summary sheet of provided personnel shall be attached to the bid.
Two wires shall be connected to each terminal wherever possible.
Random vibration, 5-150Hz,50m/s2 30ms (vertical axis and horizontal axis), 1m/s2 30ms (vertical axis)
Response: We meet the requirement. We promise to provide complete technical document meeting design, construction, operation and maintenance requirements.
Lamp surface diameter:Φ400mm(Errors within +5%:
The main construction methods of bridge pier components are as follows
2. The check of cable section is to ensure thatthe allowablecurrent capacity (Icorr)is not less than load current (Iload) and that the cables function normally during their design life.The load current (Iload) takes the effective value of load current that the cable need to be loaded during the vehicle operation is taken.
Open the junction box of the condenser fan, as shown in Fig. 4-7, and measure the coil resistance of the fan;
Test name: typical shock test class three vertical forward
The Jinwo Reservoir is one of the protection areas for drinking water sources.
Comparison of Locomotive and Rolling Stock Purchase Cost Table 4-2-5
(1) Less-smoke and halogen-free cross-linked polyethylene Grade B flame-retardant cables shall be adopted for basic lighting, enhanced lighting and common-load power distribution in the tunnel. Less-smoke and halogen-free cross-linked polyethylene Grade B fire-resistant cable shall be adopted for emergency lighting and evacuation instruction lighting, fire control power supply, important-load power supply, etc.
Non-woven geotextile and impervious plastic film must satisfy the min. requirement of Table 4.3.6-4:
4. All the reinforcements used in this drawing are of B500B type. The length of lapped reinforcements is not included in the drawing.
Fig. 6-6-1 Plan for Sustainably Developing and Completing ESMP throughout Project Life Cycle
Single-layer air grille (with control valve) will be set at smoke-proof staircase, and electric multi-vane air supply outlet at front room.
Improper command and supervision occur in cable laying and pulling and stretching are conducted optionally
10. The Supervisor shall accept the examination organized by the Client.
When the earth embankment filling is divided in several operation segments, if the filling cannot be carried out at the same time, steps shall be constructed in the segment filled firstly at the joint part; if the filling of two segments can be carried out simultaneously, overlapping shall be conducted in layers, with the overlapping length not less than 2m.
The range of the discharge of solid wastes is wide and far-reaching, and it is difficult to be degraded. It is long-standing in the soil and will cause many issues like changing soil properties, destroying the beauty of the environment, affecting the appearance of the city, endangering the health of human beings, polluting the soil and groundwater, reducing the value of the land economy and so on.
The Contract Agreement is signed by and between the Department of Transportation of Nanyang City (hereinafter referred to as "Party A") and Henan Provincial Communications Planning & Design Institute Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as "Party B") on (MM/DD/YYYY).
Before delivery, the seller shall get an inspection certificate from the buyer.
3.6.7 During accident handling, "four-no-green-light" shall be followed, i.e:
Inspect whether the packaging bags are damaged and whether there is desiccant placed in the bags
5. The construction of culvert on soft foundation shall only be carried out after the soft foundation treatment complies with provisions of drawings and at the conclusion of sedimentation period.
(1) All sanitary wares employ water-saving type. Urinals in the public washroom should employ inductive flush valves while squatting pans should employ time-lapse self-closing flush valves.
The near-term platform in key station shall have a length of 300m and other that in other stations shall have a length of 160m; the conditions for 240m long platform shall be reserved for long-term plan.
According to the dynamic detection outline and implementation plan approved by Laos-China Railway Co., Ltd., all units and departments should carefully study, master the dynamic detection content and progress requirements, implement various work requirements, and ensure the safety and order of dynamic detection.
6. Responsible for the preparation and submission of the company's financial statements, financial analysis reports and other materials;
The ventilator and fresh air unit to be hoisted shall be provided with acoustic hoods for noise elimination.
1. Guarantee the rights to know and participation rights of relevant interest groups
Internal form: it is composed of the open-type internal form frame and the self-made large pieces of combined steel form paved on the frame, and the internal form shall be processed with section steel, the sliding sleeve shall be provided to slide along the longitudinal beam of internal formwork, the rear part shall be anchored on the roof of formed girder section, and the front end shall be hung on the front upper cross beam through suspension system.
29.2 The contractor has to specify responsibilities and measures for ensuring smooth traffic in the construction organization design so as to ensure normal traffic running of vehicles of this project and local vehicles along the highway.
(6) During the lifting of derricks, the head stay wires must be under even and moderate tensile force.
Cambodia Phnom Penh - Bavet Expressway is located in the southeast of Cambodia. It is totally laid along No.1 Highway and extends from the northwest to the southeast.
Detect the slump of concrete in each truck to ensure placeability and slump of the concrete;
Multi-point method can be carried out in the following three kinds of testing places with typical salt expansion destruction in saline soil areas: no salt expansion and flat surface; common salt expansion and cracked surface; severe salt expansion and cracked and bulged surface.
Improper design of reinforcement equipment at the opening of cross passageways
Service personnel cannot work at their posts until they are trained and qualified. The training is carried out as specified in Management Procedure for Human Resources (SZK/CX 090601).
——induced traffic volume of the original related highway in case "the project is built" (vehicles/day);
Protecting all kinds of existing facilities and their use functions. The change and movement of all kinds of pipeline facilities shall be approved, and damaged facilities shall be repaired; the discharge of construction wastewater shall be treated to reach the standard.
4. The Contractor shall provide all data of survey marks in approved format to the Engineer.
Section 5.2 (Analysis of 3D Flow Pattern for Local Waters in Trial Trench): Figure 5.7 shows the flow velocity measurement section.
4.3 The Project Implementation Department shall, on a monthly (or weekly) basis, supervise and inspect the submittal of monthly (or weekly) project progress reports by each project team;
or a proof of the ultimate compressive strength of the concrete shall be provided
Address of organization: Section 2, Zhongshan Avenue South, Guanghan City, Sichuan Province
In order to prevent gravel sand and other fine hard particles from falling into the joint and avoid water seepage, a material that is easy to fill, easy to remove, resistant to water, and has a certain strength shall be filled.
Faster transit time, which reduces inventory cost;
The keyhole surface shall be flat without pit before operation and can be opened conveniently during operation. At the same time, the lock plate face shall not be higher than the door glass surface for more than 1 mm, and the higher part shall be chamfered.
The whole pile body shall be stirred evenly and continuously, and the whole length shall be stirred again.
The distance of switch to the door entrance shall be 150-200cm. The switches shall be placed at the back of single door leaf.
The fluidized bed incinerator has no moving furnace or grate.
1.3.3.1.4 Wired Dispatching Communication System
It can shorten the distance between major cities in time and space, build a fast, smooth and large-capacity passenger transport corridor, and promote the development of regional urbanization and the comprehensive development of tourism resources.
Systems and mechanisms for precision monitoring and control of critical processing equipment and tooling are available, such as periodical calibration.
At present, karst exploration is conducted in the soluble area according to the relevant specifications. Drilling, geophysical prospecting and other prospecting methods are adopted to find out the development characteristics of karst at the basement, so as to provide relatively detailed geological data for design and provide basis for karst treatment.
If the Tenderer's written application for replacing the Project Leader, General Technical Leader and main management personnel is approved by the Tenderee, the Tenderer's replacement personnel must report to the Project within 5 working days after the Tenderee's approval. During the replacement, there shall be no unattended management or liaison persons.
The DF8B diesel locomotive is controlled by a microcomputer control cabinet. The main functions of the control cabinet are:
The situation such as serving the employees and masses, being realistic and pragmatic as well as diligent and dedicated, and doing solid work shall be looked into.
Equipments and ancillary facilities of vehicles shall be properly arranged and tightly fixed to facilitate checking and maintenance. The influence of accidents on vehicles shall be considered as well.
3. Material and specification: UPVC water supply pipe DN32
Site project office and county-level manager will conduct aperiodic spot-inspection and check to traffic fee, accommodation fee and overtime meal allowance generated by malaria control workers during weekly meetings.
The bottom surface of the track slab is reserved with steel bars for connection with the self-compacting concrete layer.
Track and verify corrective and preventive actions, keep records in archives, etc.
4.1.4 In case of any change to internal and external factors of the Group Company' s environment, relevant information of those internal and external factors should be monitored and reviewed regularly or irregularly.
After referring to and studying the most advanced overseas EMC measures, at present, these measures have been successfully applied to some domestic rolling stock.
China Energy Engineering Group Co., Ltd. (seal)
(2) Use mud with good performance to protect wall and stop leakage.
First, drop the expansion ring for installation to the lowest point and disassemble it, then return oil to the hydraulic oil pump, stop the pump, turn off the reversing valve, remove the lifting bracket and the inner diameter block of the water tank, smooth the welding scar with an angle grinder, and transport the removed equipment and components out of the manhole of the water tank.
1.5 After the original point is set, move the Cursor A to a position that is (200 ~ 260) m behind the original point;
It agrees in principle to the revisions of the Company's HSSE Meeting Management Rules and HSSE Assessment Management Measures, and to the driver's HSSE assessment methods, which will be improved to reflect the revision opinions and then officially released.
1. Design Requirements and Letter of Authentication Provided by the Owner.
Verify the accuracy of the feasibility study report, and supplement the contents not covered by the feasibility study report, such as electricity metering.
Special power equipment/Communication and control equipment/Energy management platforms
The anchor, mesh, shotcrete and steel frame are all used for the support of the whole line tunnel as per the classification of surrounding rocks. Φ22 hollow compound anchor bolt is employed for the arch of system anchor bolt, Φ22 fully bonded mortar anchor bolt is employed for side walls and wet shotcreting is employed for the tunnel. All anchor bolts shall be provided with base plates and all tunnels shall be provided with profile steel frame for full section.
The widening bridge is a prestressed concrete T-beam bridge, which is simply supported and then continuous structure. The construction method of prefabricating T-beam before hoisting and assembling is preferred.
The Project adopts the staged implementation strategy, to be specific, by three stages. By the end of 2026, the domestic waste classified collection, transportation and treatment system and resource recycling system will be preliminarily established for the whole city.
Select "SATO" mode in the cab being activated (no mode of higher priority), and check in the IO interface of D1/D2 car display to see whether the signal is green.
Service Protocol for Multi-Technology Network Management of Network Element - Network Management Layer Interface (TMF 513)
1. L-shaped retaining wall is set at the right side of YDK22+060~YDK22+215 main line with a length of 155m. The height of wall is 2~4m based on individual design. See front design drawing and design drawing for the structure of L-shaped retaining wall for details. Concreting for the L-shaped retaining wall body is conducted on site with C30 reinforced concrete.
4If surface expansion of blocking agent is not uniform, fix it with a utility knife in 5 minutes after pouring to make the surface flat and aesthetic.
f During mortar mixing, water temperature shall not exceed 80ºC and sand temperature shall not exceed 40ºC.
Address of Vehicle Manufacturer: No. 55, Tuolanshan Road, Economic Development Zone, Xuzhou City, Jiangsu Province
25) Hand-held power tools: When hand-held power tools with reinforced insulation are used, they shall be equipped with an earth leakage protection switch and a reliable protection device connected to neutral. Operators must wear insulating gloves and insulating rubber shoes.
2.2.1 Base processing: The wall must be cleaned so that the surface of the wall is free of dirt, release agent, water repellent, soil, etc., or other materials which hinder the bonding, and the protrusions of the wall surface are removed to make it clean and level, and if necessary, the wall surface is cleaned with water.
Fig. 3.44 Block Diagram of Electrical System of the Automatic Leveling, Lifting, Lining and Tamping Car
2. Specification: APB15-3-A, L=270m3/h, N=0.025KW/220V
What problems does the company concern during project operation stage?
Expansion joint: Gaps between bridge span superstructures or bridge span superstructure and abutment end wall are set to ensure the deflection of the structure under the effects of various factors.
Foreign matters, like dust, dirt, rusty stain and welding slag, shall be removed prior to application of primer.
Additional 3 points for the subcontractors which have awarded the Company Cooperation Excellent Unit in the previous year.
Standard installation and application of fully automatic flushing equipment;
Various types of emergencies that may appear during the competition shall be fully considered, therefore, detailed and clear contingency plans shall be developed before the competition.
When the emergency braking begins to be relieved, the air acting on the air cylinder firstly passes through the upper part of the check valve and the hollow rod of the main valve to discharge the atmosphere. When the pressure drops below 3.4-3.6 bar, the plunger valve of the common pressure-limiting valve is reset and moved downwards. The pressure air of the air cylinder is often vented to the atmosphere with a pressure limiting valve to the main valve hollow rod.
The indoor electrical equipment shall be installed after the building is completed.
Reset the air spring cutoff cock, reset the leveling valve cutoff cock and inflate the air spring to normal height.
Delivery does not mean the termination of responsibilities, the Group should ensure that relevant requirements of post-delivery are met after the delivery of products or services.
Equipment clearance of curve sections is determined by calculation on the basis of equipment clearance of straight sections, as well as such factors, like radius of plane curves, transversal and vertical displacements resulted from surplus superelevation or cant deficiency, and parameters of rolling stocks and tracks.
The tiles shall be aligned to the snapline, paved upwards from left to right.
Lateral sliding plate - 250.0 x 216.0 x 19.0
After the concrete is manually levelled, it is vibrated with a flat vibrator, and then extracted with a roller and leveled.
Design return period P: 10 years for roof and 3 years for outside.
The station is the freight and freight train marshalling station of AKAKI, capital of Ethiopian. The station is located at the suburb of ADDIS city with the ground elevation of 2056-2070m. The area is relatively flat and there are easily accessible transports near the station.
Generally, the height of support is 1/2 of the height of the plant. The bundled parts between the support and the threes can be cushioned by soft substances (such as sack pieces).
During this stage there will be a follow-up of the RAM studies according to the changes, and the generation of the RAM demonstration tests plans.;
There are two major geomorphological types, i.e. the structural denudation medium and high mountains and river erosion accumulation.
Before the project starts, the engineering department will prepare an accurate project material supply plan according to the construction drawings. The material plan will be prepared for divisional, sub-divisional and sectional works, and all processes will be considered in a comprehensive and balanced manner.
Generally, the geological and hydrogeological conditions of the dam site are stable and favorable.
10. In case of large air humidity, polyacrylonitrile fiber concrete is recommended, while in case of small air humidity the steel fiber concrete is recommended. The concrete grade shall be consistent with the main girder grade.
Practices for canopy and ceiling construction (Unit: mm)
Requirements of power supply system on the equipment room, cable trench (shaft) and pipe routing for the architecture discipline shall be overally considered and conducted by Architecture Discipline.
3)Charging of the battery:Only chargers approved by the battery manufacturer shall be used as per the manufacturer's instructions.
15.5.1.2.Purpose of Meeting:
(1) Domestic water supply pipe in the pump room is of PSP steel-plastic composite type (the pipe nominal pressure ≥ 1.25MPa), double hot-melt connection.
Check to ensure that the sliding surface of platform plate shall be flat, smooth and clean, free of burrs, and the surface and bolt holes of platform plate shall be clean and free of contaminants;
(11) Dust-proof grade and water-proof grade of lamps shall reach IP65.
The groundwater is Quaternary pore phreatic water and is fed by atmospheric precipitation and groundwater runoff.
(1) Column: mechanical joint, welding or binding lapping for extension.
For construction of the new second line, the branch line between the station and the K296+100 of the exsisting line is to be removed and the new branch line braches off from the large mileage end of the station's New Track 4 until it reches K296+100 of the exsisting line to connect to the exsisting branch line.
One GYTA53-60B long-distance cable shall be newly constructed from the Nairobi Central Railway Station to the JKIA Railway Station and laid along the slope toe of subgrade of the Line.
Rivet the rivet nuts on the reserved holes of the side wall. During the installation of cabinet, the bolts shall be coated with thread locking agent, with the applied torque of 21 Nm. The locking marks shall meet the specification requirements. Torque wrench number: ( )
At the Area A, the access road is built with brick slags about 3.0m away from the east side of the trench along the pipeline direction. At the Area B, an access road will be built with brick slags for places without vehicle traffic conditions according to the site conditions. At the Area C, the existing road is adopted.
The spreading thickness of metamorphic concrete should be the same as that of concrete spreading and leveling.
6 Every 5,000m is regarded as an inspection lot.
The cement is required to be as same as the one used by the cement stabilized macadam for the cement concrete pavement structure.
The parts and components of ACU shall be mounted securely and reliably. The complete machine shall operate stably and reliably, with low noise.
In order to meet the requirements of transportation capacity, it is recommended that automatic block between stations is adopted in Mehrabpur-North Block Hut Section.
(6) Optimize the hoisting scheme and sequence, complete the hoisting of bulky cargo safely and quickly, and create conditions for installation.
To be responsible for organizing to carry out the activities of quality management group and review the results, and participating in review and issuing of the results of quality management group activities at the provincial, ministerial and national level; to be responsible for organizing CREGC to take part in the nomination for the excellence awards organized by relevant enterprise management associations;
Instruments and special tools shall be provided with operation manuals, drawings, calibration procedures and so on.
Weigh out 0.5000g of high purity copper (99.99%,spectroscopical purit and put it into a 250mL beaker, add 20mL of 1+1 nitric acid, cover it with a watch glass, heat it until it completely dissolves. Add 10mL of 1+1 sulfuric acid solution, then heat it until white smoke starts to appear, take it off and cool it down to atmospheric temperature, transfer it completely into a 500mL volumetric flask, dilute it to volume with water and shake up.
Prior to preparation of a new train operation diagram and determination of a passenger train operation plan, a passenger flow plan should be developed.
8.12.1Tools/equipment/software, etc. to be provided are as follows as required by the Employer:
After the hopper continues to be filled with concrete for discharging, the tremie can be raised to resume pouring work.
Polystyrene foam plate or impregnated emulsified asphalt wood fiber board
5.2 Relationship between Proposed Project and Master Planning of Mount Songshan National Forest Park (2009-2025)
For the values paralleling in the drawing, the value outside the bracket is applicable to the pier height of left column, while the one inside the bracket is applicable to the pier height of right column, and other values are shared.
In line with the Company law of the People's Republic of China, Regulations of the People's Republic of China on Administration of Registration of Companies and other provisions, your application as the agent of
Design Qualification Certificate for Highway Industry: Grade A A142000705
The floor area of this project is 11363m2 and the floor area of 900m2 for rehabilitation and reconstruction shall be utilized.
After grouting, grout in the pipe shall be removed in time, and the pipe is filled with #30 cement mortar, to increase rigidity and strength of the pipe roof.
Operating system: 64BIT WINDOWS 7 PROFESSIONAL
They are mainly distributed in hilly areas, low mountainous areas and low-middle mountain areas.
Widen and Strengthening Projectof Shahe Bridge in Jiaotong Road of Luohe City
Wheel diameter915mm (for new wheel); 845mm (for full-wear wheel)
According to the environmental and health requirements, office and domestic water shall be tap water, and a water tank of 100m3 shall be arranged.
3 The up-pull load on the pile top reaches the design tensile strength of steel bar or a steel bar breaks when the tensile strength of steel bar is taken as the controlling factor.
2. When the hole size needs to be changed in order to ensure the completeness of the outer wall facing tile, approval shall be first obtained from the employer (the Supervising Engineer).
Harnesses shall be arranged in sequence and shall not be bundled crosswise. Bare cables shall be bundled separately from bellows harnesses.
Conditions for capillary electrophoresis (cIEF): clean the capillary column with 0.25% MC solution for 10 min before sample loading, with detection wavelength of 280 nm and column temperature of 25℃; adopt 0.1M NaOH as cathode liquid, and adopt 0.08M H3PO4 as anode liquid.
There is excessive insulation thickness in the exterior wall, and the insulation board should not be laid with face bricks.
In accordance with Schedule 1 (13) of VAT Act, 1996, VAT can be exempted for those imported machines, equipment, tools and other fittings, water tubes and iron and steel sheets and plates for water conservation and power generation projects approved by the "Alternative Energy Promotion Center" or the Division of Power Development.
It has set up a complete product system with many product varieties, mainly including horizontal type CNC (digital display) milling and boring machine, planer type CNC milling and boring machine, CNC floor type milling and boring machine, horizontal machining center, jig boring machine, CNC gantry type milling and boring machine and precise turntable. The products of horizontal type milling and boring machine series have passed CE certification.
The input state of the safe output port is described by " no current detector"
The test sensor shall be arranged about 5m±1m from the end of sound barrier.
The signal lighting circuit is a fail-safe circuit, which involves not only indoor control conditions but also outdoor cable lines. So, the signal lighting circuit shall be prevented from both disconnection and mixed wiring.
Bar chart of general progress schedule for Taipingcun station project
Specification, type and manufacturer of live display device (if used)
According to the conditions for laying piers on the ground, it is recommended to adopt the single-column large cantilever system for piers of the Project.
Then use black adhesive tape for packing. Keep a good joint when packing. Entangle with half-margin width while pressing. Meanwhile, pull adhesive cloth during the packing process. The two ends of guide line earthing shall be sealed with black adhesive tape tightly.
Urban contour refers to the effect demonstrated by various entity elements, such as buildings, trees, and mountains under the skyline. It provides space recognition, image exhibition, and cultural memory functions, and reflects unique characteristics of a city.
5.3.1.5 The Annual Internal Audit Scheme is submitted to the management representative for approval.
3.2.3.1 Fasten the mounting supports for upper parts of door pillars on the roof frameworks. Place plain washers, check washer and bolts into the corresponding holes on the mounting base of the upper part for fastening with lower part of the supports as shown in the figure.
Engage in technical investigation of casualty accidents and near misses; analyze accident causes; propose technical protective measures.
The high tower cranes are generally installed at the main location and operated frequently, so the operation of the high tower crane should be observed before the operation of low tower crane.
(8) The steel wire rope shall conform to the regulations and be lubricated according to the regulations. The oil shall be cleaned and removed every 15 days.
⑨ For the underground pipeline that may trigger accidents during construction, emergency response plan shall be prepared in advance, with rush-repair equipment provided to repair such pipelines in case of any dangerous signs in time. It is important to take preventive measures.
(5) Carry out regular inspection and summary on the informatization application of the Project Management Department and its branches. Focus on the efficiency of information reporting and the truthfulness and accuracy of data information with respect to informatization inspection. Discuss and evaluate the informatization summary from the aspects of promotion and existing problems, put forward solutions, and record meeting minutes.
The list of operating parameters of the TBM, especially the TBM and the rate of debris flow, shall be provided as per the overall STP process and capacity. In addition, the TBM's requirements for the slurry shall be considered.
Gas shielded welding machine, welding and assembly welding tool of body bolster, angle rule
From MM/DD/YY to MM/DD/YY XXX days in total
-- Late stage (400 ~ 900 ℃), the fitted burner of the heating furnace is used for the furnace drying.
The cost is calculated based on model and number of rolling stocks required at preliminary design stage and purchase price during estimate preparation period, and USD 40102X104 total cost is charged.
(1)The monitoring function is mainly conducted by the maintenance workstation of the control center;
2.1.2 Analyze HSE observation cards filled in by leaders and management personnel, prepare monthly HSE observation reports, review and evaluate the implementation of HSE observation, put forward improvement measures and suggestions, and report them to QHSE management committee of HSE.
Construction safety and cooperation agreements shall be entered into with relevant departments prior to commencement.
There are defects affecting the structural force transmission performance on connection position.
Outdoor cold water pipelines shall be composed of lining plastic pipes in connection with pipe fittings.
Finite element calculation software PKPM2010 (version 3.1) for high-rise building structures formulated by China Academy of Building Research is adopted in structural calculation for overall structural calculation and analysis.
3. Shape-correction treatment: operate with technician's instructions.
It specifies the selection, evaluation and daily management of the suppliers for raw materials, major auxiliary materials, standard parts, common parts and key components to ensure that the suppliers are capable of providing products in conformance with requirements.
Do not disconnect the electrical connection under the condition of load to prevent dangers of electric arc and electric shock.
Power required for unit capacity is high, and the incinerator bed material is prone to being damaged
Guarantee the validity of the supervision and measuring equipment use. Keep the activity records;
Every printed circuit board shall have protective coating, in order to prevent cracking, rusting and deterioration caused by damp, salty air, acidic air or other corrosive environment, mold and dust.
4 The roof of the warehouse shall be made of double insulated light materials featuring with facilitating pressure relief.
4. Students will possess the knowledge about the relevant provisions of the railway train operation dispatching plan, daily transportation organization and dispatching command;
And to carry out mass production after be approved by the buyer.
Work design conditions in the front of platform (general of arrangement, the number of tracks, the effective length of receiving-departure tracks, and lines, bridges, and tunnels of district stations, marshalling stations and other big stations)
All internal components shall comply with air tightness strength load of ±6000Pa.
The wiring harnesses shall be stored into different classifications, the bottom frame wiring harness shall be placed separately from the roof wiring harness, and the corrugated pipeline harness shall be placed separately from the bare wire harness.
The optional protection elements are controlled by the optional parameters and control words. If the optional function is disabled, the corresponding protection elements will exit.
For product name, the product identification, nameplate, instruction manual, etc. shall be filled in.
Person in charge of the company: Peng Renya Director of accounting institute: Peng Renkuang
□ Are the operators within the approved scaffolding limits?
In particular, the lifting commanders and lifting hook handlers on the lifting machinery must be trained and assessed according to the requirements of the safety and technical training and assessment management regulations for special operators issued by the state and Municipal Labor Bureau, and can only work after obtaining the certificate of safety operation.
Emergency fluorescent lamp, with installation height of +3.5m
For all kinds of cases occurred in the project area, the security personnel must know the situation in time and cooperate with the local police station to deal with them.
Other inspection results related to the culvert are detailed in the Inspection Report of Culvert at K123+720 (TQE1TNDOC010177).
6. Product of contract: battery locomotive (battery-electric engineering maintenance vehicle)
(June 1, 2018- August 31, 2018)
9.2.1.2.9 Measurement and Testing Personnel
Indoor and outdoor door frames shall be installed according to the position and elevation in the drawing.
In the process of transportation, keep it stable. For the transportation of super - long, super-wide and super-high objects by vehicles, trained drivers and escorts must be responsible for the transportation, and marks must be set on the vehicles.
For the immersed tunnel of SZL Project, GINA gasket is required to provide water tightness with a water depth of about 13m ~ 40m.
(3) Affecting underground or pipe-rack facilities or equipment
The project will provide clear answers in quantified terms (%) to two categories of questions:
Oily sewage and car washing sewage generated from maintenance operation in the depot after sedimentation and oil separation, will be discharged into the nearby in the municipal sewage network for treatment in municipal sewage treatment plant.
0-Such procedure has been established and implemented effectively. And, effective analysis and corrective action have been conducted;
The following functions of the alarm controller should be checked: fire alarm self-check function, noise reduction, reset function, fault alarm function, fire priority function, alarm memory function, automatic power conversion and automatic charging function of emergency power supply, undervoltage and overvoltage alarm function of emergency power supply, etc.
(3) Construction with the aid of external scaffolds shall be stopped on rainy and windy days. After heavy rain or strong wind, external scaffolds shall be thoroughly inspected and carefully cleaned to ensure there is no settlement, deformation or looseness, and the firm connection shall be ensured before use.
Specially-assigned personnel will be provided for protection of on-site facilities, solving problems found in time and reducing the impact on construction.
If the used pipes and materials of waters supply do not have KIWA certifications, but their performance reach to the relevant parameters or indicators of KIWA certification, Can the materials be used normally in the project?
Be responsible for improving the signing and stamping procedures for engineering negotiation (technical verification), technical alteration order and other data, and providing the technical data on project economic visa to the Contract and Legal Affair Department in a timely manner;
7. The same asphalt pavement as that of the main line shall be adopted for the road to be crossed; the length of the modified pavement of Msokela is 60m, that of the roundabout branch line is 266m and that of the original Chilambula Road is 30m.
The maximum displacement angle between floors in direction Y: 1/791. (floor 1, tower 1)
Rolling stock - Apparatus (EN 50121-3-2:2006)
Command system must be determined. In hoisting, specially assigned person is to be responsible for command. Command signals from higher and lower level commanders shall be uniform and mutual communication is required. In controlling hoist performance, the driver shall obey to commands and the principle of "stopping hoisting under ten circumstances". In the event of bad weather such asfresh breeze or higher wind or heavy rain or heavy snow, construction must be stopped.
The low voltage buses of substations shall be of single bus sectioned connection, with tie circuit breaker provided.
When the main reinforcement needs to be lengthened, double-sided welding shall be adopted. The weld length shall not be less than 5d (d is the diameter of reinforcement). For the same section, the joint of main reinforcement shall not exceed 50% of total number of main reinforcements. The staggered distance between joints shall not be less than 80cm as required.
Safety Rules for Wind power plants (DL/T 796-2001)
H( 6 )= 200 mm (the bottom tensile stress of the first layer meets the requirements)
√ Self-owned o Rent o Rent o Customized
The Consultant recommends to design in the way of interchange. That road is the only access to the railway freight yard.
Xi'an Public Security Bureau Office Building Cladding Project
The formwork shall be removed provided that the strength of concrete is able to ensure that its surface and corners will not be damaged due to such removal (generally, when the strength of concrete reaches 2.5MPa).
4.3 After the recruitment application process is approved by the head of employers, HR Department and General Manager Office, the HR Department will draw up recruitment plan, organize the implementation of personnel recruitment to meet the needs of employers.
Program for Type Test on Electric Cabinet of CRH380D
Use the "Light Test" (=73-S05) button to check whether (=27-S102) lamp is on
hardwood handrail 80*40, cover three times of polyurethane flat paint;
Two sections of 27.5KV bus shall be respectively provided one voltage transformer, standby for each other during maintenance, so as to meet the requirements of relay protection and measurement.
5. Buildings shall be utilized as per functions indicated in the Architectural Drawing. The purpose and service environment of structures shall not be changed without service environment or design approval.
Utilize the spanner (suitable for M18 bolt) to unscrew and remove the erection bolts and nuts of the traction inverter box from the underbody of car.
6. Electric charge: RMB 30 thousand is required as monthly electric charge for each station, with total annual electric charge of RMB 0.36 million.
The number of drawing sheets is 18, equivalent to 37.125 sheets of A1 size, including 18 new sheets (equivalent to 37.125 sheets of A1 size) and 0 sheet of copy drawing (equivalent to 0 sheet of A1 size).
Groove shall be cut before pipeline welding, groove processing applies mechanical chamfering method, oxygen-acetylene flame cutting method can be used on site, but oxide skin must be removed and polished.
Design Drawing for North End Portal of KG. TEMIANG 2# TUNNEL
Materials shall be stored by categories based on the general site plan and signboards shall be provided.
(3) The system scheme that meets the requirements of the bidding documents and the Employer's Requirements is determined by systematically comparing and optimizing the schemes of various subsystems and comprehensively planning the internal interfaces and external interfaces among various subsystems.
The Purchaser shall feed back its comments to the Supplier within 5 weeks after receiving the quality plan.
(4) Safety measure of stonework excavation, transportation and stacking of spoils (stacking and compressing as per design requirements), quality inspection, temporary accesses and temporary drainage are recognized in the unit price of relevant sub-item and shall not be separately accounted.
Supervisor: Beijing Zhonggang Lutong Engineering Management Co., Ltd.
Any information that is relevant to the new ECR may be copied from the cancelled ECR and attached to the new ECR with appropriate comments and explanation.
2 times of red lamp flickering refers to stop at Lesonkoyo Station; 4 times of green lamp flickering refers to pass through Lesonkoyo Station
In the arid grassland,alkali soil is in obvious profile development.
A clearance being 200mm at least shall be retained between top of crane in factory building and roof truss lower chord.
Artificial side slopes on both sides are 18~23m high. Two grades of side slopes are set, with a gradient of about 33°.
14.2.9.5. Operation assessment shall be conducted for the improved part in principle. The plan and content of the test shall be discussed and determined by both parties according to site situations.
The height of the pedestal pan ring is 435mm;
3) Measure the three-phase current and detect the current balance with a clamp-type ammeter; check whether the zero-sequence current exists, if so, measure the zero-sequence current value; analyze and determine whether the excessively high temperature of motor is caused by the internal failure of motor;
If a Bidder is the candidate ranking the first for synthesis scores for two bid sections, the Bidder shall determine the successful bid section according to bid section selection sequence described in responsive documents.
Through the transformation of the original alignment(straightness and gauge standardization), the operating speed can reach more than 200 kilometers per hour
(1) Drainage ditches must be set up for tunnels with underground water discharged. Downhill tunnels shall be equipped with water pump with a pumping amount greater than 20% of the water gushing amount.
Total content of acicular and splintery particles (% by mass)
9.4 Quality Assurance and Quality Control Plan
Remark: See construction drawings of the electrical discipline for positions of socket, data port, switch and lamp in each room.
The karst water is predominated by karst fissure water and karst tunnel water, and the water yielding property, with obvious unevenness, is related to lithology, structure, landform, hydrodynamic condition, and karst development degree, etc.
For main features of this area, refer to above analysis of the document and project overview.
This is to certify that the foregoing copy conforms to the original of Project Cooperation Agreement (Excerpt) offered to the notary by Wang Han, the entrusted agent of Zhejiang Communications Construction Group.
1 - Filling layer or rammed original soil of tank foundation; 2 - Under-membrane protection layer; 3 - HDPE membrane;
The Company shall abide by social morality and business ethics and protect the public and national interests.
1. The operator must check whether the warning devices are valid before working.
Sub-project 2 permanently occupies 647.5 mus of land (including 120 mus for intelligent transportation module), with a short tunnel 420 meters set in the line. Sub-project 2 does not include bridge works.
The inspection of ammeter numbered TP09 indicates the storage life is May 21, 2013 to May 20, 2014, so this ammeter passes its expiration date, so do the key test equipment such as power frequency capacitive voltage divider.
The scale shall be determined according to the passenger traffic volume and the city level, and rational planning and systematic design shall be done to bring convenience to passengers. Importance shall be attached to coordination among all disciplines, matching of equipment, and organic connection with urban planning so as to build the comprehensive urban transport terminal centering on railway passenger stations.
A centralized steel bar and woodworking processing plant shall be set up, and the site adopts C15 concrete for hardening treatment.
3. Supplement and perfect the calculation and conclusion of pavement structure; Cancel the primer asphalt.
It is proved to be constructive and significant in perfecting and optimizing the traffic network of Yushen Coal Chemical Park, enhancing the traffic capacity of the park, strengthening the traffic flexibility and elasticity of the park and railway network, strengthening the railway traffic exit, improving the transportation quality and efficiency, reducing the transportation cost and enhancing the competitive power of Shenhua Dow chemical products in the market.
Fire extinguishers and emergency lighting shall be set up on the construction site. The arrangement of temporary fire fighting facilities shall keep pace with the progress of the project under construction;
7.6.6.1 Initial calibration of monitoring and measuring devices
Refer to and use our railway construction and operation management experience obtained in China and African countries to establish an effective construction and operation management system for the Kenyan standard gauge railway and build the railway into a large-capacity, high-speed, low-cost, high-safety, energy-conservation and environment-protection, and sustainable modern railway.
(3) Location scheme of OCS post and number of embedded foundation shall be supplemented.
2. One testing terminal should be set respectively on the side wall of the two sides of up and down directions of the station near the two ends of the underground station platform.
4.2.3The test method and specimen size of V-notch specimen impact test shall be carried out in accordance with the provisions of ASTM A370.
For Alisabieh~Nagad Section of Djibouti Railway, the protection functions of backbone layer and access layer of transmission system are normal, and the protection switching function and switching recovery function of network management monitoring pf transmission system are also normal.
Y014A-201-57Layout Plan I of Purlin of Pitched Roof of Activity Center
When a tramcar approaches turnout zone, the driver may send route request command by pushing the route selection button on control panel.
Procurement Department is responsible to purchase materials and facilities, etc. mentioned above and to supervise the procurement process.
The range of electroplating introduction mentioned in this Industry Access Conditions covers the electroplating, chemical plating, brushing plating, metal passivation of all kinds of metal and non-metallic as well as the surface treatment related to heavy metal pollutants emission.
Fig. 3 Rough Cutting Surface (Large Frontline and not Trimmed)
After change of hole diameter and casing lowering, drilling shall not be performed until the step for change of hole diameter is built to be cone with cone bit and the foreign matters at the bottom of borehole are removed completely.
② The maximum suspension height of the overhead contact line measured from rail surface is 6500mm. Suspension height of the overhead contact line in operator station within small station without shunting operation may be the same as that in section.
When the basic height allows for the direct anchoring, refer to the scope of the densified stirrup area of the framed column
Adopt reasonable sewage treatment technology and discharge scheme to reduce operation costs.
The Nairobi Existing Meter-gauge Commuter Rail Reconstruction Project is located in the urban area of Nairobi and consists of multiple existing meter-gauge railways such as Mombasa ~ Nairobi railway, Nairobi ~ Malaba railway, urban commuter line in Nairobi of Kenya, etc.
(8) Other specifications required for correctly installing the equipment;
Each column of grate is separated by refractory cast iron of special shape. The grate and separating cast iron adopt heat-resistant, corrosion-resistant and wear-resistant castings containing Cr, Ni and other alloy elements.
3) The whole construction site shall be covered with surface soil and loosened by plough or rake within the scope of farmland or vegetable field.
10. After the door and window frames are installed, the horizontal position, elevation, verticality and firmness of door frame as well as the gaps between the structural holes shall be inspected to reach the quality standard and then the wall facing works can be constructed.
The place where the invert joins the side wall foundation shall be tamped densely.
Test on Gases Evolved During Combustion of Materials from Cables - Part 1: Determination of the Halogen Acid Gas Content
Generally, the allowable distance for vibration safety in blasting is calculated by using the following equation:
On the whole, the finish-coat painting shall be brushed (sprayed) evenly with consistent thickness, instead of any leakage.
1.6.4 Setting of Centralized Concrete Mixing Plant
7.5 Fire Safety Education and Training Records (SUFA-EHSQP-106-005)
Currently, Mr. Wang is working with the entire staff to transform and upgrade the Group, aiming to forge it into a large enterprise with an annual production value of RMB 100 billion.
In 2017, the mature Precision and Pressure Control Well Drilling Technology is applied to Wjor-22 and Med-21 on the right side of Amu Darya for the first time. The result is within our expectation.
Inspection method: observation and measurement with a ruler.
Implement relevant local engineering safety and civilized construction specifications to ensure the smooth realization of the overall and stage safety and civilized construction objectives of the Project.
Talk with Embassy of China and Economic Counselor's Office in Ethiopia about introducing Sichuan enterprises, who desire to go global, into Ethiopia, to guide and promote more Sichuan enterprises to play a dominant role of "going global" under the policy of "the Belt and Road".
1.4.1 Letter of Entrustment of China Harbour Engineering Company Ltd.
The tightening torque of bolts shall meet Q/CSR 52.3-2008.
Pumps are connected with outlet pipelines utilizing coupling devices.
Minimum Pressure Stress of the Baseplate of Bridge Deck (MPa)
Name of insurance Company: PICC/Ping An/CPIC
The Tenderer shall provide battery (disassembly) samples for verification of the Employer.
The underlying bedrock is composed of (J1) sandstone, mudstone from Upper Jurassic System.
Nairobi–Mombasa Standard Gauge Railway in Kenya
ACTOM Company - South Africa Project (order No.: SI00885)
For the Project, the maximum daily domestic water drainage capacity is 123.18 m3/d, average hourly domestic water drainage capacity is 30.26 m3/h, and maximum hourly domestic water drainage capacity is 32.86 m3/h.
Surface of the door leaf and frame shall be smooth and free of obvious nevenness and the welding spot shall be firm. Surface of the door shall be coated with antirust paint and free of spraying patterns, salivation and spots.
Q22BAL1-2,Q22BAL1-3; 2 in total.
4.200,4.500 Plan
3) Adjust the depression angle and horizontal deflection angle according to the design requirements, and adjust the depression angle and horizontal deflection angle according to the requirements of the illuminated surface when there are no relevant specifications in the design.
Article 34 Parking lot layout: two social parking lots are planned. One is located in the east of the main entrance with an area of 3.15 ha. and the other is located at the southeast conner of the staring area with an area of 1.85 ha.
1. High-pressure switch; 2. Compressor; 3. Low-pressure switch; 4. Gas-liquid separator; 5. Ventilating set; 6. Evaporator; 7. Electric heater; 8. Capillary tube; 9. Dry filter; 10. Condenser fan; 11. Condenser
All the sections shall be in mutual connection, and placing length of each section shall be controlled in the spacing of 2~3m to ensure step advancement by sections and by layers.
(5) Measures shall be taken to prevent tools from colliding with the sheds of organic composite insulator during installation of insulators, and trampling on organic composite insulator is prohibited.
Granite: Brownish black mixed with brownish grey strips, weakly weathered (W2), massive and coarse grain structure; Primarily containing quartz, feldspar and biotite; core in short columns, recovery percentage: 90%.
Double click line item of material voucher or click onto enter the detailed interface of material voucher.
Figure 3.36 Types and Median Grain Size Distribution of Sediments at Trail Trench Bottom (August 2016)
(8)The reinforcing steel bar position shall be checked whether correct before pouring concrete, the reinforcing steel bar shall be avoided moving when vibrating the concrete, the position of the reserved reinforcing steel bar shall be corrected at once after pouring the concrete to avoid the displacement of the column bar and the joist.
2.Normally, the "On" and "Off" of platform screen door are under the control of signal system ATP/ATO device. The signal system gives the instructions of "Open" and "Close" to platform screen door system which execute the relevant actions according to the instructions from signal system.
Detection of residuals of combustible materials as well as the combustible gas and dusts;
13.1.20 Construction quality for foundation pit backfilling of diversion dike, energy dissipating dike shall comply with Article 11.1.46 of the Standard.
6.11.8.1.5Drainage joint installed must be free of water leakage. Wire rubber pipe is used as drainage hose to connect to the sink.
3. The operator shall carry out personal and product safety management and control in the production process.
The dead weight of front cross beam of bottom suspended scaffolding is auto-calculated via MIDAS.
PV area will be provided with two entrances and exits (with dimensions of 12m and 9m respectively) for mobilization and demobilization of personnel, equipment and materials, and will be separated from the plant area with transparent iron fence. An electric access control system will be arranged at the entrance.
2) Weld an assembly platform to the steel casing for symmetrical welding of PC HOUSE baseplate units.
The maintenance work shall be arranged according to the first-come-first-served time period.
The side wall plates shall be free of deformation. The surface shall be smooth and flat without any distortion.
c) Low noise: Noise produced during expansion and compressed air release is almost absorbed by the materials in the bunker. In addition, it works at intervals. Therefore, the noise is lower than the noise standard for the industry and entrepreneur.
4) Each system provides the environment software for its PTU running (such as Microsoft .net framework).
3.In case the Bidder is a foreign company, the Bidder shall submit the USD cash whose amount is equal to the Bid Security (in an exchange rate of RMB against the USD on the current day) to the relevant financial officer of the Bid Inviter and the Bid Inviter shall issue a receipt for the Bid Security.
After removal of formworks and acceptance, backfilling and compaction of the foundation pit shall be performed timely.
(9) EPC general contractor's negotiation response documents;
2 When the reserved anchor hole is excavated, the periphery shall be roughened, and the size shall fit the bottom face of anchor pier.
5.7.2 In the course of production, the materials or semi-finished products used for each process shall be stored in a specific area.
The Company shall hold all kinds of professional training classes, study classes, lectures, etc. and the Manpower Resource Department shall be responsible for implementation.
(1) When the Employer's requirements are inconsistent with the requirements of Project Management Department, but not lower/higher than the requirements of national regulations, the Employer's requirements shall be obeyed;
Communication, signal, power supply, overhead catenary system, traction power supply system, and other auxiliary works.
The cost of domestic 750V power supply equipment is nearly equivalent to that of 1500V power supply equipment. Hence, its costs are at least 50% less than that of single-axle monorail.
The AddisAbaba-Ejaji-Jimma-Tepi-DimaincludingJimma-Bedele railway is the railway at southwestern point of Ethiopia and the main channel to South Sudan.
In case of any change, CRRC ZELC must submit to the Tenderer the copy of the revised quality guarantee plan.
③ Fix the winch at the cable laying ending point, pull out from the winch the steel rope for pulling cable, and thread the steel wire rope through the conduit to the cable reel at the cable laying starting point.
2. Plateau tableland (north plateau tableland)is located in the northern part of the route (TK60-TK72) and is connected to the Serbian plateau tableland.
Construction machinery and equipment include generators, electric hammers, electric drills, multimeters, combination tools, measuring tools, etc.
Account No.: 23992001040018531
During floor construction, the water in sedimentation tank shall be pumped to corresponding floor, and the water upon construction shall be drained in organized mode back into sedimentation tank through PVC pipe for repeated use.
5.3All maintenance service records shall be kept, including electronic version and paper version (signed by maintenance personnel and quality inspector), for the Client or a third party's review.
The place for storage of recyclable materials needs to be separately located and provided with a functional drainage system around, or covered with plastic film when necessary to prevent pollution.
(11) In order to ensure the formwork removal effect and not contaminate the concrete structure, the water-soluble mold-release agent shall be painted evenly.
The defective products will trigger the initiation of a secondary response plan: No additional defective products may occur: No sorting is required
The appearance shall be neat with consistent connection lines during re-coating. Besides, when the bolt node is re-coated, the bolt head shall be painted uniformly, especially the lower part of bolt head must be painted.
Reserve a single-layered louver hole (600X400) closed to the bottom of board
The recommended values ​​for geotechnical parameters listed in this report are worked out according to the statistical results, the tables, the data on boreholes, and the regional experience.
New signal production rooms will be built in all the stations, dispatching offices, comprehensive maintenance center and workshops.
When the reservoir crossed by the railway is under normal water level, the water surface width is up to 675m and the maximum water depth is up to 23.3m.
Both parties understand and promise that the draft PPP contract, PPP contract or signed supplementary agreement shall prevail in case of any inconsistency between the content agreed in the general contract and that of the draft PPP contract, PPP contract or signed supplementary agreement.
Construction Organization Chart for Project Department (see the chart below)
The installation of instrument insulation box shall meet the following requirements: it shall be firmly fixed and the allowable deviation of perpendicularity shall be 3_. When the height of the box is greater than 1.2m, the allowable deviation of perpendicularity shall be 4mm; the allowable deviation force for levelness is 3mm, and the installation in rows shall be neat and beautiful.
Article 39 The technical personnel responsible for the project management shall give detailed instructions to the construction teams/shifts and operation personnel on the technical requirements for safety construction before the construction of the Project, and both parties shall sign for confirmation.
The manual tools refer to manually used tools without any other power, such as hammers, crowbars, etc.
Ancillary works of partial roads and underground space at the west square of Zhangjiagang Railway Station along Shanghai-Nantong Railway
Consulting telephone: 028-84208275 84208278
1.3.4 Responsibilities of Director of Engineering Quality:
Ankang Hanjiang River Bridge, the first slant legged rigid frame bridge in China, has a main span of 176m, ranking top among railway steel bridges of the same type in terms of the span worldwide. This project was granted the Gold Prize for National High Quality Projects.
11)The system must allow operators to remotely maintain any PLC controller through the backbone network of ISCS.
(2) Steel materials that have been sent to the site shall be stacked by type and specifications with material information indicated on a board, with square timbers placed at the bottom for storing in an overhead manner, and covered by tarpaulin or plastic cloth of colored strip to avoid rusting.
The financing contracts shall be reviewed before the signing. The review process can be implemented according to the Regulations on Review of Project Bid Documents and Contracts (SINOMA-TIANJIN-MM-SP03).
Modify the time of any work station or server of the signal system.
Domestic sewage will be discharged into the utilities sewage drainage pipeline nearby after being pre-processed (fecal sewage will be treated in cesspools and sewage with oil will be treated in oil separation tanks).
a. Rated lightning impulse voltage (peak value)
For this investigation, the Ethiopia Project Department Central Laboratory of China Railway Engineering Corporation completed the laboratory geotechnical tests and water quality analytical tests and the laboratory of an Ethiopian local company, Consturuction Design SCo. complted the rock tests according to Chinese specifications on rock tests.
1. Technical instruction should be made before equipment hoisting and the hoisting operation should be carried out strictly in accordance with construction regulations.
All metal parts must be corrosion-resistant and the motor must be coated according to the manufacturer's standard.
6. Participate in and implement the safety related goals and action plans of the drilling crew in accordance with the Branch's HSE goals.
Inspect whether there are certifications for transformer and whether the paint is in good conditions. Installation shall not be performed in case there is no certification or the paint is damaged.
2. In construction, the centerline distance and benchmark elevation shall be carefully verified; in the setting-out of each component, the relevant sizes shall be checked before the construction.
Foundation beam, base slab and base plate: 50mm for lower reinforcement with spacer, 70mm for lower reinforcement without spacer; 25mm for upper reinforcement.
CRRC Sifang has performed well in delivering trains on time and complying with the specifications. All projects undertaken can meet the requirements of providing passenger services on time.
Technical Specification for Building Interior Wall Water-Resistant Putty
9. Party A's strip steel mill shall cooperate with Party B in implementing various spare parts management regulations and systems.
Concrete pump trucks and concrete pumps shall not be maintained while working.
Make sure that the seats provide sufficient legroom to sit comfortably with ample legroom and mobility.
C20 plain concrete cushion (reserve space for drainage pipe or drainage ditch in accordance with water construction)
Treatment of fracture zone (typical) - drainage tunnel
Wiring and equipment installation in header masks in saloon
(3) For business partner's compliance information, compliance risk assessment and relevant certification materials, the business departments shall make a complete due diligence file and submit the same to the Chief Compliance Officer or the Compliance Director of the branch or subsidiary for approval.
Cement quality should meet the requirements of current national standards of and be in accordance with Table 7-4.
Warehouse-in sheet or handover sheet and arrival inspection reports shall be signed by the representatives of both parties.
The flare area of the whole plant is located in the northern part of the plant, close to the sea, and on the downwind side of the predominant wind direction of the plant all year round, which is beneficial to saving land.
□ LV apparatus □ Power transmission and distribution □Electrotechnical instrument□ Solar energy□ Other ______________ [please specify]
Meanwhile, the system shall generate an alarm and upload the information to the workstation when the emergency door opening button is activated.
Reinforced concrete foundation. Concrete is replaced with (commercial) concrete C25 (not valuated)
IDK-NT-11. Engineering Geology Description of Usman River Double-Track Super Major Bridge
4.2.2 For employees who suffer from the occupational disease and the occupational disease prevention hospital confirms that they are not suitable to continue to engage in the original toxic and harmful work, after the approval by the Company's Human Resources Department, the Company will arrange them to other jobs based on the actual situations.
The acceptance results of the third party shall be deemed as the acceptance results of the Employer.
(1) Our company shall implement a Health and Safety Plan on Site, drawn up and agreed with the Owner within 28 days of the commencement of work at the Site, which shall be in force throughout the duration of the Contract.
The design output shall meet the requirements of design input, and provide basis for design review and validation. The design output documents shall be reviewed before release.
Table 4-1-5-8 Additional Time for Starting in the up Direction at Erankau Station
This Section mainly describes the standards, regulations, definitions and abbreviations used in the aerodynamic simulation calculation for Romanian EMUs.
③ Transportation time: the first batch of goods arrives at the destination within 10 days after arrival at Guanlei Port and the second batch arrives at the destination within 7 days.
Respect the reasonable operation guidance (including environmental and social norms)
Gates not frequently used should be subject to regular inspection and maintenance. They are advised to be operated once a month, which should be within 10 minutes.
Construction of sand and gravel bedding: unload the sand and gravel to the bottom of the tank, and pave and level it manually in layers according to the setting-out height, and then vibrate and compact it with a flat vibrator.
Reception rooms, duty rooms and lounges shall be clean and tidy with orderly-arranged articles; fixtures shall be removed; doors and windows shall be complete; windows shall be clean and free of ash deposit, cobwebs, litter and sundries.
Implementation of other matters decided by the special meeting of the Board of Shareholders according to applicable laws; performance other matters specified by this Rules or other matters which are deemed as necessary by the Board of Shareholders.
Prepared by: Long Jun September 21, 2018
Qualification Certificate of Test Engineer (Zhang Jun)
Engineering Department, Security Department and Labor Management Engineer
The supplier gives specific advice on site training and will confirm it in detail in the function specification.
↘construction of foundation of current collection lines →erection of pole and tower and wire erection↗
One layer 4 thick waterproofing coiled materials APP modified bitumen (polyester reinforcement Ⅱtype;
At the same time of making the construction plan, the transportation plan of materials and equipment shall be made, and the delivery time of materials and equipment shall be arranged according to the construction period and process, so as to ensure that the delivery place of materials and equipment is in place at one time and reduce the secondary transportation of construction materials.
USD 4,163,695.35 (i.e. 5% of the Total Contract Price).
The length of the sign pole is designed based on the condition that the sign is set on the fill slope of 1:1.5. When the slope is not 1:1.5 or the sign is located in a excavated section, the length of the pole shall be adjusted according to actual conditions;
Integrated management includes office management, financial management, human resources management, public security management, etc.
During the pressure test, the water temperature shall be kept below 25 °C.
Table 9.9.3 Allowable Deviation and Inspection Method of Formwork Erection
1) Deploy technical backbones and pioneers from various departments to set up a special test team for the project. The members of test team shall reasonably arrange their own work tasks and accomplish relevant work of this project in a serious and timely manner.
7.4.2Purchasing and Outsourcing Products
2. Requirements on physical performance of doors and windows (refer to the detailed list of doors and windows).
Main quarry 1: The quarry is near Kampala-Entebbe Airport Expressway under construction, with abundant reserves and good quality. It could be used for pavement and concrete gravel and is 16km away from the main line, with relatively short haul distance. Therefore, it is the most suitable quarry along the Expressway.
Folded plate flocculation stratosphere sediment tank (superimposed clean water basin)
Be responsible for the Project planning, design, and for the Project's environmental protection meeting the requirements of Laos and China on procedures.
On the basis of the rational use of China's codes and standards, fully combine the actual situation in Kenya to make the construction project get regional elements and meet habits as well as requirements of the natives.
Bolt M27*80 GB/T5781-2000
Investigation, handling, statistic analysis and report process records for accidents and events shall be kept for the traceability.
(7) Participate in the coordination and management meeting on the project schedule.
The operation, monitoring, control and management of storage and transport are achieved by storage and transport monitoring and control management system of hardware platform adopting distributed control system ((DCS).
1) Lower the capacity of inverter, and select 2 630kW inverters for the photovoltaic array with unit MW.
(2) Influence of Road Conditions on Fuel Consumption
Under the precondition that the requirements of safety, reliability, functions and construction period are met, signal equipment shall be selected among the high-quality and mature equipment and apparatus available in China.
 Binhai New Area comprehensive transportation system - integrated traffic coordination strategy
(1) The bidding documents, negotiation, modification, written agreements or other legal documents between the Employer and the Contractor in relation to the Project;
Next, please watch the publicity film of CRCC so that Your Excellency Governor and all the guests can know CRCC better.
ERROR!!װ₪ֶױׂµ½(£¬ָ´µֳµ½>>name <<.
All the shafts in the transfer gear boxes are secured on box body 17 via roller bearings and the hydraulic pumps are connected with the box body via oil pump flanges. Power is transferred via the spline.
Length of Deceleration Lane = 125.357m
The accuracy of pressure gauge shall not be lower than class 1.5. The upper limit of scale shall be 1.5 ~ 2 times of test pressure. The verification certificate shall be available.
(8) Design Code for Protection of Structures against Lightning (GB50057-2010);
Employees are paid monthly according to the local salary standard in South Sudan and settlement shall be made at the end of each month.
Coin for change test: Adopting presently circulating genuine Renminbi coin and test coin of the same radius, thickness and mass as the genuine coin, which shall contain more than 20 coins with the face value of 1 Yuan and more than 10 coins with the face value of 50 cents;
Layout Plan from Foundation Top to 4.35 m Column
The plan shall stipulate: construction locality, detailed works, the scope and period the operation is affected; start and end time of slowing and train application; precautions for operation of the new line.
1. Set superelevation and superelevation slope.
The revision control facilities shall include, as a minimum, the following features:
M is the sensor measurement output terminal, and shall be connected to the user ammeter or shall measure the sample resistance Rm and then be connected to the power supply voltage zero point (0V).
② Planting soil (Qpd/): widely distributed on surface of paddy field, forest land, and wasteland in the project area, thickness 0.5m, brown, plastic, slightly wet, most clayey soil, containing massive plant roots.
f) When checking the centering status of the coupling, the gasket for each group must not exceed 4 pieces.
The waste oil filter and waste battery are collected separately and stored temporarily in a safe place after cleaning and decomposing the oil and harmful acid.
Lighting distribution box shall be hung at the wall with bottom edge 1.5m away from the ground
M25 concrete shall be used for RCC works.
For example, hydraulic climbing formwork technology is used for 265-meter Minaret in Algerian Great Mosque and 241-meter Changsha Shimao Hilton Hotel ;low-position jacking formwork technology is used for 339-meter Wuxi IFC.
At the same time, the coordination will be conducted by us to ensure the smooth implementation of the project;
The following environmental protection measures should be taken for construction of the project:
Installation and adjustment of the disconnecting switch shall meet the following provisions:
The arrangement of station location shall be combined with the future development of cities as much as possible, and shall attact the passengers to the maximum extent, satisfy the requirements of the short-term designed passenger collector-distributor volume and of operation management, improve the urban traffic conditions, and meet the demands of passengers.
To facilitate the parking and rest for drivers and passengers, 8 parking areas are set up between service areas far apart, so that the parking areas or service areas are no more than 60km apart.
- The outsourcing process should include the divisions of responsibilities and scopes of both parties.
Rocks are composed of clay-shale, rhyolite, clay-limestone and limestone lens.
│ │ │ │ │ 239368 Highway & Irrigation Ditch.JPG
No one is allowed to remove or displace all safety protection facilities and safety signs without authorization.
The sand and aggregates needed for the construction of the Project cannot be obtained locally and need to be obtained or imported from the vicinity of the capital.
For the pile foundation, test piles shall be taken for on-site static load test, to determine the characteristic axial bearing capacity of single pile, for which the number of test piles and the test method shall be determined according to ___________________ and the applicable specifications of local authority.
The welding layers shall be not less than 3 layer (the groove must be fully welded) and the external layer can be welded only after the internal layer welding is cleaned; the welding joint shall be full and continuous, such defects as slag inclusion or porosity are not acceptable.
Refer to 01J925-1-40-40 and 43 for fabrication method of profiled steel sheet wall body window casing;
The length of flexible joint at the deformation joint is 150mm longer than the width of the deformation joint, and a 73mm-wide galvanized steel flange is used on both sides of the flexible joint, and reducing is forbidden at the flexible joint.
The provisions contained in the following standards constitute the provisions of this standard by reference in this QHSE Management Manual.
\U+00B7L30x4 steel hanging tile, middle distance according to tile specification (welded with steel downstream strips).
The steel box tied-arch bridge will be adopted for main bridge in Option I, with a span layout of 140+350+140m.
We confirm that the final design meets the requirements for the impact of the relevant unfavorable factors on slope stability.
The radius of the lead curve is 1100m. The forepart of switch rail of the curve is of separated semi-tangent design with a separating value f=12mm.
Bridge guard fences shall be installed on super major bridges, major bridges and medium bridges.
Relying on the township's location advantage, the development model of "base + cooperative + company" is applied, and the village committee establishes the cooperative and find sales channels through rural e-commerce platform for unified sales.
Since the bridge substructure work is the work for critical line on the construction plan network drawing and retardation time of the substructure work is relatively long compared with the overall construction plan, measures shall be taken for improvement.
Special transport goods——Radioisotope, oil sample tank and motorcycle in primary transport package, as well as the goods requiring special transport that are specified by the competent department in charge of railways under the State Council
a) The parties shall discuss the contract renewal 3 months before the expiration of contract.
"Principal force (double-track train operation)", 1,81927.8,2371.8,206082.9,100,707.3
The schematic diagram of the apron door monitoring device is as shown in Figure 3.11.6-1.
7.2.2 The Solicitation Organization shall determine No. 1 successful bidder within 15 days after the review panel submits the written bid evaluation report;
2.1 Personnel who is about to take his or her turn on duty shall carefully check the quantity of equipment and tools before his or her turn;
It can work normally at the ambient temperature of -50°C~+70°C; after its temperature is restored to normal through +110°C and 3 hours of high temperature thawing in the thawing warehouse, the original working performance can be maintained.
2) Three copies of the equipment's installation foundation drawings (to be provided within 1 month after the contract is signed), drawings of overall dimensions, and floor plans (to be provided within 2 months after the contract is signed) , and the equipment's floor plans and installation foundation drawings shall be confirmed by the Buyer;
The pressure is raised slowly up to the specified test pressure, after 1h, the pressurization shall be carried out again until up to the test pressure.
Approved by the Ministry of Education, Xi'an Highway College has been renamed as Chang'an University.
7) The switching time of systems shall not exceed 5s.
Asphalt pavement construction should be based on the requirements of comprehensive quality management, to establish a sound and effective quality assurance system; the quality of the construction processes shall be inspected and assessed, to achieve the required quality standards and to ensure the stability of construction quality.
The form of subgrade and bridge is adopted for this section of line.
AC input voltage: AC380V-10%~AC380V+15%
The horizontal driller is adopted for drilling, the length for water detection section every time is 40~60m. After excavation and remaining for 2.5m, the next circulated water detection can be implemented.
Ground wire connection - reserved round steel and ground flat steel for in-column / ground beam main reinforcement
Fund Source: self-raised; currently fully fund.
b Pad before switch (also called rail brace pad. It is paved on certain section of the stock rail before the actual point of switch rail and the lead curve part is also paved);
The construction equipment shall be arrived at the site one month in advance before being used.
1. The superelevation adopts a way to rotating along internal lane. When the superelevation cross-section is greater than the gradient of road camber, the lane outside shall turn along road centerline to form a one-way cross slope with internal lane, then the whole cross section will turn along the road line;
The operator is forbidden to drink before working and shall not leave the post while the rail welding machine is in operation.
2. The General Contractor shall confirm that all software is registered under the Buyer's name when installing the software.
Article 61 Any problem (hidden danger) found in the inspection shall be immediately handled. Where immediate handling is not possible, temporary safety measures shall be taken.
Cost centers can be used to collect period expenses and cost items. Although cost centers can be defined according to different division methods, they are generally defined as per the organizational structure of expense control.
PPR pipe applies hot melting connection, and the cross section of cutting pipe shall be perpendicular to pipe axis.
Strengthen the safety education of special operation personnel. To work in special areas or particularly dangerous places, conduct safety disclosure first, and provide reliable safety protection measures for the operators themselves and others.
The quality of safety helmet must be qualified, and products of inferior quality shall not be used.
②. Keep staff canteen clean, healthy, canteen staff have health certificates with uniforms and hats, and there are raw and cooked signs on the food container.
Four receiving-departure tracks (including two main lines), 1 receiving-departure track which is also used as shunting track, 2 stub-end loading and unloading tracks and 1 draw-out track of 850m are designed in the station.
To ensure project progress, the Company will, during the project construction, earmark some salary fund as site job rush award to boost the enthusiasm of the involved employees and facilitate the project construction.
The system network equipment is configured with industrial Ethernet switches; the computers in the main control layer are configured with network cards; the pump unit LCU and the common LCU are configured with Ethernet communication modules and are connected with the switches to form a 100 Mbps Ethernet network.
First of all, please allow me to introduce our honorable guests:
If we win the bidding, we ensure that the project principal and persons in charge of major sub-divisional works immediately conduct filed work on the site on the third day of receiving the notice of award, to save time.
Table 3-2Relation Curve among Upgoing Time, Speed, Line Current, Motor Current, and Time
4.6.4 It shall be responsible for the management of product quality, manufacturing cost and delivery time of the organization.
The device has internal self-diagnosis and deviation detection device. In case of failure of the system, the device may be switched to manual control and give alarm.
Measures for Declaration of Occupational-Disease-Inductive Projects (Decree No.48 of the State Administration of Work Safety [2012]);
The project "Hormozgan - Kerman Seawater Desalination and Infrastructure Program in the South of Iran" is used to solve such issues as shortage of water, serious population loss of Kerman Province in Iran.
3. The grounding resistance of the grounding grid should be ≤1\U+03A9, and simultaneously meet the requirements of touch voltage and step voltage.
Train brake system has commonly used braking functions, including electro-hydraulic hybrid braking function, safety braking function, emergency braking function, braking keeping and parking brake function.
Based on the service capability of all sections, from now to 2029, the service capability of the Safim-Jugudul section will decrease significantly, so the road needs to be widened. As the service capability of the whole line will decrease at the end of the service period, the whole line needs to be widened and upgraded.
(1) Aluminum materials shall be aligned and adjusted before processing, and protective gummed paper shall be attached before processing;
The storage and transport system is under the centralized operation and management of central control room. The site instruments are dominated by intelligent electronic ones. DCS has OPC interface reserved for communication with factory management network.
Arrange construction nameplate (seven licenses and one drawing) at the entrance of construction site.
Major and difficult litigation or arbitration activities;
Except Huang Xing Square and Huangtuling which adopt cover and cut-top down method, the other 5 stations in the lot all adopt open excavation. The underground diaphragm wall forms supports and protections system together with concrete and steel supports and the seven sections all adopt shield method.
The wires shall be in order, clear and pleasing to the eye, with good insulation and no damages.
Before the operating personnel entering site, they must learn the safety regulations on site, comply with the rules and regulations set by the Employer, Supervisor and General Contractor and carry out safety technical disclosure; the operating personnel shall have the idea of "safety first" and improve their safety awareness.
The Station Announcement and CCTV Surveillance System shall serve as fire fighting communication facility and shared by FAS at all stations.
Supplement the ladder profile in the longitudinal section as commented.
5. Tension the transverse and vertical prestressed rebars in the closure section of side spans.
1. Name: weak case (empty case)RD1~RD3 2. Material: ferruginous baking varnish
Certificate of Award for the Third Bid Section of Lanzhou-Chengdu Crude Oil Pipeline Project
C.10.2.1 When the ambient temperature is 45ºC, the power device should work normally after running 6 hours.
Compact tube: 8W, 11W, 15W, 22W, etc.
The production equipment departments of all the organizations are responsible for handling the procedures of cement warehouse-in and warehouse-out.
Sockets and plugs provided on DEMU can match with the existing connectors used at the maintenance depot of Philippine National Railways (PNR).
The yearly internal audit covers all departments and sections and subordinate units which includes all elements of the Management System.
j 1095.399 699.039 79.906 0.104 -0.308
6) In 2017, concrete sleepers were incorporated into the certification acceptance catalogue of China Railway Corporation, increasing the product categories to 189.
Whether the wastage quota applied items are incorrect, omitted or duplicated
For the interior door, except the hole of the grille, other holes shall be sealed.
This sufficiently indicates that the welding of additional wearing plates limits the coupling clearance between the couplers and is an effective maintenance method for the coupler.
Single-hole or three-hole advance drilling (30 ~ 50m) detection method is carried out on the heading face, and when in doubt, multi-hole ultra-short distance (5m) drilling is added, and geological conditions are forecasted and verified by coring or observing the change of drilling speed and combining the color of rock powder and mud.
The electric brake (ED) is provided by the traction system of the motor bogie and is steplessly controlled by the central control unit (CCU) and the inverter control unit (ICU).
4.1 The formwork and support structure shall have enough strength, stiffness and stability;
The hose specifications and connector threads are shown in Table 2.
Rotating =61-A110 temperature adjusting knob S2
The molded case circuit breakers, miniature circuit breakers and contactors shall come from the same internationally well-known brand.
The construction projects of bridges (excluding the prefabrication, transportation, erection, casting-in-situ, bridge decking of girders), communication, signal, information, disaster monitoring, power, power traction supply, maintenance, rolling stock, EMU, track maintenance, and other buildings and equipment
8 In the process of girder binding, lifting, overhanging and placing with the main working machine, positioning of the motorized flat wagon with the main working machine shall be prohibited.
The station computer system mainly includes: server, monitoring workstation, ticketing workstations, printers, emergency button control devices, power distribution equipment, etc.
In order to strengthen the building of the grass-roots environmental supervision and law enforcement team and strengthen the law enforcement force, according to the Environmental Supervision and Management Measures for Construction Projects in Guangdong Province (trial, draft for comments) issued by Department of Environmental Protection of Guangdong Province,.
5 The site command team will stop work after disposal.
Check each construction site and other potential risks of production department; implement all items of safety production responsibility system, and carry out all safe and protective measures and all kinds of safety management systems.
Strengthen prediction and pre-control in project construction. Analyze construction situation irregularly. Handle problems that may occur during construction in advance. Ensure smooth progress of construction. Try to reduce work slowdown and wastes of personnel, materials and other items.
(3) Speed limit obtained through fact-based calculation;
10.All auxiliary contacts shall be numbered on the electrical wiring diagram and connected to the terminal strip. The electrical wiring of each auxiliary switch and all auxiliary contacts shall be numbered.
The Bidding Announcement will be published atand .
After the mortar is leveled and settled, plastering shall be carried out once more. The mortar shall be covered with plastic cloths and be cured by watering for at least 7 days.
It can flexibly change the display mode and content of the line diagram via modification software.
After the completion of the construction, summary shall be made for the standardization work to find out the deficiencies and learn from strong points to offset weakness, so as to promote the future standardization work steadily.
Laying of flame retarding cable WDZB-VV-4x240+1X120mm2
Original documents should be delivered together with transferring materials. Warehouse which distributes materials shall preserve copies. Manufacturers of distributed materials shall be indicated in remarks column of delivery sheet.
Driver's console control technology, car body light-weight technology, bogie technology, air brake technology, and high pressure detection technology.
The surface of steels must meet the requirements of the design specifications after de-rusting.
The power monitoring system mainly consists of power dispatching system of the control center, integrated automatic system of the substation, power supply repeating system and communication channel.
To solve the quality problems identified for the first diesel engine successfully, the Manufacture Supervision Engineer accredited to the factory organized and held a special quality meeting together with relevant department of Dalian Locomotive and Rolling Stock Co., Ltd.
We will adopt feasible safety measures and provide sufficient funds for safety. We will implement strict safety management to ensure there are no serious casualty accidents and to control the frequency of minor injuries within 2‰.
At 16:53 of January 12, 2010, a Richter 7.3 magnitude earthquake hit Haiti, and the capital city Port-au-Prince and a large part of Haiti is devastated. This earthquake killed 222500 people and injured 196000 people, and 1200000 people were homeless.
the date of completion of the Works certified by the Engineer in accordance with Clause 48, or
If the Respondent is allowed to submit an alternative response document, only the alternative response document submitted by the successful candidate recommended by Evaluation Committee can be considered.
The Bidder shall submit a document showing previous application of the traction and braking system (location of application, number of trains, running kilometers, and failure rate), to demonstrate that the proposed traction and braking system meets the requirements of the Bidding Documents;
Fig. 3-6 China's GDP and Annual Growth Rate
2(60+100+60)m Double-track Continuous Girder Double-detour
6.14.1.3 Organize to establish and improve the production command system, prepare a production plan and make production inspection to ensure that production tasks can be completed;
A keen-witted and capable project leading group working in practical and efficient attitude will be set up.
7) No more than 2 layers of blocks stacking on the scaffold.
Through the above framework, all servers, workstations, control devices and information collection devices will eventually be connected to the management layer and support the real-time control of the integration.
The method of two-well natural connection mining is adopted. The well spacing is 50m, a group is formed by two wells, the group spacing is 170m, and the row spacing is 120m. The control area of the well group is 20400m2 and the area of the solution cavity is 5827m2.
Premier+: 7X24X2H
Length Difference between Prefabricated Girder and Standard Girder and Angles at Girder End
At P7 point, the cables are connected to the secondary equipment in box-type substation. The cables are laid in cable trench and the cables outside the trench are supported and fixed.
Loaded container: $16/TEU/day (free storage period: 15 days); empty container: $15/TEU/day (free storage period: 30 days)
From Guangzhou South Railway Station to WKT Station, the EMU under test operates in down direction with stops at Humen Railway Station (54s), Shenzhen North Railway Station (45s), and Futian Railway Station (30s).
Operation and Maintenance Manual for Seating Cars of Standard-gauge Passenger Trains in NigeriaVolume 9 Operation Manual for Water Supply and Sanitary Equipment System
During curing, the concrete surface shall be kept moist, and the curing time shall be 7 days.
Stone painting interface agent: before paving the stone, the reverse side and the side face of the stone shall be painted with waterproofing agent. The second painting shall be 4h after the first painting perpendicular to the direction of the first painting. The front side of the stone is painted surface protective agent. Pavement can be started after 24h.
RVS-2 audio cables through DN20 galvanized steel pipes are laid underground at a depth of -0.5m below the ground.
5.3.9 For the drilling at normal section, the borehole diameter is 75 mm, and the construction shall be carried out according to the segmented grouting section height in the approved construction organization design, i.e. drilling → perform deviation survey every 30 m → stop drilling after drilling to the designed grouting height.
Manual gate valve, DN500PN1.6MPa
For the AT feeding system, the main transformer output voltage of traction substation is 55 kV, and power is supplied to the catenary via AT. One end of AT is connected to the catenary, the other end to the positive feeder and the neutral tap to the rail. Since the transformer ratio of AT is 2:1, the transmission voltage of catenary is still the rated voltage.
From September 28 to September 29, 2016, the Department organized the completion acceptance inspection of Neijiang-Suining Expressway.
The Designer should reply to each batch of review comments one by one and report to the Client and the Consultant in a formal written form;
Only authorized gas detectors can carry out gas detection and sign relevant certificates.
The installation screws of the exterior wall plate are placed at the position, which can greatly reduce the possibility of water leakage;
The flame-retarding test for bundled cables shall meet IEC60332.
5) The contact surface shall first be wet with water prior to pouring of concrete for pier, and then a layer of cement mortar with a thickness of 10 ~ 20 mm shall be poured. The pouring method shall be such that the mortar be poured directly from the tumbling barrel onto the contact surface of concrete.
Organize Party B to carry out comparison tests between bid sections based on the amount not exceeding 5% of the amount tested and organize experts to review the test results.
Select wires→clean pipes→ thread feed-through lead wire → wire loading→ bind steel wires and wires → thread through pipes.
The section of the road sideline is about 7.2 m from the residential area. Considering the residential trips, we plan to build roads for the community. with a width of 3.5 m. The base of the road will be leveled, rolled and compacted. The road will be covered with clay-bound macadam and be connected with adjacent streets, which is convenient for residential trips. The layout is as shown below:
Cracks, slag inclusions, weld beading, weld penetration, arc pits, pores and other defects are strictly prohibited on the weld surface.
2) A circular fire lane (more than 4 meters) is set around the complex building in the site area for fire engines to pass and put out fires.
The evidence proving that QHSE management system of the Company meets standards, laws and regulations, and customer requirements;
Design Scheme for Mexico City ~ Queretaro High-speed Railway Technical Part
3) Table 4.2-3 2046 (morning peak) Passenger Flow in Long Term
Special anchor dropping tools are used for dropping anchor to prevent damage to the compensation rope.
4. Maintenance of railway section automatic control system (132 class hours): mainly learn basic knowledge about semi-automatic blocking, automatic inter-station blocking and automatic blocking, learn composition, technical conditions and circuit principles of various types blocking equipment, in order to improve student's ability in applying the learned knowledge about blocking to analyze and resolve practical problems.
(1) Phenomenon: The fullness of mortar at the horizontal mortar joint of masonry is less than 80%. Bastard joints appear in vertical joints, especially more transparent joints often appear in hollow brick walls. Large-shrinkage mortar paving is adopted for masonry dry wall, with the shrinkage joint depth more than 20 mm, affecting the fullness of the mortar.
Assembled shear wall structureof Qinxing Jiayuan housing project
Water filling test shall be performed for concealed or buried drainage pipeline before they are concealed; water filling height shall not be lower than upper edge of sanitary ware at bottom floor or the height of ground floor.
The air conditioning and ventilation system supplies air through the air duct above the ceiling, and sends the cool air treated by the air conditioner to all parts of the coach through the air supply grille arranged longitudinally along the coach.
(1) Advocate civilized construction at the construction site, establish the noise management system for controlling man-made noise, avoid man-made racket as far as possible and enhance consciousness of all construction personnel to reduce noise disturbance to residents.
Relocation of 10KV and 0.4KV power lines is as described in 6.11.1.
Organized to participate in the EPCM bidding quotation at the DSO stage of Asmara Mining Project.
Such as the scope of application, accuracy, flow, pressure and other performance indicators and requirements of reliability, availability, maintainability, safety and others.
For continuously mobilized geosynthetics which are from a same manufacturer and with a same batch number, every 1000m2 or those less than 1000m2 shall be considered as a batch, and the construction contractor shall conduct 1 sampling inspection for each batch.
(6) 2016.3-2017.5 Expansion Plant Project of Shanghai Green Valley Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd. Deputy Project Manager
If other BIM technical software are required for the Project, the Company will purchase the corresponding BIM technical software for the Project.
The subway stations, street corners and hospitals that seamlessly connect with the surrounding areas form a planning sequence, which reflects the openness and integrity of architecture, thus affecting and driving the development of the region and ensuring the overall promotion of the value and image of the region.
14. The starter must be checked before using, and only can be started up after normal operation of it being confirmed.
Before starting, check the relevant circuits for any abnormality, especially the connection of PE wires, and turn on the main power switch after confirming there is no abnormality.
The average peak availability of link bandwidth is less than 70% ; that of link bandwidth is less than 45% when the shared dredging mode is used.
Address: No.83, Zone B, Sanshui Center Science and Technology Industrial Zone, Foshan City, Guangdong Province
Figure 6.1.7-2 Schematic Diagram for Earthquake Action of Wall Body
This spoil yard locates at 3 small natural gullies 50m away from the left side of the route at K63+700, which is about 200m in length, 50m in width and 7m in depth.
After being completed, the project connects many tourist attractions along the line, and brings convenience to the travel of residents. Moreover, the completion of the project also provides convenience for tourists to visit, which plays an important role in promoting the tourism development of Cambodia. Therefore, the project will be a trunk railway giving priority to passenger transport with due consideration to freight transport.
(1) Preassembly and resetting of steel box girders and fabrication of large suspension segments;
14.4.2.6 Survey and design products quality and site resident representative services quality of the Project shall satisfy the Owner completely;
ASTM-A36/A36M Standard Specification for Carbon Structural Steel
Before processing, the end reinforcement should be upset to ensure the effective diameter after tapping. After the thread head is processed and passed the inspection, it shall be immediately put on the thread head protective cap or screwed on the connecting sleeve to prevent damage to the thread head when loading and unloading the reinforcement.
3. Acceptance method of achievements of the Technical Services: Party A organizes relevant experts to conduct on-site acceptance.
It is better to do the grounding with the progressing of civil works.
4.1 Carry out test and inspection on each batch of axles as per EN 13261 and UIC 811-1. See Table 1 for items of test and inspection.
Filing S/N: SICPB No. 12008867
3. Among the transportation expenses, accommodation expenses, visa expenses and service remuneration or allowances, and other expenses of external experts invited to attend the meetings, the expenses which shall be borne by the Institute in deed can be disbursed in the meeting expenses.
the amount which, in the opinion of the Engineer, is finally due under the Contract, and
Anchoring or welding between connections and embedded parts does not meet the requirements
(1) Line A section 1 (A6~A10)
Green building technologies should be applied for environmental protection and sustainable development. Building materials and materials for building decoration should be in favour of environmental protection and human health.
Therefore, the construction shall be carried out according to the locking temperature and construction method provided by the maintenance department after obtaining the consent of the maintenance department.
16.2 During the performance of the contract, in case of contract dispute, both parties shall deal with it in accordance with the contractual stipulations and the provisions of relevant laws and regulations.
Outdoor supporting for outskirts (roads, municipal, water and electricity, etc.)
For the subgrade excavation at the weak geology, both of excavation and masonry shall be carried out section by section, so as to ensure stability of slope and construction safety.
4-piece 8mm series pozidriv screwdriver head #1, #2,#3,#4
The simply-supported beam system is the most widely used bridge type in the elevated section.
Flammable and explosive substances with chemical properties conflicting with protection and fire extinguishing methods must not be stored in the same warehouse.
③ The concealed tunnel section shall be laid with drainage pipes, geotextile and PVC waterproofing membrane as the drainage measures during the initial support and secondary lining. The waterproof boards shall be laid for the drainage pipes longitudinally from the tunnel vault to the lower parts of the side wall. At the tunnel deformation joints, rubber water stops shall be arranged, while water swelling water stops shall be used for preventing water at the construction joints.
Thus, Muang Xai Station will become a urban transport complex integrating railway, public buses, taxis, social vehicles, etc. , achieving convenient transfers among different transport systems for passengers.
The thickness of horizontal mortar joints and the width of vertical mortal joints are generally 10mm, but shall not be less than 3mm and not greater than 12mm.
A depot and comprehensive maintenance base are arranged at IDU of the line, for comprehensive maintenance of all lines in the urban railway network of Abuja.
Refer to ERP/CREC-EPC/2/11/2/D/19 for overhead contact system mast upon bridge and retaining buildings.
See Table 3 for main construction stages and procedures of pre-stressed T girder bridge.
6.5.2.1 Assist with the handling of customers' complaints, etc.
OCS grounding resistance, boosting wire, power line, OCS insulation, OCS marking, sign and warning portal shall be inspected, aiming at improving stability, reliability and safety of OCS system operation.
We know that these secrets are intangible assets for customers and will lead to huge losses once they are disclosed.
The Seller, within 30 days after acceptance of the prototype, submits to the Tenderee for confirmation the documents list and discussions in the fourth design liaison meeting.
The laid interlocking blocks shall be compacted on the top with the powerful plate vibrator or small vibratory roller for 2 to 3 times, but the range within 1m width of the free edge of pavement construction shall not be compacted.
Project name __________________
When concreting is conducted at an environment temperature higher than 30°C, the Contractor shall take special cooling measures during mixing, placing and curing of concrete.
To maintain the overall stability of formworks and the fixed position of internal formworks, a small number of split bolts are added between internal and external formworks. The split bolt is put inside a PVC plastic tube with conical caps at both ends.
1 Take out the handle of automatic brake valve and independent brake valve at both ends from operation position, to cut off the operation function of rear brake valve and avoid possible mis-operation.
Service will not be affected during FAS ring switching of network management
5)Safety distance between cables with different voltage classes;
The end of abutment walks shall be connected by C25 tie bar which is arranged in the middle of the board. Each tie bar shall be 70cm long with 40cm spacing.
Due to the high usage frequency, it shall be of a durable, shock-proof and reliable mature product.
8 When there is an out-dip structural plane with good penetration, the stability along the structural plane damage shall be checked.
(1) The remote control (adjustment), remote signaling, and telemetering functions of the controlled station are detected by the control station.
2) When the length of mylonitic granite section is less than 5m or the area stretching into the tunnel is less than 1/4, the methods such as reinforcing by chemical grouting on the surrounding area of the shield, and the removing slag locally in front of the cutterhead can be adopted.
The system is composed of video regional node (monitoring center), video access node (station) and video capture node.
Power of main driving unit: 30 kWX2X2 (2 single machines)=120kW
paint, etc., the keeper must check the validity of the product, and send the check result to the user department in writing.
43 patents were newly applied for in 2011, which increases 95% over the same period of last year. Among which, there are two international invention PCT patents, 13 national inventive patent and 28 utility model patents. The company has obtained notable achievements in the aspect of independent development of new TBM product and has been in the front place in the domestic industry.
The distance between interchange and service area, parking lot and bust stop station etc. shall meet the needs for installing exit forecasting signs and stabilizing the straight traffic flow on expressways.
Use M4 screw to fasten it to the electrical integrated control cabinet or cubicle switchboard;
0.4~5.8m: grayish brown loose silt, saturated, C=6kPa，Φ=23°，Es=13MPa，fao=70kPa，qikq=25kPa;
The following three factors should be taken into consideration to forecast the distribution ratio of oil export in the north of South Sudan to Mombasa Port of Kenya via this line and the export via Djibouti Port of Ethiopia.
14.3.11 The site test of raw materials of steel bars shall meet the requirements of Article 5.2.5 of Standard for Construction Quality Acceptance of the Standard Gauge Railway Concrete Engineering in Kenya.
For more details, see Chapter 7 Technical Standards and Requirements.
2.6 Suspended: the interface jumps to the password protection interface which allows password entry. The operator may leave for a while and enter the former interface by password entry to continue the work.
Normally, expansion joint shall be provided at 20 to 40m extent, to prevent breaking.
1) Park the train on the inspection pit with a wheel stopper so as to avoid accidental movement of the train.
The project mainly adopts relevant U.S. specifications and has referenced local specifications of Panama. The mainly adopted specifications include:
We are honored to invite 3 professors of Central Washington University to visit our school. We will jointly discuss education cooperation and make communications via the opportunity.
If the recommended system requires compatibility with multiple operating systems such as Linux, unix, win95, win98, win2k, etc., all operating systems shall be available when UAT is conducted.
Fixed assets _ Fixed assets - Molds _ Fixed assets - Molds - Increased in the year
The Employer or its representative is entitled to carry out any complete signaling, telecommunications and information system test deemed as necessary by him before the submit of temporary acceptance qualification of the entire signaling, telecommunications and information system.
In the stage of engineering construction, supply scope will be determined by taking the distribution characteristics of mechanical discipline into consideration, and series of works including procurement, technical contact, installation, commissioning, and training will be finished by integrating technology specialty and price advantage. As for special equipment including crane, enterprises with professional qualification will be selected for supply and to finish declaration and registration and installation.
1. All the dimensions indicated in the Drawing are in cm, except otherwise specified.
(3) Civil engineering construction are only to the toweling course on which exterior surface couresuse glass curtain wall, granite curtain wall and aluminum curtain wall.
(3) Material requisition and layout shall strictly comply with cutting plan and setting out data. Specific materials are used for specific purposes only.
Guarantee the stemming quality and choose inverse initiation to prevent rocket-type blasting.
47) Technical Code for Anti-Interference of Industrial Computer Monitoring and Controlling System (CECS81-96);
f - the design value of compressive strength of masonry (MPa), under user interaction;
In this section, sound barriers are installed in the subgrade section and T-beam section. The following only describes installation construction of sound barriers in T-beam section.
CRH1A is the standard 8-car EMU; CRH1B is the 16-car EMU; CRH1E has an improved head design and 13 sleeper cars.
According to the climate zone of the project site, external thermal insulation measures may be taken for the external walls of buildings, and transparent glass curtain walls will not be adopted for the external walls of all kinds of buildings.
The Employer shall provide technical parameters and detailed conditions of the orefield traffic facilities, and provide on-orefield and outer strip mining area access road and traffic facilities for free to the Contractor as per the Special Conditions of the Contract.
25.When the foundation trench is excavated to the design elevation, if it fails to meet the design requirements, the excavation shall continue to 200mm below the soil layer required in the design at 1:2 grading. The elevation difference between adjacent foundation bottom shall never be greater than 1/2 of the net distance between foundations, as shown in the following drawing.
The local resistance is mainly produced by the transition process caused by sudden change of the shape of the solid boundary, which leads to the internal structure destruction of the water flow that generates the vortex from then, and overall structure reorganization of the water flow after the local resistance to adapt to the new uniform flow condition.
3.3 HSE Meeting of Construction Contractor Work Team
During removal and transportation of the support, the following content shall be eliminated: casualty accidents, traffic accidents, support collapse accidents, and equipment accidents. The occupational disease shall be prevented and controlled.
Copies of social security certificate of Project Manager (November 2019)
Relaxation shall be carried in a manner that stress is slowly relaxed by the automatic relaxation machine. The tensile stress shall not exceed 300kN.
(4) Before the final tightening, check that the adjusted angle is not changed due to deformation. If necessary, repeat the above steps for readjustment. After the adjustment is correctly completed, use the open-end wrench and socket wrench to tighten circularly, and then use the torque wrench to check that it meets the standard.
Water supply pipes are mainly constructed by hot-melt joint, screwed joint and flanged joint.
After the pile hole testing completed, and confirmed and accepted by the field engineer, clear hole, while cleaning the slurry attached on the casing wall.
Formal correspondence documentation arising from contract implementation such as the supplementary agreement of the Contract, change proposal, acceptance certificate, payment applications, shall be presented in the format specified in the Appendixes to the contract.
1. Safety production regulations and requirements of the Company for safety production management.
6.3.2.3 El-Barwa~End Station Section
After the acceptance is qualified, the construction party must provide the investor with the test reports and the complete set of management data of each terminal point.
Figure 8-3Landslide Formed by the Residual Deluvial Sediments due to Weathering of Shale/Sandstone in Permian Strata (Field photo)
When estimating the present value of future cash flow, the Group needs to estimate the future cash flow of the asset groups or combinations of asset groups, and meanwhile, select appropriate discount rate to determine the present value of future cash flow.
From December 07 to 10, 2015, China Railway Corporation organized an on-site inspection of the Capacity Expansion and Transformation Project for Jinwen Railway capacity expansion engineering, and held preliminary acceptance meetings.
The Project Management Department shall carry out unified management on site personnel.
The time for removal of counterforce frame and partial segment depends on surrounding rock conditions in opening section, mortar performance parameters for backing grouting, and thrust force for departure advancement of shield.
4. Standard for Engineering Classification of Soil (GB/T50145-2007);
The joint commissioning of communication system and fare collection system is part of joint commissioning of systems and equipment along the whole AALRT line. Workgroup for the joint commissioning of communication system and fare collection system shall be established to take charge of the implementation.
3 The allowable temperature forceof the two rails can be calculated by formula 3.0.3-6:
(2) The power and lighting load of the depot where the charging station is set up shall be supplied by the step-down substation which is set up together with the charging station. The power supply voltage shall be AC380V/220V.
Cover plate box culverts are adopted for oblique culverts; ribbed plate culverts are used when the filling height is beyond of the service conditions of cover plate box culverts.
(1) Construction procedure: snap the line→erect the beam frame and all-round scaffold→adjust the elevation→lay the bottom form of beam→install the side form of beam→install the keel→install the top slab formwork→correct the elevation→carry out pre-inspection→conduct beam and slab reinforcement binding
1. The project design contents mainly include indoor living water supply and firefighting facilities.
Test acceptance reports shall be signed by the bidder's relevant personnel, the Tenderee's supervision personnel and the construction contractor.
An aggregate bin and a belt conveyor for conveying sand and gravel aggregate are arranged outside the main mixing station.
The ground laying method is mainly adopted and the elevated laying method is used for some sections.
2) the printer adopts well-known brand laser printer, and the basic configuration shall not be lower than the following configuration:
The working stage shall be of headroom beneath complying with the design requirement,.
Apart from artificial breathing and oxygen therapy, proper application of medicine can help get breath and effectively remove CO in the blood.
It mainly includes the asphalt concrete overlay reconstruction and slope connection of soil surface area for the existing runway, taxiway B, vertical connecting taxiways at both ends and A2〜A4 rapid taxiways of Urumqi Diwopu International Airport (see the construction drawings and the list of construction costs for details).
Infrastructure Construction Project in Central Cities of Chuxiong Yi Autonomous Prefecture with ADB's loan Project Proposal
Nominal diameter: 100 mm; upper limit value for flow range: 4000(i/L)
When correcting the inclination, the soil grab can be carried out on the high level side of the cutting edge, and the soil under the cutting edge can be removed with manual assistance if necessary.
Applicants shall follow the concept of risk control, emphasize security protection function, in combination with the function process design of the terminal building, and effectively control the risks by optimizing the design from prevention illegal interference, fire accidents, passenger injuries, disaster and prevention, seismic resistance, safe evacuation and other disaster prevention and mitigation aspects.
6. 15 thick M15 cement mortar screed-coat (internally mixed with 5%CH-B waterproof agent)
(4) User authority management function: Safe and complete user account password management function and strict control authority classification system are provided.
CK23+960 ~ CK284+670 section (Lasarat ~ Aysha) lies in the alluvial-proluvial plain and has a flat and open topography with the ground elevation ranging between 720m and 740m. The vegetation is not developed.
The suppliers joining in the material procurement activities shall be subject to the qualification examination in terms of qualifications and supply service capabilities.
According to the results of geological survey and field sampling, the <16-5> conglomerate, sandstone and shale interbed in the survey area are salted rocks containing soluble salt and medium-soluble salt minerals, which are characterized by dissolution, swelling and erosion.
The operation procedure of the tension tower balance hanging is as follows: a. hang the strain insulator and the hardware string, and conduct the high-altitude temporary anchor on both sides of the cross arm; b. adjust the sag and secant line; c. crimp strain clamp; d hang and loosen the anchor.
Noise is controlled within the allowable range of deviation for the Supplemented Surface Works of H4 Linking Taxiway (Taxiway A) and Overhaul of H4 Intersection (Eastern Section of Taxiway A) of Shanghai Hongqiao International Airport.
Copper core rubber-sheathed wire BX 500V 6mm
Address of Employer: 5F, Tower D, Building 19, Courtyard 1, Transport Department, Wuhou District, Chengdu
Five explosive warehouses are planned for Lot V;the construction of 2 explosive warehouses has been completed and one explosive warehouse has passed the acceptance and put into operation.
This section is the alluvial-pluvial plain area of the Indus River and the terrain is flat, open and slightly undulating.
Tentative Technical Specification of Concrete Precast Beam for Passenger Dedicated Railway
pour M2.5 composite mortar into 300 thickness of rubble, and the overhead edge should exceed the surface course 300;
2.3 The time, number of personnel, venue and other specific contents of training shall be negotiated by the buyer and seller.
10.4.7.4.2 Fabrication and Installation of Steel Frame
Where the surveyed area locates develops Ban Long fault, DaLong fault and second-order folds.
3. The laying of electric pipeline led into the building should comply with the following requirement:
Used for inspecting and repairing train end faces; self-propelled and liftable; can automatically translate against the head end surface, with carrying capacity ≥400kg
1. 120X600X10-thick black special tile skirting board, with joints wiped by white cement paste
1)Suppliers and subcontractors shall comply with certification levels CL 1 and CL 2 specified in DIN EN 15085-2, applicable to CL 4 of CL 1 and CL 2 accessories (for design, procurement and installation, procurement and sales).
Figure 6.2.3-21 Line Comparison and Selection of Industrial Area ~ El Hosary
2.1.4Broadcast of Control Center for Train
1) In the cab, check whether installation locations meet the requirements, whether the installation is secure, and whether the installation is convenient for operation maintenance.
The connection spots are arranged every 1.0 to 1.5 meters along the length of wall body, and the anchor plates shall be embedded during the construction of the concrete members.
Hangzhou-Ruili National Expressway is the 12th transverse line in the Planning for National Expressway Network, and Linxiang (Hubei-Hunan Boundary) - Yueyang Expressway (hereinafter referred to as "Linyue Expressway") in Hunan Province is an important part of Hangzhou-Ruili National Expressway.
Zhenhua Coatings takes the clients' demands as its mission, provides tailored safe and environment friendly water based coating products with low VOC content, protecting you from any loss in capital.
——Organize the staff of this discipline to be familiar with the content relevant to this discipline in the project contract.
c) Educate and train all employees in environmental/occupational health and safety, and monitor and eliminate safety risks in each department;
5.13.1 Be responsible for preparation demand plan of raw and auxiliary materials, purchased materials and other materials supporting the project;
and bear all losses of the Buyer incurred by the delay.
The other section shall be mechanically connected after alignment and adjustment, and submitted to the Engineer for acceptance after self-inspection.
35.2 Carefully implement the CCP's and national production safety guidelines, policies, laws and regulations, and rules and regulations; make party organizations at all levels play the supervision and guaranteeing role in the production safety of CRRC ZELC; educate party members to take the lead in the production safety.
The experiment personnel randomly take samples and carry out retests according to the regulations.
FRP seat and rear cover are installed at seat frame base.
Code for Fire Protection Design of Civil Air Defense Works (GB50098-2009)
2.10.3.1.7 Cable Laying in Cable Interlayer of Distribution Station
The Tenderer shall consider the hardware configuration, application software design, and overall interface design for each system of the Project according to the engineering conditions and operation requirements of the Project, and be responsible for the integrity and consistency design for each system of the Project.
Monitoring performance requirement ≥ 1000 concurrent monitoring tasks of the management center;
Electricity management strictly follows the principle of "one device, one switch box, one circuit and one leakage protector".
2) In case of siding departure, ATP onboard equipment, according to the track circuit information (sending UU or UUS code according to switch speed restriction), generates and keeps a fixed restriction speed of 45 km/h or 80 km/h (to the exit) to control the train operation. Refer to Fig. 4-2-13 (b).
Project of Consulate General of the Republic of Uganda in Guangzhou - Electrical Works on the Ground
Bogie longitudinal load ( ) + m1-T16
Scaffold must be checked frequently in use to remove sundries. It is strictly prohibited to pile up too many construction materials on the scaffold, or many people are crowded together to avoid overloading the scaffold and causing accidents.
See Drawing CN0428DD0462EL7-11 for built-in elements.
August 18, the initial workpiece of three-ring segment is accepted in Panyu Pipe Factory.
During process of intercalation/de-intercalation of lithium ion, there is intercalation/de-intercalation of equivalent electronics as lithium ion (Traditionally, positive pole is represented by intercalation/de-intercalation and negative pole is represented byinsertion/de-insertion).
Signed on: September 21, 2017
When the work was carried out, or the percentage completed so far if still incomplete.
The passage ways and the overpasses shall be set based on the principle of reducing the working quantity of the main line and bringing convenience to people's life and production.
Support by user driven content template. The administrator can quickly fill some pictures and characters in need of real-time display on the basis of the template well designed by designers.
Naamryck, Bonasika and Makouria. The line extends southwards until Goshen.
(1) Improve the fabrication process of trolleys, and carry out overall machining after the welding;
11.Do confirm that the inlet and outlet of lubricating pump is connected correctly when connecting the system.
The explosive load for a single blasthole can be calculated according to the following formula:
For the purpose of protecting forest and reducing deforestation, the existing stockyards along the project shall be first utilized. The exploration of a new stockyard shall be minimized according to the actual needs, the trees that don't affect the construction purpose shall be reserved and the vegetation shall be restored and afforested as required after completion.
Quaternary pore water: mainly buried in the surface soil layer. The soil layer has great grittiness and large pores, so the seepage flow is fast. Atmospheric precipitation is main water supply.
3) The land category should be measured in details (woods, bamboo land, fruit land, vegetables land, commercial crops, irrigable land, dry land, wasteland, tower head grass land, nursery garden and other vegetation), and other land category boundaries.
List of Other Drawings used for the Project
To frequency converter cabinet 1VS0410EL01
The company shall be provided with human resources, facilities, work environment and other resources to meet the requirements.
In the construction peak hours, the concrete work, masonry work (assume that the waters consumption per shift is 40m3) and plastering work (assume that the waters consumption per shift is 500m2) are performed at the same time, and the water consumption at construction site will be:q1=13L/S
3.9.4 Virus and Trojan interception shall be set on the external network equipment, the routing management account shall not be disclosed to those who are not information management personnel, the network software not required for work is prohibited from networking, and non-permitted network equipment and software shall be prohibited from connecting to the information system of the engineering office.
(5) Summarize relevant materials about passenger transport, report the materials to the passenger traffic dispatcher of the railway bureau in time, and establish the standing book of passenger flow data for weekdays, periods of ten days, and months by train numbers, sections and holidays.
When the short edge of a slab is of a span ≥4.2m, anti-cracking constructional reinforcement at slab corners shall be provided; refer to the drawing of anti-cracking constructions at slab corners for detailed construction method.
Scientific and technological basis will be obtained for continuous improvement and perfection to create conditions for further promotion.
When lightning protectors are applied in parallel, they must not be short-circuited under any circumstances. In series applications, they must not be open-circuited under any circumstances.
The inland, Zanzibar, and offshore waters have several areas with good oil deposits.
e. Different section undergoing initial, secondary and final compaction shall be obviously marked for driver to identify one another.
The relevant matters and responsibilities agreed by both parties inherit the relevant provisions in the construction stage in the draft PPP contract, PPP contract or signed supplementary agreement.
2) Party B shall propose a payment application to Party A or the EPC Contractor in line with the contract and it is entitled to propose a claim application in accordance with the contract.
3. Drainage holes will be arranged in a staggered manner from the up, down, left and right sides for the wall body above the ground every 2~3m (there should be one row of outlets on the balance weight platform).
Clearance of the Urban Railway is divided into rolling stock clearance, equipment clearance and structure clearance.
Encourage the personnel in various positions to forge ahead and be brave in contribution.
Beijing-Shanghai High-speed Railway Co., Ltd. was established in the same year, with the investment institution entrusted by the Ministry of Railways as the investor representative, and with the cooperation of Ping An Asset Management Co., Ltd. and the National Council for Social Security Fund of the People's Republic of China.
The post-tensioned girder shall be manufactured in accordance with the drawings approved by relevant departments and this standard.
Fig. 3: Weighing and Spring Adjustment Fig. 4: Bogie Assembling Workshop
The overall orientation of Beijing, Tianjin and Hebei is "world-class urban agglomeration centered by the capital, leading area of overall regional coordinated development and reform, new engine for national innovation-driven economic growth, and demonstration area of ecological restoration and environmental improvement".
1. Standard value of uniform live load at floor and the ground (variable load) and standard value of control loads at main equipment.
Trial Measures for Work-related Injury Insurance for Enterprise Employees,Assessment and Gradation of Disability Caused by Work-related Injuries and Occupational Diseases
(3) During the local rush hour, construction hauling trucks shall be stopped or reduced to reduce congestion and prevent traffic accidents.
The weight of vehicle cable required for AC380V air conditioning wiring is 114kg.
The open space (about 5m wide) on the north side of the 38th St. is to be used for laying. In order to reduce the influence on the buildings on the north side of the road, appropriate adjustments can be made according to the actual cross section of the road in the later period.
Inspection quantity: the Construction Enterprise shall inspect each track skeleton once at its support.
This bond is hereby issued to serve as a tender bond of (name of the tenderer) (hereinafter referred to as "the tenderer") for participation in (name of the tender project and the tender No.).
16.1.5 After the erection of precast box girders, the difference between the reaction force of each bearing and the average reaction force of four bearings shall not be more than ±5%.
Put the direction handle at lap position, keep the main circuit breaker closed and pantograph lifted, and remove the driver's key, to change the end;
After the system wiring is finished, the correctness of wiring shall be checked as per the random operation instruction and design diagram of soft starter;
Local meteorological data records are incomplete. According to the statistics of outdoor meteorological data from 2012 to 2015, the coldest month in the year is January, and the hottest month is June.
Specifications for the Third and Fourth Order Leveling (GB/T 12898-2009;
4.1.1 Project leader in Technology Marketing Department shall prepare the technical bid based on the bidding documents (technical specifications and attachments) and it shall be approved by the manager of the Technology Marketing Department.
OC Stadium will be slightly changed, including 2 basketball courts, 1 football field and 1 tennis court.
Therefore, there are extremely high requirements for the waterproof construction of base slabs and exterior walls of basement.
5. Settlement joint should be constructed in strict accordance with the design requirements of ETAA400-S-GJ-400-GJQC1 and relevant regulations.
∮10, 12, 14, 16 deformed steel bar
In the process of pouring concrete, carefully fill in the underwater concrete pouring records, and assign special personnel to measure and record the concrete pouring amount. If the concrete surface elevation value is greater than the pouring amount elevation value, it indicates that there is hole collapse above the concrete surface in the pouring process. At this time, it is necessary to treat the hole collapse above the concrete surface as the case may be.
Insufficient information collected, incomplete information input, with no pertinence
Pay attention to the schedule management of the Project, and control the planned schedule, actual schedule and schedule adjustment to ensure on-time completion of the Project.
5.5.6 Relevant units shall issue Product Qualification Certificate for products which are confirmed to be qualified after inspection and test.
Be responsible for collection of availability and price of materials and machines in local area.
(3) The minimum ground level illuminance of the evacuation lighting of this project shall strictly implement the following provisions:
The panel and cabinet shall be grounded firmly. The openable doors for panel and cabinet shall be reliably connected with the grounded metal frame by flexible lead; the control cables extending into the cabinet shall be arranged neatly to avoid crossing; the cables shall be securely fastened and shall make the terminal strip free of mechanical stress; the cable tag is correct.
Materials shall be delivered in place based on installation position of purlines since different purlines have different mounting positions, lengths and types, purlines shall be handled gently to prevent damaging their surface paint; and their sizes and installation locations shall be verified one by one based on the nameplate after they are installed in place.
The straight runoff refers to the length required for the transition of the crown slope from normal crown section to zero-slope section (or the reverse); the superelevation runoff refers to the length required for the transition of the crown slope from zero-slope section to superelevation section (or the reverse).
Accident case 3: Explosion accident of butadiene self-polymerization
Scoring Sheet for Inspection of Hanging-Basket-Type Scaffold (Special Inspection)
(Standard: drawing QJ/KJ202-07-2003)
Compaction machinery shall be not less than 1 m from the panel, and the area shall be compacted manually or by small-sized compaction machinery.
3.2 The supplier's personnel shall not smoke, drink, gamble or engage in illegal activities such as drug abuse in the buyer's workplace.
Take active protection measures (anchorage, supporting and pollution discharge of foundation pit bottom works) or passive protection measures (metal mesh, threads and adits).
The followings shall be submitted as the annexes to the report (the content of the annex shall be updated timely):
In this scheme, the high-speed rail station is set in the existing Tehran Station and the EMU depot is set in Aprin Station.
The construction organization plan of subdivisional works shall be provided to the Employer within 7 days before the commencement of construction.
Data collection unit of the Automated Control System DCU ACS
Provide water and electricity integrated monitoring chart of centralized control center to realize real-time display of tabular integrated operation information of all or main reservoirs/ power plants on the whole netwok;
Prepare tendering documents in accordance with NDB policies, loan agreements, and project agreements, and record the procedures of tender opening, tender evaluation, contract award, and contract negotiation;
Diesel generator set shall be provided with communication control systems, so that it can communicate with locomotive MVB network system through hard wire and bus systems, and locomotive control instructions can be transmitted to the set. Communication information, modes and protocols will be determined by both parties through consultation.
Adjacent U-shape clamps shall be facing different direction and shall not be towards the same direction.
On the basis of adopting the above methods and parameters, the project is calculated by the "medium transport volume" prediction. The profitability indicators are listed in Table 6-2-5-1.
7. The base of this culvert is on the gneiss W[4] layer and it is required that the allowable bearing capacity of the base soil must be more than or equal to 0.15MPa.
Through the analysis of environmental factors, each unit determines the influence of the factors on the quality, environmental, occupational health and safety management system, compiles its Identification Table of Internal and External Environmental Factors (see Annex A), and feeds it back to the Development Planning Department.
The working distance of acetylene cylinder and oxygen cylinder shall not be less than 5 m. The distance between such cylinders and naked flame shall not be less than 10 m. Furthermore, such cylinders shall not be directly exposed to the sunlight.
Persons chiefly in charge of Institute Office (Party Committee Office), Production Coordination and Engineering Technology Department, Quality, Safety and Environmental Protection Department, Planning And Operation Department, Financial Assets Department, Party-Mass Work Department, Information Management Station, Changqing Branch, etc.
Recruitment, employment, training and evaluation of employees shall be carried out as per the Human Resource Control Procedure.
Graduated from Highway Project Management of Traffic and Civil Engineering major of Inner Mongolia University of Technology in July, 1994, with 4 years of schooling
The project is provided with two at-grade intersection. The intersected road of county road of Hin Hoeup County at the starting point has asphalt concrete pavement, while the other intersected road is earth road, with the T-type intersection form. Due to the lower level of the intersected roads, the transition is made by plane rounded connection in the design.
It is about 3km from Registan Plaza and takes 15 minutes to drive.
Blasting operation must be commanded uniformly by the specially-assigned person, and safe area will be delimited. The altering sentry and warning signs will be set up.
According to the model, standard and quantity determined in the design, it is prepared according to the rough estimation or estimation indicators.
The temperature sensor shall detect the temperatures of the three-phase winding and the iron core in real time.
The power in "microcomputer excitation" mode is abnormal while the power in "fault excitation" mode is normal
Summarize the application of BIM technology in engineering quantity/cost management.
When the bogie is operated to cut off the cock, the train will be subject to speed limit:
Correct the factors affecting the stress and deflection of the box girder at any time by means of man-machine cooperation.
│ │ │ │ 170~180 Culvert Section Results.dwg
After adjustment, the nominal GDP in 2013 was increased from USD 285.6 billion to USD 509.2 billion.
According to the predicted passenger and freight volume, the recommended line scheme and passenger and freight train operation plan and other data, the designed carrying capacity and transport capacity of Port Hacurt-Maiduguri Railway is calculated and shown in Table 1.6-3.
Reconnect cables at Points 9~15 of =61-A204.
Secondary cleaning of the hole: The thickness of sediment at the bottom of the hole shall be measured again before the concrete pouring.
The test engineer shall cooperate with the materials department for the inspection and test of materials arrived, shall not allow unqualified products to enter the construction site and shall prevent safety accidents caused by hidden dangers of materials.
With comprehensive consideration, the content of girder erection under special conditions includes: girder erection in rain or after rain.
20-core single mode direct-buried optical cable shall be laid along the newly built special railway line from Dabaodang to Chemical Park.
The garbage storage pit is designed to be closed and the closed space is kept at a negative pressure state at any time.
The traction converter is composed of a pulse rectifier, an inverter, and an intermediate DC link; its appearance is as shown in Figure 6.24.
Angularity (flow time), not less than (s)
(11) Reduce the weight of the slope, such as cutting off part of the slope, removing the pile of earthwork materials or equipment.
Preparation of Steel Substrates before Application of Paints and Related Products — Tests for the Assessment of Surface Cleanliness
Stipulate this project's regulations of management of civilized construction and environmental protection according to the relevant requirements of the construction department and the Employer and the relevant regulations of civilized construction management, combined with the construction characteristics of this project.
Function test: including the broadcasting function test, LED and LCD display function test, video monitoring function test and WiFi function test.
Code for Design of Civil Air Defense Basement (GB 50038-2005)
The plugs of microcomputer screen (with 2 plugs) and ADU auxiliary display unit shall be fabricated respectively according to requirements of the attached table.
3)Provide the relevant hardware equipment of large screen and large screen control computer operation system software that are available and meet the requirements of all parties.
Use process control charts and tables for statistics and monitoring, and review and deal with adverse trends or quality problems discovered in the processing in time.
The transition to air brake should not be accompanied by sudden stop.
During the construction of vertical drains, as the vibration of construction machinery and the disturbance of the pile pipes will destroy the strength and permeability of foundation soils, a certain of restoration period will be required. Therefore, these sections shall be constructed firstly and subject to preloading earlier for no less than 6 months and in line with unloading standards.
Transverse Layout of Guardrails at 25.50m Subgrade Section
The leader of the emergency response team of the Project Team shall give instructions for initiating the emergency plan according to the site situation.
The group conducts evaluation of suppliers' performance, verification of qualifications and handling of misconducts. And Materials and records are collected,archived and managed by the Material Branch.
7.1.9 Equipment shall be subject to civilized maintenance, tools and parts shall be placed in the assigned position. Waste after maintenance shall be cleaned timely to minimized the influence to the environment around. The maintenance site shall be clean after maintenance is completely carried out. Civilized production shall be carried out for all equipment and relevant systems for regular cleaning management shall be established.
By attending externally open class, exchange symposium, advanced study for expatriates etc.
In maintenance mode, the direction indicator of AGM will display a "No Pass" sign, the flaps of AGM will be closed, and the passenger displays will display service suspension and relevant maintenance information.
17. In the excavation of dug piles, ventilation of the pile hole shall be maintained to ensure the safety of the workers. Waterproof and collapse precautions shall be taken. The excavation shall be carried out section by section. Wall protection shall be provided immediately after the section excavation to ensure safety of pile hole excavation.
3.4 The materials used for the decorating project shall be treated for fire prevention; corrosion protection and insect prevention according to the design requirements.
The agreement and various contract Attachments (including the classification documents and supplements during the bid evaluation and contract negotiation);
Installation of two-circuit, single-column reinforced concrete poles VL 10 kV, with traverses, without attachments of type PP 10-2 in open pits
Assuming that cost for materials of each m2 is USD 1, USD 61 is needed for each car, and USD 14,640 is needed for each train.
It is known from Nepal customs that as this project is assistance project, tariffs on imported goods will be exempted, and it is only required to report to customs for approval.
Reconnect cables at Points 2~3 and 7- of =82-A204-X5B.
Juniper appears from the height mark of 1,800-1,900 m. Herbaceous vegetation is well developed on the slopes of mountains and flat watersheds.
The debt capital of the Project includes the construction investment loan and circulating fund loan, where:
Based on 11,628 historical exploration projects, 585.96Mt of inferred historical resources are reported, of which 44.71% are Al2O3(uw) and 5.46% are SiO2(uw).
Arrange the wires as per AJA1011075G020-22-07.
Overall width of each compacted layer of subgrade bed must use the filler of same type and same conditions; fillers of different types and conditions used in upper and lower layers shall meet the following requirements:
 The image can be automatically switched by a polling mode, and the display modes of the single picture and the four pictures are provided;
When following conditions are satisfied at the same time, TCMS will send out the "extended power supply" command (valid high level) through DXM:
4.6.2.7 The technical director shall make one spot check on the original record every month. Problems shall be pointed out in time if found and corrected if necessary.
The temperature rise of the motor during commissioning shall be monitored and not exceed the limit specified by the motor insulation grade.
3. Project Construction Conditions, Timing Analysis and Suggestions for Sectional Construction
3.2 Each department, sub-company (branch) and project management department shall take the quality management responsibilities within their respective work scope specified in the system documents, and shall break down and assess the quality responsibilities undertaken within the departments.
(1) The structural design calculations shall comply with the requirements of Code for Design of Highway Reinforced Concrete and Prestressed Concrete Bridges and Culverts (JTGD62-2004).
Φ150mmX300mm cylinder test specimen
Opening and Closing Parts: All the opening and closing parts such as the cover of the ticket cabin, the face plate on the front, the cutter and printing head, and etc. shall open and close freely. No abnormal noise shall come out in opening and closing the aforementioned parts.
When the vehicle is at an ideal position on curved tracks, i.e. there is no displacement of all wheel sets relative to the track centerline, the geometric offsets at vehicle center and end on curved tracks are shown in Figure 3.5.1, which is applicable to horizontal and vertical curves.
In addition, due attention shall be paid to consideration of such factors as exchange rate to RMB and floating of loan interest in the country of project employer.
6.6 Review Opinions Handling Record(to be kept by the Technology Center for 5 years)
One set includes 4 pneumatic valves.
9) Our subcontractor (or subordinate party) shall station at least one technician in Hong Kong during the execution of the contract for the time not less than 15 days/month.
15.The general toilet shall have a minimum clearance of 700mm in front of the pedestal pan (according to the seat's outline).
Comply with PCIE(1.0) interface, 2.5Gb/S
Detection of offence behaviors and accidents
As power transformer is not used in the circuit and circuit section is related to supply voltage, be sure to ensure the safety earthing of shell (check carefully whether PE yellow-green line of the source jack-socket is grounded safely instead of connected with null line)
Areas along the whole line are mainly of low hills and alluvial plains with open land rising and falling gently. Basically no extremely harmful or hazardous geological condition is found along the line. Major engineering geological problems involve soft soil, slope stability, etc. However, some other geological hazards may occur, like landslide, collapse, etc., due to engineering construction.
National standard 05J909-NQ31-wainscot 16C
The 1.3m indoor wall that children can often touch shall be of smooth material that is easy to be cleaned, and small circular beads must be made at corner angle points including wall corners, windowsills, radiator covers and window sides.
After the train passes the crossing, the system receives the train departure information, the sound-light alerter is automatically disabled, and the guard bar rises to its original position. The crossing restores to the initial status.
When setting-out is inspected qualified, the pile cover foundation shall be excavated by excavators with manual coordination.
This is to cultivate the basic environmental protection awareness of the subcontractor's employees and to lay a foundation for environmental protection by the Project Department.
6. Tender document of the tenderer must correspond to all clauses in the Bidding Document, otherwise the tender document will be considered deviating from the Bidding Document, and for deviation from every item, tender evaluation price will be total tender price plus 1% of the tender price.
Under the same condition, the higher voltage a human body suffers, the stronger current flows, and the greater hazard will be.
Maximum time for reaching insulation position: 3s, with a travel of about 310mm
7) Low mountain area (AK746~AK901)
Its favorable geographical position determines its unique economic status. The whole city is flourishing and stepping into a multifunctional, highly democratized and modernized city with the capacity of internal and external radiation.
For the quantities of cross beams, see Table 5-1 Bill of Quantities of Cross Beams of New Station.
No part of the wheel shall have any type of notches or dents with sharp edges (for example, notches or dents possibly caused by rocks or improper operations during maintenance and transportation) or corrosion (except the front and rear end faces of the rim); otherwise, the defects must be removed properly.
3. The Supervisor can only supervise the lot which he or she should supervise. No supervisor is allowed to take a part-time job in any other lot or project.
6.2 Ground Gradient, Sight and Earth-rock Works
Cisco IOS? software 12.2(18)SXE or above, for Supervisor Engine 720-3B and 720-3BXL systems
According to the Tender Document, the contents of project construction include branch communication center of road section and communication station.
For section GDK29+000.00~GDK29+575.00, trilateral crowns are provided on the top of the base courses in subgrade bed and 4% drainage slopes are made from the centerline to both sides; the part within the range of base course in subgrade bed can be filled with filling materials of Groups A, B and C.
(2) Safety and environmental friendly, people-oriented principles, and construction safety factors shall be considered in the design;
Therefore, quick support is required after excavation for the purpose of preventing collapse.
1) The cables, connectors and self-equipped cables shall be permanently marked in an easy way.
(3) Recheck the road surface elevation and the top surface elevation of each structural part of bridge according to the vertical profile, transverse slope, longitudinal slope and vertical curve elements provided in the drawings;
Axis deviation is caused by shield measurement error;
② The gentle hills are mainly distributed with economic forests; the low mountains and hills are mainly distributed with teak timber forests and eucalyptus urophylla timber forests, and some high hills are distributed with monsoon forests.
In case of failure to convene a meeting of the committee on work safety and to issue the minutes of the meeting as required, 2 points will be deducted each time.
7. Use specific production fund for specific purpose and preferentially for material supply to ensure normal implementation of construction.
The project EPC contract's general terms and special terms are formulated by referring to FIDIC silver book, which fell within typical turnkey project.
(1) For inter-section joints on the working surface of main track and the surface of waterstop base plate, the allowable deviation of misplacement within working range is ≤ 0.5 mm, and gentle slope shall be provided;
Adjust the railway elevation and storage level of hydropower station in the same time
Qualification of main managerial and technical personnel: See Schedule 2-6 in the prequalification documents.
Principle of training through the whole process. It is the fact that training plays an important role in employee's development and it goes through the whole process of employee's development.
Cylindrical concrete is divided into two layers for pouring, the first pouring to the middle beam position and the second to the bottom elevation position of bridge deck. The height of the column appropriately increased (5cm) to eliminate the joints.
1-4-2The specific commencement and completion time shall be subject to the results of tendering organized by the Pakistan government for the general contracting company of the Project.
If obstacle detection function is activated, a maximum door closing force (≤150 N) lasting 0.5s will be applied.
Figure 3.5.3.4 Power Supply Panel 25Hz Phase Position Testing Circuit Diagram
6.14.2.1The ends of each vehicle should be equipped with 2 sets of electrically-operated/controlled double-panel automatic-resetting moving sliding door.
4. For the purpose of ensuring the accurate positioning of prestressed steel tendons, positioning reinforcement meshes of steel tendons must be set up during construction. The positioning reinforcement meshes shall be reliably welded with the surrounding reinforcement with a distance not greater than 50cm, and quantities have already been included.
After the construction of concrete stoppers and slope protections on both sides of the river course is completed, dredging in the river course can be carried out. As the river course in this bid section is wide, dredging can be carried out by sections; specifically, after the river is dewatered, drained and dried, machines are used in the river course for dredging.
Legal Representative or Authorized Representative of Construction Contractor (Signature):
Firs, this ensures that HSR lines serve the existing urban area more effectively; second, this transforms the low-value suburban land into high-value urban land and thus delivers the "exchange value"; third, this ensures the existing municipal infrastructure extends to areas around the stations at a low cost.
The dimension of each combed joint along its elvation should not exceed 30cm, i.e. the height of two bricks.
4. The ground or neutral protection of power system shall be reliable and identified.
Close the hand-operated valve at the outlet of he open cooling water pump B of #1 unit,and hang the warning sign of "Work in Progress, No Operation".
The number of temporary bolts shall not be less than 1/3 of the joint bolts, and shall not be less than 2 sets. High-strength bolts cannot replace temporary bolts to avoid damaging the thread and reducing the value of torque.
2.3.1 Body structure: The body shall be made of high-strength quality steel, with its front wall, rear wall, side walls, and roof all made of high-quality steel plates.
(1) The color of banners for survey nearby the railway shall be different from railway signal color.
The CTC system of the Mombasa-Nairobi Railway is capable of operating the train.
Business Day Reconciliation Report (with Hong Kong Seat Pool Server/Mainland ticketing system);
Push tensioner spring hanger aside and unfasten 2 fastening bolts of tensioner
2.6.1.3 Construction Method and Process of Equipment Installation
(5) Due to its simple application and no human intervention, the device can automatically finish parameter monitoring and data transmission tasks and the data monitored can also be transferred to and saved on the train.
Legal Representative: Zhou Zhiyu (Signature)
T-beam shall be put to place after be transferred to the beam position by bridge erection equipment. If center line deviation or unstableness is found after beam placement, the beam must be lifted up for adjustment and moving the beam by hauling is not allowed.
Design Starting Point of Line for Locomotive to Shed: RDK0+0.000
Risk factors existing in enterprise operation shall be led by the Legal Risk Department in accordance with the internal control system. All functional levels shall identify the risk factors existing in the system and report them to the Legal Risk Department for summary, so as to form an annual risk factor list of the company and determine the top ten risks;
The system has the detectability for a variety of door state, such as: forced door opening, line cutting, short circuit, joining-up in parallel, tandem connection and so on.
Whether the third party is designated by governmental departments or public officers without other choices?
The screed shall be preheated not less than 30min in advance to ensure the screed temperature is not less than 100℃.
③ After all the mud from site pile foundation construction is settled through the mud pit set up on the site, the mud is transported out of the site by a special mud truck.
Non-contact radar level instrument is adopted for measuring of the material level of storage bin and storage tank.
In accordance with the general experience, the sloping rate can be determined as per the following empirical values: 1:0.75 for clay.
Profit and Profit Distribution (Table 14-4)
- Scope of audit; - Auditing standards; - Audit fees;
We offer a full range of patient financial installment services, comprehensive pharmaceutical curative effect, safe medicine supplies and professional pharmaceutical services to patients.
Beiben Trucks / ND1160W241D
3. A reserved deformation of 12cm is designed.
Plan 1: 2X25m – Abutment with Wall (Excavation Section )
The steel members installed on the same day shall form a stable three dimensional system.
Wear-and-tear parts: welding rod, trichloroethylene and wet rag.
The measurement and assessment of vibration and shock performances shall be conducted according to provisions of IEC 6l373, and the following tests shall be conducted according to the provisions of the standard:
Be responsible for supervising and guiding the hazard identification and risk evaluation in the business management of Site Administration Department, Site Construction Department, Site Design Department, Site Control Department, Site Quality Department, Site Material Control Department, Site Purchasing Department, Site Document Control Department and Site Finance Department;
On-board accessory devices, wires/cables, connectors, connectors, power adapters and other accessory devices (include the wires/cables and electrical connectors (plugs, sockets) inside all PIS devices, in equipment rooms, and interfacing with the vehicle)
In addition, HSE interface meeting members, HQC Facility Manager or Senior Construction Manager shall also attend the discussion.
Joint of metallic waterstop shall be interlocked or overlapped in folding manner with overlapping length no less than 20mm.
Unexpected events related to the objectives and measures to achieve them occur.
Be responsible for organizing and coordinating the production status of each post of this shift, reasonably dispatching and correctly commanding the startup, shutdown and system switching of main equipment like PH boiler, AQC boiler steam turbine, electrical and water treatment facilities.
Outdoor: Measure double-row contact voltage, those with voltage are fault points
◆Does the quality manual include any compacted details and the rationality of such details?
1 The designer provides three-dimensional diagram for overall dimensions of door pillar housing. Other unspecified dimensions shall conform to the three-dimensional diagram. Internal structural design is for reference only.
- Departments of various disciplines such as production, technical, equipment installation, and capital construction shall organize the specialized safety inspection for the discipline once a month.
From the analysis of project setting, the number of stations in the 10000t traction scheme is 3 less than that in the 5000t scheme, and the comparison of the main works quantities and investments of the two schemes is shown in Table 3-2-1.
After a comprehensive review, we selected you as the successful bidder for Notification of Award for section 53 of Yanling – Rucheng Expressway Pavement Project of Hunan Province. Here are the details;
The design of folding seats shall avoid clamping finger during operation, and also take ergonomic requirements into account, meanwhile ensure riding comfort, convenience, safety and reliability.
Connect the AC220V to one end of the terminal block. Connect the live wire to L and the neutral wire to N. The wires shall be connected so that the conductors are well contacted and that the end copper wires are not exposed. After confirming the wires are well connected, turn on the lamp to check the brightness. (See Figure 1)
Be responsible for the management on the distribution, storage and on-site identification of materials and equipment;
Construction wastes and greasy dirt must be handled in a centralized way and must not be discharged directly.
So, to develop the project for reconstruction of highways in Huye and Nyaruguru is an important part of the Economic Development and Poverty Reduction Strategy (EDPRS) of .
5.1.1 The process documentation must be accurate, complete, uniform and clear.
Emergency call/broadcasting system is provided in the tunnels (Mansehra tunnel, Battal tunnel, No.1 Thakot tunnel and No.2 Thakot tunnel) which are more than 500m long.
Base treatment: the base surface shall be even, polished and without abrasion marks.
System Drawing for Dosing Room of Raw Water Processing Unit (3100)
Buildings of a total floor area of 20241.40 m2 are added at the Diredawa (excluded)–Dawanle section, all used as production houses.
Under the dispatching of the WCS computer, through related chain control with the shuttle car, the machine, personnel, etc., processes such as container emptying initialization, putaway and out-of-stock and container warehousing-in are completed together.
The Foreign Technical Group of the Project must have the ability of independent operation.
2#, 3#, 4#, 5#, 6#, 7#, 8#, 9#
6.6 Operation Rules for PPM Statistic of Parts for Supplier
The dead weight tags for the parts and components assembly of NW5 flat wagons were not fixed as required, and the dead weight shall be the same as that of other whole wagons. Liu Wei, the person for painting, shall fix the dead weight tags of the parts and components consistent with those of whole wagons, which shall be then inspected by the inspector Weng Lin. This remains to be rechecked in Ethiopia.
The procedures are under jurisdiction of International Market and Sales Department.
5. The General Office of Commission of Work Safety of the State Council should organize the supervision team to conduct supervision and inspection for various regions since the beginning of August.
3.10 The garbage station shall be set up at the construction site, which shall be sorted, recovered and transported on site in time and transported by the professional company according to the approved route and time.
2) All the pipes of the floor covering installation platform shall be concealed to the greatest extent;
The quality and performances of full glass door shall comply with design requirements.
0 W/m²; for air conditioning, the roof air conditioning unit and integrated air-cooled heat pump system shall be adopted, and the cold water system for air conditioning shall be designed as a closed mechanical cycle.
The equipment has dangerous voltage, and it controls the rotating parts which are potentially dangerous.
27455 (including LNG of 1884)
Low tower crane avoids high tower crane: The driver of the low tower crane shall observe the operation of the higher tower crane before turning the arm, and then operate the crane.
According to the special clauses for the Project, the Contractor shall shoot the field facilities, equipment and construction personnel involved in the compensation events and establish image data. The image data shall be taken with available date information .
2. Analysis of Influence of Domestic Wastewater from Construction Personnel on Surface Water
3.4.7 After the implementation of the control measures, the pre-operation preparation can only be implemented if each risk is within the acceptable range and is unanimously agreed by JSA team members.
(5) Apply an appropriate amount of conductive contact grease onto the contact surfaces between the left and the right support assemblies and the slider.
Soil slice width by Slice Method: 0.500(m)
Mr. Yongzeng Luo led the team to overcome many technical difficulties and successfully complete the curtain wall design and construction of the project through careful design, calculation and strict control in the construction process.
3) When the main starting signal turns on the enabling signal, but the direction indicator is off due to a fault, the enabling signal should still valid.
HSRs are safe, comfortable, convenient and fast. As a component of the national HSR network, the newly opened Hong Kong Section of Guangzhou-Shenzhen-Hong Kong HSR has greatly shortened the space-time distance between Hong Kong and the mainland , facilitated communication between the two places, and has become an important means of transportation for more and more Hong Kong citizens.
When the mechanical properties are unqualified or the retest results still are unqualified, the repeating heat treatment of castings and test blocks for standby shall be carried out, and then the tensile test shall be carried out again according to 5.1. However, without the consent of the ordering party, the number of repeating heat treatment shall not exceed three (excluding tempering).
In addition, they pass through areas near a crater, and the geological conditions are complex. It is difficult to implement the project and the investment is too high. Moreover, the speed of the railway around the island is 120kmkm/h, and it takes less than 2h from north to south of the island by taking the railway around the island; therefore, passenger traffic exchange can be achieved with building north-to-south connecting lines.
1. All drawings shall be standard A3 drawings (420X297 mm).
Tunnel Boring Machine (TBM) : a large-scale high-efficiency tunnel construction machine that integrates multiple functions such as tunneling, mucking, support, ventilation, drainage, etc.
This Specification consists of 12 chapters, 59 sections and 280 articles, including 5 compulsory provisions.
Graded crushed stone mixtures transferred to the site shall be paved with paver and compacted with road roller. The curing shall commence two days or three days after the compaction, and the curing period usually last 7 days. The permeable asphalt shall be sprayed immediately after 7-days curing is due.
Level 3 load should be divided into two sections of 0.4kV bus in the substation to balance the load borne by two transformers during normal operation.
Attachment B: AALRTS Uniform Re-claim Form
The item can be passed if no clump weight is used during the test.
Unless otherwise specified in the Contract, the Contract shall come into effect from the date of signing and stamping by the Parties, and the date of signing and stamping shall be regarded as the effective date of this Contract.
The submitted specific documents and sample requirements shall be determined according to the submission levels specified by the supplier quality engineer in advance.
Aidehua Heavy Industry Dock Project in Yinyang Operation Area of Qihai Port Area, Nantong Port
The Outer Ring Road in Katmandu will deliver better comprehensive benefits and meanwhile help improve the regional road network structure, alleviate the traffic pressure and speed up the regional economic growth. It is a urgent need to build the project so as to improve the road network of the area.
2.2 Wooden fireproof doors are selected for the Project, and they are common wooden plywood doors. The selected type of window is the hollow, tempered, coated laminated glass window product.
Ground composed of fine-grained soil with over-salinized soil, or containing salt crusting and loose soil layer shall be removed, while the depth of removal shall be determined through test.
The auditor fills in the "Audit Non-conformance Item Report" (see Form 3), which is confirmed and signed by the group leader.
1. Supervise the safety production of whole construction process, and correct violation.
1.2.14 Geotechnical Engineering Considerations
2. The scale and capacity of temporary building facilities shall be planned and designed as per the demand of general construction progress, and green construction requirements shall be met during construction.
In case of special circumstances, hand microphone, semiconductor horn and other site temporary simple-style acoustic and amplifying appliances for the organization and evacuation of passengers shall also be included.
Project schedule shall show the prevention measures and emergency measures against risk factors;
The system inspects the remote measurement by the limit value and dead zone, so as to filter the abnormal collection.
Administration Bureau of Yueyang Dongting Lake Bridge(seal)
Use M10X30 hexagon bolt (Item 2), spring lock washer 10 (Item 4), flat washer 10 (Item 3) and M10 cage nut (Item 6) to connect the upper portion of cabinet to the body.
TB/T1335-1996 Rolling Stock Strength Design and Test Evaluation Specification
1. The buildings with air conditioning and electrical heating shall be set with automatic temperature control unit to lower unnecessary energy consumption.
After submitted to the Bangladesh Employer or its Representative, the Contractor should ensure the performance of equipment/component conform with performance requirement of specification and proposal approved by the Contractor.
The tensioning end of single-wire beam adopts prestressed steel bar thread anchorage and the fixed end also adopts prestressed steel bar thread anchorage.
5. Anchor at girder end shall be sealed until prestressed steel is tensioned.
An expansion joint is provided on the herringbone framework for every 13m, L/13 joints in total. Each expansion joint is H*1.8 long and 0.2m deep.
Extinguishing agent: foam, carbon dioxide and atomized water.
(1) During the stacking of steel sheet pile, each layer shall be supported by chock; the chock height shall be the same at the same layer and the distance between chocks shall be 3~4m.
2. Organize project construction in accordance with the provisions of the contract, and is entitled to check the project cost with financial department of Party A periodically.
Nairobi ~ Nakuru ~ Kisumu ~ Malaba
The residual value shall be 50% of the construction cost and the negative value shall be included in the economic cost.
Wheelchair Area and Special Seats for the Old, the Weak, the Sick, the Disabled, and Pregnant Women
1. In the early stage of construction, the notice of performing traffic diversion shall be posted on the newspapers, and broadcast on the city TV and radio for 24 hours or broadcast in cycle by divided period.
Clause 31 All units should formulate own management measures or implementation rules based on the Measures.
Fig. 1-27Schematic Diagram of Indication of Operating State of Braking/Release Display
Close all air switches respectively, and measure the power supply due for the loads which are not controlled by the cab key. All equipment shall be put into operation after measurement.
If the top-up process fails, it shall display a failure message and give a voice prompt.
Guard room and gate of comprehensive maintenance workshop of Dawanle station
Lead-in and lead-out signal cables of signal machine room shall be of low smoke, halogen free and flame retarded type.
In the project, 2 utility model patents were developed and 5 papers were published.
Relevant scenes, such as display of tracks damaged by flood and heavy rain on the front screen
Se Bang Phay River and Nam Theun River respectively flow through the north and south into Mekong River.
8) The edge line of the flange shall be straight, free of angle dropping and misalignment.
Quick single call, group call, all call, and emergency call between dispatcher, train driver, watchman, maintenance personnel and relevant mobile operator.
Internal EPC Supervision of China-aided Comprehensive Administration Building Construction Project in Congo (DRC) -- Contract Agreement
In the finite element model of Mc car body, there are 1352774 elements and 1306973 nodes in total.
2% crown cross slope is adopted for traffic lane, and 4% cross slope is adopted for earth shoulder.
Under it are Jurassic and Cretaceous sedimentary rocks as well as Paleozoic sedimentary rocks. The absolute elevation of Mesozoic strata is 120 m.
7.5.4.3 Conditions Requiring Re-tensioning
The entire cab is well sealed and soundproof, as shown in the following figure.
8.4. Anti-theft fence shall be set for open stack yard and storage shed, and warehouse doors and windows shall be firm and solid.
Insert the remaining bolts so that the nuts can be tightened easily and ensure that the bolt head enters the concave and convex of the shell.
The characteristic value of bearing capacity (fak) is 130kPa; the compacted thickness is 200~300mm.
The BIM technology is adopted, expert discussion and expert demonstration are adopted to optimize the constriction plan, which further guarantees the physical dimension of consolidated soils is correct, and the structure surface is level and neat.
See the Structural Drawing for details of the descending floor of flooring structures in the restroom and finished floor elevation shall be lower than that of the flooring at the same level for
Use the screw thread to link the tube coupling up, after the steel tube is jacked in position, weld it together with the steel support along with the excavation.
One construction cell of bridge construction organization is 8~12 piers, the section length of bridge is 600~1000m on the basis of meeting project period and reducing of equipment removal.
b. Adequate preventive measures shall be provided for the section passing through the water environmental sensitive area, including the surface runoff system, sedimentation tank, speed bumps, speed limit and overtaking prohibited signs, etc.
As a component parameter, peak value of back voltage is ≧3200V.
2. After the reinforcement binding is completed, it is necessary to check whether the supporting legs for the upper and lower reinforcements and the cantilever structure reinforcement are firm and reliable.
Government approval department, construction department, fire department
Zhengzhou Shield and Tunneling Engineering Research Center Certified
Impact limit: consistent with the characteristics of the simulated train;
3) If the transformer has serious defects (such as abnormality of the cooling system, severe oil leakage, local superheat and abnormality in chromatographic analysis) or has weak points of insulation, the transformer shall not operate on the overload condition;
2.055m left of YCK6+650
The time to place reinforcement cages is too long, causing underwater concrete pouring to be conducted with delay.
1. Consultation on Organization Methods of Integrative Transport of China-Europe Container Block Trains in 1520mm-Gauge Section.
d)The train network control and diagnosis system fails to send the isolation command to the DCU in this unit.
The training shall be carried out on the Sunday of the last week of each month.
Within 120 days after the execution of contract. In case of large demand, the equipment could be delivered by installment.
(1). For the concrete members, the surface must be flat and smooth and without cell and pockmark, and the dimension error in manufacturing shall be ≤ 3mm.
Arc burn marks shall be removed with abrasive cloth. Contact surface shall be polished, and surface contact shall be smooth and clean, free of burn marks.
Anyone refusing to go through safety inspection and hold bad attitudes;
Two database servers, 15 port station application servers for management information system, 1 set of storage equipment (with an effective storage capacity of 30TB), 1 set of KVM, 2 sets of load balancers, 2 layer 3 switches, 2 firewalls and other equipment shall be set up for the system in the information machine room of the border inspection service complex in Boten.
It is required to make model rooms. The large-area construction of model walls or model parts shall not be carried out until relevant directors of the Employer and the Construction Contractor review and approve it.
The contact surface between scraper ring and piston rod shall be free of defects such as groove, scratch and abrasion. The contact line shall be uniformly distributed and shall be more than 70% of circumference.
Flyweight and spring of emergency breaker shall be flexible after assembled, and the stroke of flyweight shall meet the provisions.
Figure 3-20 Concrete Efflorescence on Bottom Surface of Top Plate of the Third Span
The draught screen can block the airflow outside the vehicle to avoid directly affecting the passenger area and ensure internal comfortable and pleasant environment.
Distance between Each Point of Cross Section and Design Line (m)
14.6.4HVAC air inlets, outlets and vents will be designed so that ingress of rain, dust or rubbish is prevented and they are independent of wind or vehicle movement directions during vehicle running or parking.
(3) The load on the scaffold is calculated as 120% of the total weight of the beam. Waterproof sand bags are used for preloading. The loading weight of sand bags must be weighed on site. Stacking sand bags by simulating the load distribution of box girder to determine the stacking height and arrange sand bags.
Except for post-cast strip, the restrained expansion rate of expansive concrete cured in water for 14 days shall be ≥ 2.5x10-4, and the restrained dry shrinkage rate of expansive concrete cured in water for 14 days and in air for 28 days shall be ≤ 3.0x10-4.
Pressure regulating cabinet for natural gas RXTS(D)-800
type and location of marking / graving, position of sticker holders, bar code type,…)
3. Foundation treatment: foundation pit to be dug to the elevation of -3.00m, graded sand and stone to be compacted layer by layer to the elevation of -2.55m, with the compacting factor of 0.95.
When the movable door is closed, the minimum thickness of obstacle capable of being detected is 10 mm.
Whether records are retained for product requirement review output and the actions caused by the review?
Approval of Proposal for Employment of Senior Management Personnel
In order to meet the higher requirements for the durability, carrying capacity and environmental suitability of bridge bearing in terms of high-speed railways, spherical bearing technology is researched and developed independently.
Project name: Chemical Solvent Recovery and Regeneration Project
The overall construction process is as follows: initial mobilization shall be done by April 1, 2020, the Project will be completed by September 30, 2021 and the acceptance will be done by then.
Provided with functions such as traffic data statistics, signal scheme statistics, control mode statistics, coordination optimization statistics, and so on
List of Winners for The 3rd Golden Mouse E-marketing Awards
Article 25 All vouchers, account books and statements of the Company shall be prepared in Chinese and maintained by specially-assigned person, while no one should alternate or destroy such documents at will.
2.3.1.2 The injured have received proper treatment.
Construction of water-proof coiled materials shall not be done on a rainy, snowy or windy days.
17)Signaling systems shall provide vehicle broadcast testing signals, and the detailed interface mode and interface design shall be determined eventually at the contract clarification or interface design liaison stage;
16)The FIX and EED at each side of the platform shall be adjusted on the same vertical plane.
(5) Temporary benchmarks shall be provided outside the scope of influence of construction, and they shall be stable, secure and easy to observe.
Table 2.8.2-1 Embankment Slope Type and Gradient
According to the current technological development, there are the following two technologies for the voice and control information from the operating control center to the station and depot public address systems.
§11-1 Overview on Relay Protection by Microcomputer
11. Before spraying fire extinguishing agent, all the openings in the protection area expect for the pressure relief opening shall be closed automatically.
⑧ Aggregate grading and grain shape shall be single-sized stones in two or three grades for feeding.
1the recommended value of the internal friction angle (φ) of <2-2> SP-SC poorly graded sand (fine sand) with clay shall be 22 - 26°.
1. Check whether the shell of electrical connector is damaged or deformed;
This drawing is applicable to Pier No. 1 at the left breadth of the Main Line Bridge of Boua Interchange.
The same location (e.g. room or cabinet) network device communication links failure shall not affect the normal operation of other network devices and equipment communication that are not connected to this location. The design shall provide alternate communication path/route for network devices in the same location.
Complete the document after gap analysis; add the confidentiality level of the document
No. 13, Niunitang Village, Douda Village Committee, Zhushan Township, Xuanliang County, Kunming City, Yunnan Province
If the automatic gate machine is allowed to pass, the direction indicator at the entrance end of the one-way automatic gate machine shall display the "pass" sign, and the "no pass" sign shall be displayed at the other end.
5.4 General Performance Requirements on Mid-Point Anchor Devices
① Implement the laws and regulations on safety and quality management of railway projects and relevant provisions of the Owner, and check the execution of the same.
Grafting diameter more than 0.8 cm, and sprouting more than 40 cm
The Company identifies and develops the purchasing and supplier management process to ensure the quality of externally provided processes, products, and services utilizing one or more of the following methods:
Application for construction period change shall be provided within the time limit agreed in the Contract. Failing to abide by the time limit for applications will cause rejection of the construction period change application.
Considering the China-Laos comprehensive strategic partnership and the special experience of the project, we kindly ask the Chairman to pay attention to the project and coordinate the financing of the project on your behalf:
Auxiliary Pipeline Works of Haigu Road in National Convention and Exhibition Centre (Tianjin) Infrastructure Project
Paper type: normal paper; ink-jet printing paper; photographic paper; label; index card; greeting cards; projection film; envelope.
Registration/Office address: Dongmeng Industrial Park, Wuniu Street, Yongjia County (in Building No. 4 of Yongjia County Shengbaoweini Co., LTD.)
4. Open-mounted single-phase two and three-hole sockets (with splash-proof cover) shall be installed for the elevator machine room, car roof and foundation pit, which shall be completed with the cooperation of the elevator installer in the later stage.
(4) Short circuit test of OCS to test the function of power supply system.
(4) Line 1 is set with a new independent TETRA cluster switch to connect the new cluster dispatching systems and base station equipment set in stations, depot and stabling yard and meet the requirements for wireless communication audio and data information switching and field intensity coverage of Line 1.
The existing single line to be reconstructed is 17.22km, and connecting lines, EMU running tracks and bypassing single lines and other related works are 27.22km.
(7) High ground temperature: strengthen ventilation + install refrigeration equipment.
3. External wall insulation shall be implemented by a professional construction unit and comply with the requirements of Technical Specifications for External Wall Insulation DBJ/T01-60-2002.
14) The allowable deviations during pipe installation are listed below:
after the completion of reinforced concrete independent foundation, a layer of 50mm-thick concrete slab with reinforcing mesh can be poured on the ground (filling scope).
Construction electric cables shall be laid underground or overhead, while exposed installation along the ground is not allowed.
After forecast is complete, measured data are analyzed and processed immediately at the construction site, to quickly provide decision information for next step tunnel construction. The preliminary evaluation result is provided within 8 hours after the forecast is complete.
As a formal contact method, the correspondence shall be adopted in the contact of contract, commercial and other important matters. The original of the correspondence shall be submitted to the representative or the person authorized by the receiving party.
1. Contracting scope: Unless otherwise specified that Party A shall be responsible under the Contract, all the items listed in the bill of quantities and all the work directly or indirectly related to the items are included in Party B's contracting scope.
For the explicit underground pipelines, the Contractor shall take responsibility of protecting them and it shall assume relevant liabilities and economic compensation for damages caused by construction.
PZ export equipment is to apply the same manner.
Clean surfaces connecting all circuit channels of the switch by brushing till showing metal luster, wipe off covered dirt and metal scraps with clean cloth, and apply acid-free vaseline or lubricating oil on the contact surface.
(2) Track: replace the rails, fasteners and concrete sleepers with new ones; clean and screen the dirt ballast and supplement the ballast to a minimum thickness of 25cm.
Each single battery may be connected to the liquid adding joint in series through the battery cover, which shall have the function of liquid level control. The central water adding system can precisely inject water into every battery to a given level (water flow rate of 0.5 L/min).
3) The watering shall be performed to ensure that the concrete surface wet is always wet;
Now let's make a more detailed analysis of and study on the rest four corridors.
The project shall meet the requirements for passenger flow of 6,122 persons/h in peak hours.
The over-voltage, under-voltage, de-voltage (or zero-voltage) protection can be tested together in the test of 5.12.
Cary out patching repair or weld additional reinforcement plate on the frame where the partial corrosion area is more than 40% or depth is more than 1mm.
1.When the train stands still, with all auxiliary devices operating at rated power, the cab noise LpA5 on the centerline and at the height of 1.4m above the surface of internal floor shall not be more than 63dBA, and the noise in the passenger compartment LpA5 shall not be more than 64dBA;
2)The running track height in the station area at T3 terminal is about 900mm. Sidewalk surface and platform decoration surface shall meet the boundary requirement.
The instruments used shall be corrected and calibrated before use, and must not be put into use unless meeting the measurement accuracy requirements.
Emergency brake adopts electric and air combined emergency brake (EB) and air emergency brake (UB).
Grouting: Put 1:2.5 cement mortar more than half of a barrel, and then add water to make the cement mortar in mushy state. Scoop the cement mortar with an iron container and pour slowly and be careful not to touch the marble. Slightly tap the surface of stone slabs with a rubber hammer while grouting for breathing of grouted mortar.
The power connector is of 15-pin power connector with the same model as the IOM chassis power connector.
Through joint efforts, the Company introduced such new goods as cement pipe pile, macadam and steel structure, of which the throughout reached 1 million tons in 2016.
For municipal heating sources, energy efficiency of their heating sources units may not be required; Users (households) who choose air-conditioning and heating systems and equipment for themselves will not be evaluated under the Article; For Projects with regional cooling systems and whose energy stations are invested and operated by the third party, the energy efficiency of their cooling sources units may not be required;
If discrepancy overranges the limitation, resurvey should be conducted again. The outcome could be used after analysis and confirmation.
(b) the Seller has assigns the contract or subcontracts the project without the Buyer's written consent.
A Head and tempus bleeding: In front of the ear, align the upward side of mandibular joint and compress the superficial temporal artery.
It is the only transport mode in northern part of Pakistan where the Project is located.
See the attached "product identification and traceability workflow flow chart".
In the early stage of projects, organize involved parties to formulate and issue the guidance price for labor subcontracting.
Before the insert, it shall be put in the water soaking for 4h and then put into use when dried. During the insert, first the base shall be made wet by sprinkling water, and paint it with water and slurry combined, and then immediately pave a dry and hard cement mortar layer proportionated as 1:2 with a thickness of 10mm.
In this Project, the superstructure is a frame structure, and in order to ensure the appearance quality of concrete, the formwork of all the frame columns, beams and floor slabs are mainly made of film faced formwork of 15mm thick during the construction period.
Priority is given to electric braking force when braking is required. When the electric braking force cannot meet the braking force required by the entire train, it will be supplemented by pneumatic braking force to maintain the braking force required by the train.
The driver can adjust the output volume of cab loudspeaker on the cab touch screen.
1. Prepare the annual work plan and work summary of the Company and supervise corresponding implementation; organize the drafting of important systems, regulations and methods of the Company and inspect corresponding implementation.
(Liquid consumption described in 10,000 t/a, gas consumption described in 10,000 Nm3/a)
PCAL0510EL303, power supply is led from LV distribution cabinet AA0510EL304/E
Solve space contradiction possibly arising out of trains occupying sections or stations, and restrictions of train capacity when passengers are loaded.
9. The product engineer has the right to refuse to accept the prototypes which do not meet the requirements.
Path graph shall be formed by DSA image without fluoroscopy
2)The parameter setting is flexible and convenient. Voltage, current, frequency and other parameters can be adjusted according to process changes by the administrator or user.
6.4.1.7 Open the inlet and outlet valves for cooling water, and check the pressure of the cooling water and the water return status.
Winching machine shall be set along the line or transverse line as much as possible.
b) Vibration and impact test of RK900 automatic coupler.
(1) Identify and assess the risks of material misstatement in the financial statements, whether due to fraud or error, design and perform audit procedures in response to those risks, and obtain audit evidence forming a sufficient and appropriate basis for our opinion.
Strengthen the curing work after concrete pouring, and cover the concrete with wet burlap for curing.
Each user can initiate the call request, emergency call and group call, etc. to the corresponding dispatching console.
3. Accounts receivable with provision for bad debts provided by portfolio of credit risk features
"Preheat" the torque wrench three times at full measurement range, namely pre-load maximum torque three times before first usage.
Ramp in mine area: The two stopes share 1 ramp, which is mainly applied to the discontinuous mining of medium-thick ore body. The ramp in the mine area is connected with the level tunnel, used as the main passage for trackless drilling equipment, personnel and materials entering into the stope.
1.3 Natural Characteristic and Main Unfavorable Geological Problems Along the Line
Outdoor Brick Trench Type I, 1.2m?1.4m Reinforced Concrete Slab
Enforce all quality control systems and regulations. Validate the quality guarantees and implement quality precautions. Control and correct any quality failure.
7. In the figure, the groined steel bars at the drain pipe and the lifting hole are reinforced steel bars.
Thirdly, it contributes to promoting the economic development of Qinling –Bashan mountainous areas, the hinterlands of Qinling Mountains, and Sichuan-Shaanxi old revolutionary base areas, driving the steady poverty alleviation of 1.3056 million people in the poor areas in Qinling –Bashan mountainous areas, and indirectly driving the poverty alleviation in the 16 national-level poor counties in Shangluo and Ankang.
Disciplinary design content: water supply and drainage system.
1. Please turn off the power supply before equipment maintenance.
Continuously promote technical innovation and establish an integrated platform of industry, university and research;
(7) The outlet velocity of the drainage pipe system shall not be more than 1.8m/s. If it is beyond this limit, energy dissipation measures shall be taken.
Matara is a port city in the southwestern part of Sri Lanka, and is connected to Colombo by rail and road. It is an important producing area of citronella grass and a distributing center for southern agricultural products such as tea, rubber, rice, coconut and cinnamon. There are iron, sapphire, turquoise and other minerals nearby.
6. Building height: 4.500m (from outdoor ground to roof plate)
The reimbursement of any items that should be approved by the head office must be launched by the authorized person of the branch and approved by relevant department of the head office. The expense will be paid and entered into the account book after this business is checked by the expense center under appropriate operation flow of examination and approval.
(3) During the construction and defects liability period, the Contractor shall be responsible for the management and maintenance of greening work as well as the corrective and remedial measures for any defect.
2) Procedure documents shall be approved according to the Establishment of Procedures;
Implementing fire protection laws and regulations, guaranteeing the compliance of fire safety of the unit with regulations, controlling fire safety conditions of the unit, and being fully responsible for fire safety-related work.
1.2.2 The Standard is applicable to construction subcontracting of general contracting projects.
(Based on GB/T19001-2016|GB/T24001-2016|GB/T28001-2011)
④The steel stress is obtained from the stress - strain curve, that is, the design value of tensile strength of steel is: and the design value of the compressive strength of steel is :.
Start the air compressor to supply air to the hole bottom 20 minutes before casting the concrete. Suck out the mud settled on the hole bottom through the mud removal pipe by the method of airlift slurry replacement so as to meet the design requirement of bottom settling thickness. The bottom settling thickness of rock-socketed pile shall be less than 5cm.
Circular of the General Office under State Administration of Work Safety on Issuing the Administrative Specification for Labor Protection Articles of Employers
If any problem is found, immediately request rectification, issue rectification notice, and request that the rectification be completed within a time limit.
4)For outdoor escalator, the drive machine shall be able to adapt to all-weather operations, and the handrail speed in rainy and snowy days shall conform to the requirements of 4) of Article 2.3.5 in the document.
At the next stage, we will keep negotiating relevant issues with the Employer ERC. At present, the period of grace will not be used temporarily, and the claim of construction period of 5 months was proposed against the Employer due to issues such as land acquisition at earlier stages. Currently, the claim report requiring approval is under preparation and is to be submitted to the Employer.
The core layer is necessary for enterprises with more than three departments. In addition to the reduction of connection lines and routing Peer, it makes extension and daily strategy adjustment easy.
Recording all types of the vehicles which will be used during the transportation.
"With or without comparison method" is applied to the Project to determine benefits.
Based on the two test mentioned above, 3 groups of joints of static bending were welded in one time and sent to DNV for testing, but no one was proved satisfactory.
1. The drainage ditch in the drawing is applicable to the subgrade drainage of general sections. For any ditch that needs to be calculated on the basis of requirements on flow, a separate design shall be conducted.
For more than 20 years, King Facade has trained many curtain wall technicians and several well-known experts in the industry, and has made great contributions to the technical development of the industry.
1) All cables connecting vehicles and the signaling system on-board equipment (except for shield wire and specific and special cables) and vehicle-side connectors. The specifications and type of the cables and connectors are proposed by the signaling system tenderer, and the signaling system tenderer provides the signal-side connectors.
10.3.5 Safety Assurance Measures for Flood Control and Lightning Protection
First, in the second half of 2016, Urumqi began to take on a stricter security system. Villagers can easily find security jobs and increase their income. Secondly, consumption concepts change along with the changes in household income structure, employment structure, and consumption concept.
The resident surveyor should mark and file the site records used.
<1-4> Silty clay (Q4al+pl): brownish yellow, hard plastic, impure, mixed with a few plant roots on the surface and a little angular gravel and round gravel in layers, and with rock core being air-dried and naturally cracked.
1. The Project Department will formulate a training plan for laborers required in the PGESC and put the plan into the ESHS activity report on time every month.
2) When connecting, the insertion end shall be kept straight and inserted to the pipe mouth marking line at once.
│ │ │ │ │ 60522-62910 Results.hdm
The grouting should be carried out in the order from bottom to top. When there is glue overflow on upper grouting pipe, after 5 minutes of pressure stabilizing, the grouting pipe shall be sealed and the construction shall be switched to the upper layer.
At the same time, the improved transportation conditions will promote the development of mineral resources, tourism and other resources along the route, generating a certain amount of induced traffic.
The finishing process of sheet is to uncover protective tape. If it has been contaminated, rinse it with clean water. If it is not cleaned, please seek the producer for other solutions.
Wuhan Railway Siyuan Engineering Cost Consulting Co., Ltd.
6.2.5.8 The objects of responsibility investigation for protective reasons are the protective staff, the supervisor and relevant leaders;
Will products be supplied to Liugong via an intermediate trader or agent?
Frog structure: The user specification stipulates that welded high manganese steel frog or embedded assembled high manganese steel frog shall be used, to meet the requirements of CWR track. At the same time, the frog is pre-hardened by explosion for three times, thus satisfying the requirement of 320HB hardness of the frog surface specified by the technical specification.
In the warranty period, the seller shall carry out repair and maintenance training for the engineering technicians of the buyer and the end users.
5) Provisions clarifying that necessary tests must be performed on components to verify the relevant parameters in the technical specifications.
④ Measure and plot the hot melt depth at the pipe end with a caliper and a suitable pen, and the hot melt depth shall conform to the following Table 1.
Water, electricity and storehouses for materials etc. at the construction site can meet installation requirements and construction machines and tools are complete.
Composite waterproof coating layer for 1.5 thick polymer modified cement base
When welding reinforcement cages, the upper and lower sections of the reinforcement cage must be on the same vertical line, and the main steel bars shall be subject to single-sided lap welding.
6.2.6 JTMH-120 1195km
The Microcomputer Monitoring System shall be able to detect the operation status information of PEC.
(4) Starting point mileage, gradient and slope length of gradient section of the vertical section
Once the diesel engine is started, release the start key.
5.3 Measures to Address Key and Difficult Points in Construction
Anchor wall MDQ2, Work characteristics: MDQ2 anchor wall; Concrete Strength Grade: C40
Figure 7.9 Plane Layout of CRH1 EMU
The instructions of newly purchased instruments and instruments transferred to other projects shall read carefully in combination with the instruments, starting from the primary level to the advanced level, from the basic operation to the advanced operation. Operators of the instruments shall study and summarize the instructions repeatedly, and strive to operate the instruments with high proficiency and give full play to the functions of the instruments. Personnel who are not familiar with the operation of the instruments shall not operate them blindly.
(2) When the tower crane boom trolley crosses the adjacent crane boom (mainly in case that the adjacent tower crane is in the deactivated state and the unmanned state, and the boom swings with the wind) or crosses the dangerous area (in case of personnel under the hanging object and other dangerous areas), the trolley must be returned to a safe location and illegal operation is strictly prohibited.
When storing the rock cores in the box, number and sort out the rock cores according to the formation sequence, and fill in the rock core sample label and rock core box registration form.
No.15, Daotian Nanli, Changyang Town, Fangshan District, )
81,400m3 A and B filling materials are borrowed from hills on the right side of Line CK275 and CK300
The contents of evaluation report are as follows: the evaluation report page includes automatic evaluation score (A), teacher evaluation score (B) and functional buttons (C).
The data outlet port of charging device in vehicle field is the interface, (the data cable from charging device to substation in vehicle field shall be provided by the power supply system, the contractor shall be responsible for cable laying, cable head production, testing and connection, and the vehicle system is responsible for providing interface connection and whole-process technical support))
1. The auxiliary system shall realize centralized power supply with distribution transformation so as to achieve the other purposes except for traction.
In the initial operation period of the Rizhao-Qufu Section, the railway sector will arrange 14 pairs of daily EMUs, 3 pairs of weekend EMUs and 3 pairs of peak EMUs. The fastest running time between Rizhao and Qufu will be reduced from the current 3 hours and 13 minutes to 1 hour and 14 minutes.
Anything that is not covered here shall be implemented as per API 5L-2010C standards and the basic technical operation regulations of each unit; if it is otherwise required, it shall be implemented as per the released notification or operation points.
For the original of quality certificate to be used, it shall be classified and numbered in accordance with steel No., specification and variety, and shall be well kept and stored.
Project Name: BAFOUSSAM Stadium
The reclamation work shall be carried out properly, irrigation shall be ensured, and damaged water conservancy facilities shall be repaired to ensure normal operation.
Since the establishment of diplomatic ties between Bolivia and China in 1983, relations between the two countries has been developing steadily, cooperation in trade, economy and technology has been expanded continuously and personnel contacts have been more frequent day by day.
insulation barrier shall be layered when the thickness is more than 80mm. If a insulation insulation product is used, the thickness of each layer should be close; if different kinds of insulation products are used, the thickness of each material should be determined according to calculation.
The Contractor shall assume liabilities for his infringement of patent right or other intellectual rights of others in use of materials, construction equipment, engineering equipment, and construction technology; for infringement of rights arising from provision of materials, construction equipment, engineering equipment, and construction technology by the Employer, the liability shall be borne by the Employer.
The implementation instruction shall specify the implementation date of repaired parts and predict that of the new parts.
The amplifier shall be output continuously within maximum output power range of 25 W.
c. Sort out and summarize lists of system design documents, including training materials, driver operation manual, product instructions and maintenance manual; prepare the output program and catalogue of design documents; define the output time and specific requirements of design documents for each system.
The inlet pressure is 0.6MPa and the outlet pressure is 5.4MPa.
Bid Inviter: Yunnan Construction and Investment Holding Group Co., Ltd. (Laos)
The airside concourse trailer streamline design and function are inseparable; the operation sequence is firstly loading and then unloading; the trailer is driving in one direction and forming a loop.
The documents which needs to be completed by the project team shall be completed by the project team;
Please come to ____ (place) at ___ (time) on ___ (month) ___ (date) ___ (year) for trial lecture of ___ (course name).
Longitudinal X-direction running gear: The motors at both sides of the gantry shall be driven synchronously, and boast fast forward speed of greater than or equal to 15m/min, stepless adjustable operating speed, stable and reliable operation, and effective working stroke of about 60m;
The liquidated damages shall be 0.5% of the total contract price for each delay of 7 days, and the period less than 7 days shall be deemed as 7 days.
The test is completed integrated in other tests.
4 Domestic waste is piled at designated place in camp zone, which is cleared regularly; no random dumping; domestic waste water is discharged after treatment; toilets are kept clean and hygienic; 1 point
According to the Owner's requirements, the corresponding leader shall participate in various meetings organized by the Owner.
5.6.4 After the rectification of potential safety hazard or operation against rules is completed, the responsible department or person shall submit the Notice of Fire Safety Rectification to the Safety and Quality Inspection Department in time for verification and filing.
The representative of the company is the same person or different organizations with the shareholding and management relationship participate in the same bid section or the bid of the same bidding project is not divided into the bid sections;
Results of Chemical Phase Analysis for Manganese in Comprehensive Concentrates (%)
Where: Circuit I is 41.803km, the double-circuit is 41.803km and the single-circuit is 0km;
2. The Power Support Company immediately dispatches people to check the cause of water failure, repairs the water supply equipment, assesses the estimated recovery time, and notifies the Operation Control Center after determining the response level. If the water supply main pipe burst caused a large area of flooding, the Power Support Company launches the corresponding drainage plan.
400kN compressive load at 150mm over the floor of end wall; 300kN compressive load at belt height of end wall; 300kN compressive load at upper side beam of end wall; (respectively applied)
DMU consist of 2 motor cars and 12 trailers can be started up at the gradient of 22.7‰ and reaches to the maximum speed of 37km/h;
2) Remove the grounding connection plate (Item 1) from the bogie frame and motor.
IPC + display + printer: mainly used for test operation, parameter management, report printing, historical data query, hardware confirmation, user management and other operations.
4.1.6.1The supplier approved by the Deputy General Manager of Quality, shall be included into the "qualified supplier list" by the quality management department, and the "scope of supply" and supplier category are clarified; the qualified supplier list approved by the Deputy General Manager of Quality, is submitted to the Company leaders and is distributed to the relevant company functional departments.
1) Products shall be transported to the site in containers originally packed by the manufacturer. Name and address of the manufacturer, product name or code, types and colors of paints, detailed instructions for use, and warnings of toxic/hazardous components shall be indicated on labels and data sheets.
Apply the stress and strain in the transfer function, and the final fatigue life results of pavement in Table 4-22 is obtained.
The design review will be ensured to meet requirements of design output and input through the following methods of design control;
d) Timely track and understand the results of national and provincial supervision and spot checks, and report and communicate them to the organization.
These existing pipeline models will be provided by the bidder to S.O.. in free of charge.
a The chassis is made of high quality cold-rolled steel plate, and the translucent cover is made of PMM material with high transmittance.
Specific person shall be assigned for guard for elevator and regular cleaning and maintenance.
Material Copper alloy
The system design shall be refined by the system integrator as per the actual conditions and requirements of the Project.
During grouting and after grouting in 3d, the temperature of beam body and environment cannot be lower than 5℃.
Review whether they are comply with national technical-economic policies and relevant laws and regulations;
The alkali cellulose provided in the aging section reacts with carbon disulfide from carbon disulfide tank area in the xanthating machine to generate sodium cellulose xanthate. Sodium cellulose xanthate can be dissolved in the dilute alkali liquor to prepare viscose.
9.5.3.11 Installation of fastener to recover line
All the modified indicators with the approval of the Engineer will be applied.
During drilling, the drill tool shall not be lifted at random to avoid breaking the core and jamming the clamp spring.
The grid of SierraMin exploration project are mainly 100X100m, an increased density of 50X50m at some part and a maximum density of 25X25m.
As this data structure is beyond the scope of this Standard, it is defined as NULL.
5. Rapidly eliminate defects to recover operation of the generator set;
In the "unit level" information zone of thefunctional interface for long-term index calculation and assessment, click the button of "steady operation index" to switch to the interface of "long-term steady operation analysis results at unit level", as shown in the figure below.
The allowable deviation and inspection method for pavement of ceramic tile wall surface shall be in accordance with those specified in Table 6.11.2-1.
It is allowed to adopt product certification certificates and marks for certified products, packages, instructions, certificate of qualification, and advertising.
Based on the analysis of stereographic projection, this slope has no bedding.
The parts of the bogie can be used universally and interchanged.
No. A3 16 channel steel is adopted for cantilever outrigger;
In the municipal road facilities project of the Project, the connected green belt is set on pavements at both sides of all roads, in which arbors and shrubs are planted.
* * * * Commodities imported according to the target purpose in order to satisfy the needs of the sports training team of the Russian Federation after being confirmed by the Ministry of Sports of the Russian Federation.
Yihua Graphic Design Studio, Hongshan District, Wuhan City
2 During switch transition, the indoor control intention and the indicated status should be consistent with the actual outdoor direction.
3) Deal with engineering changes and price adjustments as stipulated in the Contract, assist the owner to modify and supplement the bill of quantities accordingly, and reasonably calculate and determine the new contract price or price adjustment range for payment.
3. Valid duplicate of safety certificate of external construction team.
Concrete vibration is mainly attached vibration, supplemented by immersion vibration.
Inspection method: Observation and inspection; inspecting with leveling instrument.
The tread-plate assembly shall be fixed on the carbody according to the position on the drawings. The bolt must be coated with loctite243, and the torque must comply with the requirements of the maintenance manual.
Environmental Testing for Electric and Electronic Products- Part 2: Test Method -Test Cab: Damp Heat, Steady State
The whole line is set with new backbone transmission network + access network system.
The Contractor shall ensure that gaseous emission, surface drainage and pollution discharge, etc. due to his activities don't exceed the values required by the Employer, and also don't exceed the values specified in the applicable laws.
Inspection quantity: The contractor shall inspect the salt content uniformity for one group after every 1000 m3 fillers filled; the supervision company shall carry out parallel inspection of the salt content uniformity for one group after every 10,000 m3 fillers filled, and at least one group shall be inspected for each divisional works.
During the segmental installation, active cross brace shall be installed on segment No. 4 and 9 to ensure no deformation during the process.
Employer: Beijing Engineering Test Co., Ltd. under China Railway Fifth Survey and Design Institute Group Co., Ltd.
The equipment room shall be completed in advance to meet the equipment installation requirements of communication, signal, power and electrification rooms.
Combined with the development direction of the world railway freight transportation and the operation economy, and based on the function orientation of the line focusing on freight transport while undertaking a small portion of passenger transport, the axle load is increased to 20t in this study.
The cross level refers to the height difference between the surfaces of left and right tracks (on the same cross section) against the horizontal plane, excluding the superelevation and run-off elevation set for the curve as prescribed.
1) Daily inspection, weekly check, annual inspection and other overhauling technical schedule files;
With the support of the Government of Cameroon, through the continuous introduction of new handling equipment and modernization of existing equipment, Douala port effectively improved the handling capacity of containers.
The land within 2m from horizontal projection periphery of the bridge superstructure shall be the scope of land use.
Two green lights — allowing the train to depart from the station and forward to secondary line (see Figure 18);
Detailed design is from September 2018 to March 2019.
Talbe for Rolling Procedure of Stainless Steel Round Bar
1. Relevant road network and the location and role of the proposed project in the road network;
There is a catchment gully, which is about 2~3m wide and 1.4m deep at D1bK17+772.Usually the water flow is great with water flowing fro 6 right to the left. It is recommended that a skew flood discharge culvert be set. Vegetation is developed in the vicinity.
Optimize the construction plan and adopt advanced construction technology to improve construction efficiency.
2 The allowable deviation of static geometric dimension of jointed track after ballast regulating shall comply with provisions in Table 7.4.4-1.
The Investment Management Department conducts research and analysis, and issues the planning notice according to actual needs.
The second design liaison meeting shall be held on time according to the overall plan.
6.1.3 Appearance inspection and ultrasonic detecting.
In recent years, China Railway Harbin Administration Group Co., Ltd. has positively served One Belt and Road Initiative and built the international transport corridor for connectivity with Harbin International Container Center Station as the center, Manzhouli and Suifenhe railway ports as the support points, and China Railway Express as the carrier.
(2012) BJDJQJ Z Doc. #S019, Laboratory for Structural Strength Testing, Beijing Jiaotong University
When the connection to the address of main server set up is unsuccessful, the connection to the server in reserve as system database server is tried.
(16) Code for Anticorrosion Design of Industrial Constructions (GB50046-2008)
6.3 Standardization Requirements on Materials and Components
At an interval of 5m along the longitudinal direction of monolithic track bed, a transverse reinforcement is used to weld to all longitudinal reinforcement in the collection network.
Construction site planning and preliminary scheme for selection of construction machinery and equipment
For management, we will focus on coordinating the following cooperation:
The re-rolling is vibratory rolling using a double-drum vibratory roller for one time with high frequency and low vibration. Then use pneumatic tyred roller of more than 25t to roll the pavement for one time and use double-drum vibratory roller to roll the pavement for two times. The rolling can be stopped when the pavement becomes stable and there is no obvious wheel traces. The compaction degree shall be tested after each of vibratory rolling, with the rolling speed of 2 ~ 3 km/h.
Subtotal of embedded parts of each steel structure (side with inspection ladder)
A total of two main substations are set up, of which the administrative center main substation is set up at the northern end (already completed and put into operation) to be shared with Line 2. At the southern end, a new main substation is built near Li Jiacun Station to be shared with Line 5.
The sheet of topographic map shall be in the relevant specified form.
Rated air amount: 75611Nm3/h
Formulate and implement project quality management measures, strengthen on-site quality monitoring during construction, and pay more attention to material arrival, re-testing, and acceptance, and try to avoid the suspension of work caused by late-arriving or unsatisfactory materials.
Note: 1. Waterproofing works shall be carried out in strict accordance with Technical Regulations for Building Waterproofing Works (DBJ15-19-2006) and Technical Regulations for Building Exterior Wall Waterproofing Works (JGJ/T235-2011).
The principles for information management of the Company are: to be authentic, complete, timely, effective, well-ordered, and scientifically coded.
Start and Running of the Fan: The fan and the system can be run continuously after normal test run inspection, and the duration of running shall not be less than two hours.
Underground stations are designed for Amman Rail Transit Line 3.
The international renowned brand shall be selected for bearings.
(5) The supervision Engineer and the owner can use these measuring equipment during the project implementation.
Appearance inspection includes the inspection of equipment model, element numbers in the box, location, brand, electrical clearance of equipment, creepage distance, etc..
7.11.6 Field Monitoring and Measurement Scheme
Many steel structure embedded ironware and equipment embedded parts shall be pre-embedded in the construction process. Axis location and elevation of embedded ironware play an important role in installation quality of steel structure in the future.
The distance between BTM parts and areas with strong electromagnetic interference (air condition, transformer, traction motor and its cable, etc) shall not be less than 1m;
(4) Reduce the transportation time of concrete as much as possible, and choose to pour the concrete in low-temperature time or nighttime.
The management team office is located in the 19# building of the depot (total area is 85m2 and the total seating capacity is 15 person)
(2) Based on the variation of houses and yards, the quantity of interior and exterior lighting works shall be adjusted accordingly.
PDCA cycle - 7th S: saving; the cost will be controlled from water, electricity, gas, auxiliary materials and various materials, etc., to play a bigger role, create a high efficiency and make the best use of the workplace.
Be responsible for crisis management and external complaint disposal.
October 08, 2018: capping of high-rise frame in Phase 2.
T35-11NO4 steel axial flow fan
Agree with review comments. Add relevant contents as per the review comments.
Accept the technical guidance and interface supervision from the network ACS contractor.
Earthwork Section 2-s1-2-s1
9.3.2The battery charger shall be capable of charging a discharged battery to 80% full charge within 4 hours.
A user can enjoy Jwell provided services after becoming a Jwell member of its own accord.
3. Details regarding the selection of tunnel lining types and auxiliary construction measures are available in the "Support Design and Auxiliary Construction Measures of BENTONG TUNNEL 1" and the "Design Drawing for Profile of Tunnel Barrel of BENTONG TUNNEL 1".
Hu Haitao, He Zhengyou, Wang Jiangfeng, Gao Shibin, Qian Qingquan. Power Flow Calculation for High-speed Railway Traction Networks Based on Locomotive-Traction Network Coupling [J].Proceedings of the CSEE, 2012，32(19): 101-108.
A Coastal Supporting Trading Center is set up at the coastal area facing the west dike of Karachi port on the east side of the artificial island 1, and can provide trade, expo and exhibition services relying on port conditions.
Carry out maintenance for the bridge deck vertical cracking, and damage and reveal of reinforcement, restrain block cracking, wing wall diagonal cracking and other defects;
Refer to corresponding drawings for embedded transition slab anchorage, anchorage layout and specification.
XD / XKYX-QZB-0608 Procurement Contract Management
3.4 According to the Design Contract, all transformers arranged for the Project are of dry type.
6.6Potential risks of the equipment system shall be identified and evaluated each year to work out effective measures and prevent quality accidents.
Doors and windows shall not directly contact the ground but shall be placed with skids vertically while the vertical placement angle shall not be less than 700mm and anti-dumping measures shall be taken.
Inspection method: check production license, product qualification certificate and performance test report.
1. The new 2400MW dam is in development
The benefits mainly lie in obviously shortening the time and space distances between the north and south regions, and greatly improving the transport capacity of the channel, so as to effectively promote the flow of people, logistics, capital and information flow between the relevant regions and promote the economic development of the whole region.
Information on the travel time between the current station and each subsequent station on the route;
The focus of bridge settlement observation is the control of bored pile settlement and the control of open-cut foundation settlement, especially the prediction of possible settlement after construction.
The company is faced with different situations in different time periods.
The system can realize simultaneous commissioning or monitoring of different pieces of on-board equipment by several users who are connected to the train network at the same time.
(9) For the solid-web type ribbed arch bridge at K409+572.891, the upstream sides of the 0# and 1# abutments have damages; the side walls on the upstream side have 3 cracks (cracking along masonry joints due to the filling material of the arch and local subsidence behind the abutment); on the downstream side of the 0# abutment, the foundation is scoured and hollowed out locally.
After inspected and approved by the Engineer, go to the next working procedure for construction, if not qualified in the inspection, the construction team and group shall rework or repair immediately, and re-inspect until qualified.
1. Place O-ring φ35X3.1, roller thrust bearing (large), O-ring φ35X3.1 and taper washer into left shaft of slide bushing in sequence. Install retainer ring 30 into outer spring caliper.
 Fitting surfaces of all parts shall be cleaned;
Unqualified items shall be handled in a timely manner in strict accordance with the requirements of Internal Quality Review Procedure, Control Procedure for Unqualified Products and Procedures for Corrective and Preventive Measures, and shall be recorded in a timely manner in accordance with Quality Record Control Procedure.
During the test, the existing rubber joints were used for the axle box joints.
3. The discharge counter shall be well sealed and reliable in operation, and shall be connected according to the technical specifications of the product.
9. Non-expansive soil shall be used as fillers for backfilling below the indoor terrace in the project and then compacted by layer. The compacting factor shall be not smaller than 0.94.
The emission of cooking fume in the depot should reach the required emission standard.
Segmented T-girder is adopted for the main girder. Two girders forms an opening, and the center distance between webs of two girders is 2.0. They are connected at the diaphragm horizontally by prestress applied.
1) Land compensation fee standard: RMB 17,000/mu for Zitong and RMB 16,500/mu for Tianjia Town.
Rust Grades and Preparation Grades of Steel Surfaces before Application of Paints and Related Products
5.4.3 The product that has to be inspected or tested shall be sampled by the tester with the support of the receiver. The samples shall be sent to the test station under the Project Department, or the test agency designated by the Supervisor, for inspection and test according to national or industrial technical standards in force.
Vehicle Fireproof Engineering Plan, General Requirements for Vehicle Fireproofing
Layout Plan for Foundation Top \U+20144.850 Column
- Structural damage/displacement of existing structures
The fit between main journal and rolling bearing is H7/k6 and the fit between rolling bearing and bearing seat is J7/h6.
Connect plugs in place as per requirements of drawings. During installation, the plugs shall be aligned to sockets and then be tightened;
Whether automatic valve can be isolated/separated for maintenance?
Reconnect cables at Points 1~4 of =31-A201-X102-CPU-X5.
Drill 2 wells on site, and each well for concrete mixing plant, precast yard, stabilized soil mixing plant, asphalt concrete mixing plant respectively for pumping production and domestic water.
The electric braking torque is less than 25% than that of the demand and over 7s and PPC diplays that sliding takes place.
The pre-buried pieces and reserved holes shall be installed in cooperation with other trades, and their positions and elevation shall meet the design requirements, and the reinforcing ribs in the holes shall be complete in quantity and precise in position.
This selection of routes must be looked at in the context of the stations evaluation.
We will strengthen safety measures in accordance with the relevant regulations of the local government of Kenya to ensure the absolute safety of the special materials such as oil and fire materials and other inflammable and explosive materials.
4.3 Progress, quality and safety management of subcontracted works
a) Direct the preparation of the quality, environmental, occupational health and safety policies and objectives, and organize its implementation;
3.4 After the negotiation is completed, all materials related to the negotiation must be returned for preservation or processing.
Busy Transport for Work and Production Resumption - Railway Photographers in Action
The proportional specimen with d0=10mm and L0=5d0 shall be adopted as tensile specimen.
② Immediately close and cut off the power transmission and water supply system (except for emergency lighting system) and various open fire to prevent the occurrence of other disasters after earthquake.
It is necessary to reserve electrical connection between internal tubular element and the rest structure to eliminate the corrosion to vertical elements of front extension, outrigger protection.
Design Leader of Traction Substation Discipline, responsible for the design of traction substation discipline and a on-site coordination.
Comprehensive consideration shall be implemented with the sliding control of the electric braking to ensure quick adhesion recovery of vehicle.
[3] The company of General Manager Yu (Yu Jianhua) shall be in charge of coordination and construction work on the construction site, and the dispatched personnel on the site shall be paid as per "450 USD / person day".
(3) When the inside of the drum is checked and cleaned, the power supply shall be cut off first. A warning sign " No Switching-on" shall be hung if someone is working. The operation must be carried out with a specially signed person for monitoring.
7.5.8.8.2 Special Safety Procedures for Night-time Construction
Therefore, the connection holes of purline supports are set in the form of waist-shaped holes for easy adjustment.
Operators are prohibited to throw materials without permission during roofing operation.
Always excavate, transport and fill the embankment during the rainly season. Each layer should be built into a vertical and horizontal slope of 2-4%. The side slope should be trimmed in time and construct temporary discharge chutes according to a certain distance.
Install the beam bottom form and beam supporting head according to the formwork drawing.
They include six types of information modules, cables, wiring frames, adapters, connectors, etc.
All the above welding materials (including flux) shall be equipped with factory certificate, and the CO2 gas cylinder shall be drained before using the CO2 gas.
Beijing Libeiya Architectural Decoration Engineering Co., Ltd. (Seal)
Third-party consultation fee and technical exchange and training fee
2 The slope roofs shall be provided with the attic floors for ventilation as well as the openable sashes or funnel caps;
Daily bad behavior shall be subject to monthly "reporting zero" system.
5. Technical Specification for Steel Structure of Lightweight Building with Gabled Frame (CECS 102:2002);
(3) The HVAC unit filter adopts the plug-in construction, is easy to clean and can be repeatedly used.
(5) Depot works: the construction period is 15 months, from April 1, 2019 to June 30, 2020;
Power supply: three-phase voltage AC400V(-10%, +6%), single-phase voltage AC230V(-10%, +6%), frequency (50 1) Hz;
When the Employer requires to suspend the construction for the Project.
★representing NHJYV 0.6/1kV
Through this overhaul, the performance of all parts of bogies will be restored, to ensure operation safety and stability of the train and normal parameters and functions of bogies in the next train overhaul cycle (6 years or 600,000 km) with the premise of normal use and maintenance.
Inspection quantity: temperature measurement at representative structure or part carefully selected.
Guidelines on Cooperation Between the Government and Social Capital in Accelerating the Construction of Urban Public Parking Lots
As for the strength calculation of air cooler tube bundle of Ningxia Petrochemical Project, only general strength is calculated and there is no detailed strength calculation to support equipment design.
2) All the traction substations are designed based on the unattended mode but with person on duty.
(5) Timely issue heatstroke prevention first-aid medicine and labor protection equipment, timely supply tea, cool salty beverage, green bean soup, etc.
Route a conductor by a certain length to the operating platform through the nylon rope and the thread guide with net sleeve, preset and check the performance of the tension sensor, and install the wire clamp at the anchor lifting end.
The assembling and dismantling of steel formwork shall be carried out by cranes. During the operation, it shall be handled with care to ensure that the formwork will not be damaged or deformed during assembling and dismantling.
In case of repetitive quality problems of the product, the product is repaired after review organized by the Company
Fig. 6.4.2-5-4Contour Plot of Von Mises Stress on Side Wall under Overload Tension Case
Refer to "Drawing ML1-PD-RP-TU-SAN1017 ~ 1035" and "Drawing ML1-PD-RP-TU-ATT2018 ~ 2047" for the lining structure design.
A mechanical repairing structure for hollowing of external wall insulation mortar (patent No.: ZL 2013 2 0133840.6)
3) Check the historical alarm query function, check and see the historical communication record of collection equipment.
a. Responsible for preparing the Procedure, supervising and inspecting the implementation of the Procedure;
c) Check whether the vibration rod of the electromagnetic hammer works flexibly and the lifting height is proper.
Mechanical excavation shall be employed. If the spoils are not enough, convey the soil to the designated place of Party A by automobile. The soil shall be placed around the foundation pit after excavation. Soil shall not be piled within the area of 2.0m away from the pit edge, which shall be used as a path for construction.
11. The requirements on electrical equipment for tunnel with gas are revised, and the explosion protection requirements on electrical equipment and machinery for different types of work areas with gas are specified.
The central master clock transmits the time signal to the station secondary master clock through the 10M Ethernet channel transited via the transmission system.
1.1 Traditional method: the traditional construction sequence of rigid pile caps, such as composite foundation screw piles, CFG piles, pipe piles, etc. , is: after the pile body construction is completed, earth excavation is made and the pile heads cut off, and the pile caps are constructed after non-destructive testing of the pile foundation, and finally the backfilling is completed between the piles which is used as a cushion.
Please apply the high-quality coating and make it compatible with metal surface to be coated.
No ultrahigh road section carriageway, marginal strip and hard shoulder, and earth shoulder transverse slope account for 2%.
d. The poured concrete foundation shall be cured. In addition, it shall be backfilled and tamped around the foundation.
CNODC Headquarters and all subsidiary companies must audit the implementation of the Procedure as an important part of HSSE audit, to ensure that the requirements of the Procedure are implemented.
Monitoring, Measurement, Analysis and Evaluation…………………………………70
Staffing is related to the normal annual production capacity of the project and 100 persons are proposed for this project.
The wiring pipes shall meet the regulations of the design document. The surface shall be free from perforations, cracks and obvious sags and crests, and the inner wall shall be smooth without corrosion.
Thus, preliminary work shall be regarded as priority among priorities, the preliminary work of No.3 urban railway in Amman must be completed at the end of December 2017.
Most engineering geological properties of mud are determined by its composition and structure.
194 low-income households with 760 people are affected by this Project, accounting for 21.28% of the total population (825 households with 3571 people) affected by land acquisition and resettlement.
b. Pre-assemble the pipe ferrule after sawing the pipes.
12047.12m2 of brick concrete, 80m2 of brick and tile
When installing the shaft frame with a cage, the cage shall be placed in the specified shaft in advance.
Loose pebbles and soft concrete layers, waste, and thin cement film shall be cleared before pouring, one day before which water shall be used for flushing to wet the concrete enough.
It is the occurred cost up to now with predicted cost from now on to completion.
11) Supervise health, safety and environmental risk identification and hidden rectification of project department;
(4) The panel and cabinet shall be fixed by pressing plate or spot welding. Each panel shall not be provided with less than 4 fixing bolts and bolts shall be welded firmly.
According to the inspection report, there are many cracks; and there are voids, pits, efflorescences and aggregate exposure on the concrete surface of side walls and top slab of culvert
Conduct automatic interlocking test for dry running gas seal of compressor shaft;
2.3.1 Profile of Yangzhou Steel Structure Company
The list of equipment for 4-car train of the Project is as follows:
Drying time before the next step and before the gap between the bonded glass and the window frame is activated (not less than 10min)
Receive production orders from customer service and organize review; prepare, issue and review component purchasing plans.
All automatic fire alarm lines as well as power supply lines and control lines lower than 50 V in plans shall thread through SC galvanized steel pipes and be laid in slabs or walls in a concealed manner.
The acting force between vehicles is big, and the longitudinal impulse is big during traction and braking.
2.2.2.6 Installation of Hoistway Mechanical Equipment
(3) The locking and unlocking indication signal light for container-specific lifting tools shall work well.
Foundation trench excavation: a dedicated person shall be assigned to command the machinery to excavate the foundation trench. After the foundation pit is cleaned and leveled, timely report for inspection and acceptance.
The laying layers, laying direction, connecting method and inspection of geo-synthetics shall comply with Article 4.2.4 of this Standard.
In the event of sewage disposal, the connector of the collection vehicle shall be connected with the quick connector of the sewage tank, and the water source shall be connected to the quick connector on the flushing pipe, and then the ball valve on the drain pipe shall be opened for the draining.
Cable WDZBN-YJY-3x35+1x16
The small amount of concrete required in the early stage can be purchased locally or supplied from a mixing station that has been completed and put into operation.
On-site personnel may not defecate everywhere, and will be punished heavily and expelled out of site in case of such conduct; in case the wrecker cannot be found out, the group in the construction area shall be fined by 5% wage of the month.
The supply ability of construction materials, including cement, gravel, sand and steel, the grade of part of the cement used for the project is not less than 525#. Provide data regarding the geographical location distribution of the major production places of such materials, material quality and yield; provide the material transportation methods and prices;
1. Description: low voltage cabinet 1ZB1-P03
4) Safety operation regulations and labor disciplines shall be followed strictly during operation.
Package C2 of Follow-up Civil, Pavement and Greening Works of Hunan Yueyang-Wangcheng Expressway Project
A monitoring point is placed on the welding path to monitor the variation of temperature during the whole welding process.
1. Sewage and waste water discharge: for indoor drainage of this project, sewage and waste combination method shall be adopted.
Major Incident (Accident) Management Method of China National Petroleum Corporation
Special attention shall be paid to the treatment for construction joint and settlement joint during concrete placing.
The varieties, specifications, models and quantities of materials and equipment supplied by the Owner and contractor shall be based on the design standards. The quality grade must meet the design and specification requirements. The supply sequence and time shall meet the needs of the project schedule.
The bottom of the steel shall be padded rather than being directly put on the ground, to prevent from moisture or contamination.
The price of the goods shall be quoted CIF named port of destination, or CIP named place of destination in PRC, as specified in the Bid Data Sheet.
2. The symbol" " in the drawing represents HRB400 reinforcement, and "!" represents HPB300 reinforcement.
The specification and amount of tack coat shall conform to requirements in Table 9.2.3 of the Technical Specifications for Construction of Highway Asphalt Pavement (JTG F40-2004). The base course base asphalt grade shall be the same with that of the main layer asphalt mixtures.
<2-4> Silty clay: dark gray, hard plastic, impure, intercalated with small amount of gravel sand and fine round gravels in the surface layer.
The cost of China HSR is only 2/3 - 1/2 of that in foreign countries.
The coefficient of loose laying is generally limited to 1.2. Considering that shoulder materials move out easily, the thickness of loose laying is limited to 19cm at the shoulder, 18cm in the carriageway and 17cm in the center, so that proper road crown can be formed.
Harm: It destroys matrix continuity and lowers ductility, plasticity, weldability and wear resistance, and is the main cause of rail fatigue.
Ensure that the sidewalk face bricks are linearly straight and the surface is flat and compact.
collect data needed to develop the project, covering the following subjects:
Figure 1 Relationship between catenary voltage and the power at wheel rim under traction condition
Outer walls of water pipes and the insulation thickness of water pipes and air ducts in the HVAC system shall be taken into consideration.
Article 38 If Party A cancels or terminates this Labor Contract, the standard and method for payment of economic compensation and liquidated damages shall be in accordance with applicable national or local regulations and this Contract.
All the distribution boxes and switch boxes shall be complete in appearance, firm and rainproof; the box is coated with the safety color code and is numbered in a unified manner, and there is no debris in the box. When stopping using the boxes, the power shall be cut off and the box door shall be locked.
2) Rebars will be fabricated by machine and bound manually in accordance with the following regulations.
Technical specification and operation and maintenance instruction of the solar panel
Technical Code for Regulation of CATV SystemGB50200-94
1. Otherwise indicated in the drawing, the center line or side line of the column shall coincide with the corresponding axis.
See the gap in ranking through comparison with surrounding cities
The type of couplers to be mounted on Type A, B, C and D cars is as follows:
In high temperature, the waterproof layer should be protected against exposure with sun cloth or other objects.
Record the illuminance of the driver's console (T1) when only the reading lamp in the cab is turned on;
Time of visit: 09:30, October 17, 2018
11.0.1 The fire ratings of buildings (structures) of underground stations shall comply with the following provisions:
Inspection Pits of Comprehensive Maintenance Workshop and Rail Carport at Dire Dawaz Station
—— Do not operate the equipment if any safety device is not installed at the correct position.
During construction, all types of work shall cooperate with each other.
The section provides extremely severe conditions for vehicle driving.
The meaning of the translation shall be correct, and the translations shall be coherent and fluent with concise and clear expressions and normative, accurate and professional words;
d) The power distribution room, switchgear and distribution box shall be locked, the warning signs shall be set, and the fire-fighting equipment (such as dry powder fire extinguishing equipment) shall be properly prepared. For the construction electricity, the electricity application form shall be filled out.
The food delivery refers to the process in which catering service staff deliver the finished food from the preparation place to the food serving location or other designated sites by means of appropriate packaging and transportation facilities based on the premise that food hygiene and suitable temperature are ensured.
Being responsible for preparing purchasing plan, and performing control of itemized investment control indicators of Purchasing Department in accordance with plan.
Organize and formulate a safety technology guarantee system, carry out safety technology research, and promote advanced work safety technology.
The inspection center is responsible for the application and preparation for new items/standard change items.
The side slope of the gravelly soil layer on top of the quarry is set within 1:0.75~1:1.5, the intense weathering side slope is set within 1:0.5, and the side slope below the slightly-weathering part is set within 1:0.3~1:0.5. One 2.0 m~3.0 m step is set every 15 m (as per the drawing where the berm elevation is specified).
(1) Familiar with basic principles above all. Knowing clearly that each test item is completed by which components, and that the roles of each components in each stage, to analyze and determine the faults and troubleshooting.
Check the installation and locking of the cabinet door and protect the external interface. Positions with sealing elements shall not be covered.
(1) Small box girder with lp=30m (each hole has 2 center sills with the width of 2.4m and 2 boundary beams with the width of 2.4m) shall be used for the beam body. The structure and reinforcement shall accord to Beam Body Design of Highway Bridge (NCTQC 14). Boundary beam shall be of G type steel tendon of box girder. Center sill shall be of H type steel tendon of box girder.
In construction, drainage facilities such as catchwater shall be complete before rainy seasons, according to the slope ratio controlled by side pile, and attention shall be especially paid on those road sections with deep cutting and high slope.
Abutment body in the elevation scope of side wall shall be molded by pouring for once.
Configure the ticketing servers for ticketing internet network connection.
2.2 Personnel who need to enter the exhibition hall to carry out various activities.
Establish sorting and coding system and file boxes for data
It is planned to purchase the finished product of the DN1500 reinforced concrete circular culvert from the concrete product plant in Ulaanbaatar, and transport it to the construction site for erection into shape.
(4) The mixing time of asphalt mixtures per kettle shall be 45s-60s (the dry mixing time shall not be less than 10s). All the mineral aggregates must cover the asphalt, and the mixtures shall be uniform without uneven mixing, clustering or coarse aggregate-fine aggregate separation.
According to the available data of the current power supply system, the harmonic current and harmonic voltage content injected into the system at the point PCC is far smaller than the international requirements under various operation methods of the further peak hours of the power supply system.
Cant indication error : ±1.3 mm
Beijing XIYIXI Engineering Technology Consulting Co., Ltd.
2.5.9.1 Lower the power increase to 0 via the touch screen and this operation is unnecessary if it's already 0.
Specification for Compilation of Reservoir Dispatching Data of Hydropower Plants of China Southern Power Grid
Construction of cushion course. In general, gravel is used for cushion course, and the gravel should be paved evenly and compacted manually.
7. Advanced Product Quality Planning Schedule
"Energy Saving Law of the People's Republic of China" (Revision on July, 2016);
1. To further verify power load and determine the reasonable transformer capacity, and capacity of the transformers dedicated to communication and signal of the station should be determined based on the load.
The hollow depth shall not exceed 1.5mm and the maximum size of the hollow shall not be more than 5% of the pipe perimeter and not be more than 40mm. The valve rod at the position of valve packing seal has no correction with flexible switch and correction indication.
During construction, we will maintain main positions of reference setting-out points at each construction site and check periodically (3 months) according to the indicators of surveying control, to ensure the accuracy of construction in the next stage.
① When drilling starts, the cement mortar shall be poured into the holes. In case there is water in the holes, clays shall be directly put into the holes and an impact drill shall be used with the minimum stroke for repeatedly impacting to produce the mortar.
According to the interview conducted by the monitoring group with the acquisition office in each district as well as the documentary materials, resettlement policies of Urumqi Rail Transit Line 1 have never changed since the launching of the Project and the Project is still implemented according to the relevant policies set forth in the Resettlement Action Plan.
Check and supervise the stations to organize the passenger boarding and alighting as well as luggage loading and unloading safely and quickly, to ensure the punctual departure of passenger trains.
c. D300 reinforced concrete branch pipe of gutter inlet should be installed in a parallel and level manner with inner wall and pipe orifice should be filled with mortar.
The communication system mainly includes communication center, communication station, all the transmission cables, telephone services, communication pipelines, etc.
Each electrolytic bath has 20 movable bassinet stands. During production of electrolytic aluminum, stress state of an electrolytic bath is quite complicated due to electromagnetic field and high temperature of electrolytic aluminum. To control deformation of electrolytic bath shell, it is designed that the bottom of electrolytic bath shell shall be densely arranged with welded steel plates around to form an integral structure. Therefore, the bottom beam and steel plates around are the parts bearing strong stress, which means corner welding quality is very important. During construction, high attention shall be paid to the corner welding quality.
Steel and other main materials will be imported, so the track-laying base may be set at Djibouti Port, and laying may be conducted towards Ethiopia.
4.2.3 Interface with the Substation Installation Bid Section
Field equipment management scope covers all equipment and materials within the contract scope.
g. Water environment pollution control and prevention shall be strengthened. Oil-water separation pool shall be set together with diversion ditch in the subgrade drainage.
Contractor: Zhejiang Communications Construction Group Co., Ltd.
Before the demolishing and reconstructing bridges and culverts, the affected buried communication optical cables shall be verified and excavated. In sections affected by such construction, communication lines shall be erected on temporary poles and they shall be placed inside the troughs on bridge after the completion of bridges and culverts.
The direction of natural water flow interlaces at 45 degrees to the line. As the groove features poor geological conditions, the side wall will easily fall or be silted up, the soil quality is poor and water will easily flow downward to the bottom. The dimension of the ditch section is large, and its discharge capacity is far less than the design flow for the culvert. The upstream and downstream flows of the culvert at design frequency are mainly in the state of non-centralized flow.
EPC Contractor shall participate in the inspection to determine whether the trial operation meets conditions based on Condition Confirmation Form.
Hand over the technology for the construction personnel. Pay attention to the technical measures, quality requirements and finished product protection.
Beijing Rail Transit Line 5 was put into trial operation in October 2007. It adopted 6-car-marshalling trains. The same transport pressure occurred like that of Guangzhou Rail Transit Line 3 due to passenger flow surge.
All track gauge inspection places and descriptions of fixed speed-up turnout No. 12
(1) Number each design unit according to the project. The workload of drawing design of each design unit and necessary auxiliary workload are determined by the relevant professional design team.
System component fault alarm (icon form);
The indication of the existence of locomotive to others is mainly realized by marker light, MTD and TCMS.
f) According to the results of the investigation, it is necessary to evaluate the subcontractors, determine qualified cooperators (during pre-qualification), revise the list of qualified cooperators (when necessary), and keep records of performance, qualification and capability evaluation of qualified cooperators.
The operating rooms and the ICU equipment are provided with local equipotential systems.
The communication system of urban railway shall be designed to have the function of changing into communication for fire alarm in case of fire.
- Value of the ambient temperature, in degrees celsius (°C). The value range of is 0°C ~ 45°C, and when the temperature is below zero, .
3. Ensuring the service life of not less than 500,000 kilometers.
The freight is 7.3 USD/WMT from Zambales to Lianyungang, and 7.6 USD/WMT to Tianjin Port.
Issue on Request to Clarify, Demonstrate and Explain the Successful Bidder of Sulfur Transport
Analysis and investigation in advance should be adopted for contract management. The contract execution and problems during the construction should be frequently tracked; the contractor's actions not conforming to the contract should be corrected in a timely manner; prompt should be sent to the Employer and the contractor in advance to avoid occurrence of deviations from the contract.
In this project, imidacloprid 30.5% SC with 0.075% is to be used for termite prevention and control. It is a pyrethroid pesticide which is an ideal pesticide of high efficiency, low toxicity and long-term safety and is harmless to human and livestock.
\pt33;Collapse body, falling towards 95° at a scale of 20*8*(1~2)m, composed of broken mudstone and sandstone.
4 Vehicles transporting ballast products should be cleaned before loading without sundries such as mud and dust. The surface of ballast transportation vehicles should be covered.
(19) Technical Code for Glass Curtain Wall Engineering(JGJ102-2013)
The anchor group shall be tensioned according to relevant specifications to avoid anchor group effect and reduce the loss of effective pre-stress;
Each production organization shall organize the Brake Technology Research Institute and Quality Management Department to perform first article inspection (FAI) after maintenance of major failure of craft equipment.
The binding surface of the left side wall and 4# spandrel arch is of vertical cracks on surface course of mortar, with the length L=0.8m and crack width δ=0.15mm.
Manual driving mode fully protected by ATP. ATP is responsible for preventing overspeed, preventing train from crossing limit points (red light, switch machine, EOA, etc.) and train running at stations.
Equation (39) can be converted to a separable form:
And the 5# building is a complex building including 18 floors with a construction area of 50,000㎡.
For open bridge floor bridge and ballastless deck bridge whose span is over 40m or bridge length is over 100m, it shall have sufficient basis when radius of curve on the bridge is less than 1000m.
Table 4-4-9 OD Passenger Flow Transferred from Trains Starting with "G" to Trains Starting with "D" (person/h)
9.3 The technical documents must be legible and complete, and the reference for use must be as comprehensive as possible. The Buyer has the right to copy the above documents free of charge.
8.1 The buyer shall clearly inform the supplier of the working area, working requirements, possible dangers in the working area and emergency exits.
3) It shall tie the cable with cable tie every 150-200 mm. The cable tie tail shall be cut along the knot, and the knots should point to the same position.
r/min. Under the theoretical loading volume, the filling coefficient kc1 is 0.6, and the overload coefficient is 1.6 (when there are large stones in the loading process).
The stratum attitude is reverse incline relative to the right side slope, which is favorable for side slope stability.
7. During the project building and operation stage, configure management, technique, vehicle and other related resources based on the demand of project company;
Nempty——daily average handling quantity of empty containers (TEU/d);
Measuring the planes at centers of guide surface and stabilizing surface,and the horizontal line G (the running surface inspected by level gauge while the guide surface and stabilizing surface inspected by piano string for Value J)
The frame design shall fully consider equal stress, and the weld quality control standards meet the requirements stipulated in EN 15085.
The contractor should survey the landform and submit the survey results and drawings to the supervising engineer before blasting drilling.
The temporary construction electricity shall be protected by three-level distribution and two-level protection. The electrical equipment must have their own exclusive switch boxes. The switch boxes shall be set according to the requirements of 'one machine with one switch, one leakage protection and one switch box'. It is strictly prohibited to use the same switch box to directly control two or more electrical devices (including socket).
(4) Specifications for the Third and Fourth Order Leveling;
Lanzhou is the transportation hub in the Great Northwest and the important channel for the second Eurasian Continental Bridge.
For key and difficult works and key processes, special safety measures and special technical disclosures are prepared, and special personnel are assigned to carry out supervision and implementation of the safety.
Dimensions in the drawing are all relative ones after completion and cannot be applied to scale;
Trumpchi wuhan youzhiyou store, No,8, Longyang avenue, hanyang district, wuhan city, hubei province
When not specified, the upper and lower parts of diagonal reinforcement of horizontal haunched beam
6.4.2.6 Waterproof and Drainage (including measures for water proofing and drainage of surface water on tunnel portal and burst water inside tunnel)
Auburnish yellow, steel gray, of cryptocrystalline texture, of dense massive structure, with 5~30m thick fully~highly weathered layer.
Time-limit quick-break t2 EN/DIS control word \U+201C1\U+201D
h. Stop filling explosive under the following circumstances: There is insufficient illumination on working face. The working face and the rock face are not yet timely supported. There is possibility to occur water burst.
In 2014, total asset turnover ratio reached 0.51 time, with rise by 0.07 time than 0.44 time in the last year.
The words "Beijing Gingo United Petrotech Development Co., Ltd." shall be printed on the packing box in red with blue shade.
Dean of Graduate School of Chinese Academy of Social sciences: Fang Keli (Seal)
Where: a1, a2, a3 - Pavement structure coefficient;
Breakthroughs of China's shield technology in future will be made in respect of multi-functional dual-mode shield, intelligent and digital control technology for shield machines, and new methods for rock-breaking.
and at the same time, submit the corresponding test program files, complete Software Consistency Test Reportof hardware and development.
When the embankment below the subgrade bed is filled with Group C2 sandy soil and Group C3 filling materials, strengthening protection measures should be taken.
Front View of L-shaped Retaining Wall at Left Side of YDK17+744~YDK17+920
The Line is the Phase 1 of Zimbabwe Harare Rail Transit Planning Network, a light rail transit line connecting Harare with Chitungwiza, its satellite city.
The Electric equipment with large load change adopts the control method of variable-frequency speed regulation to improve the operation efficiency and achieve the energy-saving effect.
The thickness of the concrete protection layer: the thickness of the steel bars' concrete protection layer shall be controlled as per the requirements of the drawings.
2. The Buyer shall, according to the Contract, commit to pay the Contract Price to the Seller.
Housing material stainless steel, galvanized sheet, carbon steel plate material
The cost includes utilities, chemicals cost, salaries and welfare, depreciation of fixed assets, major repair fund, amortization of intangible assets and deferred assets, routine repair and maintenance cost, other costs and financial cost.
Bulletin boards: on the construction site, bulletin boards shall be assigned at eye-catching places.
Goethite process - treatment of lead-silver slag with pyrogenic process
The sun visor is arranged above the front window which is equipped with wipers. The wiping area meets the driver's view requirements, ensuring that the driver has a good view.
List of Engineering and Technical Information for Philippines MWC Project
The PH value erosion class is judged as H1 based on durability judgment criteria.
3. Control Points List for the Project of Assistance to Sierra Leone Freetown Ring Road ( Attached in the end)
According to the annual transport forecast for this line, 5000t, 10000t, 20000t and 30000t trains shall be considered, and the single-track railways can meet the transportation demand, so the line is a single track.
In addition, measurement aids should be equipped and verified.
AGM has display, direction indicator, warning light, sound and other interfaces, to facilitate different passengers to quickly pass through the gate with right hand holding the ticket.
[3] Zhai Wanming: Vehicle-Track Coupled Dynamics. Third Edition. Science Press, Beijing (2007).
With CSS technique, it will be easier to manage switches. The simplified network will improve operation efficiency. It allows to manage all devices integrated as a whole by logging in the virtualized device, which simplifies network management.
Masonry works on both sides of the existing mainly include drains, slope protection, and retaining walls.
General Specification of Freeway Traffic Engineering and Roadside Facilities
See the table below for the dial tone transmission delay of the user circuit.
1. In order to complete the construction in good quality and on time, it is required to make a proper division of the sections according to the characteristics and difficulty of each section.
Deposits at the portal shall be cleaned up; the original chute shall be replaced with a broadened one and extended for 10m.
S700KC Series 3-Phase AC Switch Machine
8.5.1.1.2 It shall report to supervisors or subcontractors for review and inspection according to provisions.
② Installation of main pipes: chase holes should be reserved or bushings should be reserved as per the coordinates and elevation required in design drawings first.
In the visual and aesthetic aspects, it includes the impact on aesthetic and visual experience of road in project landscape aspect.
3. Base Course, Sub-base Course and Bedding Course Material Requirements and Mixture Design
3. At the same time, according to the current customs policy of Ethiopia, manufacturers are required to assist in completing relevant packaging and marking work before shipment.
The operation status monitoring, fault alarm of CCTV equipment along the whole line can be realized at the station. The CCTV control, picture combination control and CCTV digital picture display can be conducted.
foperateflag=operation type
C.If the internal and external operating devices act, "emergency release switch (S3)" must act. At the same time, it should be noted that the door system shall be able to be opened manually.
Special contract: Any sales contract other than general contract, such as the contract that has special improvement requirements for new products development and trial production, samples and non-standard products.
Recently, the expressway conference TV network in Guangxi is the two-level network, namely the management office/ road section management station - toll station.
Floor 9, Loke Building, Tangyan Road,Gaoxin District, Xi'an City, 029 68593660
Information of pantograph failure in lifting and lowering (more than 10 seconds)
Inspect the valve on natural gas purification pipeline and import the air into ground deflagration inside fire-spread ignition unit of venting system.
Allowable deviation for formwork erection shall comply with Table 13.4.2.
Observation of construction settlement shall be enhanced to provide accurate bases for adjustments of settlement differences by stages.
If the fan speed is still 0, firstly loosen the screw cap, adjust the knob A counterclockwise (1/4 circle or half circle);
Shoulder width of ballast bed in the yard line shall not be less than 200mm. For the curve section with the radius less than 300m, shoulder width at the outer side of the curve shall be widened for 100mm, and the ballast bed slope is 1:1.5.
④If abnormal phenomena such as cracking, brittle fracture, too hard or springback of butt-welded joints of steel bars are found in the bending process, they shall be reported to the foreman in time, the reasons shall be identified and treatment measures shall be taken.
The earthing system of railway signal equipment consists of through earth wire, earthing device, earthing connection line, etc.
In case it is unable to conduct the welding operations in a cool place, sacks may be used for coverage and watered with cold water on regular time.
4) All levels of construction personnel shall be trained on installation process quality and safety, and shall be allowed to participate in the construction of this project only after passing the examination.
The outfitting wharf is of combined steel pipe sheet pile. Two segments of parallel quay structures and the connecting trestle form a semi-closed harbor of refuge.
Specific train parameters shall be provided by users. We will design the train washers based on the train parameters finally confirmed by users. The above parameters are for information only.
Backup OCC is installed respectively at train-dispatching workstation, environmental dispatcher's workstation and general dispatcher's workstation to monitor the console.
We promise that this project meets the requirements of ISO14001 environmental protection certification, regulations on HSE construction management and environmental protection of construction projects in Chongqing, and the provisions and environmental protection requirements in the Environmental Management Plan of the Employer.
Based on the basic framework, smart firefighting can also be divided into 11 research areas for a certain research scope, that is, the America technical framework for smart firefighting at this stage. The details are shown in table 1.
2 Drainage ditches and sedimentation tanks shall be cleaned regularly, and the removed soil shall be transported to the soil stocking yard or used as backfill soil after drying.
4.4.2The uneven displacement (linear displacement and angular displacement), temperature change and the influence of shrinkage and creep of concrete shall be considered in the calculation of rigid frame.
The ending point of the proposed section crosses the Chili River with abundant water volume and good water quality, so it is convenient to supply water for life and engineering; the areas near the starting point can get water from the nearby La Jolla Town.
This standard specifies the service conditions, vehicle type, technical requirements, safety facilities, testing and acceptance, marking, transportation and warranty period etc. of light rail traffic coupled vehicles.
1.11.5 All deviations of the negotiation application documents from the negotiation documents shall be listed in the commercial and technical deviation form of the negotiation application documents. Except the listed content, it shall be deemed that the applicant has responded to all requirements of the negotiation documents.
2.5.3.5 The main control cabinet provides power supply for all electric equipment.
After the borer is in place, make it in the vertical direction. Adjust the borer so that the drill pipe center is located perpendicular to the center of the pile hole, so as to ensure that the hole position formed is accurate and the hole body is vertical.
19 "SVGA flat screen and speaker
Quick removal and transportation of foundation can be achieved through following ways.
The investment cost of this Project includes: highway construction cost and highway operation cost (maintenance cost and operation management cost).
The Nanning-Qinzhou North Section, Qinzhou North-Fangchenggang Section and Qinzhou North-Beihai Section of Guangxi Coastal Railway constructed under the joint venture contract between former Ministry of Railways and Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region.
(5) Strengthen the greening of road sections. It is recommended that the road sections should adopt shrubs, such as Ardisia crenata and Myrtle, which is beneficial to roadside landscape viewing.
Arrange the sizes in vertical and horizontal directions in the room. According to the determined number of tiles, snap the control lines in vertical and horizontal directions: provide one control line for every four tiles, and strictly control the foursquare and symmetry.
Suzhou rail transit line 2 is 26.7km long totally. 22 stations are set, including 5 elevated stations and 17 underground stations. One depot and two main substations are set. The total project investment is about RMB 15.6 billion.
The closed-loop management of the whole process of the company's technical change from the initiation of change request, publication of change documents, on-site implementation and closure of test verification, as well as document modification and handover is realized.
Doors, door handles, door locks, door seals, glass and trim strips. Beforehand tightened quantity shall be reserved when the door is locked.
Tracking, analyze monitoring record of locomotive operation and report locomotive conditions timely.
Guangxi Communications Design Group Co., Ltd. 84
4.3.1 The purchased workblank items shall be placed in the inspection waiting area and at least one shall be sampled for inspection in every batch, and white paint and identification card shall be used to mark the model, specification and quantity of product and orderly filed (large size pieces shall be piled on the original handling site).
4.2 Stress Inversion and Energy Storage Density Limit
SINOMA-TIANJIN-PM-PR31-R5 Application Form for Breach of Equipment Supply Contract
The station is close to Athi River Town and is characterized by convenient transportation. At DK449+600, there is a 4m wide gravel road leading to Athi River Town.
In drilling oblong hole, flame cutting is applied after hole diameter d is expanded by 5mm.
5)The rotating speed of the diesel engines' main shaft is governed by a dual-sensor detection and control system. When one sensor is down, safe shutdown is initiated immediately to avoid overrun for single-sensor detection. Also the shutdown alarm bell is rung to send an audible and visual alarm.
Table 2 Physical Interface between Air Conditioning Control Subsystem and Intelligent Low Voltage
Innovation and development: serve for clean energy building, enhance the resource support, strengthen the innovation ability building, improve the awareness of all-involvement innovation and promote technical innovation, management innovation, product innovation and business model innovation to ensure the continuous, healthy and stable development of the Group Company.
In Stage CB1, equipment and pipelines subject to this renovation will be depressurized and purged clean;
3Close the sealing element and maintain the pressure for a certain period of time;
Electromechanical grounding plan for floor 2 of mixed traction and step-down substation
Those who violate the regulations shall be educated and penalized. If the circumstances are serious, they shall be repatriated and disposed of according to the law. Those who violate the local laws shall be dealt with according to the relevant provisions.
The design documents generated during the development involving any national secret and Company's secret matters shall be timely assigned with the confidentiality class and managed according to management requirements of corresponding confidentiality class documents.
Moderately and slightly weathered mudstone can be loosened with air drills. Dregs are removed and foundation is excavated manually.
After completion of above steps, collect tools and fixtures, and clean the carbody-bogie connection bench.
At present, SEI's main comprehensive HSSE inspections include:
Refueling of building machines with fuel and lubricants should be carried out from mobile fuel-filling machines in a specially allocated place equipped with fire safety equipment.
Considering that the topographical conditions along the line are relatively good, it should be adapted to local conditions, and the radius should be reasonably selected from large to small.
Under pneumatic control, air braking and hydraulic drive, the following preventive measures should be taken to avoid misoperation:
The integrated case shall be installed on the obvious parts which are easy to operate on the column.
Construction works and scale: the area of Qingshui River Water Plant is 75 mu, the designed construction scale is: 40,000 m3/d in short-term, 80,000 m3/d in long-term; the length of the supporting pipe network is 89.132 km.
In the tunnel area, the stratum is mainly of Quaternary Holocene (Q[3](el+dl)) silty clay, and the underlying stratum is of Devonian (D) sandstone. See the lithological description, thickness, and distribution in the Geological Profile.
Concrete shall be transported by concrete mixer trucks and placed directly into the funnel at the top of the conduit after reaching the hole site.
Clearance of emergency situation: when emergency situation ends, emergency response coordinators will notify all the Contractor/subcontractor according to contact list.
2. Unless otherwise indicated in the figure, the center line or edge of the beam shall be aligned with corresponding axis or edge of the wall and column. The elevation of the beam surface is H-0.050. See the list of floor for H.
Quantity of Land of Permanent Occupation under Action Plan (㎡)
Deaerator feedwater device and the temperature and pressure reducer are equipped with the following automatic regulatory system:
Account: 17008201040015543__________
4.2.2.1 Be responsible for filling in and submitting letter of ESI demand and evaluate its necessity.
1. Simulate Mc1 car's VVVF3 to send out the control power voltage low (DC11LVD) signal.
e)The 3D scanning of locomotive parts is realized. After the fusion and processing of 3D data, 3D data can be displayed in real time.
4.2 The wall materials used in this project (wall above the moisture-proof course), unless otherwise specified:
The originals of this agreement and other contract documents are made in duplicate, each held by each party; the copies are made in sextuplicate, one reserved when the Contract is submitted to and filed at the competent authority of construction.
Physical (Dynamic Simulation) Simulation Engine Module
In case the requirement isn't met, the system and subsystem affecting the reliability are analyzed, and the corrective measures are developed, till the reliability requirement is met.
(1) Class-I loads shall be supplied by two independent power supplies.
Students will master the knowledge about the composition of EMU end connecting device, especially the structure and working process of automatic coupler and semi-permanent coupler, so as to carry out simple maintenance work on coupler.
Dnepropetrovsk (urban district), Krynychky and Solone
Soil (Structural steel reinforced concrete); ditch cover plate and cable slot cover plate: G40 reinforced concrete;
It brings opportunities for the joint production of Siemens ELS710 external-locking electric switch machines;
The pier heightH=7.592mindicated on Drawing No. 15306-04-3110 is not correct, which shall be H=7.976m. Other data stated in the Table of Number of Pier Shaft Rebar for13# Pier is correct.
2. Shear key should be set at deformation joints on side wall. HRB400 reinforcement with the diameter of 40mm should be used, with the spacing of 400 mm and length of 1 m.
⑥ UAE environmental protection regulations 1991, no. 61.
All pumps shall be equipped with a base, vibration damping device, supporting fasteners, etc. at delivery.
There are 568 culverts in this project, including 398 reinforced concrete circular pipe culverts and 170 reinforced concrete cover slab culverts.
4. Construction Contractor shall be in close coordination with the contractors of other disciplines to reasonably arrange the construction schedule and the location of pipeline to avoid collision and rework.
In total: HPB235 Bar: 502.22kg; HRB335 bar: 242.06kg
3.1.18 The lightening protection and earthing works of railway tunnels shall be constructed according to the design requirements and appropriate signs shall be set at splicing and connection points of integrated run-through earthing cables.
Two-point hoisting is adopted for installation of steel beam. When it is in place, it is strictly prohibited to collide with the installed steel column and cable wind rope.
When the driver continuously pulls the EPB switch in the vehicle running process, the vehicle will brake at certain deceleration till the vehicle stops. The EPB is in the brake state after the vehicle stops.
Management system clarifies the positioning of the customer representative; the actual implementation is consistent with the system; and the historical customers express satisfaction thereto.
The Tenderer shall state the type of battery, recommended manufacturer and other conditions favorable to the Tenderee (such as warranty period).
1.4.1 The total length of Yanchang – Huanglong Expressway Project is 169.49km, including 17.14km of the shared line with Qingdao – Lanzhou Expressway with 152.35km of construction mileage.
As the deteriorative environment of the concrete structures may be not simple, the technical measures to protect the concrete structure from the different typical deteriorative environment (chemical attack, freeze-thaw) may be different in the durability design.
This specification is divided into chapters only for convenience and shall be deemed as a whole for reading. Titles of each section and sub-section are only for prompt and shall not serve as considerations in explaining this specification.
A. Two people pull out the auxiliary ropes from the wire spreader to the direction of the wire reel. One person on the anchor mast hangs a 1.5t aluminum pulley to hoist the auxiliary ropes with the coir ropes, and put the auxiliary ropes into the aluminum pulley when the auxiliary ropes are pulled over L/2 span.
(2)LCD media player shall be installed on each train to display media information such as TV news, advertisements, animation, pictures and text etc.
(Channel 2017-8401 Type I)
Thermal insulation shall be tied up with #14 or #16 galvanized wires or package steel strips at the interval of not more than 300mm; if the insulation is more than 800 mm in length, it shall be tied up with at least three courses within the length.
Stainless steel: heavier - elongation 20~50% - good ductility and resistant to cracking and fatigue - less thickness is required - lighter in actual application
This scheme involves the first stage, i.e. consulting and testing before up-grading of the SMRT Line. Through investigation and testing, the scheme for maintenance and regulation of the SMRT Line is worked out.
Group company has been awarded top ten in top 100 integrated strength for survey and design of China for many years continuously.
Disconnect cables at Points d1~d4, SS, a1, a3, SS, b1, b3, SS, SS, f1~f8, SS, e1~e8, c1~c4 and SS of XP279.6(M), and connect them with electronic circuit.
Such works as paving of river bed, masonry of longitudinal dam, wing dam, water diversion dam and conical slope, as well as riprap protection shall be completed according to the dimension in the drawing and the Supervisor's instructions and the accepted number shall be measured in cubic meter.
The fire control center of the Project is laid out on the 1st floor. It is provided with safety exits directly leading to outdoors; in addition, fireproof doors (the fire endurance is 1.5 h) are used for separation off from other parts.
(1) 277 Chinese employees (including: mixing plant operators, operators, repairers, electricians, welders, drivers, mechanical operators, crane riggers, etc.).
Our internal project communication includes the communication between the project team and the corporate management, and the communication between key members of the project team.
The railway special line is a facility that provides transportation services for local factories and mining enterprises. During the project study, only the connection conditions of the railway special line are considered, and the construction of the special line is not considered.
Various calculation sheets (including: vehicle clearance calculation sheet, simulation calculation of vehicle operation, calculation of parameters of major components of electric system, heat calculation, and gearing strength calculation, etc.);
11.1.4 The acceptance of support, structural concrete, waterproofing and drainage of service galleries shall be done according to chapters 8, 9, and 10 of this Standard.
④ The two wind speed and direction collecting devices at the same monitoring point should be respectively defined and displayed as No. 1 device and No. 2 device (No. 1 wind speed and direction monitoring device should be set on the small chainage side, and No. 2 wind speed and direction monitoring device should be set on the large chainage side).
3. If Xishan Power Plant can realize the following retrofit through the CH GEF Municipal Solid Waste Management Project, it is expected that Xishan Power Plant can reach 90% or more of the extent required by the Stockholm Convention.
In this study, the effective length of the receiving-departure track of the Lake Paiku to Kathmandu Section is recommended as 650m.
· During each stage of the project, reasonable and feasible risk control and mitigation measures shall be proposed and implemented timely.
17.6.2.Training courses are mainly in the related plant of parts and components or assembly.
The main camp of the Project department is arranged near the residents' farmlands near the east entrance of the tunnel. Asphalt mixing station, water stable mixing station, 1# concrete batching plant and small prefabricated yard cover 33,000 square meters in total.
Only laminated bearing is listed in the table. When the quantities of the bridge span are more than three, the straight bridge at the slab end of the expansion joint uses GJZF4 150?200 bearing while the curve bridge uses GYZF4 Φ200 bearing.
Q = 73m3/h; main motor: 132kW; auxiliary motor: 15kW
The development of traffic signal controller control system maintenance software and signal hardware system are closely bond together, which synchronized with hardware upgrading and can replace central platform for configuration and maintenance of signals on some special functions.
A car has 4 discharge doors, and the door lock position is shown in red cycle;
(2) A relay section of optical cable shall be tested with an optical time domain reflectometer (OTDR), and the average splice loss α of each single mode fiber is not more than 0.08dB (1310nm; 1550nm).
However, when any one of the Vendor's personnel operates, drives, guides, occupies, or controls the Buyer's facilities, the Vendor shall be responsible for each item of the Buyer's facilities.
All the staff of the company, sercurity guards as well as personnel, vehicles and materials from outside.
Sectional CWR track: welded section rails, long rails with joint gaps at ends, and weldless turnouts
Isolating gate with good sealing performance shall be provided at the bottom of the feed hopper and will isolate the feed hopper with the waste entrance of the incinerator if necessary.
(4) Not take any bribe or other illegal income by taking the advantage of their authorities or convert property of the Company into their own;
Cabling: The power runthrough lines are laid in the reserved trough of the bridge, and the cables of subgrade section are laid in the cable trench. Cables crossing the tracks shall be protected in the pre-embedded steel pipes.
Flexible assembling line, with the capacity of manufacturing vehicles with the level lower than intercity trains
10.3.4.3 Internal Audit Control Procedure
The annual average temperature ranges between 20℃-26℃.
General terrain: high in the north and low in the south, high in the west and low in the east, crossing seven rivers and eight mountains, with many ups and downs.
(6) The plan for station building works and other works is RMB 770.37 million;
Table 3.2.7-6 Indices and Weightings of Construction Management for Green Railway Stations
When the system works, its hardware and software faults can be detected at any time through the system self-checking function, and the fault records are uploaded to the server in the ground center through the 4G network.
If starting the engine continuously for three times gets failed, identify the fault and then start the engine, so as to avoid deformation and damage of the counter electrode inside the battery due to too long high current discharge time.
215.0-233.0 Straightening Option
10.3 Acceptance standard for bolts, studs, and nuts of diameter over 50 mm
2. Temporary cross braces for wind resistance in construction are added at 1/2 height of no.14 and 17 piers.
After clicking, the car body number and alarm threshold will be displayed in the "Current Parameters" below on the host for verification.
All train operation, such as running in the section, stop at stations, reversal operation and getting in and out of the depot, and all protection needed, should be completed by drivers.
With the maximum axle weight of 18 t, the vehicle meets the requirements oriented at the line level C2-C4 + CE-20t, CM2-CM4-21t.
The insulation resistance between pins (wires) and of the pin to the housing shall be tested in accordance with Table 3-10.
In order to ensure the river flow direction can be changed as we hoped, we will build one cofferdam at the upstream/downstream section of the river where the pipe is installed to block the river so as to ensure the river water flows to our diversion trench.
The area implements annual ranking assessment for the subsidiary (the company under construction and operating company of current year won't involve in the annual ranking), and the ranking result shall be submitted to the Human Resources Department of the headquarters after being approved by the General Manager of the area, and the Human Resources Department will submit it to the president working meeting for special review.
Completely-weathered tuff: ignimbrite, gray, with primary rock structure completely damaged, of sand-soil texture due to weathering effect, hardly fragmented by hand, and allowable for dry drilling.
Overload protection: It is provided with timing function and acts for signaling.
It is used for recycling refrigerants from refrigerating machinery (such as refrigerator, A/C and freezer).
According to the stipulation of national laws and regulations and the Company's management measures, when the work safety accidents happen, it shall be reported to the local government departments timely and accurately in accordance with the territorial management principle, and the effective measures shall be taken to organize the rescue, prevent the extension of accident and reduce the casualties and property loss as far as possible.
5.2.2 A copy of ID card (front) cut into the size of ID card;
GB/T 230.1-2009 Metallic Materials - Rockwell Hardness Test: Party 1
Malawi: a railway from Chipata of Zambia to Mchinji of Malawi, opened to traffic in 2010;
4.1.1 Make full use of resource superiorities in China and strengthen the preparatory works in China,.
Fortunately, we got your great support and finally finished the second edition.
Assembly, compilation, linking, editing, debugging, distributing, testing and integration of program modules;
Assemble and use the machine in a flat place.
Relevant standards for acceptance evaluation in the Track Geometry Dynamic Inspection and Evaluation Method (TB/T 3355-2014) are adopted for track geometry status dynamic detection of Hong Kong Section of Guangzhou-Shenzhen-Hong Kong Passenger Dedicated Line.
The signs and markings in some newly constructed or repaired sections of the line are broadly complete, while other signs and markings in some old road sections are mostly damaged.
Power cable VV22 1kV 4X101X6mm2
h) In the seedling stage, the seeds shall be removed for three to five times by combining chemical prevention with manual pulling.
During construction of cable trench near traffic roads or in bustling areas, railings and signboards shall be set up and red marker lights shall be set up at night.
Quality Inspection Center conducts inspection and analysis on the chemical composition of steel, conduct inspection on the quality of steel ingot (billet) surface and overall dimensions. After inspection and test, steel ingots (billet) whose every quality feature conforms to the acceptance standards subject to a comprehensive determination, shall be warehoused after the inspector issues quality certificate of steel ingot (billet).
According to the analysis of the bidding documents, the software compositions of the project are as follows:
2. If any nonconformity found during the "triple joint inspection", the cause must be detected and actions should be taken to correct it immediately until the problem is solved.
The landform type along the line is of gobi topography; Large part of sections are subject to gentle topography and open terrain; Hills can be found at local sections and gentle hills can be found in common with small hill body; some sections are subject to small seasonal flow gully instead of obvious valley wall feature.
According to conditions of the site test segment and the local characteristics of Laos, in principle, concrete protective fences should be designed for the whole Vang Viang-Vientiane section and the passenger stations and densely populated areas along Boten-Vang Viang section. Metal mesh fences should be designed for sparsely populated areas along Boten-Vang Viang section.
In 2018, the GDP of the county was RMB 14,160,040,000, growing by 7.2% over the previous year.
The driving elevation for plastic drainage plates shall be strictly controlled to avoid shallow deviation. When changes of geological changes are found and driving cannot be carried out as per design requirements, contact with site supervisor, and change the driving elevation after obtaining approval.
This observation point is located at 82# culvert on the existing railway between SaraisSaleh Station and Haripur Station. This culvert is 0.6m wide with large water flow used for irrigation. Country roads and cultivated land are distributed on both sides of the line, with open and flat terrain.
The weight of the particles with grain size of over 2mm accounts for 50% or more of the total weight, mainly chevron-shaped stones
After receiving the technical specification, suppliers shall carry out RAMS designs, analyses and tests as required to satisfy the RAMS quantitative/qualitative requirements specified in the technical specification.
1.1.2.2 Before the detailed tender evaluation, the tender evaluation committee shall, according to the provisions of these Instructions, evaluate whether all tender documents are substantially responsive to the requirements of the tendering documents.
The bogie, underframe equipment, cab, and interior equipment use the coating system that integrates epoxy primer and acrylic polyurethane finish. The finish glossiness is 50±10/60º.
The daily maintenance and management organization of the power supply shall be set up according to the "section-work area" two-level organization.
The company adheres to the international standards, continuously introduces advanced management methods, and strives to cultivate a corporate culture with integrity as its core content.
Test Report for Speed-up of Hong Kong Section of Guangzhou-Shenzhen-Hong Kong Passenger Dedicated Line (V2.0)
HCMT software test records and exception report
7.5.1 The opening meeting is presided by the audit team leader and the main contents of the meeting include:
2) The failure of each key device is divided into primary failure and secondary failure.
2 For bridge at curves, variations of girder length should be controlled in (30000\U+00B1500)mm, adapting variation of curve by adjusting length of cantilever outside of side girders.
The main works of PMC include but not limited to the followings:
Use the theodolite to project/survey the required axis onto the plane layer of construction, and verify the angle and distance. After verifying it is correct, set-out other axis line and detail lines.
If there is strobe in LED lights, the Supplier should present strobe data at the design liaison stage, which should be reasonable and approved by the Buyer, to avoid a strobe of the screen in the monitoring system.
3. Management System for Standardization of Construction Period and Cost Benefit System
Inspection method: the Contractor shall carry out measurement with rulers; the Supervisor shall carry out witness inspection.
The contact between both parties and the documents of both parties shall be in Chinese according to specific procedures or in other languages if necessary.
2.4 Overpass Bridge at CH519+100
The acquirer bank's own approved credit card processing equipment; or
Heating steam flow adjustment preset of peak-load heater
If the embedded steel plate could not be used, the method of drilling hole for embedding M10 expansion bolt could be adopted.
The objectives of the Project on quality and civilized construction shall be broken down level by level and the disclosure shall be made, so that each employee can clearly understand the goals and requirements of his posts.
2.2 GB50231-2009 General Specifications for Construction and Acceptance of Mechanical Equipment Installation
After completion, the HSE performance of the project shall be comprehensively measured.
Cross-linked polyethylene (XLPE) insulated conductor, WDZN-BYJ 450/750V, 50mm2
Retaining wall (wall thickness 300mm, storey height 3.9m, commercial concrete c35)
①Gradient of rampway through which excavators and dump trucks enter the foundation pit shall not exceed 1:8.
The file applies to the auxiliary power capacity calculation report. It is mainly used for checking the whole train load power distribution and auxiliary system capacity.
Technical personnel and the leader of maintenance team are responsible for supervising the execution of the maintenance regulations, arranging specific maintenance and repair work, summarizing maintenance and repair worksheet and managing the maintenance personnel.
b. The second layer is in the front of the server of the intranet to prevent the illegal intrusion by the illegal users from the intranet.
(3) Check whether the disconnector bracket is horizontal and square, and whether the height and direction of the mechanism bracket meet the requirements.
The on-site reinforced steel materials and the processed components shall be stacked neatly and covered with plastic cloth to prevent rainwater from rusting the reinforcement. The 30cm high wooden square support pads shall be used to stack the reinforcement. The terrain of stocking area shall be higher than surrounding ground to prevent the reinforcement from being soaked by the ponding and polluted by the mud.
Items existing in technical specification of negotiation procurement document but not inflected in Quotation Documents are deemed to contain in other item fees;
The graded crushed stone (gravel) mixture shall be subject to centralized mixing in the stock yard.
(6) The trackless transport of slag is achieved by using loader assisted by dump truck;
Then insert the upper pipe section or pipe parts into rubber ring;
When any of such operations is necessary, corresponding safety measures shall be taken according to the following requirements:
The relation between procurement progress schedule and procurement process control is as shown in the block diagram below:
5kt/a expand production after relocation is 12kt/a.
Given that diesel traction is adopted in this line, it is therefore determined that the type of passenger locomotive be of DMU.
b. The corrective/improvement actions taken by Project Management Department during the product implementation process and application of the management system to the project operation shall be reviewed by relevant departments of Project Management Department;
3. When widening by earth filling is employed during reconstruction and removing, the bench cut method will be adopted as per the design drawing for filling and widening in layers. The traffic and construction safety must be ensured. Meanwhile, the observation and measurement of settlement and deformation of the existing line shall be strengthened.
Issued on: June 21, 2012
1.1.5.1 Check whether the column foundation sinks, tilts and cracks, and check the plumb sag; check whether the column body is deformed and whether the thermal insulation is in good condition.
The construction of circular culverts for village roads shall be as shown in Chapter 6.2.3.
3. The application form for engineering change costs shall include the quotation description, quotation summary, quantity calculation data and unit price analysis form;
The Department of Construction Management of Ministry of Railways has the right to interpret this code.
If Procurement Department carry out one-time procurement due to emergent procurement, narrow application scope of products, small procurement amount, low value, etc., it shall conduct management according to the following regulations.
Article 30 Executive Director assumes responsibilities in following methods:
To detect 6 ~ 8 kinds of gases and warm flue gas synchronously, and to measure temperature and humidity.
4. Load standard value acting on top of foundation
(5) The projective test method for the construction site foundation pit is the projective test method by plumb aligner, i.e. Carrying out projection test by the plumb aligner.
Handling the problems in accordance with the emergency troubleshooting manual.
After the excavation of the tunnel, means of geological radar, rod sounding etc. shall be used to carry out tunnel base detection for covered karst under the tunnel, before the construction of inverted arch. Mitigation measures for such covered karst shall be determined according to the detection data.
(3) Before being laid, the optical and electrical cables shall be delivered from the material storage to the laying positions or the nearest positions according to the order of cable drum allocation;
The construction of railway projects related to the export of Chinese railway technologies can effectively promote the technical standards of Chinese railway and be helpful for establishing the international marketing network of railway products.
The fire protection design of this project is carried out in reference to the current fire control codes in China.
Then the radar reconnaissance data will be sent to the UAV mission management system and transmitted to the ground station through the UAV data link.
During the operation period, noises are mainly wheel-track noise from trains and operation noise from stations. These noises will disturb residential areas at both sides of the railway and within a certain scope around stations, and degrade the acoustic environment of the project area.
Finished products: For electronic documents and printing white drawings, technical manager and discipline head shall sign and receive them.
An audit report shall be prepared after the audit and issued to relevant departments after it is reviewed and approved by the management representative;
(2) The report is only valid with the signatures and seals of the tester, reviewer and approver.
3.3.2.4 The Seller shall provide 2-year warranty service for components not specified in the contract, and consider 10-year operational maintenance;
(2) Before the foundation construction, the excavated foundation surface should be tamped and the bearing capacity of the foundation shall be tested. If the bearing capacity is not satisfied, it is necessary to carry out the deeper excavation until reaching the formation (or rock surface) with the bearing capacity in conformity with the required value.
Each group member shall coordinate and cooperate with other to complete the exercise according to the assignment of responsibility.
All PV modules of the Project are installed on fixed supports which are mainly composed of main beams, purlines, stand columns, inclined supports and fasteners.
Maintainability: The ability to complete specified maintenance work for a product with given conditions of use within a specified time interval, when repaired using specified procedures and resources under specified conditions.
1.10 "Final Acceptance" refers to the acceptance of Contract Equipment by the Buyer after the expiration of warranty period.
3. It is expected that the construction contractor would rent local vacant houses as much as possible as production and living places.
(9) When new technologies, new processes, new equipment and new materials are adopted in the construction, corresponding safety technical measures must be formulated; and the construction site must be provided with relevant safety signs.
Storage temperature: not beyond -20°C~60°C;
The testing pressure for pipe systems should be as indicated in the each system diagram and should be maintained when necessary for patrol inspection and test of all systems and their components.
Meanwhile, the Center can give technological supports of project management and acceptance to the Laos Government; give technological services to the domestic civil engineerings in Lao in accordance with the laws and regulations of Lao, as well as do legitimate operation in accordance with the regulations and charge with the corresponding fees.
The overview of temporary working shafts is shown in table 3.1.1.
(3) Check that the three-phase junction line set of the transformer shall match the nameplate of the transformer and the label on the top cover.
6.7.1.10 Construction Control Survey of Buildings
b) Insert iron shoes to the outer wheels of the bogies at both ends of the test vehicle to prevent the vehicle from moving during the test.
We will contact and coordinate with the local government to handle the noise pollution issue properly. In addition, we will enhance personnel's education and not allow them to make a racket.
Fig. 5 The intersection of grounding reinforcement shall be welded by reinforcement in shape of \U+03C614 or \U+201CL\U+201D of \U+03C616, and the weld length and throat depth shall conform to regulations of Fig. 1 and Fig. 2.
The pressure difference between the inlet and outlet of the fan is 364Pa, and the total pressure of the fan is much lower than the design value of 648Pa.
Work space around pipe at the orifice (mm)
Logistics Support Department shall perform logistics support properly by the requirements of Emergency Operations Center.
and meet requirements in 5.2 of the Technical Specifications as well as requirements specified by national standards.
If the original support system is completely unavailable due to the larger deformation, the causes of failure shall be found out. The stability shall be calculated and checked again in accordance with construction conditions, measured parameters of soil layer and boundary conditions. A support scheme conforming to actual construction conditions shall be prepared. Under the guidance of new scheme, the dangerous place may be re-reinforced manually in layers and sections with mechanical assistance.
4.2.2Secondary buffer function test at opening / closing
Code for Safety and Hygiene Design of Chemical Enterprise HG20571-2014
Wall hung and surface mounted at a height of 1.5 m from bottom edge to ground
The platform scale can be buried underground to make the table level with the working surface or transport road.
The Company shall comply with the laws, regulations and institutions of the People's Republic of China, follow the principles of voluntariness, honesty and fair competition, abide by social morality and business morality and safeguard the social public interests and national interests.
As required in the Bidding Documents, the foundation piles of bridges and subgrades shall be tested by transient exciting time-domain and frequency-domain method.
1-Anti-pinch rubber strip 2-Perimeter seal 3-Window glass 4-Right door leaf 5-Mechanical isolation lock
Outgoing roof pipes, equipment foundation and embedded parts, etc. shall be installed before the construction of the waterproof layer and the waterproof material shall be upturned to wrap the upper part of the facility bases and the periphery of anchor bolts shall be sealed.
Giving feedback and solving problems are very delicate acts instead of broad-brush acts, you must acknowledge
The heads and ends of metal pipes vertically laid in and out of the building shall be reliably connected with the lightning protection device.
After delivery to the site, the transport vehicle shall be made to rotate at a high speed for 20s ~ 30s before unloading.
Theoretical number of units = annual requirement of filter rods ÷ annual production capacity of single equipment = 5.51 units
The project technical standard demonstration selection shall satisfy the project area environment requirements maximally, without sacrificing the environment for one-sided pursuit of project high technical standard.
We will send those materials to your designated e-mail address upon your request.
Taohuayu Tunnel lies in Zhengzhou of Henan Province. The design speed is 120km/h. It is currently the two-way six-lane loess tunnel with the minimum spacing in the world. Relying on the research result of this tunnel, namely, Construction Technology of Shallow-covered Large-span Small-spacing Loess Tunnels and Its Application, we won the Second Prize for Progress in Science and Technology of Henan Province in 2016.
Before the formal commencement, personnel shall be organized to conduct in-depth investigation on the supplied materials, take samples under the Engineer's witness, and send them to the Laboratory for quality inspection of relevant materials. Then, the mix ratio shall be determined, the compaction standard shall be specified by heavy compaction test, and the unconfined strength test of specimens formed shall be carried out.
Before lifting, performance of all equipment in the cranes shall be inspected.
Project Name: Wastewater Treatment Project for Downstream of Shending River (Yunxian County reach)
21. Qualification Certificate for Lightning Protection Facilities - The lightning protection facilities for the project need to be inspected annually.
6. It is required that the length of rail on the platform of rail weighbridge shall be not less than 25 m.
In view of the site conditions and the characteristics of the project, we will focus on the following aspects in the organization and coordination work:
The General Manager shall set up the annual quality, environmental, occupational health and safety objectives at the beginning of each year in accordance with the quality/environment/occupational health and safety policy and incorporate them into the company's annual plan for release.
Fasteners at important key parts, for example, the nuts, shall be marked as "Anti-loose" with painting in the initial test, so as to facilitate later inspections and take measures timely.
A2-1 Type Pile Diameter D=100cm Reinforcement Table (one pile)
The model of permanent slope on the left side of the section at the north portal is shown in Figure 2-7.
12.1.7 When drawings, manuals and technical documents are updated in the process of equipment design and manufacturing, the Tenderer shall timely provide the Tenderee with new updated documents.
Export (Gabon) DF8B Diesel Locomotive Maintenance Manual - Transmission System Number:
Keep an original copy of issued drawing data, and file together with issuance list.
Allowable deviations for installation of formwork of cast-in-place structure are shown in the table below;
The vertical wall acts as a partition for cables, signal and communication cable trenches and a cover plate for supporting cable trough. The vertical wall shall be provided with units at intervals of 2m, and the length of the vertical wall shall be appropriately adjusted when there are catenary pillars and other foundations.
Refer to specific documents for the functions, permissions and responsibilities of each division in each process or activity, as well as the cooperative relationships between different divisions in some process or activity.
Emission Standard for Industrial Enterprises Noise at Boundary (GB 12348-2008)
Technical Proposal for Y12F Aircraft Integrated Procedure Trainer Attachment 3 Installation at User Place
Matters unconcerned in this agreement shall be in accordance with the agreement of the original contract.
The whole train composes 8 seating cars, namely 6 motor cars and 2 trailers in fixed formation. The length of the whole train is 203 m and the space between two cars is 500 mm.
Supervisor: JinHua Gongzheng Highway Supervision and Consultant Co., LTD
3.3.1 The competitive negotiation response document shall be valid for a period of 90 days after the deadline for submission of the competitive negotiation response document. During the validity period, the applicant shall not request withdrawal or modification of its competitive negotiation response document.
See Table 3.1.6-1 for the statistical measurement results of reinforcing bar quantity, spacing and protective layer thickness.
The routine maintenance of contact rails are mainly manual adjustment of contact wires, busbars, and overlaps. And the maintenance cost is mainly labor cost, which will significantly increase for component replacement in overhaul period.
Outer lining (primary lining)- Use shotcrete and rock bolts that can achieve early strength, so that the flexible outer lining can allow the surrounding rock to deform, and restrain it from deforming too much and too fast;
Close coordination with the Civil Engineering Specialty is required during construction.
The connector shall enable frequent plugging, and shall adopt the product with high strength and wear resistance.
Tel.: 021-33763578
1. 100-thick surface course built with rough granite slabs
Turn on system power switch, and all the power indicator lights in the front of the power cabinet turn on, as shown in Figure 4-34:
When the pantograph lifts, the TCMS display screen on the console shows that the corresponding high-voltage isolator switch is closed; when the pantograph lowers, the TCMS display screen on the console shows that the corresponding high-voltage isolator switch is disconnected.
But it has started to import electricity from South Africa and the democratic republic of Congo (DRC) since November, 2005 due to the renovation of major power stations and sharp decline in generated energy.
Press and hold the "Ctrl" key on the keyboard, then click the signal with the right mouse button and select the failure you need to set in the pop-up right-click menu.
Locomotive axle driven pulse disc (1) rotates and pulse disc separates fork-shaped grating (2).
1) Winged euonymus (ligustrum vicaryi): Arrange the bush (crown diameter ≮30cm) in the range 1.2m to the slope top and bottom in every 1.5m in longitudinal direction.
Overall building area: 19388.76㎡;
Section 1.6 - Environment, Benefit and Cost Analysis
6. After the installation of starting gas transmission pipe, the air pressure tightness test shall be carried out.
Ø The security function is arranged under the high security management for performing complete reliability check on all users.
When the inspection train passes the measuring points of ballasted track at R800m curve and in straight section, the measured maximum lateral displacement of rail is 1.45mm; the measured maximum lateral displacement of sleeper is 0.16mm; the measured maximum dynamic gauge variation is 2.16mm.
The calculation of earthquake dynamic earth pressure is as shown in Section 5.1.1.4.
Dynamic noise inside passenger compartment of car M02 running at constant 50km/h (dBA)
(8) Join in and organize the information exchange on environmental protection, summarize and promote the advanced technology and management experience in environmental protection.
Tunnel works is of a kind of underground engineering structure, the design of which should be based on the investigation of geological conditions. Whether to determine the route of the tunnel or to propose a specific engineering scheme, the investigation of geological conditions should be taken as the basis.
3.0.1BThe seismic fortification standards for various categories of engineering shall meet the following requirements:
Table 2-3-2 Major Products Imported from Mombasa Port in Recent Years Unit: 103t
The measured reference sound source at 1/3 frequency band with the mid-frequency of 500Hz LWA:
5. The first-class hot work permit is valid for one day; the second-class hot work permit for three days; the third-class hot work permit for five days.
4. Top elevations of pier and abutment indicated in the drawing mean the top elevations of pier and abutment caps, excluding the height of bearing pad stone.
Bill of Quantities for Bandong Village Medium Bridge at K18+785.00
6. issue diploma to the graduates of the College.
During the quotation document preparation, the quotation team shall organize relevant personnel to prepare risk memorandum to ensure the accuracy of commercial offer and bid acceptance probability and the risk memorandum shall be kept.
<5-4> Weakly weathered basalt: purplish red, steel gray, medium-fine sand and massive structure, with rock core in bulks, short columns, with a general segment length of 5-20cm and the longest of about 50cm, with developed joint fissures, of fresh and soft rocks, and easily fragmented in knocking.
Necessary corrective measures shall be taken to resolve problems proposed in the first article inspection.
A.5.5 Safety Analysis Procedure and Method
This Code is prepared according to the characteristics of saline soil in China. Apart from the provisions of this Code, building construction in saline soil regions shall conform to the provisions of relevant current national standards.
Refer to the technical scheme of the level crossing between the main truck and the highway for the technical scheme of level crossing construction.
3. The workshop, warehouse and other structures shall be stable and reasonably arranged. The materials that are easy to be aged, such as colorful streak cloth, shall not be used as the walls of the workshop or warehouse. The asphalt felt and asbestos shingle shall not be used on the roof.
Bypass Switch for ±800kV DC Power Transmission (Trial)
Maximum eccentricity of pier body : 0.8479 (2.4920) m Maximum compressive stress of concrete: 2.537 (15.3400) MPa
The subgrade sections are mainly distributed in the first terrace and the slopes of the valley with complicated landform, which may easily form high embankments and high side slopes.
After the mortar of mortar cake is hardened, the mortar on the same plastering layer shall be used for screeding.
If tightened at bolt end, mark black line from the bolt head to the surface of fixed part, and mark red dot on bolt adjacent to black line, which shall be visible.
Review the completeness, accuracy, legality and feasibility of the drawings.
4cmAC-13C asphalt concrete upper surface course
Planning of Lianyungang Urban Rail Transit Network;
It shall stretch with over 3% of the tension to reduce loss due to long duct.
6.6There shall be fixed base for the major equipment, and hoisting hooks shall be provided on the external package.
Persons on site shall timely carry out the emergency treatment before the medical staff is reached, and shall move the injured person to the dry and clean place for emergency treatment as soon as possible. The power supply shall be cut off immediately, or the nonconductor shall be used to let the person who gets an electric shock apart from energized part.
Compact the stacked spoil; strengthen management and protection; second plowing is recommended in the later stage
We will provide the electromagnetic compatibility measures and related standards acceptable for the equipment.
Each batch contains 200 welded joints, select 6 as samples, three for tensile test, and three for cold-rolling test.
The whole plant is equipped with a combustion line of 2X750t/d, and it is proposed that the combined flue gas treatment technology of "SNCR denitrification technology + semi-dry spray tower + activated carbon adsorption + bag dust removal" will be adopted for the flue gas purification.
Accident casualty is forecasted mainly based on personal casualty and direct economic loss, and the levels are shown in the list of level of direct economic loss and personal casualty. When various consequences concurs, accident severity shall be determined according to higher principles.
The designated subcontractors must bear the corresponding responsibilities in the general contract and be responsible for safeguarding the general contractor.
The project of Package 2 of Line Works of 2110kV Shengping Transmission Line and Substation Project undertaken by your unit was awarded as "Third Prize of 2016 Quality Infrastructure Sample Project" of Yunan Power Grid Corporation.
For the automatic fire alarm system, see CN0428DD0840TC10 drawings for subdivisional works of telecommunication specialty.
A steel wire rope in ф17.5 shall be tied on the pull ring to connect with the winding engine.
Deformation, scar, crack and rust, etc. have affected the sealing or use of device
3.6.3.1Main equipment of turnout laying: ballast carrier wagon, loader, grader, roller, pneumatic ballast unloading truck, small hydraulic turnout tamper, track lifting machine, rubber-tyred gantry crane (truck crane or track crane), heavy track car, turnout replacing machine, and testing and measuring instruments.
The alarm control system is mainly comprised of control panel, smoke detector, temperature detector, emergency start and stop switch, alarm bell, buzzer as well as audible and visual alarm and manual/automatic change-over switch.
Fig. 3.1.1-2 Triassic System (T) Coal-containing stratum
(2) The connection scheme of this project mainly passes by a virgin rainforest and partly passes by the cities and towns, basically having no air pollution source but good ambient air quality; it is a virgin rainforest along the line of the selected scheme and the ambient air quality is good.
The site and building layout of the railway station shall be designed in integration with the topographic conditions to reduce damage to the original topography and geomorphy.
5) Code for Accessibility Design (GB50763-2012)
The subgrade fill quantity of this Contract's section is relatively large; the mechanized combination construction is adopted to guarantee the construction progress of subgrade filling and the construction quality.
Land for commerce, business, recreation, and sports facilities, excluding land for service facilities in residential land
Construction Market Supervision Department of the Ministry of Housing and Urban-Rural Development of the People's Republic of China
3. Overhead ground wires between ground wire towers will be galvanized steel wire strand (1x7-9.6-1270-B-YB/T 5004-2012), totally 12 pieces.
3.Technical Code of Urban Rail Transit (GB50490-2009);
1) When concreting reaches the top, secondary vibrating and secondary screeding should be adopted and shall be removed in the case of bleeding;
For buildings at the base of the depot such as factory buildings and stores, their fire resistance rating and fire separation should be determined according to the Code of Design on Building Fire Protection and Prevention (GB50016-2006), as well as the classification of production provided by the technology discipline.
Identification, assessment, classification and control measures of major HSSE hazard factors, and treatment of hidden danger
Banknotes: 1 yuan, 2 yuan, 5 yuan, 10 yuan, 20 yuan, 50 yuan and 100 yuan
25.4 In case of delaying or failure to performance contract arising out of the force majeure, the Party in question doesn't constitute default.
Fire direct intercommunication telephone exchange shall be provided in fire control room. In addition to fire direct intercommunication telephone jack at the manual alarm button on each floor, fire direct intercommunication telephone extension sets shall be provided in transformer and distribution room, fire pump room, communication equipment room, information room and integrated monitoring room.
① Wiring shall be carried out correctly according to the reviewed drawings.
The main businesses include: inspection of various building materials, including wall materials, doors and windows, thermal insulation materials, energy-saving materials, cement, concrete products, waterproof materials, decorative materials, architectural coatings, adhesives, and hazardous substances of building materials, and engineering quality inspection, including indoor environment and building energy efficiency, energy efficiency evaluation of buildings, etc.
Issued on: December 12, 2017 Signature of the bearer:
Train route time, route and guiding contour (standard time plan, standard action plan, and standard guide plan)
3. Re-tighten the first 3 segments to avoid circumferencial joint cracks caused by pulling of shield due to
After each tamping (compaction) of lime soil backfilling, the ring cutter sampling shall be carried out according to the specifications to measure the mass density of lime soil. Only when the design requirements are met can the paving of the previous layer of lime soil be carried out.
1. Position: upper part 2. Atlas and drawing name: main river channel No.9 bridge ordinary reinforcement structural drawing3. Component number and name: No. 5 prefabricated hollow slab 4. Concrete strength grade: C505. Mortar strength grade:
It shows that industries related to energy and mineral resources are in a backbone position in economy of Bolivia. However, key technologies still rely on import, the capability of intensive resource processing is relatively weak and large-scale processing of agricultural products and industrialization development of such processing have not be realized. As a result, this country is not self-sufficient in various consumer goods.
Note: (1) During machining, it is recommended to properly adjust the "Feed Override" switch and the rotary button of "Friction Roller Speed Control" to regulate the machining and the rotation speed of the wheel set to optimize the cutting effect.
After the rolling is completed and confirmed by the Engineer, the maintenance starts, and the water spraying curing method is adopted for curing.
Note: 1. Please tabulating and listing the List of Spare Parts for Commissioning and Performance Test separately according to the decentralized control system, analytical instruments, other instruments and control equipment, electrical equipment.
(8) No violation complaint confirmed by the relevant party;
K243+950 4-3m Arch Culvert
Summarize and analyze the non-conforming products every one year/half a year/a quarter, and make improvement measures to track the effect of implementation;
t'——extremely high temperature limit of PV module under operating condition (°C);
Change Trend of Wheel Unloading Rate with Speed (Car M (AW0) Working Condition)
The on-duty shift shall pay special attention to the inspection of the equipment which has operated abnormally during the previous shift, and obtain detailed information from the off-duty shift, so as to be aware of the situation and be ready to deal with any possible situations.
Lot WGZF Ⅴ of Station Building and Supporting Works of New Wuhan-Guangzhou Passenger Dedicated Line
Unit 1 Car M1 DCU BHB overcurrent
The power system of this design mainly provides power supplies for a toll station and lanes as well as the power circuit of the power points from a toll station to toll lanes.
Fax: +86-29-88320934
To facilitate the resistance of the house to typhoons, hooks of the cable wind rope are required to be embedded at the pavement concrete next to the house, in combination with the house structure. The hook is made of No. 8 reinforcement, and its both sides are buried in the concrete no less than 50 cm. Also, a curved hook should be set.
All expenses consumed by the railway enterprise in the form of money to complete the passenger and freight transportation tasks are called transportation costs.
Falling ball impact resistance (508g steel ball) : >8m
The products provided after obtaining the product trial certificate shall not only be subject to supervision according to the requirements of railway product certification, but also be subject to special monitoring in the application/trial examination.
For maintenance of machines and equipment, the welders shall handle power cut formalities, and hang a warning sign on operating switches; after maintenance, the welders shall handle power supply formalities, and inform relevant personnel.
As the first person responsible for the project management, the Project Manager is fully responsible for the quality, safety, construction period and cost of the project.
The Level-I horizontal control network is proposed to be located on an official pavement or stable ground at a distance of three times of the excavation depth of the foundation pit, so as to ensure its stability.
To organize and develop quality training work, and to direct and participate in QC team activities.
conducting scientific and technical researches aimed at improving the project quality, organizing relevant personnel to make technological breakthrough of the project, actively applying advanced construction technologies, techniques and materials in combination with the construction characteristics of the project, and striving to promote the scientific research achievements of the project quality.
Electric train staff is adopted on the existing narrow-gauge railways of which the signal system lags behind.
b) respond to actual emergencies;
C25 W6F150 reinforced concrete overflow dam retaining wall
Enter the equipment status alarm screen, inspect and clear the alarm items, and then start the flaw detection.
3) The fire faucet shall be concealed according to the design requirement, pay attention to the installation direction of fire faucet, and work with the civil engineering to ensure that the fire faucet keeps accordant with the surface of firefighting box and building surface, the horizontal branch pipe below the fire faucet is 900MM to the floor, the center of the fire faucet opening is 1.1M to the floor.
m) Being responsible for Company's risk prevention system and daily management work;
The calculation model adopts the wheel and the axle interference fit, the wheel and axle adopt hexahedron entity unit, and the axle coordination surface adopts the face-face contact element.
Project Manager: Yang Xuesong (Signature)
3.3.2.4 Hidden Hazards and Hazard Management
1) In the mechanical ventilation system, the air pressure of the ventilation fan is greater than the resistance of the ventilation pipe;
The risk management team classified investigates the risk sources one by one according to the list of activities and procedures. The risk sources are basically divided into chemical, mechanical, biological, ergonomical, electrical sources, fire protection and flammable sources, also, occupational diseases and operating environment.
Relevant dismantling construction procedures should be transacted and the dismantling work is monitored by the Owner.
② Prepare the construction organization design, construction operation instructions, quality and safety technical guarantee measures and other construction operation documents and to resolve the technical problems appearing during the construction.
Excavated ballast materials shall be recycled as far as possible according to the requirements of the bidding documents, and those that cannot be recycled shall be piled up in strict accordance with the specified locations and requirements, and the ballast materials disposal area shall be well protected; during the loading and unloading of abandoned ballast, the operation shall be strictly regulated to avoid dropping on the way.
PF-04, wind volume: 10,500m3/h, static pressure: 250Pa, dimension: \U+2205 630X630, power: 4.0kW (380V)
Support the access of TCP/IP-based communication mode;
We asked the Contractor to provide complete frame plans to calculate the load path and the load, as well as the loads on the columns and the shear walls, so that we can check the pier cap and the columns of the first floor.
1、is the leading member of consortium, whileis (are) the member(s) of consortium.
The construction area covers 30 provinces, municipalities and autonomous regions in China, and more than 30 countries and regions in Asia, Africa, Europe, Oceania, Latin America and Antarctica.
Nameplate of "Don't open the door" under the automatic mode (simplified Chinese)
Table 4.20-2~4.20-7 list the maximum lateral acceleration of the frame and corresponding speed level where the car under test is on straight line (including straight turnout), No.18 lateral turnout and curves of different radius.
All deliverables for individual lifecycle phases shall be listed out in the SWQP.
The determined testing surface should guarantee that the tested position of workpieces can be inspected uniformly and sufficiently.
The weight deviation of parts requires to be controlled within ±4%;
For luggage transport, since shippers and consignees are separated, and luggages are in various batches and each batch has small amount and volume, they are basically transported quickly at any time. While for parcels, a shipping note is required to be provided beforehand.
59 All the materials, equipment and construction machines needed to fulfill the contract shall be afforded by the Contractor.
Completely-weathered gneiss: variegated, of crystalloblastic texture, of gneissic structure, mainly composed of minerals such as feldspar quartz and mica, with primary rock structure damaged, easily fragmented by pinching, of soft texture, with rock core mostly in powders and a few in fragments.
(2) Lighting box 1 and lighting box 2 are set in the substation according to the design, responsible for all general lighting loads in the substation, as well as the stations NS24, NS25, and NS26.
(3) Hazard identification and dynamics safety evaluation;
Fig.2.4-8 Structure Diagram of Highway Network within Project-affected Area
1) Length of vehicle (middle length of gangway)
New equipment pending for operation or with transformation and technical innovation or the equipment with original installation failing to be officially put into operation due to various reasons shall be qualified through relevant tests and written explanation of relevant technicians with agreement of director before being put into operation.
2) After adjustment, the safety valves shall not leak under the working pressure.
9.1. Interior decoration works shall be as per Code for Fire Prevention in Design of Interior Decoration of Buildings GB50222, and building floors shall be as per Code of Design of Code for Design of Building Ground GB50037.
Because the communication along the line is inconvenient, temporary communication facilities will be set all along the whole line to facilitate construction dispatching and cooperation.
Anti-floating by Loading (Mainly Applicable to Projects with Low Water Head)
Reinforcing cages are pre-assembled prior to the lifting;
Interface adaptation is required between different mobile device types on the same platform at the same time;
Unless otherwise specially indicated, the materials supplied by the respondent should be quoted in RMB.
Each part shall be installed safely and correctly without leakage to ensure stable operation during jacking of the tool pipe, checked strictly in advance and carry out commissioning.
1.10 Total building area of a single building: 532.90m2
d) Provide necessary production equipment, inspection facilities, personnel, process operation environment, relevant knowledge and other resources for the above process operation;
The requirements that are not specified by customer, but is expected (hopefully be fulfilled) or requirements that are necessary for the intended use of the product;
Measure the micromoisture content of SF6 gas in the circuit breaker;
It has a land area of 462,800 km2, 8300 km coastline, and 2,400,000 km2 waters, including 200 NM Exclusive Economic Zone.
CECEP Yantai Bio Energy Project 2X75t/h+2X15MW
Figure 11 Handrails in Saloon Area (To Be Updated)
Avoid beating the damaged bolt thread in demolishing.
(2) As for major issues and business, takes responsibility for reporting to the company headquarters as well as contacts and coordinates with property department, neighborhood committee, environmental sanitation department and urban management bureau;
Interval track laying: From March 20, 2021 to December 16, 2021;
6. According to law, submit the stock exchange preparatory work listed in paragraph 1 of clause 1 of the resolution to the State Great Khural within 2018.
This project has gradually become an important visit and investigation object in the domestic convention and exhibition industry and has received favorable comments from the government and industry.
These data will be submitted during the construction drawing design stage.
b. Electrical connector cables, cable sleeves, plugs and sockets on the carbody
4. The content of P2O5 in flotation concentrate is about 29.61%, with a significant concentration of fluorapatite, which is around 76%, and the dissociation degree is around 94%. The flotation effect of magnesium carbonate minerals in concentrates is obvious, the total content is about 4% and the content of Mg is 0.4%, and the effect of magnesium removal is good.
Inverted hanging (pasted) stone materials shall not be used for external decoration.
This classification method divides the surrounding rock of the tunnel into 6 classes.
The debts of the Company prior to separation shall be assumed jointly and severally by the companies resulting from the separation, except for those otherwise specified in written agreements reached by and between the Company and creditors in respect of debt repayments prior to the separation.
During construction, measure the film thickness with wet film thickness gauge to control the dry film thickness, and each pass of paint shall not have lifting, flaking, miss, blistering and other defects.
④-4 Fine sand soil (Q/4al+pl/): grayish white, slightly dense, saturated, grain materials most feldspar and quartz, silt filling, containing few round pebble (content 10% and grain size: 2~20mm).
The route is 430 → 3KYK being normally open → LYK at running position → LYZJ being normally open and closed → 402 → QDK being normally open and closed → QD opening solenoid being energized → 300.
For this section, 1 girder prefabrication/storage yard will be set up in Vientiane South.
Material Support Department, Production Department and Workshop, etc shall be responsible for protection of identification and regional management of inspection status.
Each settlement zone is provided with an effluent unit, specification of single set 109L/s, 1.5 kW/set, tank width 15.75m,
Mud content of the coarse aggregate for DK116+554 (Hurso) Traction Substation is out of limit.
2. Operators must wear dust masks;
a. For the overflow of hydrogen sulfide in sewage well, obvious signs shall be put up at the sewage well, and special personnel shall be sent to carry out a patrol on the sealing conditions of the sewage well containing sulfur. If any abnormal condition is found, the site construction personnel shall be immediately informed and evacuated.
Each batch of iron plates shall include 6 separately cast test bars. Test 3 randomly chosen bars, and all iron plates shall be deemed qualified when 3 bars are qualified.
(1) Financial assets (financial liabilities) at fair value through profit or loss
[Economic Calculation] The project has a self-owned capital of RMB 50 million, a bank loan of about RMB 290 million, and an additional investment of about RMB 1.2 billion in sales revenue.
Industrial two-layer gigabit optical fiber switch S63Cable wire wrapper
Continuous turning of the sands cause serious wear to the refractory lining;meanwhile, the high flow rate of flue gas causes serious erosion and wear to the incinerator.
The bolts of ground seal wires need to be welded at all switches and the spots underneath the wall bushings.
A Linkage control mode, action signals of the pressure switch of the wet alarm valve, acting as the trigger signals, shall start up the sprinkler fire pump in direct control. The automatic or manual state of the linkage fire controller shall not influence the fire linkage control.
These outputs may be used by the vehicle to illuminate the door opening button on the cabin.
1. Require the suppliers to add date of production on the certification of insulating materials.
19.12. Control on unqualified products
7.8 Test termination: Terminate the test after 96 hours and measure the pH.
Distribution characteristics and properties of soft soil shall be further identified in the next stage, and economic, reasonable and effective disposal measures will be taken.
2017 Financial Budget Statement Amount: RMB 10,000
15.4.11.1 Interface with Communication Discipline
Size inspection: includes coating thickness (this belongs to FAI content), total length check, etc.
Function indication: a contact is provided in the charger to indicate the working status of charger.
Then qualified materials shall be used to anchor the anchor bolts of base slabs under bearings. At the same time, the gap between base slabs and pad stone shall be filled to ensure the close adhesion between the pad stone and bearings.
We have received your Request for Submission of State-owned Equity Management Plan of Lanpec Technologies Limited (under Construction) (GJZ [2008] No. 344).
Traveling speed: ≥20/25km/h (full load/no load);
B. Radial run-out of axis of taper hole of tailstock spindle
1. Assign a professional operator with certificate for specific crane; 2. Stop operation in adverse machine status; 3. Maintain hoisting load and scope as specified; 4. Designated dangerous areas; 5. Firmly erect landing legs.
When the desired consistency is achieved, the water consumption can be reduced.
3 Treatment measures for tunnels passing through unfavorable geological sections and special rock and soil sections.
④ The operating environment within the work shaft is good and safe.
EN50155 Railway Applications-Electronic Equipment Used on Rolling Stock
The lifting rod and outer cap for axlebox is capable of bearing the load of normal lifting, but not the load of vibration impact.
For standardization, the entrance valve with dimension not exceeding8 T 10(DN 200 * DN 250(inlet, outlet*) should use the following standard dimension ranges corresponding toAPI 526 .
Reinforcement fabrication: The reinforcement cutting, fabrication and binding shall be performed in strict accordance with the design drawing and construction acceptance specification. It is forbidden to bind and form the unqualified semi-finished product.
Notwithstanding how poor the actual outcomes are or what figures are derived by application of the various formulae under the PAA, the total amount payable by the Other Alliance Participants under Limb 3 will be capped at the value of Limb 2.
The role, responsibility, and authority of the organization are governed by the Chairman, controlled by the Human Resources Department, and implemented by related functional levels.
The action mode of the algorithm is shown in Figure 3-3.
Main Work Quantities for Resuming Unit Works to the Status before Suspension
Inspection quantity: The contractor shall inspect 2 equally-spaced sections and 4 equally-spaced points in every 100m for each layer, with 1 point respectively at the left and right of each section; the supervision company shall carry out witness inspection for 1 section and 2 points in every.
2. The appearance index is as following: The surface shall be of the same color and free of such defects as pores, scars, upset fins and burrs except for the sprue lines with the height not exceeding 0.5 mm; the internal thread shall be free of defects that may affect free screwing of the screw gauge;
3. Section SJSG01 of G25 Fuyang-G60 Zhuji High-speed Contact Line Project
Technical defects are identified by qualified technical evaluation institution specified by Party A; for update and production stopping of key parts and other parts in vehicles produced by Party A in the total service life, Party A shall be entitled to freely order a new design service to Party B.
The supplied tubes and pipes shall be matched with pipe fittings such as flanges and elbows to avoid impact on installation due to inconsistency of the connector dimensions.
The fine raw stock is used in the filling. It is forbidden to fill with pure mortar. Stop-over is not allowed when vibrating beams advances.
For the Project, the voltage level of HV power supply is 33 KV, and the voltage level of LV power equipment and lighting equipment is 220/380 V.
If a problem cannot be solved in the above two ways within 1 hour after receiving a user's request, the Seller shall send a technical person to the site for troubleshooting within 4 hours.
(2) Staggered joints: This may be caused by the inconsistent specification of the surface material dimension. The material has not been carefully selected and sorted before use; the joint was not aligned according to the plump line during the laying of tiles.
The natural water content is high, the compressibility and the void ratio are relatively large, and the main body is in the soft plastic – liquid plastic state; the bearing capacity is low, the compressibility is high, and the overall engineering properties are poor.
In case sublevel roadway has stable rock, drill jumbo shall be adopted for full-section tunneling; in case of instable soft rock, advanced small pipe method shall be adopted for construction.
H-30518,H-30519,H-30520 installation drawing
The combustible gas pipelines shall not be laid in enclosed ceiling.
The equipment shall be subject to proper parameter adjustment in accordance with the equipment procedure or process requirements and adjustment beyond the range is prohibited.
CREEC has proposed to Oromia to start the preliminary work of "Two Lakes and One Mountain" tourism project.
4) When conductor have kinks, broken strands and obvious loose strands, and the damage area at the same section exceeds 5% of the total section of the conductive part, they shall not be used;
Moving interval of plate vibrator shall be able to guarantee that the plate of vibrator covers the edge of the part that has already been vibrated compact.
5.2.3.2 The visible part at the air outlet of air duct shall be black or dark gray and shall not generate a negative influence on the performance of thermal insulation material due to spraying.
If the goods quality, specification and quantity are inconsistent with those specified herein, the Buyer can reject the goods, and the Seller can choose to replace the rejected goods.
1 GR: chassis circuit energized and glow plug preheated
Hazard List and Risk Assessment (SGEPRI/GD-160.03)
During construction, protect subgrade and slope with vegetation greening in time. During bridge culvert construction, various materials and machinery shall not be piled up at will to avoid damaging vegetation.
Antistatic class B, summer casual short sleeved suit
take the initiative in ascertaining the facts and matters required for a decision,;
11. Organize and hold the theme conference of safety risks, form the meeting minutes and report it to the chief supervisor.
5.1.2.1 Categories of Cargo, Annual Planned Handling Capacity and Ship Types
The Automatic Train Supervision (ATS) subsystem is the central train command system, which can effectively improve the operation management level, service level and reduce the labor intensity.
The overall layout of the construction site should be reasonable, and can ensure normal and smooth construction and high quality. Especially, transportation roads, flood control and drainage, equipment storage, water supply and power supply, raw material stacking in the site area should be reasonably arranged.
increase by 0.04％ based on the specified maximum value, until the maximum value of manganese is 1.10％ (WCA), 1.28 ％ (WCB) and 1.40% (WCC).
All the test reports comprising analyses and conclusions shall be submitted to CRRC PuZhen within one month after test completion for approval.
This function is used to conduct a comprehensive test on the performance of various single relays.
Focus on checking the operating conditions of important facilities and equipment for work safety and their regular management and maintenance; conducting safety risk identification, assessment, classification and publicity, registering and establishing files for the production and operation places subject to greater risk factors as well as the major hazards, and formulating and implementing the management and control measures.
Deflection measurement: The liquid-gas coupling type bridge deflection gauge with national patent developed by our company is used. The gauge has a resolution of 0.1 mm.
AL1 (4, 6~8) lighting distribution box
Subject: notification of environment department of the installation date for corresponding (name of structures) under the contract (contract No.)
When booking office machine provides passengers services to the paid area and non-paid area simultaneously, the booking office machine is in selling and fare adjustment mode, namely all functions of booking office machine can be realized.
Electric welding rod 422 Φ2.5~3.2
1. Class A design is adopted for pile foundation in the Project.
The electrically heating fan and splitter-type air-conditioner shall be provided for the control room, battery room and other rooms where the personnel shall stay for a long time or have strict requirements for the ambient environment, and the houses with the explosion-proof requirements shall be the explosion-proof type.
Labor protection articles distribution standard and management regulation
In 2017, the investment completed was RMB 36.38 billion, of which the investment in key transportation projects was RMB 30.37 billion, with a year-on-year increase of 47.8%.
For the entry of rented equipment, it must be inspected before use .Unqualified equipment may not be put into use.
After the cash box is replaced, a note for such replacement shall be printed.
The maximum working time in H2S environment should not exceed 8h.
For subbase of railway, if rigid pile foundation is employed for the reinforcement of foundation, in addition to the check and calculation for stability and deformation of subgrade, the check and calculation for the vertical bearing capacity of single pile shall also be performed.
Noise pollution during operation period is mainly train running noise and vehicle base noise.
14. Standard for structural drawings (GB 50105-2010)
The broadcasting device of the train has the emergency alarm function at the saloon.
For a steady uniform flow of the open channel, because , the above formula can be written as
The geomembrane numbers shall be archived by the Supervising Engineer for inspection.
Where it is necessary to copy or extract any secret data file, advance approval shall be obtained from the person/unit who or which defined the original security level or their superior department. The copies or extracts shall be properly managed at the original security level.
Fig. 5 Primary Fault Clearance Check under Straight Ground
g) methods, standards, documented procedures and tools to be used;
5.2.1 After purchased parts and outsourced parts are delivered to the Company, the Logistics Department shall store them in the to-be-inspected area by category or batch for the incoming stock inspectors to inspect, either all of the products or sampling, depending on the specified requirements.
Seller: Shanghai Schneider Electric Power Automation Co., Ltd. (Seal)
In order to guarantee the safety of passengers and staffs, safety grounding devices for car body are provided in stations and depots.
Management Regulations on Construction Quality Observation / Non-conformance
On the premise of accurately measuring the thickness of fault fracture zone and the fault attitude, project to the tunnel on the tunnel longitudinal section by using projective method and projection formula of surface geology to get the location on the tunnel and width of fault and its crushed zone.
The D17 type 10-axle 150t well-hole car was manufactured by CSR Zhuzhou Rolling Stock Works in 1969, with total manufacturing quantity of 25, and it plays an important role in transport of large cargoes.
4.10.1 The site layout shall be prepared strictly according to the requirements of Bidding Document and relevant specifications of Kazakhstan, with full consideration of the impacts by local weather, geographic location and road environment.
(2) Refine the entire transport and loading and unloading process to each operation step, arrange the optimized operation flow chart, and indicate the personnel allocation to each step.
The system has the built-in business model, and can rapidly realize business modeling and adjust personalized business models for different businesses.
Establish quality management system in strict accordance with the quality assurance, perfect the management mechanism and construction program, improve the quality of management and avoidreworking due to quality problems.
2.5.5.15.1 Process Flow
TB/T 3139 or requirements related to the same or above standards
The block diagram of PIS is as shown in Fig. 3-38:
Diameter of reinforcement cage ≤ 10mm; length of reinforcement cage ≤ 50mm;
Bidirectional geogrids at the two sides of the side slope are 3.0 m wide, with a 0.6m spacing from one another. A geogrid with an interval of 4 m shall be laid on the full section at the bed bottom.
Chapter 4_Annex 10 Introduction to Intellectual Property and Standardization System of CRRC ZELC
6. The burial depth of the retaining wall is guaranteed to be at least 1m, the relevant regulations are referred to for other unfinished matters.
Review of technical scheme: review of the construction organization design and technical scheme of cast-in-cantilever construction submitted by the subcontractor for review.
Implement environmental noise inspections three times per month and timely solve the detected problems.
In order to optimize the pipeline arrangement according to the collision results, the principles for the corresponding pipeline arrangement can be set: E&M pipes shall give way to water pipes, and water pipes shall give way to air ducts; small pipes shall give way to large pipes, and pressurized pipes shall give way to non-pressurized pipes; pipes with small construction difficulty shall give way to pipes with big construction difficulty.
The audit team leader shall summarize the audit records, problem lists and assessment scores submitted by each auditor, and the final evaluation results shall be used as the important basis for appraising the outstanding units, collectives and projects in annual quality management work of the company.
Reinforcement Structure of Abutment Ear Wall, Bill of Materials for An Abutment Ear Wall and Bracket
Speed-flow curve for calibrated service level standard
When the financial instruments such as perpetual bond and preferred stock which are classified as equity instrument are issued (including refinancing), repurchased, sold or cancelled, the transaction costs related to the equity variation treatment of the Company shall also be deducted from the equity.
Test the distribution and change of the air pressure difference between the inside and outside of the EMU body when the EMU passes through the tunnel at different speeds.
2) Design consultation basis (e.g., relevant laws and regulations, preliminary design confirmation documents, design contracts and important meeting minutes);
The jerk rate complies with EN 13452-1 standard and is limited to 0.75m / s3.
The "red card" elimination area and "yellow card" pending area are set.
Operators should be equipped with protecting earplugs and earmuffs to reduce the influence of noise.
Under the premise that not reducing the responsibility of the Contractor under the contract, the Contractor shall purchase insurance for the personnel who participate in the project construction and for construction equipment and vehicles at its own expense, as per the good industry practice and related national regulations.
Install the capacitor according to the attached drawing and the assembly detail. For bolt installation, see the assembly detail. The torque of M6
To avoid environmental impact, persons shall be specially assigned to regularly clean, collect and move the garbage to the designated garbage dump every day; and the garbage will be moved out of the park by garbage trucks, and discarded at designated site.
shall be paid by the Construction Contractor partially or wholly.
1. Splice welding is allowable, which shall be secure and beautiful. All welded joints shall locate at the inner side;
Manual of Emergency Troubleshooting on Route for CRH380A EMU
TB/T1802-1996 Rain Leakage Test Method for Railway Vehicles
The slope of culvert embankment shall be paved with protection. The protection heights of the upper and lower reaches shall be 0.25 m above the flood design frequency water level respectively, and shall not be lower than the cone height.
(7) The Contractor shall take measures for construction safety to guarantee the safety of the project, personnel, materials, equipment and facilities and avoid any personal injury or property loss due to engineering construction according to Sub-clause 6.1 [Safe and Civilized Construction];
The length of bridges accounts for 13% of the total length of the line. Refer to Layout of Bridges and Culverts for details.
The Contractor shall submit his method of construction for the water networks and the house connections to the approval of the Project Manager before start to the works on site.
The on-site operation workers' temperature shall be taken by the subcontractors that contact on-site engineers, and relevant ledgers shall be registered.
Project Description: Newly Constructed Jilin-Huichun Railway Key Control Engineering Bid Section JHSK-1, the product has big size, more working points and tight construction schedule; locating in the severe cold area in Northeast China with long winter and low temperature; the project has high requirements on environment protection and water and soil conservation.
Non-visible coupler parts (inner surfaces of hollow parts)
There are 47 items in total. All of them are found to be in conformity with the provisions.
Hydraulic oil is characterized by such physical properties as compressibility and viscosity, etc.
(12)Batteries for UPS power supply shall be considered as one set.
In order to ensure the dimensions of structure, integral assembly shall be made before hoisting.
Subtotal of anchoring support of radar transponder of whole bridge: 2 sets: square steel pipes: 13.8 Kg; stainless steel plate: 58.8 Kg
Management Office for ADB-funded Lanzhou Urban Roads Development Project
The longitudinal and transverse drainage measures on both sides of transition section at the transition section or at the bottom of embankment shall comply with the design requirement.
Take charge of providing up-to-labor-health-and-safety-standard labor protection articles, give out and manage individual labor protection articles according to issuing standard and management method.
3 The construction is mainly based on flow operation and supplemented by cross construction. Considering that the Project has a long construction period, and smooth traffic must be ensured during the construction, the idea of half-width construction and half-width passage is adopted. For bridge and culvert construction, it is planned to build a new half-width after mobilization.
-Dispose such potential undesired consequences as possible accidents of customers during the use process of products and services.
Total usage of HRB335 reinforcement (≥Φ10): 6,327 (kg)
Sleeper beams of girder-storage platforms shall be provided1 meter from both ends of the girder (position of a lifting point for girder design).
——The review results and the measures caused during review shall be recorded.
If the fuel is not up to standard, the driver shall have the right not to refuel, and Party B shall bear the downtime loss caused.
At the same time, the locking date and locking rail temperature will be marked with paint on the outside of the rail or on the observation pile, and recorded.
1.5 Manage the Project within the scope authorized by the Project Manager.
Table 5.3.1 Maximum Compressive Stress of the Abutment Bottom (MPa)
Fifth payment for the shopping center and Tower T1
1. 450x520x20 sesame gray granite (smooth)
The type test is the responsibility of the supplier, and shall be performed by the supplier according to the test plan proposed by the supplier and approved by CSR Puzhen.
Report to the project department immediately after accidents, organize accident investigation and handling;
We acknowledge that, in the event that our company is added to any such list of sanctions, the client is entitled to exclude our company from the procurement procedure and,.
(2) The cross section of the ditch shall have enough water passing capacity, convenient for cleaning and checking.
The design flow rate and minimum critical flow rate of the culvert are all greater than the non-scouring velocity of light loam of 0.75m/s, so the ditch at the culvert outlet can wash away deposits, without siltation.
(1) Light fittings shall be installed as per applicable Light Fitting Layout Drawings.
Gray wall and floor tiles are adopted in the kitchen and the pinch plate is of white background.
(6) Text and schematic diagram (mainly geological photographs) shall be adopted in conjunction for investigation record-making of engineering geology. The record data shall be accurate, reliable, clear in statement with the texts and pictures consistent with each other.
Winding method: fold the branch line into 90 ° and close to the main line.
Design running speed: 120km/h for passenger trains and 80km/h for freight trains;
According to the characteristics of the project, two 55t cranes are used for the installation.
Freight orders, cooperated with Chongqing Logistics City on vehicles of Gefco, Management Committee ofLianglu Cuntan Bonded Port on vehicles of Pang Da Automobile Trade Co., Ltd. as well as Chongqing Xiyong Micro-electronics Industrial Park on vehicles of Greenland Runtong Group, are increasing, totaling up to 900 finished vehicles which are 480 containers.
The product structure has excellent fireproof performance, for its design of structure and all the components as well as the manufacturing process are all implemented in compliance with relevant fireproof specifications. Hence, it conforms to the laws and regulations regarding fireproof and, to the maximum degree, prevented fire from happening.
Organizing the implementation of rectification actions; and implementing the schemes and rectification actions
L1-L9998 "L" reads as "Lin" or "A"
6. During construction, it must be noted that the whole length of the culvert and the pipe section shall be arranged accurately. For oblique pipe culvert, the oblique pipe section at two ends shall be arranged first and others are arranged as 1.0m standard pipe section, and the remaining pipe sections less than 1.0m shall be adjusted as 0.5m straight pipe section.
① Before installation construction, handover and acceptance of equipment foundation shall be performed.
The cut-off valve is adopted when the diameter of the living water supply pipe is less than or equal to 50 mm, and the butterfly valve is used when the pipe diameter is greater than 50 mm.
General Layout of Frame Box Culvert with Aperture of 1-4.0m (Skew Angle: θ=25°)
Sick leave of three days or less shall be reviewed and approved by the department head, while that of more than three days shall be reviewd and approved by General Manager of Business Department.
Temporary lines generally serve for 15 days and one month at the maximum. The construction periods of infrastructure and installation works are determined based on the construction plans.
The photovoltaic power stations shall implement various safe production inspection schemes.
The software has been applied to the feasibility study design, preliminary design and construction drawing design of multiple railways including Taiyuan ~ Zhongwei (Yinchuan) railway, Shijiazhuang ~ Taiyuan dedicated passenger line, Beijing ~ Shanghai high-speed railway and Beijing ~ Tianjin intercity railway and has good performance.
Establish an interconnected platform to ensure timely and effective implementation of on-site rescue and safe transfer tasks, reduce casualty rates accident losses.
Construction traffic engineering (on-site and off-site construction access)
The interior wall surface, ground and ceiling, etc. shall be decorated according to the process requirements.
In August 2017, the CREC Survey and Design Group conducted the first site survey of the Sokhna-Alamein Railway and completed the Sokhna-Alamein Railway Project Proposal (the version with speed of 160 km/h and internal combustion), which was submitted to Ministry of Housing and Urban-Rural Development and Ministry of Communications of Egypt.
Matters not covered in the Contract shall be solved through supplementary agreement by both parties (including engineering negotiation records, minutes, engineering changes, site access, claims, adjustment reports of contract price and other modification documents), which is an integral part of the Contract.
Locomotive depots are equipped with wireless maintenance stations that are equipped with wireless maintenance equipment.
Each component shall be firmly and reliably assembled, each lamp shade shall be opened and closed flexibly with even gap around, and the locking function of each lamp frame shall be good.
The details of requirements of fillers and compacting standards of the subgrade bed are listed in table 1 and 2.
(3) Animals: Except the police dogs that may be used by police, all other animals are forbidden on site.
To operate and manage the advertising, catering, motel, retail, automobile and electromechanical maintenance, automobile accessories, fuel oil sales, highway engineering and other related service businesses within the permitted scope along the Project under the Agreement.
Instruments shall be selected based on import or joint capital and economical, safe and reliable products shall be chosen;
The basic limit width of the rolling stock is 3400 mm, plus the signal devices on both sides of the train, and the total width is 3600mm.
2.1 The movement speed of each cylinder and the traveling speed can be adjusted manually and steplessly.
The traction feeding dispatching area of this line is kept consistent with the train dispatching area.
If the oil content of internal drainage of the plant is higher than the requirements of internal drainage oil content of the plant outside battery limit, the oil separator is necessary.
6.12.4 Cooperate with relevant departments in earnestly performing the investigation and handling of major safety accidents. Propose the suggestion of imposing disciplinary punishment within the Party on Party members and cadres responsible for the accidents according to relevant provisions in the Chinese Communist Party Disciplinary Regulations, if necessary.
3\U+00D724+8\U+00D722.2 I-girder + T-girder
Incidents that can directly or indirectly cause casualties, occupational diseases, property damage, and environmental pollution;
Corrective actions for the nonconforming items discovered in the internal and external audits shall be developed in accordance with Internal Audit Procedure;
(1) Existence of typical regional congestion: main urban areas, northern urban area, high-tech zone, Xiaozhai, Dayanta business area and surrounding roads.
According to Article 5.8.8.2 of BS5400-4: for rectangular-section beam, T-girder body and other physical section without concave angles, the design crack width can be calculated with the following equation:
Fig. 9-2-3-5-4 Process Flow of Cantilever Casting Construction
In this region, fault structures are developed in large scale and long extension and form the unique local hydrogeological conditions.
Generally, there are embedded lifting rings for hoisting roofing boards, and hoisted can be made by hooking the lifting rings with hanger.
The Quality and Safety Department shall receive the QHSE objectives issued by higher authorities, develop the QHSE objective breakdown programmes and convey and release them on the information platform of the department.
2.4.4.2.2. Management Measures for Construction in Rainy Season
Fig. 2-1 Organization Diagram of Project Management Department for Steel Tower of ÇANAKKALE Bridge in Turkey
TB/T 1333-1996 General Technical Specification of Electrical Equipment for Locomotive
In order to achieve the planning goals of the Dammam Oasis project, it is inevitable that sanitation management can maintain the domestic leading level, and step forward to the international advanced level to fully realize the "harmlessness, reduction and recycling" of urban waste.
9.4The Bidder should provide related technical materials to the Purchaser.
Compliance officer shall participate in and supervise the tender activities, and shall strengthen the examination and control of the authenticity, accuracy and completeness of the data required for tender in the tender evaluation, so as to ensure the authenticity and accuracy of the preparation of bid documents.
The operators must take appointment with certificate and be familiar with the technical performance of cranes.
Inspection of concrete strength, quality inspection and submission to supervision engineer
Railway mileage scope: GK238+200~GK241+488.852 Survey Phase
230kV, 64 foundations and 64 iron towers assembly and erection.
a) Responsible for organizing the initialization, review and appraisal for new products, preparing annual new product development plans and checking the implementation of the plan;
1 Work safety responsibility system should be established and designated safety inspectors should be arranged, work safety management, supervision, inspection and safety technical disclosure should be well made.
3. The Applicant Organization must provide appropriate maintenance and closure facilities and conspicuous safety and other bulletin boards at the road section or area temporarily occupied.
The audit team leader communicates with the participants to confirm the audit plan;
Component sections are selected from tekla section library for component modeling.
The length of each pipe segment should be neat and uniform to facilitate measurement of the length and to make the markings and records.
Table 3-4-5-3 Data Sheet for System Functional Test of Athi River Station
Correctness of the spacing between supports and the spacing with water pipe, correctness of the wiring of junction box, and the straightness of pipeline in horizontal and vertical directions
3. Employ part of the labors from provinces and regions with slack farming season to guarantee the construction progress.
In METHARA, the groundwater with a large content of chloride salt and fluoride is not suitable for direct drinking. Detailed descriptions are as follows:
If the oil motor is not seized up at the "load increase" position but the voltmeter 1V's reading is large, this is generally caused by a smaller resistance of R4.
In the process of pouring concrete, the formwork keeper shall flush the seepage slurry on the back of the formwork with a high-pressure water gun (after initial setting of concrete, all rooms shall be cleaned one by one).
Fig. 3-5 Arrangement of Traction Points for Point Rail of Turnout 1/18
Etad _ minimum _ pump = pump efficiency of the second group pumps of Savay-1 Pump Station when the total design waterhead is 49.00 m:
4. See the drawing of "MWSF 12" for the details of grounding system set for this tunnel.
9.9.5 150 high C20 waterproof concrete is adopted for balcony block and wall foot, and the width is the same as that of upper wall.
The Production Section shall conduct strict and continuous quality monitoring on critical procedures and special procedures, and fill a variety of monitoring records as required.
Specific type, quantity and special requirements shall be determined during design liaison.
② Stacking: Reinforcements will be stacked at the designated site according to specification and classification and equipped with a nameplate showing name, specification, origin, etc.
The subgrade in bridge head and pond section in the wetland is protected by M7.5 slurry block.
The Contractor shall update all Octopus Reader/Writer with the latest Octopus API provided to ensure they are in the proper working conditions. Appropriate testing and commissioning of all Octopus Reader/Writer shall be conducted by the Contractor, prior to the date for substantial completion of the whole of the Works.
4.7.2 The Contract Clarification Meeting shall be organized and convened by the Project Manager;
If a system consists of multi-state components whose safety changes with time, at first, the critical state of system safety shall be identified; this state may pose a threat to the environment, or it is unsatisfactory for reaching the level of efficiency during operation process.
After comprehensive analysis, it is more advantageous to adjust the track laying base from Boten to Vientiane. Therefore, it is recommended to adjust the track laying base to Vientiane.
Switch, router, AP, server, working station, disk array, equipment cabinet, siding frame and terminal, etc.
Use thin copper bar of 0.6mmX100mm
Code for Design of Gathering and Transmission Systems in Highly Hydrogen Sulfide Gasfield
The declaration forms for general import goods shall be filled in duplicate; for goods that need to be canceled after verification by the Customs and goods refunded in tax, an additional special declaration form for tax refunding shall be filled;
100V voltage is respectively connected from phase a, phase b and phase c in the secondary coil circuit of voltage transformer through a three-phase tap changer to trigger opening of voltage relay contacts, and at the same time, the wires for overcurrent protective device test through high-current method are connected to the setting current value.
Problems of poor line type and great impacts on road traffic caused by viaduct construction exist in the Option.
8 rows of runway beams total 426, 0.4m thick and length and width different. Wire mesh is set inside beams and dowel bar is used to connect two neighboring beams.
Ningxia Intercity Railway Electric Power Relocation Engineering Department of China Railway 21st Bureau Group Electricity Electrochemical Engineering Co., Ltd.
The user can call and display the fault recording data in the protection device by station number and serial number and store the data in the monitoring workstation. The files shall be named after the station number, serial number and fault time.
② Apply one coat of plain cement slurry and roughen it (mixed with construction adhesive)
To make evaluation that working environment can meet the requirements of product manufacturing or not. To perform adjustment or reformation if it cannot meet the requirements,;
TB/T 412-2014 Technical Specification on Turnouts for Standard-Gauge Railway
Certificate No.: 1367742018000376 July 3, 2018
3.3.2 Opportunity and frequency of compliance evaluations
Incoming Goods Inspection (Quality Control of Raw and Auxiliary Materials, Packing Materials and Labels:
3. Grounding components should be welded by continuous double-sided welding, with a weld length not less than 100mm and height of 8mm.
In the future operating stage, under the condition of that the planning tunnel is navigable with the limit scouring once in a century, the tunnel burial depth is only about 5m, and the anti-floating capacity of the tunnel cannot meet the requirements.
Point the controller of projector to projector, then press "ON.
The principal of the Construction Contractor shall be organized timely to check and confirm the burying of underground cables during construction of concealed works of cable laying.
Operators must clean up the sawdust and shavings and cut off the power supply before leaving.
As reported by UAE "Gulf News", India's Minister of Railways Suresh Prabhu expressed in an interview with the local media that India would invest 140 billion US dollars on the construction of the railway network in the next five years.
11) Instructing the Technology Division to collect and sort out project archives.
According to the geological conditions in this bid section and the requirements of bidding documents, it is proposed to treat the foundation with concrete filling piles, thus to meet the requirements of foundation bearing capacity.
2. 9 thick 1:3 cement mortar priming and brooming
Location Diagram of the Glass Curtain Wall on Facade 1 (72° north by east)
Assembly and spot welding quality shall be checked to see if the spot welded seam has crack and air hole defects, and the assembly spacing shall comply with the requirements.
When the inspection train passes the 4 test work points of the track structure, the measured derailment coefficient, wheel load reduction rate and wheel axle lateral force are shown in Table 4-1-3-4.
Give rewards and punishments impartially. Those who fail to deal with and report incipient accidents and hidden dangers will be severely punished.
Distribution room and instrument remote IO station in the electrical area are considered to be arranged together. According to the Proposal, one electrical room will be arranged by the side of SP boilder and AQC boilder each;
Technical Specification for Occupational Health Supervision (GBZ 188-2014);
Joint fissures at dam foundation and on both banks are developed, resulting in leakage, so leakage prevention is required. Weak and soft zones at the dam foundation, such as fault, compresso-crushed zone, joint-concentrated zone, require special treatment; due to that the excavation slope is high (about 120m), there are structural soft zone and developed stress release fissure, so it is necessary to reinforce slopes.
In case of emergency such as fire, passengers shall be evacuated; emergency lighting and ventilation as well as video monitoring and emergency talkback systems shall be activated at the same time. Because large capacity batteries are used, the requirement of emergency power supply for 45 minutes can be satisfied completely. Saloon doors on both sides of the vehicle shall all be opened, and passengers shall escape through both sides.
The access road, water, electricity, and communication conditions meet the requirements for commencement;
The first article inspection (FAI) is carried out in the manufactory of Baotou Beifang Chuangye Co., Ltd., to make first-phase preparations for the batch manufacturing of 128 KW10 hopper wagons.
The ballast thickness is between 0.15-0.4m, in which a majority of it is between 0.2-0.3m.
The proposed project, located in Danfeng and Shanyang Counties, Shangluo City, Shaanxi Province, is an important part of the Danfeng-Ningshan Expressway, a provincial expressway.
If you have any questions, please contact by email:
1.4 Response to Key Items of Tender Specification Requirements
The jack is stably placed on the bearing plate with its piston connected to main girder.
The Tenderer shall be responsible for the development of all the monitoring software.
Comparison Between 1,500V Power Supply Mode and 750V Power Supply Mode
After completion, the number of mobile users in the area is about 0.42 million (140/100 people);
Equipment List of Communication Inspection System for High-speed Comprehensive Inspection Train (CIT) of Jakarta-Bandung High-Speed Railway in Indonesia
CRRC ZELC strictly follows the requirements of standards ISO9001 and IRIS and the company procedures, and selects subcontractors and carries out quality control according to the maturity priority principle, moderate competition principle, comprehensively preferential principle, re-admission principle and certification admission principle.
The steel pipes shall not be packed until all the inspection items are completed and declared qualified by the inspector.
330 mechanical coupler head used at the front end of the train needs to be coupled with the 330 coupler head of existing vehicle.
For special construction roads, urban roads, existing rural roads, agricultural tractor roads, and civil construction access roads along the line will be used so as to reduce land lease.
The powerhouse is composed of the turbine room, deaerator bay and chemical water workshop arranged in three rows. The deaerators and high-pressure (HP) and low-pressure (LP) heaters are arranged in the deaerator bay (B-C).
At the same time, please specify the specific completion position of waterproof measures for the lower layer during construction. If there is any change, please communicate with the Designer to adjust the planting position to ensure the plant growth environment is suitable.
After the water feeding valve has worked for the preset duration (2min), the liquid level of the water booster has not been reached.
2 Temporary facilities scheme, including the selection, scale and standards of temporary houses, material sites, construction access roads, electricity, and communication.
Integrated Monitoring, Access Control, FAS, BAS.
a) After the central system of the railway administration issues the Level-I P-wave early warning emergency treatment message, it will delay for 5s before sending the false warning release message of Level-I P-wave early warning.
The established structure health monitoring system shall be maintained.
Flow rate of cooling water used for cooling drills and removing concrete chips shall better be 3-5 L/min and the temperature shall be not higher than 30°C.
The battery is charged with constant power of 2200kW to 85%SOC, and the charging is stopped when the charging current is reduced to 0A.
6. Water supply for construction: The local domestic water, ground water and wells shall be taken as the water sources, and water reservoirs shall be set up to meet the construction and living water demand.
6.Bogies Provide the Best Ride Comfort and Higher Safety and Reliability
Detect the compactness with a nuclear density meter.
Figure 2-11 Male Island~Hulhule Island Trench and its Slope Fathometer Chart (May 2015)
After comprehensive comparison, the welded mesh is used in this project.
The thickness of the protective layer refers to the distance between the outer surface of the stressed principal reinforcement and the outer edge of the concrete.
5.4.1During the design of contract equipment, according to the requirements of the design process and schedule, the tenderee will send technicians for design liaison.
Dust and sand test & mould growth test: The tests shall be done as per IEC 60068 & IEC 60721.
Power-driven winching traction and A-type derrick shall be used for erection.
According to the Code for Design on Railway Bridge and Culvert (TB 10002 - 2017), the results of check calculation of longitudinal horizontal linear rigidity of pier and abutment and the displacement of pier and abutment top shall be:
Requirements for manufacturing accuracy of specially-made track rail are listed in the table below:
In case of a joint venture, the bid security must be in the name of all partners to the joint venture that submits the bid.
Under the rated load, the starting impulse current of the power supply is less than 3A.
Bridge piers with height less than 30m in the Lot are of solid piers, using large piece set-shaped steel formwork with scaffold support and one-time placing in place; bridge piers with height larger than or equal to 30m are of hollow piers with scaffold erection, turnover formwork and segmental construction and tower crane transportation.
A procurement bidding needs to be held in Laos, and the procurement objects can be international or non-Lao insurance brokers.
The highway load shall adopt "Class Ⅰ" or "ClassⅡ" based on the road class.
The system of a specific person responsible for specific mechanical equipment (excluding tools) shall be applied, such that a specific person can regularly maintain specific equipment.
The controlling train shall be equipped with ECP braking system and brake cylinder and air reservoir.
But by this mode, Laotian customs officers need to enter China's territory, which involves sovereignty issues and need to be decided through consultation between the relevant departments of two countries.
Contract price: RMB five billion one hundred and twenty-three million seven hundred and thirty-seven thousand eight hundred and forty nine (¥5,123,737,849).
7) Wiring shall be conducted in accordance with the requirements specified in EN 50343:2014 Railway Applications - Rolling Stock - Rules for Installation of Cabling.
(4) Do not drive without wearing seatbelt by driver.
Handle a humping route of certain station track, and then handle the shunting route to the station track in another throat section.
Party B shall be liable for its own interpretation of such data.
CENTER320 noise meter (No. XD005.
2. Each ticket selling/checking server of this system is computer-based; the backbone system network is equipped with GE, FE, 10/100Mbps interfaces and user interfaces of 10/100Mbps.
During concrete casting, vibration rods, etc. shall be used in time to avoid any formwork deformation under pressure resulting from extremely large load on part of the formwork.
Sign-in Form of First (Last) Meeting for Internal Audit------------------------------------------
Uphill: adhesive weight of locomotive = traction tonnage/[adhesion coefficient/(gradient + 0.005) - (gradient + 0.005)/(gradient + 0.0035)]
2. The door opening and closing test needs to be carried out for three times in the cab at both ends, and one photo is taken for door opening and closing of the whole train on the HNI screen and compressing state and two photos are taken in the cab at each end, totaling four.
Safety guarantee measures for high-altitude operation in civil works construction;
The average illumination value of the garage is 131lx, which is higher than that of the garage standard 30lx. It is suggested that the operation circuit should be reduced properly.
Take off the warning board "Work in Progress, no Switching on"near the power source of#1 slag scraperof#1 boiler,
2. The underfloor wheel lathe operator shall select the best machining process according to the diameter value measured by the system and the target diameter value, and determine the cutting times and the feed amount each time.
1) When the three-phase current of transformer is unbalanced, monitor the maximum one-phase current;
The locomotive brake control system is the core component to ensure the safe and reliable operation of the locomotive. It is generally composed of the brake controller (including automatic brake handle, separate brake handle), equalizing reservoir, relay valve, distribution valve, application valve, emergency valve, and other components such as pressure gauge.
2. The maintenance and test items and cycles of the digital dispatching switch of the station shall conform to the requirements of the following table.
A sample shall be taken from constructional columns, beams and slabs of all construction sections of all floors.
CCCC Third Harbor Consultants Co., Ltd. (Seal)
After the door leaf is installed and adjusted, the installation of steel waterstop can be carried out.
6.3.5When reinforcing bars are arranged at the concave corners of the tensile area of the member bar, the reinforcing bars shall not be bent according to the concave corners. Separate reinforcing bars which cross each other to form concave corners shall be provided. In addition, transverse reinforcing bars sufficient to bear no less than 35 % of the total force of all longitudinal reinforcing bars shall be provided at the place.
In the design of construction drawings, the overall layout of tunnels is reasonable, and the tunnel entrance is properly set and safely structured.
The station is the intermediate station for passenger and goods traffic service and is the starting station of this line as well as the junction station for connection of railway in the direction of KURMUK in the west of Ethiopia with this line.
And according to the uniqueness of the product indicated in the accompanying information of the product for identification and maintenance.
The position of the diesel generator room shall be convenient for the laying of pipelines and transportation of equipment as far as possible.
Attention should be paid to the two points: collection and transportation is not arranged at peak dining time and peak traffic hour.
The materials with defects mentioned above shall be stacked separately for research and treatment.
Flange sealing surface shall be intact and smooth without burrs and radial dents.
If the cash receiving staff wrongly receives the forged note, under the principle that "the one who takes charge of money will be held responsible and liable for compensation, the staff involved shall bear economic responsibility and compensate for the loss in full amount.
Before wiring, all sundries shall be cleaned out form monitoring data transmission unit, and the internal space shall be kept clean.
(2)Shanghai Electric (Group) Corp. will be responsible for the implementation of the general HSE plan and all subcontractors will be managed by the Contractor.
There is a broad and gentle wavy plain and a low hilly desert area.
The door control unit supports automatic detection and sufficient data storage capacity.
The cable shall be five-core cable. It shall be designed and arranged according to the construction plan and of overhead installation as required. The minimum vertical distance between the maximum sag of the overhead line and the ground of the construction site is 4 m.
The operation personnel did not perform relevant prying work carefully for top slope pumices.
Moreover, there will be 3 overpasses (1 at mainline toll station and 2 at ramp toll stations) and 1 maintenance division (the construction of which will be integrated with that of N17 Interchange ramp toll station).
1) When the unfavorable and favorable parts to the permanent action all use partial factor , instead of giving more unfavorable effects, then take , ,
Director of Geological Prospecting Development and Research Institute of the Administration, branch secretary, vice president, president, deputy chief engineer of the Administration, manger of Sugeli project,secretary, Professor of Engineering
When the actual conditions require to change the construction method or organization method, the logical relationship shall be adjusted.
Broken or damaged roots shall be completely cut off, which is conducive to the growth of roots.
7. Maintain original state of vegetation and trees inside and outside the construction boundary as much as possible.
The mixing operation length of the land leveler should be 300-500m each.
According to the standard EN 60077-1:2017, the insulation resistance between all wires and the ground shall not be less than 10 ΜΩ, and the insulation resistance of common circuits is shown in Table 11.4.2.4-1.
Reviewer: Hong Xuehai, researcher of Institute of Computing Technology, Chinese Academy of Sciences
Operation Department shall identify and determine existing potential nonconformities and causes according to the hazards and problems provided in after-sales service report and customer feedback.
An employee in a strange place shall attach the emergency treatment certificate issued by a local hospital with the Application for Personal and Business Leave, otherwise the Application is invalid.
4.4 The glass of the front window can bear 16 KPa aerodynamic loads.
Employer name: Municipal and City-appearance Administration Committee of Changping District, Beijing
The employer's telephone: 13924154159;
2. Mainly laid in conduit. The design requirements shall be met. Refer to the design drawings.
NH3-N of Department of Environmental Protection of Shanxi Province by Changzhi Changping Sewage Treatment Plant
Distribution System Drawing for Lighting Sockets of Operation Department: 3ATE2-SS1
Signed on: July 09, 2018
Inspectors shall establish a Quality Notification Form on nonconforming products disapproval, confirm the responsible suppliers, and sign comments (sales return or review), and inform the Procurement Management Department.
2.0.1 The fundamental assumption for strength calculation of the rails shall conform to following provisions:
According to the FGJ [2011] No. 534 Document, your company shall pay a bidding agency service fee of RMB 190,630.
(8) Strictly control the humidity and temperature of the workshop in accordance with the test specification; Arrange the instrument and equipment in order, keep the workshop tidy and clean.
The newly increased shunting locomotive shall be maintained and serviced by the locomotive depot of the neighbor line.
If the arrangement spacing between longitudinal diaphragms is small and , the shear capacity of the member can be calculated by making an assumption that .
Overspeed under rescued driving mode;
The camera screen used for sample confirmation is located at the bottom left corner of the program and shows the position information of the sample, and meanwhile it also the place where the X-ray inspection is conducted.
6) Full-automatic vehicle couplers are equipped at the ends of the train to realize the automatic mechanical, electrical and pneumatic coupling;
Table 1 Typical Cases of Urban Comprehensive Pipe Corridor Projects in China
This document is prepared for the steel pipe of air line (for braking system use) used in the motor train units of northeast corridor and California. The steel pipe of air line should meet the following technical conditions.
Calculation result shows that at condition of 750 V catenary voltage for traction and 900 V catenary voltage for braking under AW4:
The power source duration of emergency lamp battery is not less than 60min.
It shall combine with the geological conditions of subgrade works along the line, and aim at controlling deformation, to ensure the subgrade structure is even, stable and safe.
It refers to the thermal reservoir, caprock, heat controlling fault and relationships among them.
(2) Before put into use, the small- and medium-sized machinery and equipment and general protective facilities shall be reported to the relevant departments of the General Contractor for acceptance after performing self-inspection;
There shall be duty room, rest room, office, shift change room, material and tool room, fitter's room and room for battery charging and maintenance of lamps, inspection pending room and changing room.
Grade requirements and codes are specified in tables 1 and 2.
The distribution of lateral earth pressure is triangular, and the point of resultant force is 1/3H away from the bottom of the wall.
28.1 Stipulation on procurement of materials and equipment by the Contractor:
The factors that affect the insulation performance mainly are partial discharge, heat, mechanical stress and humidity, and its process is very complicated.
To preliminarily identify the distribution of differential weathering of eluvium and igneous rock.
The "half a car" refers to: the cab module, one window area, two door areas, the electrical cabinet at No.2 end, the end cover plate, interior parts of the gangway, etc. defined by CSR Puzhen's three-dimensional drawing files.
Installation of cabinet for braking resistor device-braking resistor
10.13 The Bidding Documents of No. jzzba2014041-02, and the Designer's three-volume Tender Documents dated on January 12, 2015 are the attachments of this Contract (each party holds one original of the bidding and tender documents) and shall have equal legal effect with the Contract.
8.1.14. Air conditioning unit shall be free of air leakage in any connection, weld and joint.
It is a special tool which is used to bend the rail during railway installation and maintenance.
Train formation: 6 motor cars and 2 trailers, in which A for trailers, B, C, D for motor cars, 4 moving axis for each trailer.
1.1 Pursuant to Contract Law of the People's Republic of China, Construction Law of the People's Republic of China and the regulations of other relevant laws, administrative laws and regulations and in the principle of equality, voluntariness, fairness and honesty, the Parties hereto have reached and concluded the Contract for construction of the Project through negotiation.
Project: the New Capital Rail Transit Monorail Train of 6th of October City Rail Transit Monorail Railway
(2) Responsibilities of members of Emergency Response Team for Security Incident:
Handover of the engineering entity shall be carried out as specified in the Tender-invitation and Tender Documents and the project contracting contract; the supervision company shall be responsible for and coordinate all parties to handle the handover procedure timely, solve potential problems and work hard to make the project be put into operation early.
Research on Human Factors of Violation Accidents Occurring in High Speed Railways Based on GEMS Model
Then report in written form to emergency leading group office of company as per the format prescribed in Information Report of Company's Emergency (see attachment 1).
Automatic Fire Alarm Plan of Exhibition Hall A6 - Floor 2
The rotary floor assembly includes a rectangular floor and a semicircular floor.
On-site processing of small pipes (φ42); sealing of rock surface by shotcrete; hole drilling by pneumatic rock drill; pushing small pipe into the hole by the jacking force of jumbo drill or pneumatic rock drill; controlling of drilling angle by inclinometer; pressurized injection of cement slurry by grouting pump.
The horizontal and longitudinal alignment of the whole line goes with the terrain and topography. The alignment indicators of it can meet requirements of high-grade highways after little transformation design except for the urban section and the hill section of the highway.
3.6.1 Start the large power transmission after the penetration of electrode to melt the materials in the furnace, and start the oxygen blowing to assist melting with the oxygen pressure from 0.8MPa~1.5MPa when most of the material in the furnace in the melting bath become red.
The primary lining made of sprayed concrete and rock bolts, steel frame, reinforcement mesh, etc. after excavation of the tunnel with composite lining.
On the request of a customer, the first article produced must undergo FAI. Without the customer's approval, batch supply is not allowed.
(b) Calculate the air volume based on the maximum number of people working in the tunnel at the same time (combination of the conditions of maximum number of people working in the tunnel at the same time: working face drilling + primary support erection + secondary lining concrete casting + secondary lining reinforcement installation)
(3) Construction setting-out: first set out every 10 m of middle piles and side piles at both sides, then set out block control piles according to concrete block conditions, and then measure the elevation of each control point. If the elevation is high, the parts beyond the deviation shall be supplemented by manual cleaning of the base course to ensure the construction thickness of concrete.
CHC National High-tech Quality Supervision and Promotion Committee
Commands shall be sent to the interlocking system immediately after operators input.
Accordingly, it is mainly considered to obtain the power by T connection with the local power supply. For some local key works, generator could be provided as backup power supply.
(1)Measure relevant parameters of wheel with the fourth type of wheel inspector for LLJ-4D type of railway rolling stock:
A large number of Chinese technicians and operators received training of different levels in the companies.
If obstacle still exists after three repetitions, door will hold obstacle for 5 minutes.
The height from the bottom of the shaft to the bottom of the lock collar is about 19 meters, which will be cut and supported in 9 cycles. Height of each cycle is about 2.1 meters. After each cycle excavation, the surface shall be timely supported by anchor and shotcrete. The progress rate is 10 days/cycle, and 90 days are required for the completion of shaft body construction.
Date relevant to quantity of sulfur to be sold (date relevant output at future period and inventory of each area) and customer demand shall be collected.
10.2.5 All training materials shall be easy to be copied, and audio and video products shall be able to be copied.
This anticline is developed in the middle of the tunnel barrel, where it appears as subsidiary small fold, with the axis extending in E-W direction. It is also developed in Carboniferous slate intercalated with sandstone, with the axis intersecting with the route at an angle of about 66° at DK229+244, where it appears as interbedded fold.
Upon assembling of lightning rod, install a waterproof cap, and cover the lightning rod base, embedded bolt and grounding wire with cement mortar, so that the base will be formed into a slope which is higher in middle with four 45° sides, so as to facilitate the water discharge.
In accordance with the tax law in Nepal, EPC consortium (or joint venture) is required to pay a withholding tax at a rate of 15% for the engineering fees paid by it to QYEC.
The external time source mainly uses the GPS timing signal, Beidou timing signal acts as the first standby, while the high stability crystal oscillation signal of internal time source acts as the secondary standby.
7.7.8.2.2 Construction Safety Management of Tunnel
All the tests mentioned above have been completed and the test results meet requirements of the test program.
Participate in the subcontracting of works and the tender for materials and equipment.
Fig. 3 Schematic Diagram of Intermediate Carbody Structure in Similar Projects
(2) Flotation test for sample 2 with 400-mesh fine fraction removed
3) Straight thread connecting sleeve shall be provided with certificate of quality. Bore-holes on the two ends shall be covered with sealing cover. The specification shall be marked on the sleeve surface.
Provide a door-to-door full logistics service for import sulfur containers
3) The steel pipe pile shall be inserted into the casing of the casing connection system after it is turned upright, and then the vibratory hammer shall be hoisted to clamp the pile.
Inspection quantity: The Contractor shall check 2 position for each construction section and at least 3 bars on each position.
7.1.1 General Plan of the Use of Maintenance Equipment in Rail Transportation Network
PV Power Generation Demonstration Base in Mining Subsidence Area of Baotou, Inner Mongolia
Super major bridge CIK220+238.10
Total mass generated by live load, total mass generated by load in user-defined working condition and total mass of structure are those results with live loads reduced (1t = 1000kg).
The Contractor shall observe the dewatering situations at any time, maintain the pumping equipment and lower the groundwater to the required height.
[1] Song Rui. Railway Transportation Facilities. China Railway Publishing House Co., Ltd., Beijing, 2012.
Undertake the material inspection, testing, semi-finished products and finished products testing, etc.
Adhere to the service idea of starting from initiative, giving the sincerity, and satisfying in the end, perform the consulting contract in an all-round and high-quality way.
Table 3-13 Forecast of Containers Traffic Division for Nairobi Container Central Station Unit: 10,000 tons
In the sixth step, click the start test button on the laptop, and the program can automatically obtain the pressure value of the brake shoe pressure sensor.
Goods parts provided and manufactured by other manufacturers (if any):
Tertiary system (M): it is yellowish brown in color and mainly formed by mudstone, with a burial depth of greater than 13m. It is mainly distributed in the section of GK182+100 ~ GK182+300. The heavy weathering layer is relatively thick, and the slightly weathering layer is not revealed.
The information security system must meet the requirements of Level 3 in Chinese classified information security protection, and the Tenderer shall ensure to pass the Level-3 appraisal and evaluation.
The vibrating mode is to vibrate with the plug-in vibrator or the plate vibrator. The pouring sequence is generally moving in rows based on the layout. The front and back positions and rows are overlapped with each other for 5cm to prevent incomplete vibration.
Arrange the aftermath and recover the production and living after major emergencies;
Treat sanitary sewage, waste oil water by means of 3 levels of precipitation and chemical separation.
⑤ Use a crowbar to lower the jack, so to prevent transformer vibration.
Concrete curing shall be performed timely by the specially-assigned persons in a special shift; the exposed parts shall be covered by wet geotextile and the inner part is directed watered for curing.
Be responsible for the validity of construction drawings and project changes; submit written materials to the Consulting Project Department on any problem found in the construction drawings during construction.
As indicated by temperature monitoring on full-scale space, the highest temperature is 50.7°C, appears in 55 hours after pouring. The maximum declining temperature difference from the highest temperature to the environment temperature is 36.3°C.
Record items in measurement handbook shall be filled in one by one.
(3) According to Notice on Requirements for Further Strengthening the Supervision of Construction Funds Flow(TC [2007] No.237) issued by the former Ministry of Railways
Registration items of the Company are subject to verification of the registration authority.
Certificate Registration No._______Z 98 No.
1. The specification of instrument root valves in the drawing is DN20.
Outdoor electrical works: outdoor cable installation (including 123.4M3 earthwork from outdoor cable trenches)
(2) It is recommended that the highest water level elevation of the anti-float design of the site is taken as 0.50m, the lowest water level elevation is taken as -7.50m, the uplift pile is adopted for the pure basement, and the pile type adopted is the bored pile.
PS0473MP07C-F Terminal block -X:
2.6.2 In terms of implementation, communication, operation and maintenance of the policies and objectives of the Quality Management System, whether the quality objectives at all levels set for achieving the overall quality objective are specific, well targeted, measurable and achievable.
1.2.1 For the funding source and proportion, please refer to the Pre-attached Schedules of Instructions to Bidder.
Person in charge of the construction area should be responsible for sefety technique of working at height and establish the appropriate responsibility system.
12.7 Take charge of inspection, storage and distribution of labor protection articles of the Company.
The beam-erecting (removing) equipment and lifting tools (jacks) (strength, rigidity and stability) and conditions of their static (dynamic) load tests, test run and acceptance made at construction site shall be examined, and corresponding records shall be made.
The data processing unit is a train-borne LAN system, composed of the database server, real-time processing computer, data analysis computer, network printer, and switch.
The Deputy General Manager in Charge of Technology shall be responsible for the management and approval of qualified suppliers.
It is a modern investment and construction enterprise that plays three roles (investor, builder and operator) into one.
Responsible units shall perform review of nonconforming problems against the nonconformities or nonconformance detected in quality control, quality control supervision, quality assurance supervision, external supervision and inspection, examination by management department, quality and quality assurance trend analysis or by other personnel to determine impact degree.
This port is 1km from the government building of Shuolong Town, 45km from the downtown of Daxin County, and about 11km from Detian-Ban Giov Cross-border Waterfall on the border between China and Vietnam.
Right-skewed 179\U+00B059′60.0″
No. 27, Jiuzhai Group, Tongxin Villagers Committee, Tongxin Township, Ning'er Hani and Yi Nationalities' Autonomous County, Pu'er City, Yunnan Province
After the completion of trial run, using department shall submit detailed trial run report to be used as basis for whether the equipment can satisfy contract requirements and whether it shall be accepted finally.
The access loop will be provided with APS1:1 protection or looped network protection.
In order to solve the problems with construction of infrastructures such as traffic and municipal facilities, Chuxiong Prefecture will enlarge the urban infrastructural construction investment and quicken the urbanization construction step.
Our company will dispatch Comrade Wang Xuefei to the Philippines on July 23, 2019 to participate in the China Engineering & Technology Expo (2019 ), and will survey on the local economic and investment environment.
3. The surface of herringbone water intercepting framework protection slope should be the complete drainage system. Both sides and bottom of drainage channels should be subject to mortar jointing to prevent rainwater infiltrating into the slope.
5. Window guardrail shall be added for windows with a windowsill height of smaller than 900. Unless otherwise specified, refer to Details 2, Sheet 35, 11ZJ401 for the construction method.
2. Special lifting appliances are provided, including hanging beams and trimming beams, double-buckle flexible slings, and anti-skid sizing blocks, etc.
Figure 4-45 Temperature Deformation (Longitudinal) after Concrete Pouring of S8-5
In the switch real-time quantity interface, double-click switch quantity description, then the analog real-time interface will be as follows:
After receiving the penalty notice from the Client, the supervisor shall pay the penalties stated above directly to the Financial Department of the Client within five working days.
Construction team leaders should inspect the completion of construction schedule for the construction team members before, during and after the shift every day, and promptly fill out the "Construction Progress Records".
The film formed by the white curing agent can also reflect sunlight, reduce heat absorption, and inhibit the temperature rise of the concrete.
ISO 228-1 Pipe Threads Where Pressure-tight Joints Are Not Made on the Threads - Part 1: Dimensions, Tolerances and Designation
Clean up unwanted user accounts, check account privilege levels, and change monitoring passwords
(4) Warning areas shall be set up during erection and dismantling;
2. In case of force majeure, the Contractor shall immediately inform the Engineer and try its best to take measures as soon as possible to reduce the loss.
During concrete pouring of girder body, inspection shall be witnessed by the supervision engineer.
4. The outer side of the platform is assembled by four platform plates, and the inner side is assembled by three platform plates.
After pipeline laying is completed and qualified in inspection, the tightness test of pipeline shall be performed.
The position shall be verified after embedding the casing, ensuring a positional deviation not more than 5cm and inclination not more than 1%.
6.The Owner has the right to adjust the date of trial operation according to the progress of construction period.
The trunk subsystem is the trunk wiring section between the light current machine room and each weak current machine cabinet.
Inspection method: The Contractor shall carry out visual inspection, measure the temperature with rail thermometers and record the temperature; the Supervisor shall check the records made by the Contractor and carry out on-site supervision.
The non-corrugated waterproof steel pile casing with the minimum wall thickness of 9mm and the outer diameter no less than that of the bored pile shall be used to resist the push-pull force of the rig and the surrounding earth pressure.
In case of backfire, rapidly close the acetylene valve and then oxygen valve.
The system shall be able to automatically broadcast the preset broadcast content.
Cleaning of soil at hole bottom: After the drilling is conducted to the preset depth of drilling, the soil in the deep must be cleaned by idling of the drilling machine, and then the rotation of drilling machine shall be stopped; when the drill pipe is lifted, it shall not be rotated back.
Head of a department — directly responsible for compliance management of the department;
b) 2-pole-pair stator, only one direction needs to be tested, for 3 times.
Be responsible for the contents and delivery time of the design documentations and the technical documentations supplied thereby.
2) Error frame data are performed every second. When the number of error frames are greater than a given setting, the communication is considered abnormally. After the communication is abnormal, the differential protection is interlocked. Once the communication is restored, the protection is automatically restored; the device automatically counts the error rate of the data transmission. When it reaches a given setting, the self-check information "fiber channel abnormally" shall be reported;
3 Temporary prestressing steel rod is glued and tensioned to combine segment 1 and segment 2.
Rework is not conducted when the construction quality is unaccepted and the supervisor engineer requires rework.
The configuration of elevator operation and tip parts shall be convenient for the disabled.
The light is on when the power unit of No.1~No.3 car operates abnormally
The permanent control coordinates and benchmark given by the Owner shall be taken as the reference to measure the construction area. Then, the surveying control network shall be set within the construction scope of the Project. Such network shall be kept away from the buildings and the operation and transport route of the earth mover in the place. In addition, apparent protective marks shall be set.
July 30, 2017 – June 29, 2019
Trees and grass will be planted, if proper, for railway projects to remedy the vegetation damage due to construction.
1. One settlement observation pile shall be provided respectively on the shoulders on both sides (on the outer edge of subbase surface on both sides of preloading sections) and at the center of the subgrade surface
It can be seen from the above distribution: 38.5% plane curve radius of the route in this section is distributed between 250m to 400m (the plane curve overstep being 6%), which is high for the design speed of 80km/h. But limited by the complex terrain conditions along the route, further optimization is smaller.
The Procurement Department and the related departments should bear responsibility for preparing the contract documents, technical data and background information required by the contract review. The specific contents include: bidding documents, contract-signing agreement and clauses, specific requirements on clauses of contract, technical documents and data related to contract review.
Slope protection should be provided for the sections with deep cuttings to prevent slope collapse or slope instability.
Set the speed to 160 km/h, press the sanding button in the cab for 15s, and confirm that the "sanding action" of the vehicle corresponding to the sanding detection interface of the TCMS screen turns green, and the sanding time for each sanding port is about 15s.
Notice on Further Preparation for Supervision by the Ministry of Environmental Protection of the People's Republic of China
Proactive inspection: It is required that the platform can regularly and proactively detect the devices accessed to the system, which mainly include network detection and reading of traffic flow device status bit.
Reach an agreement with the decision-making team of enterprise on labour relations adjustment objectives and results
Under normal temperature, the concrete strength of the wall must reach 1MPa prior to removal of formworks; during winter construction, the removal of formworks shall be carried out on the basis of the compressive strength of the test block cured under the same conditions.
The risk monitoring involves selection of alternative solutions and emergency plan, taking corrective actions, or modification of project risk management plan;
——generalized cost of shortest route, EUR;
5.Article 5.1.3 of the Contract is revised as follows:
The Contractor of turnouts shall define the organization and technical interfaces between each subcontractor, make important content and information documented, and regularly check the implementation of such interfaces and organization responsibilities.
The line and station shall be chosed far way from sensitive area such as dwelling district and planning area, schools, hospitals, etc to avoid and reduce vibration influence caused by operation of railway.
The mathematical formula for calculating the characteristic wind curve (CWC) is derived using the system model.
Main river distribution, water system feature, hydrological and meteorological data along the line.
2) A power lightning protection box shall be separately provided at the lead-in point of power line of signal equipment room.
Installing TT-AD on pre-assembly platform by special fixing bracket
(4)Sensor: The vehicle's sensors are divided into speed sensor for display of vehicle speed, rotation speed sensor for display of diesel engine speed, fuel level sensor for display of fuel tank level and hydraulic oil filter alarm (there are 3 alarms used to give out alarm when hydraulic oil filter is blocked).
(6) Inspect each bearing as per the above requirements and clean with kerosene before restoration as per the assembly drawing.
Balances, weights, X-fluorescence spectrometers and other instruments used in the tests must be regularly calibrated to meet the test requirements.
The intermediate joint is a unit to be specially used to fix and connect adjacent steel-aluminum composite rails or accessories and conduct electric energy.
Stacking control of finished products: they shall be stacked orderly and straight in types and specifications and padded with skid at the bottom; for lamination stacking, they shall be padded with skids at the top and bottom; for horizontal stacking, the upper and lower shall be consistent to avoid deformation and damage; for lateral stacking, skid and supporting lug shall be provided to avoid overturn.
The bridge is in super-elevation with one-way value of 2.5%.
By 2020, it is planned to basically complete the construction of the arterial highway network based on national highways and provincial highways in north Laos, achieve 3,300km traffic mileage for Class 2 highways, 1,614km for Class 3 highways and 1,222km for Class 4 highways, reconstruct 800km Class 5 highways between provinces and counties and between counties and villages, and construct 168km border highways.
3. The adequacy, effectiveness and suitability of the management system shall be considered during reason analysis;
Train T0109 made a turn-back on Shendu Highway
1X32+(2X68)T-shaped m girder
(9) The Contractor shall strictly standardize the basic measurement work and the procurement and inspection of materials.
(3) Hoisting and installation of each end segment of the main trusses TR03 and TR04 are completed, and the complete trusses are formed by splicing and fixing with the middle segment;
Its carrying capacity is increased from about 60 tons to 70 tons and new heavy-duty bogie for speed increase is employed.
The exporter shall prepare all the customs declaration documents within five days before shipping, and shall submit them to the customs broker. After confirming the received documents are correct, the customs broker shall go through commodity inspection and customs clearance and declaration without delay.
In most areas of the country, the elevation is above 500m, and some narrow valleys are distributed. Low-lying areas provide the possibility for agricultural development.
1. Material; 2. Specification; 3. Connection type
But it is once every 10-20 years.
Due to attenuation of VHF/UHF signals, many couplers must be installed in the GIS.
DC 110V (77 V ~ 137.5 V); reference standard: GB/T25119-2010
Volume of each water recycle pond is designed as per the recycle water volume of a filter grid, and the highest level is reached when it contains recycle water of a filter grid. The highest level can be reset according to actual condition of recycle water volume of a filter grid and suction volume of a suction dredger after the plant is operated.
Main factory houses, including turbine hall, deaerator/bunker bay and boiler house, are arranged in three rows.
Subbase of subgrade bed (replacement filling should be implemented if the subbase of subgrade bed is expansive soil)
6) The Project Engineering Department shall timely communicate the instructions from leaders of the operation teams and the superior competent departments, assist and guide the accident organization to properly rescue the wounded and do the afterward disposal, and report the recent news of accident disposal to superior competent departments.
The configuration of main construction equipment and personnel for early tunnel excavation is adopted.
6 Reliability, Maintainability and Expected Service Life6
The project is supported by one natural gas distributed energy station (CCGT) with a generating capacity of 60MW.
Project director shall be responsible for the contents of the system documents, time schedule, product critical state (especially for system SIL) and available resources, and prepare the software quality assurance plan (current document), including at least the following contents:
The leave for medical affairs period shall not be counted into the performance assessment of the department.
Integral steel square column formwork with adjustable section is employed.
The customization and registration of "Visiting Card"shall be conducted by Administrative Department.
The handicap toilet should provide all necessary equipment for wheelchair users, like the disabled and the elderly, and provide enough handrails at appropriate positions.
To ensure that the boards are laid in a stable and smooth manner, wooden wedges are laid underneath the boards (because the distributive girder of flange plate is oblique).
2.Our company has taken many measures for ensuring the wages of migrant laborers
Architecture structural discipline determines measures taken for rolling protection of the outgoing drain pipe based on road planning and bearing capacity of the foundation.
Among which, the elevation of ceiling bottom in walkover bridge area is 6.7m
OEM products are not accepted for this bid invitation.
Regenerative braking in electric braking shall take priority over resistance braking.
Report the procurement, expediting and inspection conditions of all equipment in accordance with the reporting procedure of YDIC.
【For this section, the main shooting materials are sceneries outside the passenger transportation station, the ticket selling service of the ticket selling hall, the environment of the waiting hall, security check and ticket checking before passenger's entry into the station and the thoughtful service provided by train attendants for on-board passengers.】
(Elevation H=12.600~21.700~12.600)
(6) Glass sealant for fireproof windows/doors
In the inspection based on EN 1399, for the anti-burning property against cigarette of floor cloth, with Method A≥Level 4 and Method B≥4 Level 3.
Operating ambient temperature: -10℃ to +50℃.
④ Rolling: After paving, the surface shall be rolled immediately while it is still wet.
The angle beads meet the construction specifications and the surface is flat and smooth; the gap between the door and window frames and the wall body is well filled with a flat surface.
② Build new sections and increase double-track mileage.
December 4 - Check Bronka Terminal;
B02 Neighborhood –Red Cross Society (Z05)
The expediting company shall expedite the submittal of the production schedule by the supplier who confirms to have received the purchase contract and then submit the schedule to the Expediting Supervision Engineer.
Figure 10 Train line current, motor current vs. distance curve
Resin daub shall be changed to epoxy coal tar resin daub of special type and isolating course shall use the primed twice, covered three times and finished two times with epoxy-coal tar resin glass fiber reinforced plastics.
On December 9, borrowed car bodies for transportation in 2020 Spring Festival travel rush successively arrived in Chengdu, Guiyang, etc., and the car bodies transferred within the management of China Railway Chengdu Group Co., Ltd. also departed one after another.
Except for the platform at the top of sheet pile wall, intercepting ditches shall be provided for slope platforms of various stages.
Since there is floorslab at lower part of high area of track and field stadium, the 1000X2500 beam load cannot be borne, the bottom formwork and support shall be specially designed separately and description is not made hereby.
Within 28 days after signing the Contract, the Owner shall pay 15% of the preliminary design fee (RMB 397,334) as a prepayment; after the field work acceptance is passed, the Owner shall pay another 15% (RMB 397,334);
Adjust the speed of the machine to warm up it, and inspect the following two points:
In any other case that the Supervisor needs to consult the Client as specified by the Contract, or the Chinese or Laos side, or the China Railway Corporation.
Different from Riyadh and Jeddah, Dammam is defined as an industrial center, is Saudi Arabia's crude oil industrial hub and an economic growth engine in eastern Saudi Arabia, and has a population growth of 12%, ranking one of the cities with the fastest population growth in Saudi Arabia.
(1) Position of hanging points shall be symmetrically arranged on the two sides of the air duct center line at a spacing shown in the table below.
The installing and dismounting of the transmission gear and coupling;
Finally, specific case study is conducted in the context of a petroleum industry city.
Creative communication management is the frontier theory of the current marketing industry. The Golden Mouse·E-marketing Awards has been specially set up for the "Creative Communication" case award since its establishment, and is committed to finding classic cases to maximize creative communication and providing the most valuable references for innovative E-marketing mode.
The scope of bid winning includes the preliminary design, budget estimate and construction drawing design of the Relocation Project of North Lighting Station at West Runway of Beijing Capital International Airport.
(5) Linked blasting: Keep the lead control point at least 150m away from the initiation point, and start blasting after ensuring that there is not any person or local animals with the safety range. After detonation, check the blasting effect and adjust the blasting parameters properly for secondary blasting if the effect is unfavorable. After completing the blasting process, restore the control on surrounding environment.
This railway is dedicated to freight, without passenger transport, so lighting is not considered.
Meanwhile, Lanzhou Rail Transit Co., Ltd. provided the 1# and 2# buildings that belong to the auxiliary development project of the Donggang Depot of Lanzhou Rail Transit Line 1 (Block B of City Dawn Project) to Chengguan District Government as the housing resource for exchange of property right and compensated the expropriated persons who selected the exchange of housing property.
▪ Processing universal transverse Mercator grid (UTM) data, especially determining the coordinates of the entire control traverse through the grid topographic map issued by the survey department
Responsible for the formulation of annual HSE targets, indicators and management plans and annual HSE work plans.
Scenario building of "leakage incident of hazardous and chemical materials of major hazard sources in chemical industrial park"
The above problems shall be handled and improved by the Contractor within one month after the handover acceptance, and the Supervisor shall be responsible for the inspection and acceptance.
With the rise of knowledge-based economy and the advent of the information era, market competition are becoming fierce. Therefore, enterprises need to improve the core competitiveness by carrying out technical innovation and strategic innovation for survival and development.
3) Control the straightness and gradient of the pipeline: when installing pipes, the side wire shall be hung at the radius of the pipe, and the wire shall be tightened and shall not be loosened; when adjusting the center line and elevation of each pipe segment, it is necessary to use stone pads for firm support, and two adjacent pipe segments shall not be staggered.
Input value such as length of the train concerns safe running of the train, so it is required to carefully check correctness of input data when inputting length of the train.
A group of internal force testing sensors shall be set up in the foundation pit to test the distribution and transmission of stress in different soil layers.
The followings must be implemented to ensure the works quality to achieve high-quality standard:
When a pipe gets through the interior wall or floor slab, the casing shall be provided. The gap between casing and pipe shall be plugged by flexible fire-proof materials.
1. Changes arising from remeasurement of defined benefit plan
8. Develop construction equipment such as multi-fulcrum transverse moving formwork, boom-type combined sliding staging, and platform with changeable angle which can freely move at height;
According to the characteristics of the Project, the key technical problems in survey and design are proposed as follows:
The toilets shall be shaded for a height of 1.7m (using ground glass, etc.).
Video surveillance system equipment mainly includes: NVR, TLCD, CSSW/SSW, camera, etc.
Term of Validity: 2005.05.13-2025.05.13
d) project planning (refer to 8.3.2);
Primary grouting is conducted to the corresponding 2 tremie pipes, with amount being 6m³ X 2 for the tremie pipes after completion of borehole cleaning, to ensure the quality of the continuous concrete pouring.
5.1.2 Dynamic management: conduct a rolling update to the talent database every year so as to prepare for the next year's talent reservation and development.
According to the current situations of domestic and overseas signal equipment rail traffic projects under construction and those completed, the ATC system applied to the urban rail traffic mainly has three modes as follows:
The materials that the manufacturer is specified by Party A shall be purchased from the designated manufacturer.
Gullies are developed within the survey area. There are only rural roads in the vicinity of the route, so the traffic is inconvenient.
CRRC guarantees that the motor products provided are advanced, well-developed, economical, applicable, as well as reliable.
Roughen the surface manually to a depth of 2-3 mm.
For this section, the left track will be blocked firstly and the right track will pass.
The project is approved to be constructed based on the document of Wenshan Development and Reform Bureau (WFGF [2016] No.268).
A lock shall be provided for the box door and kept by a person in charge of the discipline.
b) Once the change of the Company influences the occupational health and safety of contractors, the safety office will together with the labor union negotiate with the contractors on such change. When appropriate, the Company's safety office will negotiate with the external parties regarding the occupational health and safety matters.
ÃÀuc1¹¸u214 O½¹u185 1Óu205 IÆ?Ð­»?
The construction units shall be divided by specialty and formation of specialized construction team shall be established according to the working face management.
They are able to work normally, and ensure self-study and training time.
Note: The Construction Package 1 is generally divided into three areas, namely: Area A, Area B and Area C; Each area is divided into five batches in total to complete all construction works in sequence. The 1st construction batch of each area arranges three shifts respectively to carry out construction. Each shift carries out construction of two buildings at the same time, and each shift carries out flow construction between construction buildings.
Implemented fromJuly 01, 2008
The residual pressure in the can can be ensured through the adjustment of the exhaust air flow in the exhaust unit (EXH) and the fresh air flow in the air conditioning unit (AHU).
1) Standards for determining impairment reserves of the entrusted loans: entrusted loan principal is higher than the recoverable amount.
China Tianyuan New Energy Technology Co., Ltd.
The qualification of project team members shall conform to that of corresponding post.
b) Assist the Procurement Manager to formulate the HSE management objectives of goods transportation carried out by the logistics contractor of projects, and participate in the preparation of HSE Management Plan of Project Procurement;
The crane driver strictly obeys the "ten no-liftings" for the crane; the lifting rigger and the commander must well master the basic knowledge about object binding and strictly implement the safety and technology operating instruction about the lifting rigging and commanding operations
3) Chemical products and dangerous goods shall be stored in special warehouses, and correct storage and maintenance of them shall be ensured.
#10 abutment end mileage DK8+663.788
Sway cabinets and confirm that the cabinets are securely and stably connected to frames:
(1) Mixture shall be paved and scrapped in full width by LTU125 automatic-leveling asphalt paver (maximum paving width of 12.5m) produced in Xuzhou.
Including the interface protocols of the mission control computer and integrated navigation equipment
The pole coils are formed by edgewinding 2.2428mm TDR copper strips.
A.0.3 Words denoting a permission of a slight choice or an indication of the most suitable choice when conditions permit:
Reply: Concrete of abutment approach slaps can be changed to C40.
The Project Department is responsible for the construction and production organization and site management of the Project on behalf of the Company.
The system is of liquid cooling type, uses antifreezing solution as heat exchange medium and has two working modes of cooling and heating.
⑤ The design concept of safety, environmental protection and economy shall be implemented in the option, and the design shall be flexible, comprehensive, detailed and creative to achieve the overall harmony with the nature.
Party A: Bijie Kunlun Natural Gas Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as "the Employer")
When the route intersects with local roads of various grades, separated interchanges shall set up.
(2016) GTJ(TJ) Z No. R0414
This certificate can be inquired through call 16897739 or 160 with in the region of Yunnan. All the certificates which are queried but not found shall be regard as invalid certificate.
7. GB9074/M5 combined grounding screw: 3.7Nm, supplied with the whole machine
- arithmetic mean of actual output error of current transducer at the calibration point i;
Scope of divisional and sub-divisional works over a certain scale and with high risks
hi-- the thickness (m) of the i-th soil layer within the calculated depth;
Emission Standard for Industrial Enterprises Noise at Boundary (GB12348-2008)
In order to ensure the overall strength and stability of the box culvert, cast-in-situ construction is proposed to be adopted, and 3 teams will be dispatched for pipelining construction in different sections.
0.1 Million Tons Joint Annual Output of Ethylene Glycol Cleaning and Rennovation Project with Comprehensive Recycling Utilization of Calcium Carbide Furnace Gas and Extinguishing Coke Powder of Xinjiang Tianzhi Chenye Chemical Industry Co., Ltd.
Field measurement is made using special OCS measuring tools, which must be calibrated on a year basis.
Coordinate the communication between the project team and relevant units, manage and coordinate the internal interfaces of the project team.
Leq(30)DB(A)1: The logarithmic mean of all measured noise data in the 30 minutes of testing time; it is calculated by equivalent noise level A.
Timely supply of materials is the key to ensure the smooth progress of the Project. The Department of Materials and Equipment will use the information management system software to prepare the corresponding monthly, ten-day, weekly and daily material supply plans to organize material supply in advance to ensure the smooth progress of each project.
With the "locomotive + LNG tanker" method, the commutation traction shall be carried out after decoupling and recoupling with the tanker; with the "locomotive + LNG tanker + locomotive" method, the commutation traction can be carried out without decoupling, which provides high operation efficiency.
The mountainous terrain fluctuates greatly, with the broken local terrain and the developed gully. The relative height difference is large.
1. The time for he/she to enter and leave predecessor company: _________________________________
The program result will include the thinking and advice on speeding up container transport development for China Railway, boost intermodal container development, and improve the competitive edge of the container transport market of CR.
2. 2 points will be deducted for each time of detection of failure to establish material receiving and distribution management accounts and on-site material management account, and 1 point will be deducted for each item not recorded completely.
The specific deep treatment process is selected upon the recycle purpose.
Do not mix those hazardous chemicals that may easily cause burning, explosion or other hazards via collision and mutual contact and those that contradict each other in chemical properties or protection and fire control methods for transportation.
Environment and equipment monitoring system of Integrated Supervisory Control System (ISCS) at Dongdu Road Station
Guo Manyu: participate in making production plans, in production preparation, in production coordination conference; communicate and coordinate related matters in each production process; report the progresses and plan completion in each production process; make statistical data analysis in the production process and keep related required records.
9.1.5 Party A shall assist Party B in going through the formalities for the custom clearance and transport (if any) of the equipment to be used in the survey and design, and the expenses incurred therefrom shall be borne by Party B.
4 The borrowed HXD1 shock absorber meets the requirement for geometric attribute of the secondary lateral and vertical shock absorbers on locomotive bogie in Macedonia Project.
The trench shall be simultaneously backfilled on both sides where the height difference shall not exceed 30cm. Special attention shall be paid to selection of compaction equipment within 50cm range above the pipe top, to prevent pipe structure from being damaged.
On the system control tab of the main test program, the temperate setting pane is arranged at the upper lower corner:
(Workers at rope fixing area can pull the spring compensator with small rope and fix it).
Appendix C2: Acceptance Recorder of Electrical Switch Drive
2.2 For technical documents, materials, parts and components, complete machine, measuring instruments, equipment involved in design and process of nuclear products, if common nonconformities occur, responsible divisions/departments shall investigate the reasons, corresponding corrective actions shall be timely formulated and adopted and the implementation of corrective actions shall be verified.
The Contractor will also submit to the coordinator a copy of the list of participants, initialed by each of the participants, to ascertain clearly whether or not each of them is aware of it.
(3) The building area shall be used as the key factor for statistics, and the statistics of the comprehensive average probabilities of fires for the regression subsystem shall be carried out based on the statistical data of the past five or ten years.
Engineers figure out corner coordinates of the pile cap as per design drawings, and figure out the sloping coefficient and excavation widening amount based on the height of pile cap and design elevation. The ratio of the longitudinal slope to transverse slope is 1:1.
The output property of auxiliary power inverter shall match unit auxiliary AC load and DC load of the car.
Failure in preparing measures and schemes for energy-saving and emission reduction of key energy consumption equipment, minus 6 points;
Electrodialysis and Evaporative Crystallization Skid-mounted Device of Anyue Gas Field Moxi Block Longwangmiao Formation Gas Reservoir 6X109/year Development Surface Project
5.3.3 Relays, devices, instruments and meters, transformers, switches, converter valves and other products shall be identified with the product bar code, product model, production number and production date, etc.
Before processing, detailed shop drawings should be prepared to determine the reinforcement dimensions. In addition, the reinforcement processing sheet should be prepared.
The modularization degree of locomotive broadcasting station is higher, being free of adjustment. The installation environment is better with comparison to main engine of train tail. Since most functions are completed by relying on software, with higher working reliability.
(5) This project adopts home-made equipment as far as possible.
Requirement Specifications for JZ.GD-1 microcomputer axle counter system
(5) In order to solve the problem of excessive maintenance caused by routine maintenance, the maintenance class and mechanism are continuously optimized in combination with the online status of system equipment. Based on the performance, status and risk assessment of the system equipment, the maintenance method of system equipment.is adjusted timely.
2.2 The inserting points of the vibrating needle shall be arranged uniformly, and moved regularly according to pouring sequence. Incomplete vibration is prohibited, the distance between the vibrating needle and the formwork shall not be larger than 0.5time of the operating radius of the vibrating needle, and the spacing between the inserting points of the vibrating needle shall not be larger than1.4 times of the operating radius of the vibrating needle.
② If combined with urban plaza or commercial center, it is easy to form the city center or commercial center, and drive the development of the whole large community.
Only the construction machineries and equipment accepted by Project Supervision Department can be used during the construction of the project and no rejected construction machineries or equipment can be used in the project.
Layout Plan of Lines of GWAGWA Parking Yard
6. Minutes of meeting China-Pakistan Economic Corridor Raikot-Islamabad Highway
Cantiere(ET) station is a border station. It is set with receiving-departure yard and frontier inspection yard, which are arranged in longitudinal manner.
30.3 Implement "three-simultaneity" principle and other national or industrial technical standards and specifications about production safety in major technical projects of product development or technology renovation.
Appendix F Reduced Coefficient of Linear Extensibility of FRP / PVC Pipe
Aijiang - Detian Section of the Project is close to Guichun River, with superior landscape resources, and is located in the core scenic spot, with a length of about 6km.
Bidder name: Zhejiang Communications Construction Group Co., Ltd.
Procurement No.: ____________Specifications:___________:
Card/equipment test and authentication shall follow the provisions of the related standards below.
② Site selection of borrow area shall be determined by consultation, with the cooperation of local authorities and competent departments of water and soil conservation, in compliance with integrated planning by competent departments of water and soil conservation, and accounts shall be taken of local water conservancy, farmland, construction planning and environmental construction planning.
5)Remove the compressed air supply equipment and pressure gauge from the pipe.
The final inspection and test shall be supported by special document; the document shall specify the inspection and test items; the technical requirements shall be consistent with the user's requirements; the record of inspection and test shall be true and normative.
15306-04-6203-1-revision
The window opening area in the smoke reservoir shall not be less than 30.39m2.
Before commissioning, all commissioning personnel shall be organized to participate in the discussion and analysis of the problems that may occur in the commissioning process and the corresponding solutions.
5.3.2.3During cleaning, cloth should be used. It is not allowed to adopt cotton yarn to avoid blocking the passage.
Reasonable arrangement of number and location of tower crane, reasonable arrangement of construction schedule to reduce the impact of construction on safety of surroundings.
(2) Strictly follow the order of removal. Thescaffold shall be dismantled from top to bottom. Those bonded later are removed prior to those bonded former. In general, railings, foot planks, and cross bridging are removed prior to the small ledger, large ledger and vertical standard.
b)The conditions for using test equipment (water spray nozzle) in Figure 5
Such education should be given to the staff: the construction personnel of subcontractors should respect the supervision personnel and actively respond to the requirements proposed by them; ignorance of supervision personnel or collision with them should be avoided;
Including expenses for office supplies, living equipment (including furniture) and consumable materials.
If Party B breaks the Contract by violating relevant administrative provisions in the technical specifications of the Contract, Party B must bear 10% of total contract price as the penalty for breach of contract as per the regulations of Special Terms.
Schedule 3: List of Non-metal Materials Divergence
7.7 The order number of Tenderee, the shipment number of Tenderer, and the destination name of product shall be indicated outside the packaging box.
The large angle formwork shall be processed to make the chamfer lines straight and angular.
When spiral bars are installed, the flat side of the three vertical bars shall face down. The gap between the spiral bars and the hole-forming device shall be consistent as far as possible.
The construction scheme of the mass concrete of the Project shall be as follows: the mass concrete shall be mixed in the mixing plant, transported by tank truck, and placed by the pump truck. The concrete shall be integrally placed in one process and there shall be no construction joint during placing. During placing, the placing shall be carried out in layers and sections from one side to another side as per the site conditions.
Penetration test: Test the resistance of application system to attacks.
When a fiber channel is multiplexed at 2 Mbps through an SDH device (Figure 3-3-4), there are two cases:
On the construction site, major hazards of electrical shock exist in the following cases:
Table 10-3 Intervals for Overhaul and Medium Repair of Main Equipment
Add "description to product sealing is required; inspection should be performed to product indexes; eligibility criteria of stability should comply with product quality standard" in item 8.4.2.
d) Air source pressure: Rated value, the tolerance is 1％.
To conduct weight determination on EMU to detect whether the weight and distribution of motor cars and trailers in EMU meet the requirement of evaluation standards.
The grade of traffic accidents that may result from vehicles coming off the bridge
The completed working diagram can be handed over to the next process after the approval of the Employer.
7 Environmental protection measures shall be taken for temporary works and site layout.
Outline drawings of equipment (including the cross-section drawings and views of each direction).
Article 10 The wage payoff and management situations of migrant workers of the construction contractors shall be incorporated in the credit rating for such construction contractors.
6 The wiring of lightning protection component shall be separated with other wiring.
The torque wrench shall be qualified and effective. The torque wrench shall be in minimum scale value of 4Nm before use, its torque value is set as 16.1Nm for tightening M8 bolts, and the torque value will be returned to minimum value of 4Nm upon completion.
1) Backfilling shall be carried out after the structure has passed the inspection and the concrete reaches 2/3 of the specified 28-day strength.
First, low-noise equipment is the priority selection. Next, the following measures, such as silencing, sound insulation, vibration reduction and individual protection, etc. shall be adopted:
(2) The employees firmly believe that the provider does not intend to influence their performance of official duties in some way.
All passenger stations and Vientiane Dispatching Station will be equipped with one set of branch meeting equipment respectively. Logically, star structure networking will be adopted between MCU and the station video conference terminal.
Before erection, safety technical disclosure shall be made to scaffolders, signing formalities shall be performed, and written records shall be made.
21.7.1The Tenderer shall prepare the EMC management plan and submit it to the Tenderee for confirmation.
2. All the air-conditioning units will be equipped with dedicated vibration absorber, the configuration of which should be finished in cooperation with professional producer.
As for interface server, customized development of relevant interface software is required by this project to ensure that the center server can be applied in a reliable and stable environment to make the whole PIS system not only maintain the normal operation of existing function but also process special requirements of the project.
The retirement takes effect from January 1, 2018.
The steel frame is connected to the reinforcing bar with Φ22 reinforcement with a spacing of 50cm.
In the event of a major fire, the emergency rescue team and 101 shall be promptly reported to. Small fires or hazards shall be quickly extinguished with fire extinguishers and hydrants.
3. Elongation value listed in the table excludes compression of girder, E=1.95x10^5MPa.
General measuring tools: steel measure tap, steel ruler, feeler gauge, vernier caliper, universal angle ruler, etc.
Perform opening and closing test under the designed water pressure to observe whether the opening and closing function is normal.
Abandoned sand, stone and soil must be transported to the specified special storage place for stacking, and shall not be dumped into rivers and ditches other than the special storage place.
3.1Party B shall start trial manufacturing of the first monorail vehicle immediately after this industrial cooperation agreement takes effect.
12.10.13 Shotcrete layer surface shall be uniform and smooth, without sudden change.
245 m3 environment test area, EMC lab, mechanical environment test area, urban rail test area, water test area, sand and dust test area, manufacturing center
It is recommended to calculate 1 ~ 3 different mix proportion ratios within the gradation range of engineering design.
In addition, the meteorological conditions can be input into instruments for automatic meteorological correction when adopting total-station instruments.
In this design, removal, replacement and filling of permeable soil separation layer or addition of impermeable composite geo-membrane are adopted for low embankment section.
Contract number: HKXCKSH [2010] No. 8
Communication Signal Test Station, Metal Chemical Test Station
(4) The commissioning of protection, control, measurement, signal and excitation circuits of the motor shall be completed and they shall act normally.
The lateral stiffness of some floor is less than 70% of that of the floor above it, or less than 80% of average lateral stiffness of three floors above it. The structure is free of irregular lateral stiffness.
11. The Agreement is made into two originals and eight copies, with one original and four copies held by each party hereto respectively. Where the duplicate copy is inconsistent with the original one, the latter shall prevail.
CK230+120 ~ CK273+960 section (Adigala ~ Lasarat) lies in a gentle hilly area and has certain topographic relief with the ground elevation ranging between 710m and 780m. The vegetation is not developed.
Sewage treatment plant, traction station and sundries room are set on the east side of the maintenance workshop.
1. Plan of Engineering Geology of K101+240-K101+420 and K101+220-K101+400 Deep Cutting(Drawing CD27-22-1)
Report on CPI survey technology (including results regarding control point and benchmark)
Figure 7.2-2 Land Exploitation around Recent Planned Construction Lines for Rail Transit of Lusaka
Dimensions800*500*900+450
Organize professional construction team and strictly restrict the number of civilian workers to avoid a shortage of labor in busy farming season.
Technical training for local employees in the countries where the projects are located has exceeded more than 100,000 people.
Isolated Hill Distributed Sporadically in the Area Passed By Abuja Rail Mass Transit Project
(4)One special invoice of value-added tax with amount of 30% of total contract price.
N:3792633.02 E:482206.53 GK40+351.42 right 15.45
For bridges crossing general rivers in plain area, in principle, column pier should be used as far as possible; based on the on-site survey, the rivers to be crossed by the designed bridges are mostly filled with sticks, deadwood and large pebbles, so it is advisable to adopt solid thin-wall pier to the maximum extent for the piers, to avoid the impact damage resulted from those large pebbles.
The safety accessories on welding and cutting equipment such as oxygen cylinder and acetylene generator should be intact. Otherwise, such equipment is prohibited to be used.
Draw lines in the top and bottom rails of the swing leaves and fix the core pin plate of pivot pin and the rotating shaft gusset plate of floor spring according to the lines.
R—— External restraint coefficient of concrete. It is 1 for rock foundation, and it is
Concrete was poured inside such models to monitor the performance of steel-shell concrete.
3) If the existing line is frequently elevated, the culverts shall be treated by heightening the coping or extending according to the actual conditions.
Release of Evaluation Results on the First Batch of C-NCAP Vehicle Models in 2020
Capacity of AC butt welding machine ≤100 kVA
According to GDP data from 2009 to 2016, it is predicted that its GDP will grow to USD 665.4 billion in 2020 and USD 1238,9 billion in 2025, still the first economy of Africa.
Experienced technical team and component-level maintenance features: Currently, inverter or converter manufacturers are upgrading and updating their products too fast. Unless component-level maintenance capacity is obtained, it is not possible to carry out the maintenance when it is short of standby boards after the machine has been run for 10 years.
According to requirements of labor law, complete the labor protection equipment work of the project, according to numbers of each type of work and nature of labor, material supply department shall be responsible for purchasing and preparing enough and necessary labor protection appliances.
Hot melt joint: Connect hot melt appliance with power supply. Operations may proceed after the working temperature is reached and the indicator light is on. When cutting the pipes, the cross sections must be perpendicular to pipe axis.
Insulation Withstand Test Report for Cover of SA2 Lightning Arrester: No. H 05071
b. The whole screen surface shall have sufficient water passages, to ensure that both the discharge area and the flow meet the design requirements; the flow rate of sewage passing screen gaps shall be less than 1m/s.
Figure 5-1 Current Situation of Land not Acquired in Sangong Village Figure 5-2 Geological Condition of Land under Acquisition in Sangong Village
Location dimension of supporting seat section of guide channel support 6680±1 mm
The wheel load reduction ratio is defined as the ratio between wheel load reduction (ΔP) and average static wheel load of the axle.
See Chemical Engineering Design Manual for proofreading procedures of design documents quality guarantee.
Support light control function or external control function;
(2) The cost is relatively low, and the amount of the required cement and stabilizer are small and convenient to purchase;
(4) The salary distribution of front-line workers is based on the accounting results of the construction team and the team, and the salary will be paid according to the internal valuation of the completed project quantity and the assessment linked to indicators such as safety, quality and material consumption.
In front of us is our T-beam reinforcement processing center with stacking area for raw materials, semi-finished products and finished products.
Table 3.1.7 Management Staffing
Schedule 4 (Statement for Repayment of Loan Principal and Interests) shows that, the short-term loan is raised in 2021 ~ 2028 (8 years in total) and increased year by year from the 1st operation year, i.e. 2012, and may reach the maximum value of USD 17,9710,000 by 2025, and there is no short-term loan from 2029.
6.1.1 Preparation, Revision and Issuance of Management Documents
3 Strict "three-level" safety education shall be carried out for all construction personnel entering the site, and safety work certificates shall be assessed and issued. No work shall be carried out without education and training on safety in production.
The project is Shuitu G8.5 Glass Substrate Project—Posterior Fabrication Plant, located at Chongqing Liangjiang New Area Shuitu High-tech Industrial Park.
Providing leasing of engineering machinery and equipment or participating in minerals mining and investment in further processing.
When the CBR value of soil filling material strength used in the roadbed does not meet the requirements, the treatment depth of excavation and replacement shall be 80cm below the pavement structural layer
Amortization method for low value consumables and packages:
The upright column will not be installed until the concrete reaches the curing time of more than 7 days.
3. Any ventilation fan has recirculating air, or any ventilation fan is installed at an improper position, making the suction air become recirculating air;
The fire fighting water source enters the underground fire pool from the municipal water supply system and delivered to various fire hydrants by fire booster pump.
(3) Technical Specifications (including Supplementary Technical Specifications);
(18) Indoor lighting: illumination ≥ 800 Lux, all lamps shall be explosion-proof.
c) Preliminarily plan the project implementation plan and prepare the project schedule according to contract requirements.
Li Zhi, from the project of CETC Avionics Co., Ltd., will organize the final acceptance of the Project, and Li Zhi is the leader of the acceptance team, leading the civil work and installation acceptance teams
Embedding two DN150 stainless steel drain water pipe, i=1.5% slope to collection sump
Strengthened anti-corrosion measure shall be taken for the buried hot-dip galvanized steel pipe, namely, four layers of oil and three layers of cloth (apply a layer of waterproof oil and stick a piece of glass fabric; repeat the procedure three times and finally apply a layer of oil). The total thickness of the anti-corrosive coating shall not be less than 5.5 mm.
② Technical innovation shall be carried out for the project and technical innovation plan shall be prepared under the system. The preparation content of the innovation plan can refer to ten new technologies promoted and applied by the Ministry of Housing and Urban-Rural Development.
AASHTO LRFD 2010 BRIDGE DESIGN SPECIFICATIONS
The combination of pipe sections shall comply with relevant provisions of design documents.
Acquisition unit shall control the storage environment of materials and equipment, store the materials and equipment to be used based on their classifications, put necessary cushion in the contact surface of two articles and stack them tidily, provide a cover whenever necessary, to prevent being wet and contaminated.
The line is divided into several sections by taking the station with temporary turnaround conditions along the whole line, considering the temporary operation route that can be selected only if one of the sections fails.
2. Starting sequence in case of heating: ventilator-electric heater.
It was extremely hot in July 2001, with the average temperature reaching 24.6 °C.
□Raw/auxiliary material fabrication □raw/auxiliary material inspection □use of raw/auxiliary materials □product production
The wiring length error shall be ≤±10mm;
The air source system provides the locomotive and the brake and air equipment of the vehicle with clean, dry and stable compressed air.
3. Check the condition of seals before pressing, and visually check the alignment status of such seals, which must be aligned before pressuring.
One original and two copies of completion certificate issued by the Purchaser;
Crawler crane or truck crane is selected for structural hoisting according to the existing equipment at the site,and calculate the weight of main components and crane parameters.
During the identification and planning period, the General Manager decomposes the quality/environment/occupational health and safety objectives by department and level, implements management at different levels and staff participation, adopts a systematic management method and carries out continuous improvement to meet the requirements by relevant parties;
Strengthen fund dispatching, guarantee normal usage of fund of key projects and guarantee key projects can be conducted based on plan smoothly.
All departments/offices and project teams regularly organize relevant trainings to improve the professional ability of observers.
If the amount of a certain interim payment to be paid to the Contractor is less than the minimum amount of payment stipulated in the Special Clauses, the Employer will not issue the Interim Payment Certificate and not pay this amount.
There is one straight commissioning line, one curve extensive commissioning line in the new plant of Puzhen Co. with the maximum dynamic commissioning speed of 80km/h.
In the column of elevations, the radius of vertical curve is not considered for the values inside the brackets, and the vertical curve radius is 15,000m.
One passenger underpass is designed, with net width of 6m.
Since the Buyer will pay the Vendor the contract money in the way as specified in the following text, the Vendor guarantees that it will provide uniforms, accessories, and incidental services to the Buyer, and fix defects for the Buyer in accordance with the Contract.
(6) Clarifications and modifications made for tendering document in accordance with clause 2.2 and clause 2.3 of this chapter are part of this tendering document.
The upper part of a panel is provided with aluminum alloy air funnels. The surface complies with art technology conditions. The lower part of a panel is provided with skirting boards (0.5 mm stainless steel, horizontal brushed).
For dual-locomotive traction, the ruling gradient is 18.5‰.
List of Records (JL-4.2.4-01)
Distributing Main System Diagram of Monthly Inspection Shed (Office Building and Building for Work Teams)
(1) The construction areas shall be determined rationally according to the design drawings and construction organization, and the construction activities shall be carried out in phases, so as to minimize the impacts on the existing traffic flow.
Moisturizing method: After concrete is poured and formed, it will be cured by water storage, watering or water spraying. Insulation method: The concrete, after being formed, will be immediately covered by plastic thin film and insulation materials, or painted with membrane curing liquid for curing.
The construction handover from civil works to track works shall be carried out continuously according to the track laying sequence, and the handover section shall not be less than 2km each time.
It is good to improving efficiency of urban traffic, reducing accidents and regulating traffic.
1.5 Resource Allocation and Management Service within Construction Site
The Quality Management Department is responsible for organizing relevant departments to strictly follow the inspection control points set in the product quality plan.
(3) The processing of pipeline beveling is as shown in Table 2.2.4.10-6.
b) Welding materials shall be stored in special areas, and all kinds of welding materials shall be marked by cards carrying the information such as category, model, specification, production date and batch number, so as to ensure that the account, material and card are consistent;
CCCC First Highway Consultants Co., Ltd (029-88322888)
After the EPC Contractor complete equipment commissioning, the operation organization will carry out trial operation and production.
3. Provide sewage purification tank to treat construction wastewater, which can be only discharged into rivers or streams after it complies with the environmental protection standards. Production and domestic garbage should be treated centralizedly.
(8) Reinforcement measures shall be taken for enclosure of traffic guiding to ensure stability and firmness. Carry out safety inspection frequently, if any problems happen, repair timely to prevent the enclosure from falling down due to natural force.
Sampling unit: every 300 t of raw coal is a sampling unit.
Fabrication and installation of cable terminals; Pyrocondensation; Section within 35mm2
Maintainability test can refer to MIL-STD-471 standard.
(2) Bind bottom reinforcement on the top plate in such way that ensures uniform spacing of stirrups after erecting bottom formwork on the top plate.
However, it shall be noted that both solutions require suspension of traffic during the construction period (several months).
After the abrasion-resistant powder is evenly distributed on the concrete surface, perform the purifying treatment three times with purifying machine.
(1) Operation services of landfill disposal of municipal solid waste in the landfill: RMB 32.80/ton
Inner Mongolia Western Natural Gas 4X50X104m3/d LNG Project
b) Formulate annual quality awareness training plan, organize its implementation and evaluate its effectiveness.
Agency Framework Agreement (industry and commerce; the other party is an individual)
Protection measures shall be taken for the cultural relics and ancient trees affected in the construction process. The garden department shall be entrusted to be responsible for the relocation of the trees to be relocated after the confirmation by the garden authority. For the cultural relics to be protected, the protection scheme shall be proposed under the guidance of the cultural relics unit, the cultural relics protection unit shall be notified, and the site protection shall be organized.
18.4.4 The raw materials, mixing ratio design, and mixing of concrete shall meet the requirements stated in Sections 6.2 and 6.3 and Article 6.4.1 of Standard for Acceptance of Concrete Works in Railway (TB 10424).
The main air compressor shall be provided with completed functions, able to run reliably with low noise and completed with protection measures.
1.12 Additional Contract Price refers to the contract price added by calculating contract price after being confirmed by the Employer under the circumstance that contract price needs to be increased in the process of contract execution.
Apply torsion within 20 minutes after tightening.
3 Embedded water swelling strips should be used for waterproofing between invert blocks and lining concrete of cast-in-situ arch and side wall.
Some of the rescue equipment or facilities for the site should be placed at site and hung with signs.
Kaiyuan, willing to advance with you hand in hand and meet the new future!
Supervisor: Fujian Luxin Transportation Construction Supervision Co.,Ltd.
Transverse joints of upper and lower layers shall be staggered from each other for more than 50cm.
In 1997, CRTG applied TBM in the construction of Qinling Railway Tunnel on Xi'an-Ankang Railway Line; in 2000, CRTG applied compound shield TBM in the construction of Yuexiu Park - Sanyuanli Running Tunnel on Guangzhou Metro Project, setting off a climax of factory-like flow process in tunnel construction.
1. The BER performance requirements for the 2048kbit/s link of V5.2 interface are as follows:
In case of any discrepancy between the text and the Annexes of the Agreement, the text shall prevail.
Whereas the micro water measurement shall be carried out 48 hours after the breaker is inflated, and the micro water in the air chamber connected with or not with the arc extinguishing chamber shall meet the requirements; the insulation resistance value of the opening and closing coils shall not be less than 10 M Ω; the withstand voltage test shall be conducted at 80% of the factory test voltage.
7. Inspection methods and measures for quality assurance
3.3.5.2.3 Man-machine interface of control system.
"Coating Application Sheet" shall be completed by the operator in advance and coating can be conducted only after approval is granted.
The expanded power box is hoisted to the train bottom with four M12 bolts.
7. The OD data of passenger transportation and freight transportation of the railway in the last five years.
The function of fire prevention is realized by the carbody, power supply system, traction system, on-board safety monitoring and testing equipment subsystem.
The external assignment training of staff in Functional Departments shall be audited by the training director of the General Management Department, and then be approved by department director.
Tie bars or mesh shall be placed in mortar joints, the embedment length shall meet the requirements, and the vertical position deviation shall not exceed the height of one block.
Interchange, as the entrance and exit of high-grade highway, has important functions of traffic conversion and traffic connection.
It is a testbed for comprehensive tests on various properties of electric equipment.
(3) Carefully select the purchase channels and transport modes of materials and equipment, and complete the assessments of transportation costs, to ensure that transportation expenses are within the scope of financial forecasts.
Node diagram of simulation calculation under the headstock condition of the right line within a section
When the 1/4 power losing, the train still can run to the end of the line.
After scraping, if the bearing interference becomes larger, the tightening force of bearing shall be readjusted;
The Project Management Department shall carry out the planning and implementation of continuous improvement in terms of product quality and quality management system in combination with the actual conditions of the project.
Table 5.3.1Estimation table of dangerous rock mass
The elevation of top surface of inner rails at the north and south portal of the tunnel is 31.875 (31.95)m and 29.255m respectively; the maximum buried depth of the tunnel is about 68m.
DIN5510-1 Preventive fireproofing for railway rolling stock, fireproofing classes, technical measures and evidence.
Fix the unstable cranes and suspended objects etc. so as to avoid secondary injuries by other hidden dangers.
Lighting for emergency guidance at EW15 and EW16
In summary, the quantity of structural works of option K is smaller.
7) Implement ISO-9001 series standards and strictly carry out process control so as to standardize and program the research work,.
B. Concrete mixing: Moisture content of the sand and rock shall be measured prior to mixing of concrete every day so as to adjust the actual water consumption for mixing.
(2) It is needed to describe existing problems and solutions of product development; in addition, it is needed to describe feasibility of project implementation.
The large sized stone with a uniform surface should be selected as corner stone and face stone.
5.3.2.4 Face Recognition Algorithm and Search Analysis Server
This manual applies to item number: 02181001(0001-0010)
Liquid surface inside the tank not filled with inert gas is divided as Zone 0; space within the range taking vent nozzle as the center and having a radius of 1.5m as well as pit and groove below the grade level within explosive dangerous zone is divided as Zone 1; the scope within 3m away from external wall and top of storage tank is divided as Zone 2.
Supervised and prepared by the State Administration of Work Safety
If the claim made by the Client to the Supervisor cannot be justified, the Client shall be responsible for any cost incurred by the Supervisor in relation to the claim.
3. The depreciation of original value of fixed assets provided this year
The Contractor shall provide the earthing complying with all the following performance requirements::
Note: H of anti-pollution suspended ear insulator shall meet the requirements for the installation of M18 bolt pin in double-ear connector.
(22) If any private connection is made from the permanent power supply, water supply and steam (gas) supply facilities for the Project without permit, USD 100-500 will be fined for each case;
The length of exposed wire core after crimping shall not exceed 1 ~ 2mm.
Before the vertical main reinforcement of pier and abutment body is embedded, its arrangement shall be marked accurately, and in the process of binding, it shall be located and checked with the vertical and horizontal cross curve at the center of pier and abutment body and the outer contour line.
When it is longer than 80m, the drip uniformity is greater than 90% and the working pressure is greater than 0.1Mpa, the drop irrigation belt can withhold the tension force of 130N (the drop irrigation pipe can withhold the tension force of 180N), with no breakage and leakage.
If there is a breach of contract by the supplier, the buyer will use it for compensation or indemnity.
2 The impervious grade of underground structures in this Work is ___ , and □ the frost resistant grade is ___ .
An accident, which causes economic losses of more than RMB 500,000 to customers or the Company, causes on-site shutdown, rework for more than 15 days, or may cause shutdown for more than 15 days, is a major quality accident.
Documents in the Bid do not bear official seals of the Bidder, or signatures of the legal representative or his entrusted agent as required by the Bidding Document, or the original copy of the Power of Attorney is not provided with the Bid even if the documents have been signed by the entrusted agent;
The full scope and limits of the project are generally described in the Bidding Documents and shall not be limited in any way by the description in the quotation breakdown.
(1) Environmental protection work shall be carried out to temporary production and living facilities and construction access roads that need to be environmentally protected in accordance with environmental protection requirements. Water shall be sprinkled frequently to prevent the adverse impact of construction dust on ground vegetation and crops.
The grating plates of permanent operation platform and passage shall be installed step by step from bottom to top; in case of lack of goods, missing part shall be installed with closed rigid double-guardrail envelope and set with skirting board, or replaced temporarily with the grating plates from other positions for replacement after arrival of goods.
d) Leakage of safety management information-based platform.
Table 10-2 Investment Estimation Table Unit: USD 10,000
Immediately carry out maintenance when users require service of this sort.
Key items of quality control at interface between design and commissioning
Safety Department and Engineering Department of the Company shall train the management on site on GB/T19001-2008 quality management sysem, GB/T28001-2011 occupation health and safety management systems and GB/T24001-2004 environmental management system.
Training should identify the responsibilities of each individual, the tasks to be performed, the knowledge and skills required to carry out the tasks, the understanding and mastery of risk identification, the adoption of the necessary emergency measures, and the safe evacuation of people, training in rescue operations, etc.
Transverse drainage is adopted for ballast tub on top of abutment. Refer to relevant drawings for details of structures such as ballast tub on top of abutment, sidewalk, etc.
The casing passing through the back wall shall be placed properly and then fixed with cement mortar.
Items requires the purchaser agreeing to reduce the availability of the nuclear power plant to ensure the safety.
(12) The Operation Management Department shall undertake evaluation work for the personnel Administration Office and monitoring rooms of toll stations. The results of evaluation shall be submitted to the Administration Office.
"For the construction project requiring the environmental impact registration form by law, the construction unit shall submit the registration form to the competent department of environmental protection administration at county level in the location of the construction project as required by the competent department of environmental protection administration under the State Council for filing. .
1) Fully Stable The gallery has sufficient self-stabilization capability for a long period of time, can maintain stability without any artificial support, and has occasional falling blocks and no collapse.
Properly installed clamp shall not drop off when gently wrenching right and left, and the middle splint shall not dislocate or drop off, otherwise, it needs to repeat above procedures for installation and inspection, until the clamp is correctly installed.
Fig. 2.26 shows the first sliding running process of train on wet rail at 80km/h~0km/h on level and straight track under AW4
2.3.2.3 Passenger Traffic Volume and Maximum Number of Passengers at Main Stations
Joint-venture Agreement of Vientiane ~ Wanrong Expressway Project
In the construction process, the bonding effect between marking paint and pavement shall be guaranteed;
If the station has property development, the property development area shall be an isolated fire compartment, with the usable area not more than 2,000 m2 (equipped with water spraying), and two separate evacuation exits that can directly lead to the ground shall be set in each fire compartment.
The Contract is signed at Information Industrialization Center, Information Industrialization Base, Kunming Economic and Technology Development Zone
This amount is the total price required by the Supplier for performing the Contract. Unless otherwise stated, the Purchaser shall not pay additional costs to the Supplier for the purpose of the Supplier's performance of the Contract.
Finally, smoothen upper surface of the bearing platform for 2~3 times after initial setting and before final setting of concrete.
General construction sequences: subgrade → subbase → base → surfacing (DBST).
1) The tubes and pipe fittings for the Project shall be stored by specifications and materials. The stainless steel pipes and heat resistant steel pipes shall also be stored separately. All the valves stored shall be checked to see if their ends are enclosed. All the materials stored shall be clearly marked to specify the specification, material, certificate No. and other details.
BS EN 13452-2:2003 Railway Applications - Braking - Mass Transit Brake Systems - Part 2: Methods of Test
The quality accident shall be timely reported to the supervising engineer once it is discovered. Causes, current situation and handling method of the quality accident shall be studied carefully, be submitted in writing to the Supervisor for approval and then be implemented.
The statistics from UIC show that, by the end of September 1, 2014, the total operating mileage of HSR lines in world is 22,954 km, with 12,754 km under construction and nearly 18,841 km under long-term planning.
The construction management scheme is composed of organization management and commissioning, material management and procurement, resource management (labor and equipment), subcontractor management, coordination, reporting and internal management, design and construction activities' integration method.
Display the total electric quantity of system, total electric quantity for operation, temperature etc;
University: Air Force Engineering University Air Force Engineering University (seal)
Therefore, the independent hardware security redundant computer-based interlocking system is recommended for the new stations of the line.
3. Settlement method for disputes on the Contract: Any dispute arising from the performance of the Contract shall be settled upon consultation by both parties; for failure of consultation, any party may raise legal actions to the people's court in jurisdiction to settle the dispute through litigation.
In case of any traffic responsibility or relevant responsibility after the product is put into operation along with complete locomotive/complete train, Dalian Locomotive shall claim for compensation of the Supplier according to written documents issued by relevant departments.
Calculation basis of reinforcement for reinforced concrete: Code for Design of Concrete Structures (GB 50010-2002)
The occurrence of major or more serious quality accidents;
Construction solid waste having environmental impact along the railway line mainly includes:
Such an adjustment shall be a reasonable price within the range of the price tag. The potential subcontractors shall submit a separate sealed letter stating the price change resulting from the adjustment of the potential subcontractors' tender within the time limit specified in the contractor's technical clarification.
7.4.6During the prestressing stage, the strength of the member and the stability of the axially compressed member shall be checked and calculated.
Code for Design of Metro (GB50157)
Fire-fighting equipment power monitoring system voltage sensor
6.19 Adjustable safety support shall be set around platform bottom, and the lower support platform shall have coordinated dimension and good-looking appearance.
For clean areas of different level in the test area and packaging area, respective pressure sensor is used to control the speed of each FFU, so as to ensure the requirements for indoor pressure.
9.5.6Before the installation of member, it is mandatory to obtain conformity information for foundation acceptance.
● Geographic information system (GIS) construction: construction of such databases as database for current situation of land use, cadastral database, database for overall planning of land use, geological mineral database; other geographical information system construction and development and application of relevant software.
75%~95% (in 30 consecutive days)
Make the completion time for all the rolling works as short as possible.
2) The installation of formworks shall be from bottom to top by sections and layers. Firm supports shall be installed inside and outside the formworks.
The Contractor shall liaise and co-ordinate through the Engineer on interface requirements during the design, installation, testing and commissioning of the Works where the Works interface with the Railway to ensure proper integration with existing systems.
Submit it to the Regional Business Supervisor for review after review by the Regional Technical Supervisor
Important materials (cement, rolled steel, etc) and construction equipment must be of traceability.
3.5.5Hazard Rating and Risk Matrix
Fabrication of single arc plate on tank roof shall be based on arc mould.
Firmly establish the idea of "quality first", strengthen the technical training and education for employees, improve the quality of employees and the level of construction technology, so as to ensure that the quality of the project meets the standard.
The base material containing excessive moisture shall be dried during compaction.
1) Road level: Two-way four-lane standards of expressway;
4. The strength grade of concrete for the pile, bearing platform and foundation beam is C25.
5.2.1.1 Be responsible for signing master localization agreement.
Communication between train control and monitoring system and subsystem
The workers shall be educated to form good health habits, such as do not litter wastes and debris and keep the working and living environment kept tidy and clean.
(8) Paving depends on the construction setting-out. Setting-out of all curves shall be performed as per the square grid to ensure smooth and natural curves.
When pipes with various diameters are piled, large and heavy pipes are placed at bottom while small and light pipes are placed at top. The height of piled pipes shall not exceed 2m. Both sides are retained by wooden wedges or planks. Pipes with a diameter larger than 1m shall not be piled for storage.
The interior of the driver's cab is divided into the upper and lower spaces by the ceiling mounted on the top. The upper serves as a ventilation space for the fans and the lower as the crew cabin.
(2) The wheel flange thickness is less than 28mm, the flange is damaged and has crack and projecting.
In laying cable in tunnel or channel, cable shall be laid on support or cable tray.
3.2.5 Natural gas is used as the heat source of domestic hot water. The heat consumption of domestic hot water is 44 kw. Two 22KW gas water heaters are used for central heating.
The Materials Management Department of the Project Management Department shall organize the procurement of self-purchased materials, and shall be responsible for the daily business. Before procurement of materials, procurement bidding or supplier evaluation shall be conducted, and a "list of successful or qualified suppliers" shall be established and submitted to the Employer for review.
The outdoor buried rainwater drainage pipes are FRPP pipes with socket welded rubber sealing ring interfaces.
In words: RMB twenty million six hundred and eleven thousand only (¥ 20,611,000)
Hu Fengyu has been working in our company since July 1990.
(6) The starting time of lawsuit and arbitration refers to the date that the lawsuit and arbitration is accepted and heard, or the documents about lawsuit and arbitration issued by the court are received.
The methods of pictures, videos, textual materials, etc. shall be used to promote the significance of cultural relics protection and teach staff to identify simple cultural relics and make the participants in construction to establish the awareness of document protection.
5) Where conditions permit, ballast discarded in reconstruction of the existing line could be used for subgrade. If necessary, measures, such as cleaning and artificial mixing, may be taken to meet the requirement.
3) If the Engineer fails to review it within 7 days after receiving the statement of quantities submitted by the Contractor, the quantities in the statement of quantities submitted by the Contractor shall be deemed as actual quantities completed by the Contractor.
Do not plaster to the bottom of walls and set foam board at junction with the ground to reserve flex space for pisolite ground.
28. Assembly and installation of A1 electric panel assembly 1 (TEA972307000)
Bracket erection and coordinate elevation measurement: 2 brackets are installed on the lining of the undercut tunnel, and coordinates and elevations of the 2 brackets are accurately measured using the pass points, and reported to related parties for timely re-test.
All-electronic execution unit takes computer control technology as the core and power electronic switching technology as the foundation.
2. All steels in the drawing are Q235.
In terms of labor choice, allocate it in an optimized way, develop a reasonable reward system in order to improve the labor and production levels.
96780.00 In word: (ninety-six thousand seven hundred and eighty)
3.3.10Design, construction, installation, maintenance, service and dismantlement of temporary works (including maintenance, service and dismantlement for traffic reconciliation and pipeline relocation);
Table 2. Hardness, Metallographic Structure, Depth of Decarburized Layer, Residual Deformation and Antirust Performance
(4) PPP Contract Part B (including the relevant part in the Addendum of the procurement documents);
Pile foundation shall be tested as per the provisions of Technical Code for Testing of Building Foundation Piles (JGJ106-2003). The proportion of piles undertaking ultrasonic inspection shall be not less than 30% of the number of pier foundation on the whole bridge.
Table 3-9Relation Curve among Downgoing Time, Speed, Line Current, Motor Current, and Mileage
1) Where concrete disintegration occurs or adjustment is to be carried out by adding additives during transportation, the mixing truck shall mix rapidly for not less than 120s;
Modified documents shall be approved by the original leader in charge.
A It is one of the key jobs of contract management in the supervision work to formulate a scientific and reasonable project contract network diagram according to the characteristics of the Project and determine the relationship between the units participating in the construction.
Provide two low-speed mixers in each anoxic zone, totally 8 mixers; each mixer shall keep a flow rate in channel at 0.3m/s.
Handling charges for land acquisition and building demolition: not included.
Stop and correct any behaviors against the rules, regulations and uncivilized operation. Penalty might be necessary.
The rear driver's cab only performs running control of the track dynamic stabilizer; the front driver's cab performs operation control of the track dynamic stabilizer as well as the running control.
Brake forming process: rebar size on the batter board shall be given according to the material list of rebar, during brake formation, the bending positons shall be marked out with chalk based on the size and then adjustment value shall be deducted according to bending angle.
2) The pipes with nominal diameter (DN) being over 50 shall be welded by gas tungsten arc welding and shielded metal arc welding;
The whole bridge has such preceat I beam for 210 pieces in total, among which, 100 pieces are in the splash zone
The technical quality is objective while the functional quality is subjective annd is the passenger's experience and perception of the services he is provided during the whole journey.
Road transportation of anti-corrosion pipes (primary transportation)
Gravel shall use gravel mix with natural granular composition less than 50mm and content controlled within 50% with no plant residue or rubbish. Silt content to be less than 5%.
The power supply line in the tunnel adopts a three-phase five-wire power supply system, and the power source adopts a three-phase 380V voltage.
2.2.1 Ensure that the materials comply with the relevant release standards.
8) The drinking water chamber shall be arranged on the site, and there shall be tea water buckets in the drinking water chamber, and the water buckets shall be marked with obvious signs and shall be covered and locked , and it shall be managed by specially-assigned person.
If other lubricant is used, the torque must be adjusted accordingly.
Providing the fare collection system equipment of the project, including central data acquisition and data processing equipment, on-board charge equipment, SVT initialization equipment, SVT selling/recharging equipment, tools and appliances for maintenance and repair, and spare parts.
a) The stopping point has been set up and trains must stop at the platform section.
Interior decoration: compound mortar and cement mortar are used in plastering for inner wall surface while acrylic inner wall paint is used for finish;
Jiangsu Xingguang Power Generation Equipment Co., Ltd. (special seal of invoice) 32128371861292X
(10) All the above settings will be adjustable after acquisition of experience in service.
According to characteristics of design general contracting together with different division of disciplines ten departments and one division are set, including:
4.1 The design codes issued by the state and its ministries and commissions, and the current engineering construction of various specialties
For digital signature, RSA or DSA algorithm shall be used.
Analysis on completion conditions of product quality indicators.
A perfect drainage system shall be established in order to prevent water and soil loss.
China Construction Metal Structure AssociationIndustry Association Unified Social Credit Code: 51100000500002088N
b) In the approval of product drawings and design documents, personnel at all levels should meet the following requirements:
In the bottom supporting structure, the structural beam is mainly used to strengthen the rigidity and strength of the platform door structure, so as to ensure that the structural beam can be used as a main bearing component when the whole side platform structure is loaded, to increase the rigidity of the door machine beam and to reduce the bending stress of the door machine beam.
A. The project manager is the core of construction safety management, shall take unshirkable responsibility for the safety issue on site, and must ensure the work safety in each link.
Sewage, noise, dust, toxic and hazardous waste discharge are rigorously controlled, and there are no major complaints from related parties.
4. Any duty-free or other policies for imported materials and equipment;
For main quantities and investment of the whole line and key works, we will conduct index comparison and analysis with other similar lines or projects to ensure the rationality, accuracy, and reliability of the work quantities and investment.
(3) Adhere to the idea of "people first and quality foremost" and attach great importance to safety design so as to safeguard vehicles and the people to the maximum extent.
On-board equipment of all systems shall be installed by Vendor.
Passing through the plain concrete pile section of the bridge pile, complete with foundation consolidation measures
5.30m~6.00m to the left side of culvert
Explain the measures that must be taken for trains off-line for a period of time (including measures to be taken before and after the off-line respectively).
The intrusion alarm system adopts local withdrawal/deployment, and the user unit withdraws/deploys independently. The security center can withdraw/deploy and check the withdrawal/deployment status, and can receive alarm signals.
Emery cloth (180-200 meshes)
In the European cement standards, the maximum allowable mixing amount of blending materials is largest. For example, the mixing amount of slag can be up to 95%, 85% in Germany cement standards and 70% in Chinese cement standards; the allowable mixing amount of fly ash and pozzolan is closer; but in the European cement standards, the cement added with the blending materials is subdivided in accordance with the mixing amount.
We guarantee that if our bid is accepted, we will strictly implement the terms and conditions in the bidding document, earnestly fulfill Party B's responsibilities and obligations, and fulfill the commitments set forth in our bid.
Based on characteristics of the project and surrounding environment, in consideration of construction scheme, the following safety measures and safety guarantee system are worked out to restrict unsafe behaviors of the people, control unsafe state of materials and unsafe environment conditions, and to have closed management of safe production by following the principle of conventional science of accident.
The preparation of train service plan is restricted by railway infrastructure equipment conditions.
10. The concrete shall be shall be cured with covered geotextiles and by watering, so as to ensure the concrete surface always keeps wet and the curing time is not less than 14 days.
1 Refer to ISO2768-mK for unstated tolerances.
1) Site workers shall receive fire safety education and shall be regularly organized for fire drills.
The route control optoelectronic detector is mainly composed of photoelectric switch, connecting plug, photoelectric switch bracket, etc., it is used to detect positions of the materials and feedback the signals to the electrical control system so as to achieve control requirements required for the system.
The environmental classification of the bridge is exposed to the rain or with dry-wet alternation.
The sedimentary environment of the foundation soil transits from the continental facies to the marine facies.
buried treatment of all the mud should meet the limit given in Appendix (3).
② The rigid conduit shall be connected with the lighting fixture through the flexible conduit, and the length of the flexible conduit cannot be more than 1.2m;
│ │ │ │ DELIJAN Station Section.hdm
Total 18 points of the culvert are inspected for carbonation depth. Inspection indicates that the maximum depth is 8.5mm and the minimum depth is 2.5mm.
2.4.4 After the bolster has been cleared, there are other through type defects with a single area over 30cm2 or total area over 60cm2.
4.2.3.3 After the customer representative comes to the Company, the inspection host shall organize the technical, production, inspection and manufacturing departments to fully communicate the product situation with the customer representative and approve the product inspection procedures.
North Male Atoll (55km x 30km) is one of 22 atolls forming the main structure of Maldive Islands.
Air ducts shall be numbered by system and stacked in order and reasonably to facilitate transport.
Project Management Department has established at construction site to directly command the construction. Major technical and management personnel of this Department are with rich construction experiences and organized to construct as per item method.
1 set of three-layer switch is provided from Rawalpindi Station to rolling stock washing house of the station. Integrated access device (IAD) of telephone is provided and included in the railway telephone switching network.
The hazard log is updated (Version A.4).
Before any part of the Project is carried out, the Tenderer shall submit relevant technical specifications, analysis reports, and all other specified documents and drawings to the Tenderee, according to the requirements of the Technical Specifications for the Project.
Application for measurement shall be proposed by Party B at the end of each quarter and measurement shall be made by Party A after verification.
(2) Waste water, exhaust gas, solid waste, noise, shock and discarded radioactive sources from construction;
After the construction of culvert pipe and diversion channel under the bridge are completed and normal water diversion can be ensured, lift the block of sandbags at the channel entrance, making water flow through the diversion channel and culvert pipe.
After confirmed by the Employer, as a procedural document for relevant interface issue management of the Project, the plan shall be binding on all parties to the interface. The interface management plan includes:
12. The financial audit report issued by the accounting firm for the last three consecutive years (2014, 2015, 2016), or such audited financial statements.
5.14.5 The mechanical vibration resistance shall conform to the requirements of 4.4.2 in JT/T 817-2011.
In 2009, the net sales of Mother Company B (Short) exceeded 23 billion USD (about 157.07 billion RMB), of which about 765 million USD (about 5.223 billion Yuan) was from the Chinese market.
2.14.1.3. The bus network or the bus network + backup train wire control mode shall be adopted for the train control. The network system shall have a high redundancy.
(4) The anchor bolt must be provided with such accessories as steel pads, anchor head and stop-grouting plug, and the dimension of steel pads should be 150*150*6 mm.
Laying of flame retarding cable WDZB-VV-4x50+1X25mm2
3) Auxiliary current is supplied through the auxiliary inverter (integrated in the traction converter). The auxiliary converter consists of the constant voltage constant frequency converter (CVCF) and the voltage converter variable frequency converter (VVVF). The auxiliary converter can realize the redundancy function.
Types of train services (e.g. WKT related Long Haul, WKTrelated Shuttle, non-WKT related national train service, etc.);
(1) Smooth roads; (2) Smooth drainage and drainage facilities; (3) Site pavement hardening treatment; (4) Landscaping; (5) Others site standards subject to green safety and civilized construction
The gangway shall have a height of not less than 1,900 mm, a width of not less than 1,300 mm and a minimum curve radius of R110m.
b. Special requirements: Development and application of new materials, new technologies, new equipment, new processes, and environmental protection and labor insurance requirements;
Carry out a standard discharging process (140A for 1C) for the test sample as per a) in Clause 5 under room temperature;
Arranging construction plan during the period of rainy season should concentrate the manpower and highlight sections, based on the principle of finishing the process on the same day. We must not rush the process or meet tight deadlines on rainy season.
Record the measurement error at each calibration point of the transducer, namely the reading of the multimeter.
(1) A sound system is established for mechanical equipment operators with certificates and maintenance system.
After the completion of inspection before power-on and the system is confirmed to have the right conditions for power-on, then the cabinet can be powered on.
Take responsibility for accidents caused by failing to inspect/calibrate the instruments and meters at regular intervals.
Control risk and transfer risk are two methods that are mainly used for prevention of construction risks.
Huadian Shiliquan Power Generation Project 1X660MW
It can complete automatic detection, remote detection and remote maintenance and other functions.
[1] Evaluation and Study on Structural Performance and Reliability of Shield Lining under Erosion Environment for Life Cycle [D]. Xing Sun. Lanzhou University of Technology 2018
5. N1 and N2 should be reliably welded, and N3 and N4 are welded from both sides with a weld joint of length 15cm and effective thickness 6mm.
8. Refer to calculation formula of straddle-type monorail for the train running resistance:
10 The emergency lamps are arranged on the wall or ceiling. The emergency exits marker light are arranged above the entrances and exits. The evacuation indication marker lights are arranged at evacuation corridor and its corner and staircase in equal distance of 0.5 m, the distance of indication light at the corridor being no more than 20 m.
2. Place the receiving container at the sanding port to collect sand. The operators on the car and the maintenance personnel underfloor call for sanding function test. Move the sanding switch on the driver's console forward and make sure all forward sanding ports sprinkle sand. Move the same switch backward and make sure all the forward sanding ports sprinkle sand normally.
Control Procedures for Technique Research and Sample Vehicle Trial-manufacture Q/JJT02(7.5)02-2008(A)
11) The treatment of foundation for ditch of drainage pipe, as well as the strength of base plate for the well and the pond shall conform to the design requirements.
The Contractor is responsible for providing pre-weld heating equipment (it is suggested to be electric heating tapes) and temperature measurement devices for welding joints of converter shell and the main body of backing ring, to complete pre-weld heating and measurement and meet the requirements of SMS;
8.3 The project manager of Party B shall organize the construction in accordance with the construction organization design (or construction scheme) approved by the project manager of the EPC Contractor and based on the instruction s sent based on the construction contract.
Foundation beam, base slab and base plate: 50mm for lower reinforcement with spacer, 70mm for lower reinforcement without spacer; 25mm for upper reinforcement.
5) The double-row ETC gantry system set up in the provincial boundary and the reverse ETC gantry system at the same section should have data sharing and de-duplication mechanisms to ensure the cooperative processing capability between gantry systems and prevent repeated transactions and reverse transactions.
As for single-shielded cables, the shielding layer shall cover corresponding cores and cover all cores as much as possible (exposed length controlled within 20 mm) before the cores are connected to pins/jacks.
(4) Optimal design shall run through the whole process of basic design and construction drawing design, and the design schedule and quality objectives shall be reviewed, and the implementation shall be followed up and checked;
Set up the limits on working hours and rest time, and stipulate the vocation system to protect the workers' safety and health in the perspective of time.
b) Preparation prior to test: short-circuiting in insulation test, Table 10
For the materials obtained from urgent purchasing, if they belong to general technical materials or need acceptance because they are tooling, molds or equipment, they shall be accepted as per the corresponding acceptance procedure.
It is generally required to measure once every 6 months to ensure the accuracy of the gauge.
It is forbidden to arrange the disposal yard in sensitive areas, such as water conservation districts, scenic regions, natural protection area and others.
The purpose of this process is to create conditions for the root system growth of lawn plants.
Whether the non-competitive fees such as levies and charges, taxes, safety protection fees, civilized construction and environmental protection fees are charged according to regulations
At present, China's EMU products cover speeds of 250 km/h, 300 km/h, 350 km/h and above, and can be adapted to different lines, different environmental conditions and different transportation requirements.
(RO concentrate backfilled into landfill area for evaporation 3332.2)
The operation shall be safe and reliable. All switches shall be installed behind the protection plate with openings and only the operating handle and buttons are visible.
Each track can meet the requirements of wheel replacement operations for one 8-car train.
Cantilever rod type porcelain insulator 12KN (creepage length 1800MM)
"Three simultaneous" (simultaneous design, simultaneous construction and simultaneous use) management: There were no new renovation and extension projects in 2017; the machining workshop of tunnel component factory completed in 2016 has passed the environmental assessment, safety assessment and professional assessment; occupational health facility, environmental protection facility etc. have been put into operation simultaneously with equipment and facilities of the Project.
The Employer shall construct the construction project - Fabricated Decoration Works of Xicheng Old City Conservation Purposive Prearrangement Housing Project in Gaolizhuang, Fengtai District (hereafter referred to as "the Project"), and has accepted the bidding proposed by the Contractor of undertaking the construction, completion, delivery and repair of any defects in the Project.
Other repair fees refer to daily repair fees and overhaul fees of fixed assets including buildings, tracks and equipment system (except vehicles).
Optical cables should be fixed on cabling racks with cable fixer;
If no value-added tax is considered here, "0.16" in the subject of value-added tax should be changed into 0 and the net profit without consideration of value-added tax could be generated automatically.
The self-developed bellows positioning jig frame can ensure that bellows arrangement in line with the design as much as possible.
Girder: factory fabrication and on-site assembly;
After the construction of the last layer of shoulder, set out the edge line of the shoulder again and carry out trimming with grader according to the design line and slope.
The machines and instruments used for prestressing shall be managed by special personnel and shall be maintained and checked regularly.
D.Tighten the fastening bolt of intermediate gangway foot plate and the rear fastening nuts of left and right upper slide rails.
See the figure on the left for the specific dimensions of concrete buttress.
When the Company decreases the registered capital, the balance sheet and the property inventory must be prepared.
H-30747, H-30748 citric acid dosing pump
c) Get to know the service condition of the inspection object, the process procedure and dangers that may happen;
Unless otherwise specified, the currency for the Economic Analysis is USD.(USD 1 = MMK 1519 = CNY 6.70.
Therefore, the outward transportation of bauxite is an important issue, and it is urgent that the mining area build a railway dedicated for the transportation of bauxite to solve the problem of large-scale export of bauxite.
9.2.10 In case of small deformation of anchoring point, reinforced-concrete lattice retaining wall with anchors may be simplified into cross beam on anchoring point for internal force calculation; in case of large deformation of anchoring point, the impact of deformation on internal force of lattice retaining wall shall be taken into consideration.
This is a 50 m long and 2.5 m wide railway comprehensive simulation sand table composed of two parts, i.e. the sand table model and control equipment.
Determine the key points of adjustment and time limit
Ground water mainly comprises pore water in soil layers and fissure water in bedrock and it is buried deep, so there is small impact on the Project.
All parties agreed that the achievements mentioned above shall be submitted to the second joint working group meeting on transport of China-Europe trains for approval.
Such point cloud data is processed by professional software and then a corresponding point cloud model is established. By comparison with the point cloud model and the design model, the workload of supervisors is reduced.
The contract officially signed on October 30, 2006 by China Civil Engineering Construction Corporation and the Nigeria government.
Table 2Comparison of Technical Parameters between Prototype and New Car
The fault faces towards northeast-southwest direction and developed in the carboniferous slates mixed with sandstones. It intersects with the line near DK227+758 with angle of about 52° and the obliquity and inclination are unknown.
Chapter 13 Contract Modification, Change and Termination
Improve the dormitory living conditions of staff and ensure that articles and equipment for heatstroke prevention and temperature reduction are provided.
In the construction process, various organic solvents and chemical waste liquid cannot be directly poured into the sewer, and the special container shall be used for collection and unified treatment.
Ability to use the bearing capacity of original bridge to some extent;
The contractor shall participate in solving relevant problems in case of any interface technical problems with the Client.
The main valve part of distribution valve is still at the pressure remaining position and the pressure increasing valve is also at the closing position. But for the equalizing part, as the pressure of action tube at the underside of equalizing piston reduces, the pressure of brake cylinder makes the piston move downward. Its top surface leaves the air supply valve to open the center hole at the upper side of piston rod. The compressed air in brake cylinder shall be exhausted into the atmosphere through opened center hole.
1. According to Chinese regulations, no matter what the scope of fire pool service is, only once fire consumption is counted.
3.5.5 The technical disclosure for construction shall meet the following requirements:
If the need arises to use land for temporary purposes, it shall follow the principles of using the land reasonably and economically and try to use the land as less as possible or use no rice fields or arable lands and take proper measures to conserve water and soil.
8.2.2.5 Displacement observation stake of continuously welded track
The temperature in the 2nd SCRUBBER is too low.
Where power, communication and broadcasting equipment (including those in complete equipment) is damaged due to transportation or equipment package and needs the Contractor's repair/disposal on the site, the Contractor shall not reject on any ground; the Issuing Party will admit relevant quantities in the form of field change order;
PAM Delivery Pump 2kg/h 2 sets
Generally, after each use, a brush shall be used to brush the front and back of the screen gently for prompt elimination of the dust deposit. Then the test sieve shall be kept in a dry container or a plastic bag.
c) Certificates of occupational health and safety management system;
Y014A-201-76Fire Hydrant Pipe System
Submersible sewage pump control box is adopted manual operation mode.
The southwest winds are prevalent throughout the year (especially in southwest monsoon season from May to October), which followed by south winds and west winds, with average wind speed of about 6m/s.
8. Existing administrative division, staff allocation and transportation tool setting.
3.4.7.1 The TV signals, telephone signals and network signals are led in via the municipal low-voltage power grid.
7. See general layout plan for absolute elevation to which the relative elevation ±0.000 in the design drawing is corresponding. Elevation shall be adjusted on site if it does not meet the actual conditions.
The single length of the acoustic pipe of pile foundation (N4) is wrong, please clarify it.
The distances from the valve to the side surface of the cabinet and the inside surface in the rear of the cabinet are 140 mm and 100 mm respectively, with the allowable deviation of 5 mm.
● The wheel load reduction rate is calculated according to the wheel-rail vertical force measured by the instrumented wheelset:
When external system of the converter assembly is under abnormal operation, the control system shall immediately inhibit IGBT-driven pulse and assess the situation of abnormal operation of the external system. The external system shall be rapidly recovered when meeting operating conditions.
Regularly organize HSE inspection according to HSE checklist of the project;
Content in this column relates to the special requirements for routine test and nondestructive test. The conditions are as follows:
5.2.6 Personnel qualification process is shown in Fig. 2.
Since the lime kiln is equipped with a switching room (control room), the Client is supposed to lead power (380V) to the pile on LV distribution cabinet in lime kiln provided by the Vendor.
Through the professional and effective operation by the social capitals, better products and services can be provided to the customers.
Water on the pavement surface is drained by the natural crown flowing to the drainage ditch outside the shoulder;
1.00MPa compressed air pipe system
1. Existing Stations Involved in Parallel Section with ML-1
7)The Tenderer shall fill in Table -9 and provide the structure diagram of the wheel, and the test method and test report of the roller.
The vehicle parc in Kaduna, Plateau, Bauchi and Gombe states fluctuates irregularly and greatly. The main reasons are: 1) There are many used (second-hand) cars with poor performance and may be scrapped at any time; 2) High traffic accident rate and serious vehicle damage; 3) Man-made damage.
2. Prior to erection of the steel column, the base reserved anchor bolts shall be checked for their spacing and it shall be checked whether their threads are damaged or not (attention shall be paid to protection of them during construction).
In the import business, all enterprises are required to grasp the opportunity of foreign exchange settlement and make full use of the opportunity of RMB appreciation to reduce the purchase cost.
UPT4004020201-0000290 = Close of order line
When the height difference of two ring beams are ≤ 500MM, the ring beams may be connected with the lintel to form a frame along the vertical round of the opening, as shown in Figure 11-4a.
and the probation period is from(MM/DD/YYYY) to(MM/DD/YYYY).
The contents of the "Effectiveness of Measures Taken to Cope with the Risks and Opportunities" were not provided in the review input documents and review reports of International Drilling Company, No. 3 Drilling Company, No. 2 Drilling Company, Downhole Operation Company, Well Cementing Company, Sulige Gas Field Branch, and KUNSHAN COMPANY.
The Laos-China Railway passes through Luang Prabang and Vang Vieng respectively, so Luang Prabang Station and Vang Vieng Station shall be established. Both stations will accommodate the passenger operation. The area of the station buildings is 6,000m2 and 3,000m2, respectively.
Complete the lifting and lining of curve tracks according to the basic principle of string lining as well as the requirements for professional skills of lineman and railway line maintenance rules.
The step is 0.2m wide and high.
Analysis on Possibility of Squeezing Large Deformation at Exit Section of Attock Tunnel
Characteristics: The circuits between the distribution panels/cabinets and the general distribution cabinet on each floor
China has gradually become the most important business area of Praxair. Its head office of Asia, Asian business technology support center, Asian production operation and quality management department are all located in Shanghai.
Inspection Rules (as per ISO 2859‐1)
Organize to inspect and test the project, conduct quality inspection and other activities and cooperate to conduct internal quality reviews.
If a probationer fails to pass the examination, the probation period shall be extended for half a year. If he or she still fails to pass the examination after the extended period, the labor contract shall be terminated.
Accuracy: better than 1% of full measuring range
The grains of the backfilling material shall be slightly finer than those of the original blinding material and filled by thin layers lightly rolled or manually tamped.
Railway passenger service satisfaction evaluation includes the following steps:
The base station is running normally and there is no signal interruption caused by the system itself (except for reasons other than the system). The field strength coverage meets the design requirements, except for the handover, there is no disconnection or drop during the call process, and the dispatching communication function is normal.
7.9.4 Lavatory is provided at "B" end of this car, and vacuum permanent dejection collecting device (toilet), throttle valve, hat hook, toilet mirror, stainless-steel washing cabinet, dustbin, toilet paper box, toilet paper sheet box, safety handrail, window rail, lamp, power socket, etc. are provided in the lavatory.
Add L-XEGB2 grease to the bearing with a dosage of about 0.8 kg. The bearing space shall be filled up, and the remaining grease shall be evenly shared by the grease chambers of inner and outer bearing covers.
The specification of the filtering geotextile shall be 350g/m2.
1) Prior to installing the sewage unit, the position and dimensions of holes for water discharging, flushing water and electrical cables, etc. shall be checked.
In order to obtain the desired result from the management of construction investment, various measures should be taken.
If the requirements are not met, those shall be removed for pavement again and compaction.
Our company is about to assign a construction team with staff that has years of construction experience in similar projects and covers complete disciplines for scientific management, so that the Project can be completed in advance with high quality and in a safe, fast, and orderly manner.
2 This clause is determined according to Clause 4.9.1 in Design Code for Road Tunnel Ventilation and Lighting (JTJ026.1) and based on the interval of parking strips and operation management of the special road tunnel.
(5) 1X0.6X0.3 is indicated for the rectangular side ditch, in which the meanings of the figures are uncertain. This should be corrected.
Figure 4-36 Temperature Deformation (Longitudinal) after Concrete Pouring of S6-2
The syncline axis intersects with the route at an angle of about 90º.
δ——friction angle (°) of the soil against the back of the retaining wall, the value of the angle can be taken according to Table 6.2.3;
SINOMA-TIANJIN-PM-SP32-R2 Annual Incomes and Expenditures Plan
——the delivery of an intangible product (e.g. the delivery of information (3.8.2) in the context of knowledge transmission).
It is their responsibility to write down the testing results and settle the documents.
Listening to the report in the Salt Rock Technical Room and putting forward suggestions for the next step of work
Communication pre-processor adopts Windows 7 Chinese Professional Edition Operating System to run ATS workstation/ terminal software .The software adopts C/ C ++ language programming.
Carry out all-round inspection on various construction machines and tools prior to construction of alsphalt road surface, and the machines and tools shall meet the following requirements.
The disclosure should be carried out in levels according to the priority of works in the project. The disclosure procedure should be completed, and all levels should be strictly controlled.
2) For formwork removal with the steel form trolley, the concrete strength on the vertical surface shall not be less than 0.8 Mpa. During formwork removal, concrete must be able to afford its own weight, and the surface and corner angles are not damaged.
The Ministry of Quality Affairs arranges relevant personnel to investigate and deal with issues reflected by customer calls, letters, and visits, and makes records.
(2) Tanzania, Burundi and Rwanda have set up a railway committee. Tanzania is recommended to give full play to the role of member country to promote the construction of the railway sections in Burundi and Rwanda of DIKKM Railway, improve the regional road network,.
If the construction in rainy season is necessary, the relevant provisions of the specification must be strictly observed. The construction can be carried out only after the approval of the Supervision Engineer.
2.3.4 Equipment that is easily to be eroded and rusted by moisture must be packed in water proof and sealed solid container. Drying agent and inert gas shall be put into the container to ensure low humidity in it.
Add a waterproof rolling material at corner, internal and external corners, deformation joint and post-cast strip of the base course. After the processing is completed, the whole rolling material is tiled to avoid empty drum during construction.
A Materials Section (belonging to the Operating Department) is established by the Project Department, responsible for the procurement and management of materials at the project site. Refer to the "Materials Management Organization Chart" for the organization.
(9) The waterproof layer of bridge and culvert shall be made of new environmental protection materials to prevent pollution of ambient air and thus to ensure air quality.
As for the relatively smooth surface of the base course, roughening shall be applied and clean water shall be used for washing.
178080mm (the pressure of stored gas is 11kPa)
(1) In this design, the exploitation transportation system of the mine is considered as highway exploitation + vehicle transportation system,.
Where the network voltage Us is greater than or equal to DC600V, the characteristics keep the same; where the network voltage Us is less than DC600V, the train tractive characteristics of starting point and ending point of constant power decrease in proportion of first power with the decrease of network voltage.
For the AC/DC converter, the existing mature and reliable module will be adopted.
The water seepage at the position may be from the overflow dam section through the guide wall root to the step surface and further confirmation of the water seepage location is required on site.
2.5.4.1.2.2.2 Control Point Location Survey
Mombasa-Nairobi Section of Existing Meter-gauge Railway in Kenya, with the 530.39km long main line.
The recommended physical and mechanical parameters values as shown in the Table below.
3. The plunger well flushing method was used for well flushing. The plunger was repeatedly lifted and lowered section by section to create a negative pressure environment, so that the mud skin on the shaft wall could peel off completely and the permeability of water-bearing stratum could be increased.
In 2014, daily passengers dispatched reaches 6,077,000 persons, growing by 9.7% over the same period; the daily dispatched passengers by high-speed railway EMUs reaches 2,253,000 persons, accounting for 37%.
3) Green belt rehabilitation. Pursuant to the relevant specifications of the contract, grooves to be restored by our company will be backfilled to the design elevation, and then green planting soil can be employed for the subsequent backfilling. The original plants will be transplanted for maintenance.
IN TESTIMONY WHEREOF we have hereto signed this document on October 18th, 2014. To be accepted on October 18th, 2014 by (Jiangxi Fifth Construction Group Co., Ltd.).
Party B shall ensure the accuracy and integrity of submission documents and drawing data and accept supervision and inspection from Party A.
During excavation of foundation pit, it is proposed to pay attention to stability of slope, regularly observe whether it has adverse effect on surrounding roads, public facilities and buildings, and ensure the safety of the existing buildings and personnel inside and outside the site.
The optical cable shall be cleaned continuously during blowing to prevent soil and water from entering the pipe along with the optical cable to increase friction.
The Company has prepared the Information Security Management Manual according to the standard of ISO/IEC 27001:2013 Information Security Management Systems - Requirements, and has included requirements of risk assessment and treatment.
Before the fatigue strength test, the frame had non-destructive test (MT) once every 2,000,000 fatigue load cycle test till the 10,000,000th test was done, but no fatigue crack was found on the surface of frame, indicating that the design normal fatigue strength is met.
A concise information sheet distributed by chemical manufacturers or chemical distributors that contains information about a particular chemical/material.
5 Put the sleeper on the ground, then extend slowly the wire rope for the caterpillar crane to lower the equipment on the sleeper, and finally keep it fixed with support.
4.1.1 Take corresponding protective measures according to the working medium of safety valves provided by the user organization;
The cost of examination included in the total supervision cost is RMB ONE MILLION, ONE HUNDRED AND EIGHTY SIX THOUSAND, ONE HUNDERED AND THREE (RMB 1,186,103).
The chromite in South Africa is mainly privately owned. Xstrata PLC, Samancor Chrome, Assmang Limited and China's ASA Metals (PTY) LTD posses a large share in South Africa's chromite industry.
Drawing problem: The unit-type air-cooled cabinet in 1F weak current machine room fails to reach required design depth.
1. For the design of exterior decoration of this project, please refer to the Vertical Plan. For details of construction practice, please refer to the "Material Practice Table" (outdoor part). The specifications and arrangement mode are shown in detailed drawings. The material and color require sample plate which should be provided by the developer and designer.
Chain lever block 3T (alloy chain lever block 3T)
4) Before new project, service or devices are put into use, each department shall arrange relevant management personnel and operation post personnel to attend special safety education and training so as to let them know requisite safety skills.
Measurement Procedures of Magnetic Field Levels Generated by Electronic and Electrical Apparatus in the Railway Environment with Respect to Human Exposure
Technical documents such as construction organization design, method statement, special scheme and operation instruction shall be prepared and submitted for review according to the actual situation of the project, and safety technical measures in the technical documents shall meet the requirements of safety risk control.
12) Power-off operating procedures are not strictly followed when power-off operations are carried out.
Filling shall be performed timely after paving, to avoid long-time direct exposure to sunlight.
The special socket for wall-mounted air conditioners shall be single-phase three-hole socket, 16A.
The terrain and landform shall be fully used to coordinate with the environment.
3) Construction of culvert works : July 1, 2019 ~ October 31, 2019
The centerline of transverse gallery crosses with the centerline of this line in Boten direction at 75\U+00B0, where trackless double-lane is applied and the inner clearance size is 7.5m X 6.2m (WXH).
Leveling of waterproof mortar at toilet, wainscot to ceiling bottom
Unless otherwise specified, the cement used shall meet one of the following requirements of AS 3972: GP-General-purpose Portland Cement, GB-General-purpose Blended Cement, HE-High-early-strength Cement, SL-Shrinkage Limited Cement.
Identification and protection: This process is the important one in optical and electric cables project.
Regulations on Management of Contractor's (Sub-contractor's) QHSE Performance Assessment
3. See the electric construction drawing and relevant process drawings for details of foundation grounding;
Cross by level crossing and some interchange type separately.
Strengthen the drugs management. The used drugs should be produced by regular manufacturer, which should be careful about the service life.
Due to the influence of large tectonic zone, the moderately-weathered zone (IB) at the initial dam site is rather thick, ranging from 15cm to 25m.
The operator makes sure that the axle wheel seat dimensions are inspected and within Φ232mm. Fill the dimensions on the process record card.
(5) Periodically inspect the daily work and emergency response preparedness of each standing emergency response organization and department;
The application from a station for broadcasting the special information against emergencies prepared in advance shall be approved.
Table 3: Long-term Storage Stability Test Results of Latch Number SMA1210003 (temperature: -15~-25 ℃, away from light)
There is one 110kV power transmission line from Choybolsan to Baruun Urt. Baruun Urt has one 110kV substation, three 35kV substations, which can provide 35kV, 15kV, 10kV and other different voltage level power supply lines.
2)Carry out the high temperature test under 70℃ for 6h under the standard method. The sample is powered off during the whole processes of heating and heat preservation and shall be able to start normally under the rated voltage at the end of 6 hours' heat preservation.
Bogie meets the requirements of the contract and UIC standard.
No. 1 Handover and Acceptance Certificate of First Contract Section of Huaibin-to-Gushi Civil Engineering
6. New Nanning-Guangzhou Railway (Litang West-Zhaoqing North)
(11) The following requirement shall be met during blasting excavation:
Among them, the viaduct in Suxi is 3,456.8 m long, with the main span of the superstructure of (45+75+45)X2+(40+60+40) prestressed concrete variable cross-section box girders, and a maximum span of 75 m, and there are 6 interchanges, including 2 hub interchanges;
The vibration noise at the air return inlet of the AC unit in the passenger compartment is loud enough to bother passengers.
Q=160m³/hH=32m N=22kW (frequency conversion)
Needle penetration (100 g, 25℃, 5s)
(9) Outdoor hot work at heights shall be stopped when the wind force is above Grade 5, and all outdoor hot work shall be stopped when the wind force is above Grade 6.
The lower outgoing lines of the distribution boxes are in a mess and are not earthed for protection.
Implement the "three-inspection system" of vehicles and control vehicle speed.
11.2 Material Inspection of Lamps and Accessories
Access to computer information networks or use of computer information network resources without permission;
The maximum horizontal working load of this component is 10.0kN.
(1) Be responsible for design of detailed construction drawings in accordance with the agreed detailed design documents;
b. Steel beams shall be painted with fire protection coating. For details, please refer to the paint 29 of page TL20, 05J909, to meet the fire resistance limit of 1.5h.
1) In terms of construction electricity, the Technical Code for Safety of Temporary Electrification on Construction Siteand theStandard for Construction Safety Inspection issued by the Ministry of Housing and Urban-Rural Development of the People's Republic of China (MOHURD);
Each time the "BACKLIGHT" is pressed, the buzzer will sound once.
In charging state, check the voltage and current, and record the maximum charging voltage and charging current, floating current, and floating voltage;
TB/T 1.2—1995 Lettering and Marking of Railway Cars--Letter and Style of Calligraphy
Fourth Continuous Unit 2X30m Cast-in-situ Box Girder (Bifurcated)
The bolts shall be tightened during the installation of diesel generator sets. In addition, damping device shall be provided, the ground shall be leveled and a lay of rubber shall be laid.
It shall also meet all the regulations on escalators as specified in Code for Design of Metro (GB 50157-2013).
c) Preliminary assessment on product and service requirements: Conduct the demand assessment for both products and services involved in the engineering projects by reference to the Company's current production and technical capacity.
Design flood frequency: 50-year return period for bridges.
az-40\U+00B038′38″ R-1604.2 l-180 T-684.4105 L-1317.9675
Cable running across roads or pipe routes or inside concrete raft or foundation shall run through ducts of adequate size.
GB11352—1989 Carbon Steel Castings for General Engineering Purposes
(1)Oil leakage: Leakage of damping oil is generally caused by poor sealing of baseplate and tipping of transducer and will affect output stability and response time of transducer. Therefore, the transducer shall be timely returned to the factory for repair.
a Prior to the installation, the Contractor shall provide the Employer with the instruction and standard for installation and other work.
Kunming Metro Line 6 (Airport Line) Project
14. Water at the culvert position has a corrosive grade of H1 on concrete structures, thus concrete meeting durability requirement shall be used for frames and foundations.
The check scope is specified in the order, and is generally limited to the following items, unless otherwise specified:
1. As for installation of temperature controller, its inner plate shall first be installed onto interior sidewall of cab with Items 2, 3 and 4.
The products and the same type of products, the production of which was suspended for more than two years and then is resumed, and the products which are consecutively produced for more than four years, and the consistence of performance and quality cannot be proved;
2.Fot the Seller, at the implementation phase of the project, all personnel's food, lodging, transportation, network and communication costs shall be solved by themselves.
At that time, the energy resource for 99% of Rwanda population depended on trees, resulting in massive deforestation as well as water and soil loss.
Operation status of locomotive: loading, relieving, idling, AC generation, fault
The charging station has an installed photovoltaic capacity of 9kWp, an energy storage capacity of 30kWh, five 10kW DC charging and discharging parking spaces, twelve 6kW wireless charging parking spaces, and a distribution power of stereo garage of 125kW.
If the demander proposes special management assurance requirement to the company according to the requirement of the project, they are also the compositions required by the management system of the Company, and are brought into the contract assurance clauses.
6. Masonry Solid-web Type Arch Bridge at K360+962.635
1.2Main Design Principles and Main Technical Standards
(4) Form of back bracing: I-beam is embedded in soil wall in criss-cross form and the jack is employed to support the plug. The quantity of the jack depends on its size, with one or several jacks being employed.
The light dynamic penetration blow count is N10=48 ~ 72, slightly dense ~ medium dense, with thickness of 1.2m.
Short-period purchasing process: direct purchasing in the register of qualified suppliers on the premise of meeting customer requirements, company profits and controllable risks, with purchasing price determined through four-level approval (division-level, price auditor, department-level and leader in charge).
The groundwater in the area is mainly composed of such two types as the bedrock fissure water and the loose accumulational pore water.
Train control unit shall have the functions of self-surveillance and watchdog (which must be made available for user), and be able to automatically define to restart after the completion of troubleshooting.
Check whether the power resistor is discolored, cracked or damaged, and replace it if necessary.
It shall be tested as per the provisions of GB/T 12027—2004.
Upon the emergency exercise, the group leader shall organize evaluation on the effectiveness of the "emergency response", and adjust or update the requirements of "emergency response" when necessary.
γ1 — Accident rate before widening reconstruction of the highway (time/100 million vehicle kilometers);
2.9 Fire risk classification for production: Type D for workshops; fire risk classification for storage: Type D.
The bridge is a river-crossing bridge about 25m high and 212.56m long. The route encounters Usuman River near IDK19+358.
Survey and Design of the First Contract Section of G60 Liling to Loudi Highway Capacity Expansion Project
Telecommunication transmission system provides a 10/100M Ethernet channel from the control center to each station and the parking yard for the PA system. The channel is used by the control center to send voice messages and transmit monitoring messages and network management & control signals to each station. The channel requires a bandwidth of not less than 10M.
Some vibrators shall be provided on conical wall of lime storehouse to vibrate the wall and cause internal dry powder to move downward.
2.5.1 Cut off the power supply immediately to avoid expanding the situation.
Time period from receiving of traction system's command to the output of electric braking force: T1:0.3s,T2:1.5s
Multiple grounding of 40X4 galvanized flat steel+0.3m above the ground
6.1 The film thickness should meet the requirements of 5.1.5 and 5.2.5 .
After the labor construction team enters the site, timely organize the disclosure of construction period, technology and construction quality standards, and conduct safety education and training, etc.
A demand of promoting the development of trade between China and Peru and improving the friendship between the two countries
Jianghan Machinery Factory has not record about the training, only the sign-in form is saved.
Pore forming: an anchor drilling machine is used for drilling, the hole depth is not less than the design, and the hole diameter is not less than 125mm. In case of obstacles, the angle and position of soil nailing can be properly adjusted.
Bill of Quantities for Ban Na Ben Village Medium Bridge at K44+433.00
When the pressure of volume chamber exceeds the pressure of adjusting spring, valve port slightly departs from valve seat, and pressurized air enters relative large valve surface, driving valve to rise quickly and valve rod to move upward, closing the passage to left straight hole a at upper side of valve. Meanwhile, open exhaust outlet b, to decrease the pressure inside volume chamber.
Retaining structure shall be so designed that the load system, load combination and checking calculation requirements employed shall comply with the current specifications and regulations related to railway subgrade retaining structures.
1) Sieve the stone powder with size below 1.7mm sieved after Los Angeles Abrasion with square mesh sieve in a grain size of 0.5 mm, take 200 g stone powder with size below 0.5mm and divide into 3 portions, and place into the mixing device;
The locomotive is provided with a label indicting the serial number, staffing, relevant marks and safety signs on electrical equipment.
Teaching project: students will understand the station interlocking concept and master the knowledge about the composition, operation and working principle of station interlocking equipment.
If the height of subgrade slope is less than or equal to 12m, the gradient of subgrade slope shall be 1:1; if the height of subgrade slope is greater than 12m but less than 20m, the gradients for 0-8m slope shall be 1:0.75 and 8m~16m slope 1:1,respectively. Based on conditions of subgrade slope, 2m wide slope stage shall be provided every one step.
14 vertical cracks are evenly distributed under arch rib of the arch support, with average length L=1m, total length L=15.2m and the maximum width δ=0.8mm.
3 Rubber shall meet the fire prevention, smoke and toxicity requirements in BS-6853-1b.
The maximum stress calculated for the square timber of 3.613 N/mm2 is smaller than its designed flextual strength 13 N/mm2, which satisfies the requirement!
Various plants shall be planted in the locally optimum season of the area where the highway passes by, unless otherwise indicated on the drawing or instructed by the supervisor; planting shall not be carried out provided that the soil condition is not unsuitable.
Overall quality of dispatching personnel will be improved and professional dispatching personnel will be provided so as to achieve specialization of dispatching personnel on the site.
1. Consolidated Balance Sheet………………………………………………
C)Move the tread wear gauge in such a way that its measuring plane could contact wheel flange, then read the value of tread wear from the left vernier and that of flange height from the right vernier.
Table 4-1-5-20 Additional Time for Stopping in the Down Direction at Matthew Station
\pt33;Pond, with 1~1.5m deep water, under maintenance by someone.
For the construction project, a written report on the tendering and bidding situation shall be submitted to the relevant competent authority within 7 working days from the date of the successful bidder determined.
Apply a force of 300,000 N per square meter, and vibrate 3 million times, without macroscopic breakage.
To field control cabinet AC0950EL03
Including all kinds of accessories and wiring, excluding the power line from cabinet to power distribution cabinet and the ground line to grounding box.
The Airport modeling gathers together essence of traditional architecture, forms a landmark optical center with the cross-shaped ridge connecting the front with the rear, and creates an impressive airport skyline for both land and aviation sides coordinating with the roof tilting.
Articles of Association of SCEGC Mechanized Construction Group Company Ltd.
Gangway can be supplied as a completely replaceable unit.
November 2011 – March 2013Chief Project Commander of General Contracting Project of the 100,000 tons/year Non-Phosgene Process Polycarbonate Joint Plant Project of Ningbo Zhetie Dafeng Chemical Co., Ltd.
Pass over Friendship Tunnel at DK2+370
We believe that the financial statements of CCEED Decoration Company are prepared in accordance with the Accounting Standards for Business Enterprises in all material respects, and fairly reflect the financial status of CCEED Decoration Company as of Saturday, December 31, 2016, as well as its operating results and cash flows for 2016.
15.2 In the general layout of the Project, fire separation distances, fire lanes, rescue zones in relation to fire safety shall comply with the requirements of specifications (refer to the General Layout Plan for details).
(4) The unit shall be able to start when the power supply voltage deviation is ±10% of the rated value.
The engineering geological conditions are similar except that the eastern line option without passing Meru has a more flat terrain with the optimal topographic conditions.
The company shall grasp the "export pass" of person dispatch, strictly carry out the "No training, no dispatch" system, and the people shall be dispatched out when they are qualified in exam and permitted by the contractor.
"whether it's in the state of property takeover, freeze, or bankruptcy, and whether it's within the administrative punishment period in the Sichuan administrative region;
Principal tensile stress borne by hooping shall be tv=1.876578MPa
9. After the Contractor provides the performance bond, the Agreement shall be put into effect as signed by the legal representatives or entrusted agents and stamped with official seals of both parties.
The dimension of all sampling adapters is generally DN25. Two valves shall be installed for low-temperature media to prevent freezing while sampling.
The bridge with the span of 20m is located on straight line, which is easy for construction
Plastics – Determination of Tensile Properties – Part 1: General Principles (GB/T 1040.1)
Those found with unqualified physical conditions in the physical examination shall be transferred away from the special operation and special equipment operating posts.
The main works include base and foundation, main structure, building decoration, building roof, water supply, drainage and heating, ventilation and air conditioning, building electricity, elevator, intelligent construction, building energy conservation and outdoor works within the scope of the drawings.
Progress control as well as quality control and investment control restrict and depend on each other.
The operation response of TVM shall be quick and that shall be guaranteed by software and hardware design. Obvious delay is not allowed.
Components that are not labeled shall be configured by the manufacturer according to the standard.
Open operation system shall be used in the information system of this line, and general and mature development tool software, database management software and network software shall be adopted.
Bidding price: ¥307,393,473.65.
Power box type substation in the sections are established with GYTA53 optical cable in a separate laying way.
• The fire detection alarm system and the central control room control the start-up of the pressurized blower.
Be able to operate by using this ability independently under most circumstances
3.2 For mineral aggregate composite gradation to be verified, the sieve mesh (at least including 0.075mm, 2.36mm, 4.75mm and maximum nominal grain size) passing rates must be close to the grading value of production mix proportion, and the hump between 0.3-0.6mm shall be avoided.
2) Analyze the debt paying ability based on the basic financial statements, with focus on the composition of corporate loans, borrowings, accounts payable and other payables, the level of financial expenses, as well as asset-liability ratio, debt-equity ratio and long-term asset suitability ratio;
10.14.2.Static strength test and fatigue test of frame
According to the technical exchange comments between China and Pakistan on November 6, 2015, "Only the locomotive facilities for Karachi, Lahore and Rawalpindi shall be reinforced".
Between the beneath of vertical shaft and tunnel, it is proper to arrange dual-side connecting channel.
Fig 3-5 Schematic Diagram of Stations with the Condition of Operation in Reverse Direction
It consists of wheel lathe shed, monthly inspection shed, periodic/temporary repair shed, auxiliary maintenance shed and building for personnel.
The threaded connectors unnecessary for removal in installation shall be set with anti-loosening marks.
2) The connection of lead wire shall be tight, and the length shall not be less than 150 mm when binding connection is adopted.
The cross beam is welded into an "I-shaped" section structure comprising the upper cover plate, lower cover plate and web plate.
The picture of soft and weak oil core is shown in Figure 4.4.
China has encountered major logistical challenges in transporting gasoline.
(5) Grade 5 loading (12.0~18.0 month), subgrade design height 6.000 (m), subgrade design height (with consideration of settlement effect) 6.264 (m), calculation results after loading
By taking such measures as grasping from basis, strengthening industries, promoting open development and building platforms, Lincang Border Economic Cooperation Zone will be built into an important open economic functional zone along the border integrated with trade logistics, comprehensive bond, cross-border financial service, cross-border tourism, international capacity and equipment manufacturing cooperation, import and export processing etc. by 2020.
The equipment shall be kept by the specially-designated personnel and be operated with permit. It is unallowable for anyone to operate the equipment at random.
"DN" of waterproof sleeve indicates the pipe diameter, and the casing diameter is selected according to page 15 of 02S404.
4.1.5All the junction boxes, binding posts, electrical switches and electrical elements shall be arranged at the positions easy for repair and replacement.
5. 200x200x20 sesame black granite (flamed)
Completion year: 2015 Started running since 2015
qmax --- drainage discharge of one sanitary ware with maximum drainage flow in the calculated pipe section(L/s)
Preliminarily record and analyze the fault circumstances in the testing process.
Inspection lead pin: Neat, clear and easy for tin applying
Provisions: "10.3 Sight Distance" stipulates approach sight distance and intervisible triangle area, and also that every fork in the road shall provide an approach sight distance fitting the driving speed; bedsides, the triangle area composed by the stopping sight distances of two intersected highways shall be free of any objects obstructing intervisibility.
The unit and individual who carry out these Temporary Provisions and make great achievements in the computer information system security protection work of financial institutions will be commended and rewarded by the financial authority at higher level, the unit or the public security organs.
(3) Sign labor contracts with qualified, reputable and specialized labor service companies with similar engineering construction experience in advance to ensure construction quality and safety.
3. 20 thick 1:3 cement mortar leveling layer.
Where: Speed – speed (km/h);
Metal protection layer should have the overall anti-(rain) water function.
Static-Load Cracking Resistance Test Method for Prestressed Concrete Sleepers (TB/T1879-2002)
12. Provide the emergency lights for temporary lighting after the power failure due to the explosion.
A balancing test must be performed when the balance block is dislodged or displaced and when parts are replaced.
The regulations and requirements for engineering survey and investigation should be carefully studied to understand and master the Client's requirements for engineering survey and investigation and related contract documents;
Major machining products: JW4G and JJC frames; frame mounting seats of diesel-electric models.
Real object quality inspection Quality rewards and punishments Quality assessment
Sheath mechanical performance test before and after aging
If materials are not strictly checked on and non-conforming materials are used, which causes irretrievable losses, the units shall be punished.
Every MV switch cabinet shall have a LV cell accommodating all the comprehensive relay protectors, instrument displays, control switches, option switches, switch cabinet status displays, and fault resetting buttons.
When the system works, every microcomputer (having the self-diagnosis function) will diagnose the minimum diagnosable unit, such as power amplifier, passenger's emergency communication unit and other terminal equipments.
If the abnormal conditions such as the coating of the connecting part is damaged, or smoke and peculiar smell takes place, please stop charging at once and cut off the power supply.
Special personnel shall be assigned to observe key parts and special sections: The personnel shall observe and inspect the anchor pole, stay wire, curve mast, transition mast and middle part of the anchor section at any time.
Before login, the information of service suspension shall be displayed on the passenger display.
During construction under burning sun and in windy and rainy days, concrete in a dump truck shall be covered.
Organize the identification, provision and maintenance of equipment (hardware) and transport resources in infrastructures, and operate the process.
According to the calculation results of Chapter 4 and Chapter 5: Based on the calculation as per the European Codes, the flexural bearing capacity and crack width of the culvert are qualified, and the shear bearing capacity is not qualified; based on the calculation as per the Chinese Codes, the flexural bearing capacity, the shear bearing capacity and crack width of the culvert are qualified.
The Company is provided with the Manager Office Meeting of which the function is to manage and control important decisions and routine work of the Company.
to prevent control console from unnecessary damages and influence from bad weather.
Content and format of the locomotive resume document shall meet requirements of Tentative Technical Specification for AC Drive Locomotive Electronic Resume (TJJW095-2016) issued by China Railway (CR).
• Environmental damage which can be recovered within a period of more than 3 years or cannot be remedied at the current level of modern science and technology, thus arousing public anger and criticism
The Seller must obey the whole process management of the project by the Buyer's representative in terms of tendering, schedule, plan, interface, design liaison, equipment production, quality assurance, factory test, the transportation, installation, commissioning and acceptance of equipment, user training, technical documents, etc.
SS should be able to identify user's off-hook, dial-up and on-hook events reported by the media gateway, control the media gateway to send various tone signals to users, such as dial tone, ringing tone, ring back tone, etc.
Given that, it is recommended that new railway company be established under the management of Kenya Railway Corporation, being responsible for the operation and management of Mombasa~Nairobi Railway and Nairobi~Malaba Railway in a unified way, in order to improve the efficiency of operation and transportation and to reduce the operation cost as well.
3.3 The Administration Department/Tianjin Sinoma Asset Management Company is responsible for the routine safety supervision and inspection at public places within the office area of the Company's headquarters.
For deformation during blanking process, mechanical straightening and flame straightening can be combined, and the heating temperature shall not exceed 900℃.
(1) C25 formwork is adopted for lining concreting of the tunnel trunk; the inverted arch is advancing, and the concrete tank truck is adopted for concrete transport; the concrete delivery pump is used to transmit concrete to the formwork and the concrete will be watered for curing after formwork dismantlement.
It has been proven through field exploration that there are petroleum and natural gas resources in Somali Region in Ethiopia.
——A traffic control plan should be carried out based on the traffic conditions of local lines.
Supervised by Chongqing Rail Transit (Group) Co., Ltd. Chongqing Urban Construction Archive Chongqing Construction Engineering Quality Control Station
Passenger flow level in the technical proposal of Karachi Circular Railway (KCR) Project in Pakistan is modified and estimated according to study year of this project and based on study of Japan International Cooperation Agency (JICA).
In addition, I have a question: Have your company ever considered whether subgrade works are available at the section at CH80+300-CH82+200 as the section runs on steep slopes.
Installation of the reinforced concrete anchor poles of the overhead lines 10 kV, single-column, with two struts with traverses, without attachments, type ОА10-1
(2) Basic functions of playback: support retrieval of video files according to file type, date and channel, and remote playback after successful retrieval.
Due to the continuously expanding supply shortage of EG in the region, the new ethylene plants will still be provided with the industrialization of EG and synthesis gas one-step EG production technology, as well as the breakthrough in the bottleneck of coal to EG production technology, and the capacity scale of new plants will continue to increase.
2. All drawings provided by each Designer to the Project Management Department will pass the internal audit by the Designer and then be submitted to the external review agency determined by the Employer for external review.
Fill the maintenance product (such as Mobilarma 524) of 4.7L per month into the gear box, and let the gear box run at 1/3 of the maximum speed for 5 minutes in each direction.
For the equipment which can distinguish the belonging machine set precisely, shall work out the EOMR in unit of machine set, for example: the equipment under some project belong to NO1 and NO2 machine set clearly, then the EOMR shall be formulated based on NO1 and NO2 machine set separately.
Forced concrete mixer (within 500L)
3) Information will be supplemented according to the comments. Please refer to SDI-XT-03 for details.
(4) Reserve fund: RMB 81.9145 million.
(1) Equipment commissioning: installation and commissioning shall be conducted after the equipment mobilizarion, to maintain the mechanical equipment under the good operating state.
(2) Before the production of reinforcement, the fabrication length shall be calculated first according to the design drawings and construction, design specifications. The batching list shall be filled, and the material shall be prepared in strict accordance with the batching list after approval. Each batch of the prepared reinforcement should be numbered, hung with tag and stacked.
S0: average driving speed under the condition of without this project (km/h);
6) Engineering investigation and mapping of the Camacupa integrated farm in Bié, Angola
1)After the on-board earthquake detection device receives the emergency treatment information issued by the central system of the railway administration, for different emergency treatment grades, whether EMU applies emergency braking.
Concrete workers: concrete pouring into formwork, concrete vibrating and curing, etc. (the concrete shall be mixed and transported centrally at the commercial concrete station)
The air conditioning unit is provided with a fresh air filter and a return air filter.
1st-star knowledge: The knowledge entry submitter will be rewarded 1 annual knowledge point;
4. All the steel structural components must be set out in 1:1, and laying-off, fabrication and construction cannot be started before confirmation.
Close feeder circuit breaker 201, and use multimeter or AC electroscope to verify and confirm the existence of AC 600V output voltage.
Discipline: Turbine
Entrusted by Party A, Party B will complete the foundation pit monitoring of Lanzhouxi Railway Station West Xijin Road Underpass Interchange Project (K0+557-K0+797). Upon negotiation, Party A and Party B have reached the following agreement terms, which both Parties shall abide by and implement jointly:
2.6.9 The specifications of liquid separating packet, evacuating valve and draining valves of steam pipelines shall be selected as per the Table 2.6.9-1.
New Project of Fudian-Pengzhou 220KV Power Transmission Line
Turn the starting switch from ON position to START Position to start the machine.
Single-cantilever A (column: Φ219X8X7400; layout 3000-2000)
115 (used for tightening only; it will be re-tightened after the gasket is adjusted during the commissioning.)
Operating Unit: Handan Power Supply Branch of State Grid Hebei Electric Power Co., Ltd.
After insertion of modules and checking for no wrong point or shrunken core during connection, blow wire size as per blowing process, and then connect the screw in each module with plug shell (you need to remove roof and pull back down cable from the inside of cable duct in car repeatedly to complete this process, so as to ensure the shell is close to the module and the screw is fixed just right).
The grade of slope for the foundation trench is determined according to geological conditions of the site and excavation depth.
The short point rail is installed along the side direction of the turnout and the heel is of inclined joint structure. The gap between the heel and the abutted surface of switch rail at frog heel shall be 1.0mm. The sliding performance of the inclined joint shall be maintained to reduce the switching resistance of the point rail.
The more ideas the representatives have, the better. They are encourage to work out ideas, and their ideas stated out during brain storming will be recorded.
This Project will be completed on schedule with guaranteed quality and quantity based on careful organization and scientific management through the use of the company's overall technical strength strictly in accordance with specifications and design requirements.
2 Study and commend the companies and individuals that have made outstanding contributions for work safety; and punish the companies and individuals responsible for work safety accidents.
Or is it a series of product models (if so, how to distinguish the modules, assemblies and parts in the document list, and form a complete design drawing)?
3. Stripping: Strip the single-core cable with Weidmuller stripping pliers as per the process specification. The stripping length shall be 9mm. Ensure the cable will be in proper position after connected to the terminal without the insulating coating being pressed and exposing core.
The branch line 4-1 starts from the Gudi junction station and ends at Abuja. The main track of the line is 119.45km long.
The whole body vibration in the driver's cab shall meet the requirement of TB/T 1828.
The transformer employs the fully assembled structure; the box employs the double-layer, sealed, corrosion-resistant and temperature-insulated structure; and the interior is tightly divided into high voltage chamber and reactor chamber
9. First non-electric air conditioner with no vacuum pump in the world (2006)
During the implementation of the Project, the environmental factors listed in the list of key environmental factors will be controlled.
4.2 The bidder shall list the specific configuration list of spare parts (including model specifications, quantity, unit price, discount rate, total price) and calculation instructions during the quality assurance period according to the equipment; free of charge, not included in the total price.
Engineering geological investigation for new talus discovered during the construction shall comply with the provisions in section 6.8 of this code.
(4). Organize all personnel to receive accident education;
The second plastering can be performed in case of the pre-hardening of the fine aggregate concrete; the secondary plastering should be compacted and polished without any omission.
① The geological structure form not only changes the gravity stress field, but alsoaccumulates in the rock body in various forms in addition to the release through various structure forms. This relict structure stress will have a significant impact on underground construciton.
Two construction team camps should be set up, including offices, conference room, dormitory, dining hall, bath room and so on. All are of colored steel removable houses.
In the menu of page 2 of measurement mode, press key and shown setting out mode.
carry out emergency technical training and improve emergency technical support capabilities for emergency rescue.
The Bidder offers a variable bid price, or contains price adjustment conditions, or provides two or more bid prices and does not state which one is effective.
5) The following substances shall be used limitedly: (1) lead; (2) cadmium; (3) mercury; (4) hexavalent chromium element, etc.
1. Except that elevations are measured in m, all the other dimensions in the drawing are measured in mm.
Light Layout of 6-5/16-15 Axis Elevation of Conference Hall
4.1 Work Safety Department takes charge of preparation, revision and implementation supervision of this document;
15) Running wheel, guiding wheel and stabilizing wheel are all equipped with rubber tires.
The column, cross beam, supporting rod of cross beam, flange, hoop, hoop bottom lining, column cap, stiffening rib, and steel pieces like connecting bolt, nut and washer shall be subjected to hot-dip galvanizing for rust prevention. The galvanizing amount of any fastener is 350g/m² and the rest 600g/m²;
The gradient 8% in front of the warehouse is wrong. Verify and modify it.
Note: The Notification shall be directly delivered to the target receiver for signing in. If the target receiver refuses to sign in, the sender shall invite the employees' representative of labor union to the office of the target receiver, describe the conditions, and indicate the reasons why the target receiver refuses to sign in. The Notification will be deemed as delivered to the target receiver after it is signed or stamped by the sender and the witness.
Refer to Figure A.1 for the safety helmet management work flowchart.
The real-time messages may be sent, through the Ethernet in the transmission system, from the control center to each station for real-time broadcasting.
Earthing of CCTV cabinets in communication equipment rooms of stations is subject to uniform configuration by the dedicated power system for communication. Earthing electrode required for cameras installed on access ground is provided by construction sections, while the equipment and cable materials required for lightning protection and earthing of CCTV equipment are provided by the Tenderer.
Note 1: Type of company: 1. domestic non-financial subsidiary; 2. domestic financial subsidiary; 3. overseas subsidiary; 4. public institution; 5. infrastructure construction unit.
The Chinese side shall be responsible for the blasting excavation of the mountain; the earthwork and stonework transportation, and the pavement hardening shall be contracted to qualified Iranian professional companies.
November 2018~February 2019
During the construction period of the diversion tunnel construction, we will strictly follow the requirements of the contract conditions and local laws and regulations in Zambia to organize construction works and for good management. We have made commitments and set targets as follows.
4) determining how to comply with legal and regulatory requirements and other requirements;
Interim Provisions for Engineering Survey of Newly Built Railway ESKJF[2006］No. 166
4 Building positioning, design elevation and drawing standards
When overload operation is necessary, the user should provide reliable calculation basis and develop a reasonable operation program (including safety measures and response program in case of emergency) which should be approved by the chief engineer and implemented under the supervision of the safety supervision department and machinery management department.
The customer can use the special symbols to identify the significant characteristics that have an impact on the customer safety, regulatory compliance, function, fitting or appearance.
Command pipeline local losses
The length of toll island at MTC one-way exit, one-way toll island at Battal and Battagram mainline toll stations and overload detecting island: 38m;
Pt100 platinum thermistor shall be adopted to measure the temperature below 400°C;
Hoist ADC1006218A motor bogie slewing ring onto the fixture of hydraulic lift truck. Use cleaning agent and non-woven fabrics to clean the connection arm and base plate. Place Item 94 as shown in left drawing correctly on connection arm.
Beijing Subway Batong Line; urban rail transit; skip-stop operation; genetic algorithm; standard station stop scheme
The scanner scans passengers' luggage by X-ray in case passengers carry any explosive, combustible, corrosive, toxic, or radioactive stuff or guns and knives that may endanger public security.
(3) Application for payment of 25% of total contract price;
Dawanle Station Freight Yard – Freight Warehouse Roof Lightning Protection Plan
2)The structural quantities of the monorail system of Chongqing CRC almost equal to those of the Bombardier monorail system.
Operation Diagram of ZL1006 from 23:00 Oct. 16, 2017 to 0:30 the next day
By the evaluations in the management review, we can summarize the current performance of the management systems to find out their deviation from the objective performance, and thereby think of any opportunity for improvement and the way of improvement to consistently enhance the Company's Management Systems.
Precision of time occupancy: ≥93％, with the range of occupancy:
Limitations on mechanical braking are the same with above requirements.
DTc car: wiring of cab, car top wiring, chassis wiring;
The project muck (spoil) shall be stored at a designated place.
Crushed stone test sample: specification (square hole sieve) 60~70mm, mass 240kg.
Closure detection between two traction points of switch rail shall be completed by closure detector placed between the traction points.
Under the tide of globalization, the future development of enterprises is the trend of internationalization. With the help of foreign aid work, enterprises can find the breakthrough of internationalization better and faster.
——Annual review of operation of HSE management system documents
Identify the environmental factors in the activities, products and services within the scope of environmental management system, which are controllable or can be affected, and determine important environmental factors to facilitate management, control and updating of those factors.
For inspection and review results, the project department shall fill them into the product packaging inspection and acceptance form.
8 During construction, smooth water flow at and around the car depot shall be ensured.
(2) Equipment procurement: The equipment price shall be calculated in accordance with recent actual order contract price and later quotation of some equipment manufacturers, and it shall also include the freight for equipment to the port in China (for the concentration in port). Expenses for spare parts shall be calculated at 2% of equipment procurement expenses.
Section cables will be laid in the communication and signaling cable ducts set by the civil works. Station communication cables will be laid in two HDPE pipes with a diameter of 100 mm.
4.2.1 Mixing proportion of concrete shall be determined through delivery test. Cement used in concrete shall not exceed 450kg/m³. Concrete consistency shall conform to provisions specified in GB/T 50080-2002 and TB/T 2181-1990.
The through water bolt shall be bound tightly with several strands of #8 iron wire and penetrate into the ring. The other end of iron wire shall be bound on the cross bar at upper opening of the concrete storage hopper. The cross bar and iron wire shall have certain strength to reliably bear the concrete dead load from the through water bolt.
The water level of supply stations for each station can be controlled automatically. Stations with water storage and distribution structure can be disinfected by sodium hypochlorite or chlorine dioxide according to the external water supply conditions.
Those unqualified will not be used in the project or piled on the site they must be cleared immediately.
Concentration of copper in the blank solution of accompanied test sample obtained from standard curve (µg/mL);
2. EMU manufacturer is responsible for preparing the record of newly-built EMU, four copies in total: one for manufacturer, one for Acceptance Office at the factory, one for allocated bureau, and one for settlement basis.
6.8 Notice on Printing and Distributing the Interim Management Measures for Online Procurement of China Railway 18th Bureau Group Co., Ltd.
VPN encryption throughput ≥ 700bps;
3. During construction, it must be ensured that the net thickness of concrete cover of the outermost reinforcement is not less than 40mm.
4. Apart from elevation measured in m, other dimensions indicated in the drawing are measured in mm.
A large area of swelling soils are exposed, dark gray, red brown, hard plastic clay and silty clay. As per results of test, free swelling ratio of the soil layer in the section is about 13%~83%, which is in medium swelling trend with thickness of about 0 ~ 8m.
(1) Green light: the train passage is allowed and the route is opened in the straight direction of the turnout;
The vehicle has no three-phase AC inverter. DC variable frequency air conditioner is adopted for air conditioning. DC 24 V blower is adopted for equipment cooling.
3) Be responsible for the analysis of microcomputer monitoring information, master the change laws of equipment characteristics, organize targeted maintenance and prevent equipment failure.
The bogie structure of the vehicle for the Malaysia Project is shown in the following figure.
Formwork can only be removed after the approval of on-site construction technicians and the Supervision Engineer.
An urban village which can bring about a community spirit, a sustainable mode of life and a comfortable and quiet environment, is to be built.
It is used for the remote control of the opening and closing of the breaker in line 16 and output idle contact; there is no common point for remote control of switching on/off. The time of holding the exiting action can be set by program;
Strictly follow the water drainage scheme for construction and provide drainage ditches around the foundation pit.
Table 2.2.3.5-2List of Comprehensive Evaluation Regulations on Suppliers
Brief description of distribution, property and scale of designed locomotive facilities
As for the internal of detachable carbon steel and ≤9 %Crlow carbon steel,the minimum corrosion allowance (CA) of each side when it contacts with the operation medium shall be 1/2time of the minimum corrosion allowance (CA) of vessel shell.
The car axle and solid wheel shall be placed under the same condition for more than 24h before press fitting.
If the diesel engine is under the operation state, for the operation of distributor gear (6) gear makes the lubricating oil fly and expand, the measured oil level may not be accurate.
Be responsible for organizing and implementing construction and production according to construction drawings, construction specifications, process specifications, quality standards, and approved operation guidance; and strictly implementing process disciplines to guarantee project quality;
On-board charge of storage batteries are composed of constant current stage, constant voltage stage 1 and constant voltage stage 2. Under the conditions of 25℃, the setting of specific parameters is shown in the following table -Table 5:
JQMB-122- aspen - 2700*598
All the drainage facilities shall be repaired and cleaned immediately to maintain unblocked drainage.
All material recipients related to production, including BOM external materials and diesel oil
7. This drawing is appropriate for pier bodies of height 25-29m.
If vehicles are to be retrofitted locally in Mexico, we will build new workshop or reconstruct workshop, transport replacement components to Mexico for assembly, and carry out vehicle performance debugging.
SIV chassis: DI3 (K11 and K13 control signals)
Article 8 The Company establishes a financial budget management system with capital flow as the core, and implements comprehensive budget management for financial activities such as fund raising, asset operation, cost control and income distribution in accordance with the financial objective of maximizing the value of the enterprise.
Steam turbine barring is free of jamming, friction and abnormal sound.
On-the-spot supervision shall be conducted for the construction processes of critical processes as well as significant and difficult positions to timely correct violation operation, to eliminate potential quality risk in advance, to track possible quality problem, and to prevent quality problem.
The outcrop of Paklai iron ore in Xaisomboun Special Administrative Region (SAR) extends over 10km and it is extremely thick. In terms of grade of ore, generally the content of TFe is more than 60%. The reserves are estimated to be over 200 million t.
1) The "Unit Interfacing Table" shall list interfacing units or contractors, contact and contact information, content of interfacing, period of interfacing, responsible interfacing person, etc..
gives or offers to give (directly or indirectly) to any person any bribe, gift, gratuity, commission or other thing of value, as an inducement or reward:
4.2 According to MM0607 Axle Box, install the special equipment for the outer end cover and the axle end of the axle box to the axle end.
1.Identification of information security management requirements and objectives: identify and summarize the information security requirements, management objectives and leader concerns during business development;
Table B.1 M4 and Above Bolts Locking Marks
The karst subgrade is treated as follows:
Figure 7.38 Business-class Seats of CRH380A EMU
Restore the database soft through the corresponding rman script.
1.4.2.2 Remove flashes and burrs of parts.
18.2.3 The installation and application of the high-pressure water pipeline shall be in accordance with the following provisions:
Our Company suggests the Client considers the maintenance and storage of the Multiple Units according to the situation of the units on this line. The Bidding will not describe the contents in this part again.
(2) Embed connecting reinforcement with a diameter of 12mm, tie and fix the reinforcing mesh, and pre-embed inspection nails.
Silencing, sound insulating and foundation vibrating reduction measures will be taken for the main noise sources of the Project to greatly reduce the intensity of sound sources. Personal protection measures of operators will also be strengthened. The Project is constructed in an industrial park and the noise of the Project has little impact on the acoustic environment.
3 ) When drawing the turn-back track, the turn-back time must be adjusted
Install the bogie on the vehicle body and adjust it accordingly. Please refer to Maintenance Manual MM0602 Removal and Installation of Bogie for specific operation.
Besides, the feasibility study report of the first expressway, the Vangvieng - Vientiane Expressway, formulated by the Company has been approved by the Lao Government and the Project is under the process of construction.
The communication discipline shall provide the housing area and location of communication machine room.
Modular design and manufacture shall be adopted. Parts and components shall be standard and common. The main parts and components shall be interchangeable.
3.4 The Material Management Department is responsible for reception, warehousing, storage and safekeeping of customer property.
Whether there are evidentiary materials for mandatory national, local or industrial regulations related to RMS, product acceptance and verification.
After rail bars are lifted onto the bridge, they shall be distributed and installed from the first rail bar one by one to the middle of the segmentation with manual coordination and after the installation progresses to the middle, repeat above-mentioned procedures from the other end of the segmentation to finish the distribution of rail bars in this segmentation.
220kV Ning'er Grid Frame Reinforcement Works
As the grid-connected three-phase uncontrolled rectifier is used for power supply of the metro in the early stage, the electric energy generated during braking of the train cannot be fed back to the grid, and the train is installed with a braking resistor to dissipate braking energy for a short time. At the later stage, the braking resistor is arranged in the ground power supply system;
Up to now the Chad Project Phase 2.2 following the Chad Anti-corrosion Pipe Project, it has undertaken cargo transportation involving more than 580000 revenue tons from China to Chad, including some heavy pieces (single piece with weighs of 61 tons), super long pieces (single piece with 24 meters long), vehicles, containers and other goods.
7. Refer to 11G521-1~2 Steel Purlin and Steel Wall Beam for detail drawing of purlin installation joints and formwork drawing of purlin. Other drawings are specified in National Building Standard Design Atlas.
Analyze the cost trend brought by the changes of the construction scope and economic environment and estimate the completion cost.
5.6.1.6 Special type operators and operators of special equipment must be certified.
1.4.3. Final Fastening: Lubricate the bolts with grease before installation. Draw check marks after fastening. And then, lock the lock catch of front roof plate assembly of the middle roof plates.
As calculated in the design, 2 sets of Φ150mm high air-pressure downhole drills will suffice for normal production of the mine.
150-200 mm in range, 8 mm in measuring anvil diameter, and 24 mm in roller diameter
Before mounting, the culvert pipe must be inspected at the construction site and can be mounted only after being found as qualified.
Check whether the cab apron gives any obvious noise during train running.
② Real-time monitoring of phase loss or dislocation of input power;
Packages of goods and materials procured: to prevent goods and materials from being affected during the process from transportation, storage to acceptance, causing quality reduction.
The recycle bins should be washed and cleaned regularly to keep clean, without dirt found anywhere, including the place surrounding the bins;
e. The allowable deviation of trench shall be in accordance with the provisions of Table 3.13 in CJJ37-90.
■ Also applicable to surfaces such as brick walls, cement lime walls, gypsum boards, asbestos boards, hard boards, and soft boards. It is mostly used formaishi paint or texture system.
Second Design Bid Section (Pingsheng Bridge) of Heshun – Beijiao Highway Main Line of Foshan
Purchase of Vehicles for Guangzhou Metro Line 9 Project
The space between and diagonal lines of anchor bolts are fixed on the top of the column formwork by the special fixation support and then adjusted to meet the design requirements for dimensions.
U-shaped Slot AK3+700~AK4+100
Notice on Issuing the Measures for the Conflict of Interests Avoidance Management of Zhejiang Geely Holding Group, Co., Ltd.
(3) In summer, outdoor exposure time should be reduced and drinks should be supplied for workers;
5. Under the condition that the Chinese government requests receiving party to disclose the confidential information, receiving party shall cooperate with disclosing party to take all reasonable measures to minimize the disclosing occasion and scope and reduce the adverse impact caused by disclosing to the minimum extent.
Axle load (t) ≤16
Display the proportion (%) of accelerator usage in cement;
5.2.5.2 The conversion of score of technology module to score of supplier performance QCDT appraisal is:
Through identification, confirmation is not required in the Company's current production process.
Rebars can only be cut off at the working gap of excavation and crushing and relevant operators must wear safety belts and safety helmets.
Table 7.3.4 Allowable Position Deviations and Inspection Methods for Reserved Ducts
Side slope shall be filled and compacted in layers. After all embankments are filled, the slope surface shall be smoothed.
IIDK81+506 1-3.0*3.5m Reinforced Concrete Frame Culvert Design Drawing
4.2.5.5 Concrete pouring: one-time pouring finishes; contact the concrete supplier in advance to determine the pouring date and the total pouring quantity; carry out pouring layer by layer (each layer is 1000 mm in height) and section by section; use concrete transfer pump for pumping; make the concrete enter the frameworks in a symmetrical way.
When fire door of fire escape ladder in 1F zone is open, and
Then enter into "Total Travel Distance" interface
Traffic works of the Project include signs and markings.
1. Design Orientation; 2. Design Philosophy; 3. General Concept
See "regional railway network planning chapter figure 2-2-1 and table 2-2-1" for relationship between alignment and location and main technical standards of each railway.
3. Quantity of reinforcement does not include lapping and loss.
Inspect whether the built-in fittings and the reserved holes for civil engineering meet the design requirements.
September 21, 2017, Wuhan-Jiujiang HSR
Strap the beam steel bars: firstly, install the platform beam and slab formwork, strap the primary beam and the secondary beam on the platform formwork in turn, place the beam steel bars in position, adjust the position of the beam steel bars and install the protective layer pad.
(4) Pay all outstanding taxes and taxes arising from the liquidation;
Article 9 Where the method of government procurement is adopted, the department and bureau shall prepare the procurement budgets together with its annual budgets.
Surface spray or cast derusting (Sa2.5)
The Company must use process 5-D as a means of solving the problems. Where necessary, the Company shall use process 8-D as a means of solving the problem.
In case of loss of 1/2 drawbar power and when trains are empty, the trains can keep moving to the depot from the place where failure occurs.
Name, scale, stage, investment and design content of the contract project
AC, rectified current and DC can be used.
The engineering design is generally divided into the conceptual design, the preliminary design and the construction drawing design.
At the crook of the pipe, the bending flatness degree shall be less than 10% of the pipe outer diameter and the crook shall be free of defects like wrinkle, concave or crack.
Be responsible for the planning and implementation of new product marketing plan and marketing strategy plan, and collect, sort and analyze customer demand, competitors and product information, etc., and provide decision-making basis for research and development of new products and improvement of existing products;
The unused materials and supplies are promptly adjusted for usage.
SZK/JL 0811-002 Application Form for Modification of Corrective and Preventive Actions
① Organize to formulate specific implementation measures for tart plan of environmental protection of the Project Management Department according to target and plan decomposition of environmental protection management of the Project Management Department.
Field safety warnings and other safety measures comply with requirements.
The maintenance costs incurred by the improper use of "TOPACT" for various machines and equipment provided by "SCEC" in the process of use shall be borne by "TOPACT".
(2) Try to reuse machines, tools and circulating consumables to save money.
It requires an intact vehicle without fault and in AW0 load contion.
Official Reply of China Railway Corporation, Chongqing Municipal People's Government, Hubei Provincial People's Government, Hunan Provincial People's Government on Preliminary Design of Qianjiang-Zhangjiajie-Changde Railway (TZBH [2014] No. 1421)
Regardless of the shape of the patch, there must be no sharp corners/edges.
The 4.100 thick C25 concrete is applied and flattened simultanously, the bidirectional reinforcement steel bars are φ8@250, the sub-sealing is 12 wide, the two-way central distance is 3000, and medium sand is used for seam filling.
The pavement width of the road entering the traction substation is 4.5m, the pavement width of the road entering the section post and AT post is 4.0m, and the pavement must be hardened.
The consultant has configured the necessary test equipment in the management process. Taking into account the characteristics of the project construction, the Consultant entrusts the highly-professional testing items such as raw material inspection, mixture proportion verification, compactness testing and concrete strength testing to local testing institutions with corresponding qualifications.
5.4.3.Technical Standards and Requirements for Other Materials
During in-position binding at the site, firstly, remove all the wood shavings, scrapped wood bricks and waste within the formwork.
4.1 Basic Forms and Requirements of Automatic Plasma Welding Machine
The intercom system shall be used in case of problem with the finger print reader or with the ID card.
2. The option proposed in 16.2.3 is mentioned in 16.2.1 in Chapter 16 of Technical Proposal, quoting "the socket manhole is equipped with stroke switch, which is capable of feeding back the open/close status of the manhole to train management system, and the interlocking of external power supply and the main power system can be realized through train management system."
In this design, the regional PLC systems are connected by fiber optic cables. There are two control stations (including the one in the batching equipment factory) for the raw material's loading, batching and mixing system, another two (one of which belonging to the ignition furnace system) for the sintering and circular cooling system, and one for the main exhaust fan system.
1. Marketing Department■2. Manufacturing Department■3. Purchasing Department■4. Quality Department■5. Special Valve Branch■
Interior wall 3 coating interior wall (burning behavior of Grade A)
(3).When washed by water flow, it shall not be less than 1.0m below washing line.
The costs incurred by any recurring courses resulting from this situation shall be borne by the General Contractor.
5.10.6.2 Form and Arrangement of Intermediate Jacking Station
(3) Ten percent (10%) of the contract price shall be retained as quality security which will be paid by the Buyer to the Seller within 30 days after the warranty period expires without quality problem or all quality problems that occur during the warranty period have been resolved.
Power separation point of the project is the incoming switch of the power supply incoming cabinet in the distribution room of the ground.
Whether the supporting plate has been installed and the nuts have been tightened on bolts.
Type DJK5-1 inspection pit fasteners shall be adopted for fasteners in depots and for inspection pits. They shall be elastic split fasteners (see Attached Figure 10-2).
1. Recently, the station will be provided with 5 receiving-departure tracks (including main lines) and with 1 reserved track; 2 freight tracks will be provided and 1 freight track is reserved.
For Yunshan Tunnel section, the maximum altitude at Yangqu Maintain is 1,900 m, and the minimum altitude is 1,200 m, about 1,500 m in average.
7.3.1 In the case that survey and design costs are adjusted by the State or Ministry of Railways during survey and design period, the survey and design costs for this project will be adjusted accordingly and the amount approved by Ministry of Railways and Guangdong Province shall prevail.
With a total building area of 30000m2, raft board basis and one-floor basement, this Project has a structure of concrete core tube steel frame shear wall, a floor of steel platform cast-in-place concrete plate, a roof of terrace garden and a external wall of painting decoration.
2. Conduct routine check before use and use the protection articles correctly during construction.
The maintenance record shall be complete and accurate, and the acceptance procedures shall be carried out according to the provisions.
2. Calculation on Load-carrying Capability of Movable Suspended Scaffolding during Casting of Concrete
In order to lift and move, there is a lifting point at the top of the cooling tower, which can be lifted by crane.
When the design flow passes through the culvert, the extrusion coefficient ε and the flow velocity coefficient φ are taken as 0.95 and 0.85 respectively according to the situation that the front wall of the splayed wall is submerged by the accumulated water in front of the culvert.
The average annual precipitation in the southwest is 2,180 mm, while that in the northern region is 1,000 mm.
Violation of laws and regulations and the decision-making procedures stipulated in the Articles of Association during critical decision making;
Check all the bearings for internal friction to see if they move freely. Measure the contact force when lifting and dropping the pantograph. Remove the possibly accumulated dust (especially in the long unused period).
② If the elevation value of the pivot fails to reach the specified value, adjust it slightly with a hydraulic jack, and place cushion blocks to fix it firmly after the designed elevation is met;
Any electromagnetic field brought from the brake system must not interfere in the normal use of passengers' belongings or magnetic media.
Contract Section Handover Acceptance Certificate No.(2014)020
1 The position of the equipment box shall conform to the design requirements and shall be installed behind the line side. The most convex edge shall not be less than 2440mm from the line center.
3~8.7m: auburnish red, purplish red completely weathered sandstone, fao=300kPa;
Simple power unit, short repair cycle and long annual operating time.
Admixtures should be stored according to recommendations of the manufacturer. It is not allowed to use admixtures out of date.
The gland will be flexible and subject to adjustment as per the cable diameter and space available without putty.
After the completion of cast-in-situ bored pile, during the earth excavation and when the strength of the pile is not less than 75% of the design requirements, the pile head can be broken at 700mm~1000mm above the elevation of the pile block as per the drawing requirements.
The southwest of the building is an exhibition hall with a two-step staircase connecting the outdoor plaza, the exhibition hall and the roof garden.
Generally, wire stripping pliers shall be used for the conductor with the sectional area below 4mm2 in principle. The method of stripping the insulation layer of the wire around the conductor with a knife is not allowed.
When required by operation, the control center and the equipment centralization station may be manually controlled after certain authorization procedures.
of 30X30, φ1, box section with 50*30*1.5 frame
Power Converters Installed on Board Rolling Stock—Part 1: Characteristics and Test Methods
Construction depth: from the surface to 2 meters under the tunnel invert block.
The joints of the stressed main steel bars in many parts or of many components in the Project are connected through straight thread and there are quantities of joints to be connected. Therefore, threading and connection quality of the steel bar end shall be regarded as a key point.
The Central Asia Freight Train (Harbin-Busan) sailed to the sea this year with the advantage of land-ocean transportation. In the first quarter, it operated for a cumulative total of 17 times, delivered 1,888 TEUs, a total of 25,600 tons. Grain and timber worth RMB 153 million were delivered to the ports in southern China though this land-ocean transportation channel.
(6) The dismantled formwork shal be timely cleaned, brushed demoulded. If the formwork is found uneven, or the rib is damaged or deformed, it shall be repaired in a timely manner.
Un - uneven coefficient (Un=0.75)
When pressing of [release] key is detected by LKJ
3) Accident site protection team, having the responsibility of accident site protection, counting and evacuation of people.
Charts and presentation materials provided shall be in an approved format: PowerPoint, TIFF or JPEG;
It is capable to maximally control dual-position (open/close) operations of 70 routes,.
7) Perform visual inspection on the equipment before using the aerial work platform, check the oil level of the hydraulic oil tank, and check the electrolyte level of the battery.
Centrifugal pump (OH2)(Ver. 0)
Article 50 Any disputes related to this contract or arising out of the performance of the contract shall be resolved and governed by the laws of the PRC (laws of Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan are not applicable).
The insurer shall inform the Insured of the results. If the claim is in the coverage of insurance, the Insurer shall perform indemnity premium obligation within 10 days after making an agreement with the Insured on indemnity premium.
Song Junxi has the title of senior engineer and has been engaged in highway construction for 14 years. He has worked as a contract engineer in similar projects and met the bidding requirements of this project.
The gluing surface is not uniform or pleasing to the eye, but the sealing performance is not affected.
With reasonable design, the effects on ecosystem along the line can be maintained to the minimum level during construction and operation. Planting and landscaping will improve landscape effect and environment quality.
The primary method for managing safety is through identification and management of hazards.
If crossing is unavoidable, the high voltage cable shall be covered with insulation layer at the crossing position.
The top face and side face of crossing have cracks.
The environmental problems caused by the project mainly consist of the following factors:
B2-1 Single Module - My Zone Model Position + My Zone Series
During on-site installation, gas (CO2) shielded welding shall be used as the main means, assisted by high strength bolt connection.
Acceptance deflection value of pavement surface LA=31.7 (0.01mm)
Add the texture information at the detail level to the overall level through affine transformation, and then reversely synthesize face texture according to the face levels.
The main waterway transport in Serbia is performed through the Dunav - an international waterway. It is known as the Pan-European No. 7 Waterway Corridor and has a mileage for transport of more than 400 km in Serbia.
(6) Participate in contract review and organize and carry out cost budgeting, planning, accounting, analysis, control and assessment.
Recovery of anchorage ground occupied by the reclamation area, the cost, and principals.
Refer to Figure 6-3-16 for construction process flow of Reinforcementon beam and slab.
Paints and Varnishes - Evaluation of Degradation of Coatings - Designation of Quantity and Size of Defects, and of Intensity of Uniform Changes in Appearance - Part 4: Assessment of Degree of Cracking
The compaction of subgrade bed bottom soil shall comply with the following requirements:
6.3.6 Emergency Unrestricted Manual Driving Mode (EUM)
Rated inductance 8mH (100%~110%)
Taking the integrated public transit network of Lanzhou combining rail and bus transit as an example, this paper analyzes the topological characteristics, discusses the method of identifying key nodes with centrality, and suggests optimizing the network through the key nodes.
The safety requirements for the overall compressed air system shall meet internationally recognized standards.
Patrol inspection system for track state consists of image collection module, image management module and image identification module.
The 5# cover plate is with a transverse crack (L=1m, δ=0.05mm). See Figure 6.
The technical treatment scheme for the parts to be treated shall be examined and parts shall be the re-checked and accepted after treatment.
The ends of the pipe at the start and end inspection wells (also referred to as the upstream and downstream wells) of the pipe section to be tested shall be blocked with steel blinds.
It is implemented according to the acceptance standard of forgings with the material thickness smaller than 16 mm.
5.1.3 The General Manager (Deputy General Manager) of the Design Center shall be responsible for reviewing the design schedule of the pure design project;
Establish and improve the operation management regulations and records related to safety, quality and environmental protection;
Pressure test shall be carried out when the pipeline embedding works of the kitchen and washroom have been completed. Civil decoration/finishing construction shall not be started until the pipelines pass the acceptance.
Wire trays shall be selected according to the length of the strain section during conductor erection to reduce the number of conductor joints;
Firstly, continue to promote TOD development and land application for the Project.
Compaction: After the exhaust, an iron roll wrapped with rubber (length: 300 mm; weight: 30 kg) can be used for the plane parts to compact the roll with the base course. The hand-held compression roller is used for the vertical parts.
6. In the tendering organization, supervise and urge the Tendering Agency to ensure that the tendering is carried out in an orderly manner according to the established plan, so as to maximize the benefits of the tendering arrangement.
9.1 Interface between ISCS and SIG
The cabinet height (H): for 600mm and below, 1.5m distance from the bottom to the ground;
Maximum gradient (main line): 60‰
The threading hole is φ32 and be equipped with protection opening rubber ring. Refer to drawing for opening hole.
c)Remove locking screws (34) from support (73).
Apply within one year after documents approval.
b)The geometrical shape of forgings under ultrasonic flaw detection shall be as simple as possible such as rectangle, cylinder, plate, pie and barrel;
Check whether the wiring of the door locking device and the emergency unlocking switch gets loose.
The responsible department shall analyze the reason of and correct the audited nonconformity, and the auditor shall follow up and verify
Product and Service Requirement Review XD/XKYX-QZB-0508(Ver. 6)-2017
Inspection of the surface and welding conditions of end ring and conducting bar.
6.1.1 Inspection shall be carried out for each finished welded joints.
5.2.12.2 The on-board earthquake detection device can also send a testing request to the ground equipment actively, start the testing process after receiving the testing command sent by the ground equipment, and send the testing result to the ground equipment.
The inner packaging material of 120ml Anti-Aging Lotion must be subject to irradiation before filling and the irradiation dosage is 3kGy.
② Material control: The main appliances must have a production license approved by the China Railway Corporation, and all equipment and materials must have a product certificate, a factory quality certificate, an instruction manual, a three-warranty certificate, and a product test report.
The insulator shall be manufactured in accordance with this Part and the technical documents of the product drawings approved in accordance with the specified procedures, unless otherwise agreed by the Supplier and the Buyer; its main structural dimensions and dimensional deviation are as follows:
If it is necessary to move the objects at the incident site due to reasons such as rescuing personnel, preventing the incident from expanding and dredging traffic, signs shall be made, site diagrams shall be drawn and written records shall be made to properly preserve important traces and physical evidences at the site.
Installation Material List of Busbar flexible connection B
Sheet 04-1 Calculation Sheet for Other Engineering Costs and Indirect Costs
Electric control valve (244YV) is in the proper position on air circuit screen.
The type of electric cable is checked and whether there is any damage on the electric cable surface is inspected. The insulation between the core wires and the insulation to the ground is detected with a megger. The laying sequence, turning position, number of the replacement support, the level of the support on which the electric cable is located and the actual length (including reservation) of each electric cable are determined according to the electric cable manual and the actual situation on site.
The Materials Department shall count the main materials quantity received by subcontractor by the month and report to the Operating Department.
7. During construction of operating layer, protective railing and toe boards shall be installed between the ledger outside the scaffold and the scaffold according to the requirements of edge protection, in order to prevent operating personnel and materials from falling off the scaffolding board floor.
Measure the DC resistance of the winding along with the casing in all positions of the tap with a digital micro-ohmmeter or a DC double-arm bridge.
According to the objective of construction period control for the whole line, the subgrade worksite, especially the soft foundation treatment section, near the erecting base is the first position to start working.
For details, please see Fig. 5-3-3, Schematic Diagram of Scheme Comparison and Option.
2. Feedback and requirements of agents and customers for product use and quality.
The fillers from excavation shall be sampled and reviewed, and can be used only if they meet the requirements.
3.4.5. VVVF inverter box
18.1 Project management file submitted by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd.
It is prohibited to move single and automatic valve handle, before the train stops steadily.
Note: The drawing shows the high signal tie line, and in case of dwarf signal, the boxes shall be arranged according to the outdoor equipment layout.
200V–7400V, ±10%
It need not to be responded at this stage, and will be answered in testing schedule at subsequent stages.
Scope and quantity of acceptance: 2 bridges, including Wangpogou North Bridge which is 169m long, with the maximum single pan of 72m, and is designed to be a reinforced concrete arch bridge, and Wangpogou South Bridge which is 226m long and is designed to be a reinforced concrete deck arch bridge with the maximum single span of 132m and with a thrust arch structure, also it is designed with a transition section of 50m on both ends.
2. Model and specification: PDAT PE=3KW_x000D_
(2) The main keels can be adjusted up, down, left and right through the long bolt holes of the fastening iron parts and connecting pieces. The horizontal left and right directions shall be aligned with the position line arranged on the floor. The up and down directions shall be aligned with the floor elevation. The front and rear (i.e. Z-axis directions) shall not exceed the control line to ensure that the main keels in the up and down directions are vertical and the spacing meets the design requirements.
There are one ancient pagoda, one commune office and one medical center along the road.
The works include 16 intermediate stations, and main work quantities for station and yard renovation include: line removal and paving for 9.6km and turnout removal and paving for 32 groups.
The distance of resultance force of compression area to neutral axle y=87.772167mm
Mechanical joints shall meet the requirements of Article 7.0.7 of the Technical Specification for Mechanical Splicing of Steel Reinforcing Bars (JGJ 107-2016).
Small traction quality and low operation speed of the freight trains (average operation speed was 35.4km/h in 1996).
After the establishment of the leading group for the incorrupt government construction, the group shall establish a management system for the incorrupt government construction in accordance with its mission objectives and scope of responsibilities, make specific provisions on the concept, working procedures, educational methods, supervision procedures, management measures and other contents of the work of incorrupt government, and prepare relevant documents.
The model and specification of the pumps shall meet the design requirements and shall be equipped with factory qualified certificate, technical manual and test report provided by the manufacturer. The accessories of the equipment shall be complete without defects or damages.
(3) The optical cables will be mainly laid manually in the troughs; if there are conditions for laying through mechanical traction, optical cables will be laid through mechanical traction.
Length/width of earth excavation of main buildings and structures=foundation outer edge (or outer wall) dimension+3.0m+0.5*excavation depth
Locomotive Business Division/Bogie Business Division (Different Work Type of Same Department)
2: The material of temporary water supply pipeline shall be in accordance with the specified material of the drinking water sanitary requirements of Beijing City.
The scope of comparison is: DIK1+500 ~ DIK4+201.69.
The audit team carries out audit activities as per the annual internal quality audit plan (usually, one audit activity in every half year).
3.2.5 The procurement method shall be determined according to the technical complexity of the content of the design works to be subcontracted in the application.
Moderately weathered grey basalt: it is of cryptocrystalline texture and vesicular structure; the rock mass is relatively broken and the joint fissure is relatively developed; most cores are of column shape, with a hard lithology and a section length of 10-20cm.
MBCU uses two-way CAN communicative interfaces to communicate with BMU and central control unit (CCU).
The video monitoring workstation, where the on-duty personnel work, shall have the following functions:
Check the fastening bolts of connecting cables for any looseness, and check the busbar for any deformation.
1. Review Meeting Minutes of the Construction Tender for the Second Phase of Laos-China Railway
If the competent authority finally determines that the contractor is involved in forgery on business status by issuing invoices or forging digital tax certificates (EFOS), PEP will have the right to terminate the contract completely according to the clause of "Termination (Cancellation) due to Breach of Contract by Contractor".
Principles to be followed in emergency procedure of fire and explosion accidents
At 10:30 on April 1, No. 28,030 CRE train, carrying 18 loaders and 1 road roller, left Liuzhou, Guangxi and headed for Almaty, Zashita and Pavlodar, Kazakhstan.
1.1.1 Name of wastes: Drilling rock debris, drilling wastewater (including wastewater generated from well logging, mud logging, well cementing, well flushing and other auxiliary operations) and solid wastes;
6.2 Q/ZJG52/53-CX-08-2017 Major (Important) Hazard List (Table 2) (Storage Period: 2 years)
(1) The reinforcement cutting dimensions shall be subject to the construction drawing, and the defective part shall be removed when cutting.
Option B starts from the mainline toll station of Xiaomengyang-Mohan Expressway in China, and is connected with the Xiaomengyang-Mohan Expressway. The route is generally laid along the west side of the existing highway (Shangyong-Mohan Class-I Highway (China) and No. 13 Highway (Laos)).
If the components are fastened with nuts, the number of threads fastened on the lock nut must exceed 3.
4.3.2 Sources of danger in construction of the project;
3. Use special engineering facilities and devices to limit energy release and exposure and leakage of harmful substances;
Error in title, and it shall be the exit end wall of the drainage ditch in Rohri work area
For other domestic water supply stations, on fire fighting water pool is set at the main platform and mobile fire pumps are provided.
7.1 The combination of centralized and distributed reactive power compensation is adopted and the superior substation is installed with a complete set of automatic reactive compensation device. All the luminaires are provided with capacitance compensation. After luminaires get capacitance compensation, the power factor is above 0.9.
The equipment shall be transported horizontally by crane and pallet truck, and positioned by chain block and track jack. Cables for transportation transformers and power distribution equipment shall be connected reliably with complete marks and numbers.
The fault interface on both sides of the display screen pops up, showing the "VVVF3 HBD" fault for Mc1, and the fault guide suggests that "VVVF INPUT has overcurrent.
Excavation of regular soil under the pipes, the caps and monolithic ditches
China's railways are characterized by natural monopoly and the railway tariff is strictly under the direct government regulation.
The general manager office shall arrange transport, living and other logistics work for the staff of the emergency command center of the business division.
8.6.2 Duowei shall formulate List of Important Environmental Factors and List of Important Occupational Health and Safety Risks for important environmental factors and major hazard sources, and determine management plans for governance and control.
Relevant terms and conditions hereof may be amended upon agreement of both parties hereto.
The general rules that should be followed in the design and installation of chemical pipelines are not repeated. Only the relevant Standard names are listed for use in design and installation.
The Contractor shall not discharge the water containing pollutants or visible suspended substances into rivers, waterways or irrigation systems.
Project Name: Lae - Kerema Road Upgrade and Reconstruction Project of Papua New Guinea
Assemble Item 2 and Item 3 as per Product Drawing AJC1019932A and carry out positioned welding.
Arrangement of slideway: one layer of sleeper with the height of 220m is horizontally arranged at the axis 2475mm from Row C on 9.7m layer. Two [12 channel steels with the mouth in an upward direction are laid on the sleeper, forming a slideway where the roller can roll and move inside.
Only administrators are allowed to change the media for backup facilities.
Implement fixed position management of the stacking of various materials, equipment, finished products and semi-finished products.
Table 3-12Relation Curve among Time, Speed, Line Current, Motor Current, and Time for Y7-Q7
Selection of the tunnel construction method shall be favorable to protection of self-supporting capacity of surrounding rock and thus reduce the disturbance to it.
5: When the anchorage length of lower reinforcement of L beam does not satisfy the requirements of the specifications, mechanical anchorage shall be adopted. See the Detail (C) on Page 55 of 11G101-1 for details.
The cross section of carbody machine room is shown in Fig. 7.2:
6-6-2 Fine sand (Q3a14): bottom elevation of 285.0m, 3.0m thick, grey brown, mainly composed of quartz and feldspar, of impure sand texture, locally mixed with a small amount of cohesive soil.
Specification for Design and Construction of Concrete-filled Steel Tubular Structures (CECS28:2012)
6. Have basic foreign language communication ability required by this post.
A toll island shall be 2.2m wide. A one-way MTC toll island is 28m long; one-way ETC toll island, 37m long; and two-way ETC toll island, 54m long.
4. Complete other tasks assigned by the Office of Emergency Leading Team.
For a single side, earth excavation and back fill for 100 linear meters is 0.4m Excavation 0.4m\S<1,70>3 and 0.6m Back fill 0.6m\ S<1,70>3.
1.1.3.2.12 Cabling of Power Supply Panel
Table . List of Parameters of Bending Test for SCS Sandwich Composite Construction
It is recommended that the demand sector reviews the scope of work, the workflow, and the analysis items and methods in Appendix No.1, and clarifies the service requirements.
Cables shall be laid intensively with the principle of from far to near and from big to small.
Each of the VUTs was directly tested for its vehicle vibration acceleration, dynamic deflections of bolster spring, wheel-rail vertical force and wheel-rail lateral force.
In case of work in the tower, specially assigned personnel must be arranged outside the tower for monitoring. Cables and ladders used for entering and going out of the tower must be safe and reliable.
(8) The width of masonry joint on the surface of positioning block shall not be greater than 4cm.
According to survey data of CRU, since the 3rd quarter of 2015, the gap between nickel supply and demand in China has been increasing from the perspective of nickel production and consumption, reaching 137 kt by the end of the 2nd quarter of 2017, regardless of import factors.
It shall be calculated by the actual value during construction and the control stress for tensioning under the anchor shall be 0.75fpk.
The port area has a bulk cargo storage yard capacity of 430,000 tons, a container storage capacity of 1300 TEU (standard container), and an oil tank capacity of 200,000 tons.
2 sets of mud scrapers, 14 sets of mud valves and 14 sets of resilient seated gate valve
Range of maximum voltage: 90-264V AC; 47/63Hz;
Industrial air conditioners will be installed for the signal and communication machine rooms, control rooms of power transformation and distribution substations as well as rooms in which temperature, humidity and cleanliness cannot meet the process and equipment operation environment requirements.
After the divisional works have been completed, the contractor shall submit the intermediate acceptance and inspection application report with related construction documents, technical data and complete records of construction inspection and assessment to the EPC Project Department, who will submit the said materials to the Supervisor and Employer after approval.
Galvanized steel pipes shall be all embedded with threaded connections instead of fusion welding ones, with thread length at pipe ends no less than 1/2 of the pipe joint length, and after connection, the threads should exceed 2~3 turns.
4.23.5.5Image Monitoring for Pantograph Operating Status
The underframe and transmission connecting rod are stainless materials and the transmission connecting rod adopts the fabricated structure. Cutting and welding assemble is not allowed in the construction site.
Measures for concrete curing: concrete should be cured in time after the pouring.
Excavation within 2m of the railway subgrade must be approved by the local railway management department.
After the measurement, the end with the larger level difference is the initial lifting point.
Unit: square meterJointing area per Linear Meter of Mortar
<13-1> Clayey sand (SC): grayish yellow, slightly wet, medium dense to dense, with gravel content of 15% and particle size of 4.75~75mm, with sand content of 75% and particle size of 0.075~4.75mm, with silt and clay content of 10%.
Construction of pile foundation, bearing platform and abutment shall be arranged reasonably, so as to realize flow process.
[Release/RLS] key: Request to release service brake command by pressing the key.
Insufficient fire protection equipment and materials and improper emergency rescue measures
When the electric equipment are under normal working conditions, electric instrument and its range of measurement in the cabinet should be controlled in order to ensure the displayed value is within the range of dial. It should be configured according to the design. The instruments should not be damaged in case of short circuit and overload. Accuracy of instruments should not be lower than Class 2.3.
⑩ When the beam truck passes through a small box beam, the wheel set of the beam truck should be kept within the warning line.
1. In case of fire and explosion, put out the fire source and call the police promptly, evacuate personnel in time and treat the injured.
Auxiliary converter charger load adopts pure resistance load, individual switch control for each resistance is adopted, and charger load connection mode is shown in
The drain interval of the gear oil is 1 year or 200,000 km.
Description of sub-item in the bill of quantities (unit): drainage ditch (Nr.)
The file Matters on Bridge Pier Alarming Mark is being sent to your department, referring to the Attachment for details. Please examine and approve it.
Q/JZ.G7.150 Safety Management Regulations on Lifting Operation
7.2.5 The finished product inspector shall inspect and test the products item by item according to the corresponding delivery inspection specifications and make a judgment of whether they are qualified or not.
Wangjialiang–Balou section: The project commenced in March 2014. The construction is in progress currently. This section is expected to be cut through by the end of 2017.
TCU Software Schedule"
Regarding the direction change of the work branch of flexible suspension catenary at main track, the horizontal angle with the former direction normally is not larger than 6°, and the horizontal angle from the transition track or catenary of other tracks and non-work branch of the catenary at the main track to the former direction is preferably at most of 10°.
8. Test on operating relation between direction selection and traction/brake handle
8# crack on Qom side of first span (maximum width: 0.50mm)
In this design, sidings with turn-back functions are set in HSR Station, Dar El Fouad Station, Hyperone Station, Maryotea Road Station and Boulak Station of 6th of October City Rail Transit Monorail, and all of them can be used for turn-back.
5.3.2.3 Floor and Beam Formwork Removal
4.Diversification plan should be prepared as early as possible to form a complete development plan;
The income of other business in 2017 was RMB 7.4392 million, mainly including the service fee, bidding fee, and qualified supplier admission fee for bidding agency of the Material Trade Company, which is 12.76% up from the previous year. The gross profit rate is 27.91%, 6.48% down from the previous year.
Level of mechanized construction shall be improved, the amount of construction machinery shall be increased and advanced large equipment shall be applied; delivery pump could be adopted for concrete pouring to reduce labor cost, lighten work strength, improve work efficiency and speed up construction; auto pump could be applied for concrete moving and pumping for cushion cap and main structure.
Protection zone of Loaded Organic Phase Room can refer to this drawing.
d) When the load capacity is not less than 20% of the rated capacity, it is allowed for stable operation for a long period.
Site relocation rate: taken within the site relocation distance of 650 km.
Make a spot check on new technology, new materials, new processes and new equipment, and the implementation of the technical disclosure system.
C - Predicted average daily output of domestic waste per person (t/d/man);
Table 1-8: Comprehensive Emission Standard of Air Pollutants (Unit: mg/m3)
Flame gun, blowtorch, and sandblasting nozzle shall not point to people.
Equipment cabinets (boxes), cables and equipment accessories, etc.
(3) Provide scheduled time to the Buyer for submission of the Technical Specifications;
It refers to the process to find, identify and describe the risk.
7. Drying time (surface drying), h ≤22 dryqualified
Asphalt concrete pavement is applied and its structure is as follow:
The electric traction control unit (DCU) transmits parameters such as the actual traction/braking force of the vehicle and the actual speed of the vehicle to the VCM through MVB, and the VCM performs traction/braking control and provide protection according to the feedback quantity.
Technical Requirements for Interconnection of Railway International Data Transmission Network
5. When completed, the Project can create XXX jobs directly, and with the radiance and driving effect, the Project can drive the development of associated industries, creating hundreds of jobs indirectly.
(3) The Financial Evaluation Methods and Parameters for Construction Projects issued by the National Development and Reform Commission and the Ministry of Construction;
The valve shall be installed in the diameter direction of the pipeline. The flange plate of the valve shall be parallel to the flange plate of the pipeline. The flange gasket shall be placed on the central faying surface of two flange plates, and attention shall be paid to the alignment. Then, the bolts shall be tightened along the diagonal, and finally all bolts shall be tightened.
Mark the vertical central line on the two ends of each T-shaped beam and set the vertical central line, vertical and horizontal central lines of the bearing, horizontal end position line of the T-shaped beam and the specific position of each T-shaped beam on the surface of the abutments before lifting of the T-shaped beam.
16. Safety Assessment - Conduct safety pre-assessment, safety acceptance assessment, comprehensive safety status assessment, and special safety assessment according to legal requirements.
The power supply system is of centralized 110kV-35kV two-stage supplying method; the 35kV power is led out from the main substations at east sea channel and Shangdong parking lot to supply power to metro tractive step-down mixture substations and step-down substations.
When the vibratory pile driver is used for pipe sinking, if tightening wire rope is used for pressurization, the clutch shall be adjusted at any time according to the sinking degree of pile pipe to prevent lifting of pile frame and occurrence of accidents. In case of strong wind during construction, pile pipe shall be inserted into the ground for embedding, so as to ensure the safety of pile machine.
The project implementation of this contract section should be in accordance with the design documents and relevant design changes, and agreed to submit the project checking and accepting
Code for Fire Prevention in Design of Interior Decoration of BuildingsGB50222-95(revised in 2001)
3. The protection for slope under the orthographic projection of overpass plane and the cut slope within 3m on the left and right shall use 30cm thick M7.5 mortar rubble.
Type inspection should include index requirements in Table 2.
Conduct identification check to confirm all the signs on the equipment (name, specifications, manufacturer, serial number, date of manufacture, etc.).
4.4.1 Procurement plan of main materials and equipment
Pipes may not be put in contact with the ground, minimum distance between pipe and ground shall be 0.2m, and both ends and the middle shall be lined with sand bag.
Relocation of gas pipeline, water pipe, communication line and public pipeline protection, etc.
2) The structural design meets the requirements of strength, stiffness and stability, and is characterized by advanced technology, economic rationality, safety and applicability as well as quality assurance, and meets the requirements of aesthetic beauty.
Installation Drawing for Acid Unloading Pump in Dosing Room of Raw Water Processing Unit (3100)
This controller can be connected with six temperature sensing cables with addresses 1-6 respectively. When the temperature of the detected equipment reaches the alarmed temperature of the temperature sensing cable, an alarm will be triggered.
Accumulated recognized gross profit (loss to be listed with "-")
Participate in the investigation and handling of occupational safety and health incidents.
Note: The interest rate section of long-term loans at the end of current period is 1.20-7.00%.
Mudstone, shale and red sandstone are forbidden to be used for filling under immersed embankment or groundwater level.
Move the container from the fire scene as far as possible to an empty place.
A fault is categorized into three levels (A, B and C). When a fault is diagnosed, the locomotive network control system shall take corresponding actions according to each fault level:
4) Cast-in-situ continuous box girder of reinforced concrete and prestressed concrete
The overall performance EMC test shall be carried out according to the national standards.
The side formwork wraps the bottom formwork for the beam formwork, and the sponge strip is clamped at the included angle of the formwork.
The Usman Khatter Station is shown in Figure 3-2-1.
Figure 10-2 Max. Effect Bearing Reaction Force under Settlement of the Bearing
The "reboiler" is a pot-type heat exchanger, in which a tube sheet heat exchanger is inserted. Steam flows through the tube sheet to provide heat to the solvent in the reboiler. Solvents are pumped from the wet RC storage tank in the tank farm to different feed points in the distillation column.
Reference standard: Railway Applications - Air Conditioning for Main Line Rolling Stock - Part 2: Type Tests (BSEN14750-2:2006.
the construction contractor shall conduct sampling inspection at 3 points, of which, 1 point in the middle of the line, 1 point respectively on both sides 2 m away from the edges of replacement and filling.
5.1.2The steel shall have obvious yield terrace, with elongation more than 20%.
The joint measurement part is not included and the actual workload is adjusted according to the site conditions.
Ground Buildings (such as, Ground Station, Elevated Station, Section Traction Substation, Depot and Control Center)
Connect the air source correctly or set the air source working pressure again.
The materials qualified through inspection shall be marked with signboards and labels and relevant account shall be made and stored properly. The quality certification of each batch of materials shall be collected and the materials qualified through inspection shall be stored in warehouse or material stacking yard. The solid rain-proof shed shall be erected in the material stacking yard, and all materials shall be stored as per specification, model and texture.
Version D: pubulished in June 2003, combined with the three-standard integrated management form for more than one year of implementation, the system documents were revised, and the operability of the integrated management system was improved.
The control to other products not for railway excluded from the applicable scope of the system of the Company shall also be performed according to relevant requirements of the Manual.
Power supply mode: current collected at the third rail.
According to the checking calculation results of this section, the flexural bearing capacity of the culvert, crack width and the shear bearing capacity does not meet the requirements as per inspection data.
CS21 Combined Roots Blower Installation Size Drawing
Zhibo Lucchini Railway Equipment Co. Ltd (ZQ for short)
Plants shall be free from defective branch knot, bark abrasion, wind injury or other damages. They shall be normal and healthy in appearance, being able to stand proper pruning of upper parts and roots.
1. Most of strongly-weathered tuff within this construction point is unprotected, while the shotcrete with wire mesh is adopted in the section of GDK7+560~+635. The protection standards are inconsistent, cancellation is recommended.
Ray dosage monitoring function shall be provided, surface dosage rate shall be displayed in fluoroscopy; cumulative dosage, zone dosage and dosage limit shall be displayed in fluoroscopy.
2. The construction items of the project includes: decorative part, construction part, brand-new aluminum alloy window part, brand-new security door and framed glass door at each room, newly installed electrical part, roof drainage part, electricity expansionand cable access, the part of the old building to be demolished, weak current installation part, as well as newly installed air-conditioner part.
The Vendor shall clearly establish reinspection responsibility and handling authority limits for unqualified products.
Apply 1:3 cement mortar as primer and broom, and floating in two-time operations
GB10230.1 Tap Changers - Part 1: Performance Requirements and Test Methods
15.5.2.1 The vehicle design liaison meeting will be held approximately 1 month, 3 months and 5 months after the contract is in effect at the general design stage of the vehicle, and the meeting expenses shall be borne by the vehicle supplier.
(3) Calculate steel purlin and steel tie rod.
Personnel with occupational contraindication of working at height shall not work at height.
1) The digital constant voltage power amplifiers are adopted for the public address power amplifiers;
Entrusted by CSR Qingdao Sifang Co., Ltd., State Key Laboratory of Traction Power, Southwest Jiaotong University, started to carry out analytical calculation for California EMU gauge from March 2014.
Two contact points (one for each channel) forcedly braked by ASD are connected in series.
Before the track panels are transported to the site for track laying, the installation location has been clearly defined, and the product identification is made according to the used part, so that the laying operator can check track panels for track laying.
This feature will be obtained through the use of redundancy and fast reconfigurations protocols.
6.1 If the performance is delayed or failed due to force majeure, either party shall be held responsible for such delay or failure.
3. Monitor the operation condition of the air conditioner blower and close the fan automatically upon fault and give an alarm.
3)Install the 12mm-thick adjusting shim (8).
Article 9 Main Duties of China Railway International Co., Ltd.
Refer to CN0428DD0610EL2-9 (5) for fabrication drawing of supporting column
After adjustment and acceptance of platform plates, formwork erection and grouting shall be carried out for cement pads;
7) The tooling design shall be carried out with computer aid, preferably with 3D auxiliary design analysis.
Settlement observation is required to be performed in this Project. It starts when the foundation is poured and then is performed at the interval stated below: once upon completion of constructing a floor; after the main works are completed and during the decoration period, once in every month; after completion of this Project, once in every 2~3 months in the first year and once in every 4~6 months thereafter.
Pipe root, wall root and equipment root will be partially strengthened.
1.3 Coya Power Plant controls the three plants of PHC in a centralized manner. As a result, there are quite many alarms in the monitoring system. To focus on work when on duty, operating personnel generally turn off audible alarms,.
① The construction speed of full span prefabrication, transport and erection of this method is far faster than that of the other construction schemes.
The water pipe at the rear of the wiper is connected in place, and there is no obvious bend in the middle of the water pipe and no obvious looseness at the joint.
Tie bars shall be reserved for columns in places of infilled wall specified in architectural construction drawing.
Provincial and departmental office buildings and other important or crowded public buildings and fire hazard sites
The PRS-753A/C-G protection device takes the phase-splitting current differential motion element as the main protection for the whole line of quick operation, and it is equipped with the backup differential motion section of the zero-sequence current differential element.
Fire alarm system is mainly composed of smoke detection controller, photoelectric smoke detector and linear heat detector, as well as corresponding cables.
The annual internal management system audit of the Group is generally carried out in the form of "decentralized audit", and centralized audit can be carried out in case of special circumstances (such as the version change of standards or system documents).
Pore water, bedrock fissure water and karst water stored in Quaternary loose soil are the main supply water sources to groundwater in bridge site. The burial depth of groundwater is shallow.
Fix the external power line with tubular joint and connect the connecting terminals reserved in the lamp body.
8.1.3.1.1 Design and development planning is a key link for the product realization process and will be used to decide the inherent characteristics of products to provide basis for other activities for product realization (such as procurement, production, servicing, monitoring, measurement, etc.). It is also an effective method to make design reach the expected goals.
(14) After the installation of pipes, the system should be washed repeatedly until the discharged water has no foreign matters such as dirt, sand and iron swarf and the water is clean.
Legal Representative or Entrusted Agent: (Signature)
Design conditions: axle load 23t; speed 200 km/h, 1,760 sleepers/km;
Excavation permit is needed for any form of excavation and trenching and shall be obtained before construction. HSE Manager shall sign and issue such permit.
Take part in the handling with engineering qualitative accidents and review and approve the plan for such handling.
The urban section in Bogota is 14.60km long and the suburban section in Bogota is 25.06km long.
The education on job safety, knowledge of fire prevention and fire extinguishing and emergency measures shall be given to personnel working at the sites where accidents or emergencies may happen to ensure that full-time (part-time) emergency personnel and first-aid personnel have the corresponding emergency and first-aid capabilities.
Larger vibration will be produced when cutting hard rock, which will lead to advanced wear of cutting pick or affect cutting efficiency.
The demand department submits the procurement application-the non-production procurement department or the purchase departments of all bases is responsible for bidding and negotiation-contract signing-payment process
The measuring range, record time and sampling frequency set shall meet the requirement of the physical quantities to be measured.
Marks, including text, color and pattern, are given at specific position of the equipment.
The tree is 8m in height, 120cm in DBH and 9m in crown width. It is located beside the existing highway in Gutun and it grows well.
Subsurface excavation is performed as per shotcrete-anchor construction method and by means of smooth-wall blasting and wet-shotcreting technique; the arch wall lining is poured all at once by use of inner lining trolley; the invert is constructed in advance and integrally poured.
Gaskets Used in Tube-shell Heat Exchangers - Part1: Double-jacketed Gaskets GB/T29463.1-2012
When the brake command is valid, control the traction torque output.
Facilities (changing room, medical room, bathroom, canteen and toilet) shall be established by the Contractor according to the sanitation standards and requirements of ventilation and lighting on the construction site, and special personnel shall be assigned for management and regular cleaning.
During the construction, circular drilling rig, rotary drilling rig or impact drilling rig shall be selected for drilling, and the construction method of injecting underwater concrete by tremie method shall be adopted for piling.
The road network of Monrovia mainly consists of the ring line formed by Tubman Boulevard, Haile Selassie Ave, United Nations Drive and Somalia Drive.
This Agreement and various contract appendixes (including various management rules, management methods, management documents and supplementary data issued by the Employer during the construction);
The control mode of mixed operation of regenerative braking, resistance braking, hydraulic braking, and electromagnetic rail braking is provided for train braking mode, to make full use of the electrical brake to reduce the wear of brake line and save electric energy.
According to the relevant provisions of the Contract Law of the People's Republic of China and other laws, regulations and stipulations, both Parties have reached a consensus to conclude the Contract.
There are old roads in the areas involved in the route of the Project. Our company is to use the existing roads to access the construction sites, to built access road from the existing roads to the main route, and to perform regular maintenance to ensure necessary availability of the access road under various weather conditions.
* Note: H2O:58.34mol%; CO: 20.02mol%; H2: 14.09mol%; CO2: 6.60mol%
Table 8.4.11 Mineral Admixtures Content in the Concrete under Different Environments (%)
Check all indicator lamps and bypass switches in the cab
Accumulated Amount Valued: RMB Accumulated Amount: RMB Accumulated Amount: RMB:
1.1 The drainage ditch shall be excavated away from the fill slope toe prior to the embankment filling to keep the site free of accumulated water.
2. Window interface of AutoCAD
The MDF of each station, control center, depot and yard shall be installed in cabinet type (including modules, security units, ground strips, quick alarms, general alarms, etc.).
4. The blue cell in the table is an automatic calculation item, where the formula has been defined and no additional input is required.
(Autographic signature of the Legal Representative) Gender: Male Age: 49 Position: Chairman, the Legal Representative of Shandong Provincial Communications Planning and Design Institute Co., Ltd. (Name of the Tenderer).
1.1.7 "Effective Date of the Contract" refers to the date on which all the conditions for entry into force agreed in the Contract are met.
During soil cleaning, foundation trench excavation, pile cutting, and pile cap placing, the fracture of pile shaft below pile top elevation or disturbance of soil between piles shall be avoided.
10. It shall be compatible with three-phase, single power input conditions. The three-phase power in the input screen shall be provided with open-phase protection device, and phase sequence checking function.
1.2.8 Environmental impact refers to any change to the environment, whether adverse or beneficial, wholly or partially resulting from an organization's environmental factors.
(Corresponding to project assessment, with supervision and management strengthened)
The reserved length of the main cable should not be less than 2m at each end when adopting direct burial,and should be sufficient at a time when using cable trenches,but the branch cables below 50 meters do not need to do that.
Kong Deku: Supervisor, Zhou Shenggui: Supervisor, Zhao Shengping: Supervisor, Wang Jihong: Director and General Manager, Meng Guangshun: Chairman, Huang Qinghua: Director, Wu Jianshun: Director, Wang Yaohua: Director,
Be responsible for the accident statistics of photovoltaic power station as well as the timeliness, accuracy and completeness of reports.
Base course cleaning: Clean the loose impurities on the surface of the structural and insulation layers. Level out the sticking substances projecting on the base course surface, such as ashes; and do not affect the effective thickness of the leveling course.
7.5.1 Selection of superstructure of bridges of conventional structure
But all of such kinds of work shall be performed under the accident treatment procedures with approvals.
Evaluation of project quality and contract execution、comments and relevant decisions of problems and defects (Attachments are applicable in case of a lot of contents contained:
(1) Procurement shall be made in strict accordance with the Seedling Table. Seedlings with strong branches and trunks and beautiful shape, without plant diseases and insect pests, shall be selected.
Axial force: 289.2 Bending moment: 177.5
When the printer fails, the operator can select another printer for printing.
(7) The installation and erection of the power supply and distribution trunk line at the site shall be stable and tidy, the phase line and zero line shall be laid and arranged in sequence, and the erection height must conform to the specifications.
3 The girder transporter shall be loaded based on the model and specification, and overload shall be avoided.
Measures against the rain and drainage measures shall be taken for concrete surface with roller compaction completed.
(e)Warranty Period (GCC Clause 9.8.1):
Concreting of the culvert body shall be conducted by sections as specified in the design drawing through parallel cross flow operation. A settlement joint shall be set between sections as specified in the design drawing and waterproof and drainage works shall be carried out as well.
Each department shall organize once of emergency response plan drilling in each quarter and revise the plan in accordance with the problems occurring during the emergency response plan training and drilling.
2. The entire claim notifications shall be delivered to the address specified in this guarantee within the business time of our bank, i.e. before [17: 00] of each bank business day, otherwise it shall be deemed as arriving in the next bank business day.
Table of Dimensions of Flexible Waterproof Casings (casings shall be selected and installed in accordance with the table below, refer to national standards 02S404/5~7 for the details)
(10) Installation of grounding system: The grounding resistance shall not exceed standard and connections shall be firm and reliable.
Table of Resume of Survey Engineer to be Input in the Project (Wang Xiaoyang)
5m flexible rule, 300 angle rule, slate pencil, 2m leveling rule, gas shielded welding machine, pneumatic nut riveter, plumb line
5. Where a OCS support cantilever slab conflicts with the railing column, the column position may be properly adjusted. The quantity has been included.
From the perspective of lightning current shunt, all kinds of lightning-proof buildings in the sewage treatment plant no longer need to set up dedicated down lead provided that natural down leads have been set up.
6. Fully applied with special interface treatment mortar (for aerated concrete masonry wall)
Press "OFF" on the manual operation box, switch off the press device, press "Lifting" and "Withdrawal" of the left and right press heads. After the press heads are withdrawn in place, lower them to the proper position. Press "Combined Lifting" of the top pick to make the flange top slightly higher than the movable rail surface.
The junction of taper pipe holes should be equipped with fully tightened plug screws.
The impact resistance shall be designed and tested in accordance with Level 3 anti-interference of waveform in IEC 61000-4-5 Standard for all supplied equipment, which shall meet Level B performance standard.
1 The on-site service worker shall try to solve the problems of user on the site.
Quality grade standard: qualified,see the Particular Conditions of Contract.
3.1.8 All taxes shall be paid in accordance with the national regulations, and relevant tax payment certificates shall be provided to the Employer and VAT special invoices with corresponding tax rates shall be issued at the time of payment in accordance with the financial requirements of the Employer.
Notes: 1. Deduction will continue until all points are deducted; 2. If points are deducted for other reasons, the specific problems should be noted.
Before test, isolate the pressure regulator and close the outlet cock (A09) of main air reservoir to realize air suction of compressor and record the opening and closing pressure of safety valve of main air reservoir.
4) If one device breaks down during normal operation, the standby device must be started; the operator shall close and shut down the upstream and downstream hand valves near this device and open the corresponding valve.
Total usage of HRB335 reinforcement (≥Φ10): 3,751 (kg)
The 15cmX15cm square wood is laid above and below the jacking and the base; the square wood is laid in the cross-bridge direction under the vertical pole, and is laid in the longitudinal bridge direction above the vertical pole.
Since the end of 2003, 18 cities have been approved to construct metro, of which 9 were approved between the end of 2003 and 2006 and so far another 9 have been approved since 2006.
­Card Specification 2.2.1 (GlobalPlatform)
6)If any part of the system in the Contract is changed, the tenderer shall promptly replace the spare parts and special tools, even if these spare parts and special tools have been sent to the user.
17. Technical Proposal, QFD Analysis Form, Project Charter, DFMEA Form and Advanced Product Quality Planning Schedule
According to the construction technologies and process of this Project, the main surveying tasks include:
Splicing at four corners of door and window holes is forbidden and it's necessary to adopt the whole insulation board for cutting formed incision and making the board vertical (as shown in the following figure). At the corner of the wall, it's necessary to use the same insulation board for pasting and fixation.
Furthermore, power of execution for the regulations is poor. Failure to abide by the existing laws and regulations always occurs.
After the alarm was eliminated, the operator rejected about 700 vials and about 500 rubber stoppers exposed on the filling line, as well as 3 trays (about 1,680 vials) of filled and sub-packaged products and wiped the surface of the equipment with 75% ethanol solution, followed by 3-min self-cleaning.
6.3.1.3 Turnout sleepers for cracking strength test under static load shall pass through appearance, type and dimension inspections and be selected among 2.5m–3.0m long turnout sleepers.
It is very difficult to implement speed-up on the existing railways in China, which is mainly reflected in the two aspects as below:
6.5.8 The mixture of soil improved by road-mixing method shall be free of plain soil ball or layer.
First floor: Pedestrian and logistics entrance/exit is set on the south side.
Law of the People's Republic of China on Product Quality, Law of the People's Republic of China on Work Safety, Environmental Protection Law of the People's Republic of China, Law of the People's Republic of China on Prevention and Control of Occupational Diseases and other applicable laws and regulations
4.1.1The original copy of the Quality Assurance Program of Nuclear Valves shall be filed and kept by the Quality Department and the new edition of Quality Assurance Program of Nuclear Valves shall be uniformly numbered, which shall be distributed as per the release scope defined by the leader of the Quality Department with release and receiving registration records.
Network middleware mounted on each computer and used to realize network data communication.
The seismic fortification intensity of the construction site along this line in the section is shown in the following table.
The main distribution box and distribution boxes shall be locked during normal operation, and they shall not be locked if the switch box is loaded.
The lower left window in the management software shows the device warning log information (warning log happens on that very day by default, and the logs happens the latest are arranged at the front). In case of device failure, the corresponding warning information shall be listed in the window.
The deviation of the shifted formwork's center to the chimney's geometric center shall not exceed 5mm. The lower limb of the formwork overlaps with the cast concrete about 100mm. For the formwork surface contacting with the concrete, it shall be cleaned with no slurry left and painted with release agent after being removed each time.
The issuing range of data documents shall be determined by the competent department of the documents.
After the purging and flushing are qualified, all the pipe systems shall be recovered according to the design drawings.
The originals and duplicates of the Contract are of equal legal effect. In case of inconsistencies between them, the originals shall prevail.
Manufacturer: Consortium of China Railway Baoji Bridge Group Co., Ltd. and the Second Harbor Engineering Company Structural Engineering Co., Ltd.
When the contract wires are erected by a small tension, the temporary reinforcement measures shall be applied to the mast assembly in a curve section and transition mast.
See the attached 10379/4~5 for the plane layout of the equipment of boosting station.
After the sewage is disposed in the sewage regulating tank, it is pumped to municipal sewage pipe network.
Cleanliness: doors and windows shall be sealed, and the purification shall comply with requirements of computer room (particle size of dust: <0.5μm, number of dust particles: <18000particles/dm3, noise: <70DB);
Unscrew the mounting screws M6 of the electrical plate, and remove the electrical plate;
The load shall be controlled according to the diversity factor of the unit.
Notes: 1. Ready-mixed mortar can be used for masonry mortar when conditions permit, or the mortar can be mixed on site when conditions do not permit.
Decision on the necessity for reallocating resources for implementation of HSSE management system;
3. Indoor pipeline shall be applied with two layers of red lead rust-proof paint at first and two layers of alkyd enamel after that; and outdoor pipelines shall be applied with three layers of alkyd enamel phenolic aldehyde primer at first and three layers of alkyd enamel afterwards.
10.4 Any unaccomplished matters shall be handled as per the country's relevant provisions, or a supplementary agreement shall be signed otherwise as negotiated between both parties hereto. The supplementary agreement has the same effect as this Agreement.
Fire dampers are divided into three categories: One is a "silly" valve, that is, a simple valve without any control signal and feedback signal; the second is a fire damper with a feedback signal of 70 °C; the third is an electric fire damper with signals controlling the opening, closing, reset, and feedback.
1. Specifications, models and tag numbers of instruments and accessories comply with the design or standard.
Test and verify interface function of CTC and interlocking system; test and verify functions of operation dispatching console and auxiliary dispatching console under dynamic scenes.
Our Company plans to build the living quarters in an off-site area designated by the Owner in accordance with the bidding documents and site survey.
D3K6+046 Design Drawing of 1-4.0m Reinforced Concrete Frame Box Culvert
Along the line, exposed strata are developed completely which mainly include the Paleozoic, Mesozoic, Cenozoic and the Quaternary deposits from various genesis overlying on bedrock, with complicated forming causes and a great variety.
The floor dustproof paint should be applied till to the height not less than 350mm on the wall.
If problems not affecting the normal unit operation are found in the inspection for handover and there is no handling scheme for the time being, the Handover Team indicates the problem handling time limit and responsible person (track handling) on Handover Form of Projects for Warranty. Projects can enter the warranty period (maintenance stage) after passing the review given by the Handover Team and the Review Team.
Applicant: Beijing Tiezi Cost Consulting Co., Ltd. (Official Seal)
In the Two-stage Preliminary Design of Wuzhou (Longyanzui) - Shuolong Highway (Chongzuo - Jingxi Expressway to Shuolong Port Section), 5 mainline tunnels with a design speed of 100km/h and 1 connecting line tunnel with a design speed of 80 km/h will be provided on the recommended route. See the following table for details:
Thermal relay setting: FR11, FR21 4.0A; FR12, FR22 4.6A; FR14, FR24 4.3A
Apron door status is monitored with monitoring system and delivered to drivers;
(5) For boreholes of the parts with erosion and abrasion resistance requirements, 3d after borehole sealing or grouting, the borehole surface shall be treated according to the requirement of (2) in 3.3.2 of the "Technical Requirements".
(11) Propose suggestions for the perfection of the evaluation system of financial business.
The highest elevation of roof structure ( the cornice in the roof) is 46.500m and the elevation of the cornice outside the roof is about 38.700m. The roof system is supported above the stand structure.
Participate in the acceptance and pricing of project items, and guide project divisions to conduct the responsibility cost accounting.
Parts development verification plan determination rate = 100%;
Therefore, in the construction and maintenance, particularly in the engineering reconstruction, there is no need to make significant adjustments to the whole system, but to simply reconfirm the electronic drawing on the computer.
Fig. 5: Import and Export Trade of China and Ethiopia by Year (Unit: USD 100 million)
Quality requirements: qualified and meeting the requirements of Detail Design of Railway Passenger Station.
China-Laos Railway: Construction Fully Resumes in International Corridor
After every strain section in the section is tightened, the tail circuits on both sides of the tension tower in the section are led to the junction box under the tower, and the downlead clamp is used to fix the optical cable to the inside of the main material of leg C of the tower. Do not cut off unnecessary cable until the joints are connected, as shown in the figure below:
The schedule of values shall allocate the entire Subcontractor Price among the various portions of the Subcontractor's Work and be prepared in such form and supported by such data to substantiate its accuracy as the Contractor may require.
(3) After the preliminary design passes the review, 80% of the advanced exploration, preliminary survey, preliminary design costs shall be paid;
- development (or selection) of devices and equipment for the safe operation of machines and mechanisms for the mechanization of construction and installation work;
1 Establish a green construction management system and formulate corresponding management system and targets.
Opening Bank and A/C No.: Xinshi Sub-brance of Rural Commercial Bank of Maanshan City 20000030219310300000122
The supporting total height from the bent cap top at the front line of back wall of abutments to the bottom of the main girder is 30 cm;
With improved structural strength, reasonable stress distribution and better radial elasticity, it significantly improves the wheel-track motion acting force.
Highway: South Sudan's infrastructure is poor, as are its roads.
Project Name: New Boten (Luang Namtha) - Houayxay (Bokeo) Expressway
The main contents are as follows: 1) when the independent foundation concrete of this work is poured in layers, the concrete is fed into the mould by pump, the inserted vibrator vibrates, and the foundation is poured in whole layer, with no construction joint left.
The temporary custodian shall still manage the seals in strict line with this management method. The original and the temporary custodians shall strictly handle the handover formalities, and fill in the Seal Handover Record Form for registration.
3. The variety of welding rod or welding wire suitable for the material to be welded should be selected for welding and the factory qualification certificate is required.
7) Equipped with wind sources, 3 on each side (located at both ends and in the middle).
5.5.5.6In order to ensure the smoothness of concrete at the joint of wall, column and roof formwork, the formwork at the upper and lower joints shall be removed after the upper concrete is poured. The layout of formwork is shown in the following figure:
Reasonable use of materials is required, to avoid the unnecessary waste;
This CP101 section is from Yongan station (starting point) to Pegu station, a 70.8km double-track line.
Under loads, the whole process of cracking failure of the specimen can be obviously observed in the numerical test. Fig. 9 shows representative failure processes in the course of loading.
(5) The name of extinguishing agent and the number of a storage container specified in the design shall be marked on the front of the storage container.
4)Software integration test specifications shall fully satisfy software structure design specifications.
Student Yang Rui Gender: female, born on August 27, 1997, from March 2014 to January 2017, studied in the major of Mechatronics Technology of this University, having studied all the courses specified in the junior college teaching plan with qualified standing, and is hereby approved to graduate.
The control room is the control center of train washers that controls the whole process of train washing.
The districts, county-level cities and county of Zhengzhou City are composed of 76 subdistricts, 65 towns and 12 townships, totally 153 in quantity.
Where: Q'ij—— induced traffic volume from i zone to j zone (veh/day;
2. Elevation positioning system: This project uses the elevation system provided by Party A.
Plaza refers to the urban public space that is mainly featured with functions for recreation, commemoration, gathering and emergency sheltering, and is an important place for people to carry out social activities. Normally, there will be a great many people and traffic.
(1) The borrowing costs which meet the following conditions simultaneously shall begin to be capitalized: 1) expenditures to assets have already been incurred; 2) borrowing costs have already been incurred; 3) the acquisition and construction or production activities necessary for the assets to reach the expected usable or marketable condition have already started.
Board of Supervisors: It is the permanent supervisory organization of a company, mainly responsible for supervising and inspecting business activities of the enterprise, to prevent the Board of Directors from abusing power and thus to protect
10.2.4.1 AC power switching distribution cabinet and AC/DC power distribution cabinet
3. If we are accepted, we will sign contract and perform contract in strict accordance with secrets provision of the Employer and other relevant laws and regulations, and carefully fulfill the confidentiality obligations of the Contractor specified in the Contract; otherwise, we shall undertake the corresponding legal responsibility.
Rules Governing Organization of Train Operation shall be formally issued as soon as possible as a basic rule.
In the structural construction stage, identify the decoration materials and practices, select materials and determine the sample.
Traffic lights should be installed in front of tipping gates to guide garbage truck unloading.
j 5767.415 0.000 524.310 0.511 -0.027
The windows and glass curtain walls of original structures involved in the figure shall be subject to the external curtain wall drawing. The figure is a schematic diagram.
② Clearing by pressing YZSA: Press YZSA first, and then press YA.
Insulation of air ducts, components and equipment shall be carried out only after air leakage inspection or quality inspectionof air duct system is proved to be qualified.
When binding the base plate and side wall for the first time, bind reinforcement at side and top plates after strength of concrete poured for the first time reaches 75%.
The main construction equipment includes the reinforcement bender, the reinforcement cutter, the abrasive wheel cutting machine, the reinforcement straightener, the straight thread threading machine and the grinder.
According to the standard video coding format and standard communication protocol, the camera signals can directly access the network, and the video images can be transmitted.
Code for Construction and Acceptance of Boiler Installation Engineering (GB50273-2009);
Figure 46 Stressing Diagram When Hydraulic Arm swinging left 45°, Propulsion Beam Remaining Foremost, and Rock Drill Moving Foremost
(2) General Code for Design of Highway Bridges and Culverts (JTG D60-2004);
Lighting at recharging center, socket, and emergency power room equipment plan
4) Installation side formwork: before the installation of the formwork, the surface of the formwork shall be polished and smeared with release agent. After qualified the acceptance, it is manually installed with the crane.
The F-type coupler and NC390-type buffer that meet AAR standard requirements are adopted.
2) Permanent cable number signs must be installed at both ends of the cable.
Typical stratigraphic distribution: fill, silty clay, fine sand or rubble, mudstone and sandstone strata.
Check the pit bottom width and slope gradient while excavating the pit. If the width or gradient is inadequate, timely adjustment is required. Especially the elevation should be measured timely to prevent over-excavation.
CREGC's management system document specifies the interaction between processes and the interface relationship between the main control department and assistant department. For details, refer to Chart for Allocation of Management System Process Function.
In November 2008, Hongshi Group formed a strategic cooperative relationship with Goldman Sachs Group, the Fortune Global 500. With introducing the foreign capital of 120 million US dollars (equivalent to RMB 816 million), the Group became a Sino-foreign joint venture.
Connecting to biogas pipeline (get close to fermentor as possible)
All quantities in the Daywork labor list are provisional, and the actual quantities occurred shall be filled in the completion price according to that approved by the Project Supervisor.
The following core functions and mission summaries shall be clarified and implemented in the phased emergency response to emergency rescue flow of the tunnel group accident:
With increase of running speed, the method of testing super-speed air drive with motor car model is generated. Microprocessor was invented later than traction drive control system, and AC traction drive technique became mature gradually, thus the method of "back-to-back" testing is generated.
The plan is made only for the project bidding. Software and hardware will be further detailed and clarified as the design progresses.
Earthquake: As no earthquakes happened since the foundation of Nigeria, no dedicated earthquake administrations are established to record data in this field and no seismic fortification is provided for local infrastructures like public works, roads, water and electricity works, seismic fortification is not considered in the design of Abuja~Kaduna of Nigeria Railway Modernization Project.
Waterproof layer of bridges and culverts includes TQF waterproof layer of type A and TQF waterproof layer of type C.
The seismic fortification intensity is 7 degree, the design seismic group is group I, foundation pit acceleration of design earthquake is 0.10g and seismic characteristic period is 0.4s.
2.5.4.3.2. Precise Control over Prestress
1.3 Site survey conditions and construction experience summarized in relevant works constructed or under construction.
Dangerous chemicals in the Construction Project are stored in different areas, categories and warehouses according to their chemical properties, and incompatible materials should not be mixed.
Train cab is active, and the network system is trouble-free;
(3) The construction of water-proof course shall be carried out by professional teams. The water-proof material shall be evidenced by the product qualification certificate and performance test report and the type, specification and performance of the material shall comply with relevant national standards and design requirements.
(10) It is capable of automatic detection of GPS position and frequency distribution.
For example, the selected starting point position and path of reinforcement in y-direction on the top surface of Flow Channel Roof in Working condition 6(y-z+) are shown in Figure 3.
Shielding can be classified into switch shielding control and substation shielding control.
2. Detailed construction organization design refers to the independent version thereof.
c. Before the splicing box is sealed, all optical fibers shall be tested in a unified way to find out whether there is test omission and whether there is extrusion of optical fibers and splices between the optical fiber reserved trays;
6. Original Tender Document–>Instructions to Bidders, ITT 19.1: 28 days before the deadline for bid submission, the equivalent of freely convertible currencies determined by the selling rates set by the Bank of Mongolia.
First, as shown in Figure 6, open the front panel of storage battery, press the clamp spring at the top of the left and right guide ways at the same time, and the location is as shown by the arrows in the following figure. Pull out the guide from inside of storage battert compartment, and then dismantle the connecting lead of charger by cross screwdriver, which is as shown in the following figure:
6 professional security personnel will be allocated to accommodation camp and production area.
It is necessary to carry out on-site repair in time towards the damage, such as rail breaking, that may affect the running safety.
4. One stub-end freight loading and unloading track will be set at primary stage and 4 through freight tracks will be built in the long term, realizing the conditions of whole-train loading and unloading and receiving/departure.
"Transverse CWR track with double-hole light load of single-track (seismic action)", 4,33363,0,40,3923,122597
Monitor the pressure holding test in the entire process, and take photos about the test results and recovered valve state.
Curved Type Ground Station Structure of E-W Line (Model)
Environmental Conditions for Electric and Electronic Products Appearing in Nature – Part 2: Altitude and Air Pressure, Deepness and Water Pressure
Central Control Quality Record of Sintering Workshop
Concrete efflorescence, S=1.99m2, as shown in Figure 3-16
Bridges in the section for phase-I project involved in the study include superstructures and infrastructures of elevated bridge structures in the section (including station bridge and turnout bridge), communication facilities installed on the structures and appurtenant civil construction facilities for traction power supply system.
Maximum set speed beyond the limit (exceed 1000 steps; for 302 use, reach or exceed 4500 steps)
(3) Upon beam transport, the distance between pivot and beam end should be no more than 3.0m (calculated as per 30 days after final tension).
Currently, the domestic silicon block supply is abundant, the product can be produced according to the quality requirement of the user, and the supply source of silicon block can meet the requirements of the project.
Model: LZ555LA60/587.30/FL.D180
First, fit the cold-shrinkable intermediate joint body onto cable A, with the exposed liner end facing inward. Next, enlarge the copper wire mesh and fit it onto cable B.
Walking in the ditch, you can experience the real pastoral scenery.
CJZYG,CJZYF to CJZALE
During this period, the Transport Department of Guangdong Province organized volunteers to carry out voluntary activities in order to provide for those who were to return home services such as boarding guidance, tea offering and luggage handling.
All are container yards, so no dust-removing and sprinkling will be considered.
1 supplier material quality certificate is provided for each batch of products
The ceiling adopts double-layer 9.5mm gypsum board or wood board and base board structure (the total thickness is more than 20mm)
(6) Evaluate the handover application submitted by the Construction Contractor, and organize the inspection and acceptance for the functional works to be handed over;
17.5.10 The construction position, thickness, gradient and broken joint treatment of the protection layers shall meet the design requirements, and the width of surface crack shall not exceed 0.2 mm.
Table 9-10 List of Estimate for Invested Construction Funds for San Antonio TSF (Each Phase)
3 When the LEU box is installed on the wall of the tunnel, the metal foundation brackets shall be fixed on the tunnel wall with M16 expansion bolts, and the drilling depth on the tunnel wall shall be 150~200 mm, and the distance from the top surface of the metal bracket to the cover plate of the cable tray shall be 200~300 mm.
1) According to the negotiation situations, it is anticipated that the two parties will agree to that claim to compensation;
The route is starting at the point of K0 + 000, the intersection of Route 13 and East Capital -Segar Avenue, and ending at the point of K109 +800, Vangvieng to Luang Prabang section of Vangvieng Connection with the total length of 109.800Km (long broken chainage not included).
(3) The site shall be arranged for facilitating management and allocation of labor force, machines, tools and equipment and to help reduce interference with construction works and promote the building of a civilized construction site.
SEBETA (ADDIS)~ MIESO, with a length of 317.774km, is an integrate part of the international railway from Ethiopia to Djibouti, SEBETTA~DJIBOUTI PORT.
m) Set up appropriate safety systems around the whole project and adjacent sites belonging to the Employer.
After nearly four years of hard construction by railway builders, on February 15, a good news came from the Yuxi-Mohan section of the China-Laos Railway that the holing-through was achieved at Lixin Tunnel, a Level 1 high risk tunnel on the railway.
The corresponding tension force of the cable is calculated and determined in advance, and the cable force is adjusted step by step through the oil inlet or oil return of the electric oil pump.
If the site is a steep slope, the team should use the sleepers to erect a solid and stable working platform.
The target value of speed is one of the core railway indicators, and it is closely related to the railway function orientation, track design parameters, overall technical conditions of trains, and train control, communication, and signal systems, and directly affects the engineering costs of the railway project and the adaptability of the railway to transport demands after it is put into operation.
3. This certificate shall be invalid if its cover does not bear a special seal for verification.
In principal, RC fences will be used for passenger intermediate stations and densely populated areas nearby along Boten-Vang Viang section (DK0+000 ~ DK283+400) and for Vang Viang-South Vientiane section (DK283+400 ~ DK431+600).
The finished product protection group shall organize one coordination meeting every week to solve the found out problems in a centralized way, direct and supervise the implementation of finished product protection works of each unit and well coordinate protection works of cross finished and semi-finished products.
4.7After-sales Service Department shall handle the non-conforming products in the products delivered.
It is indicated by the calculation results that under the condition of AW1 load, 750V traction network voltage and 825V braking network voltage:
Curve 2: az-3\U+00B032′08.1″ R-1000 l-30
The number of ports and bandwidth of the switch shall be selected in full consideration of the requirements of ISCS and network communication equipment. The network switch is directly connected to the communication transmission network.
Interface protocol: ONVIF, PSIA, CGI, ISAPI, GB28181
Strictly regulating the scope of construction activities. Vehicles and machinery should be driven on the planned road. It is strictly prohibited to drive at will and crush vegetation, so as to minimize the disturbance to the ecological environment caused by construction.
During construction, the four formwork pieces shall be assembled according to the required size of the rectangular column, and the unused holes shall be plugged with plastic plugs, the positioning holes on each formwork piece shall be correspond to the adjusting holes on the adjacent and corresponding formwork frame, and are fastened by hook bolts, so that the sectional dimension can be controlled and adjusted before use.
Treatment of tunnel quality defects: Replacement of secondary lining of 234.7m; replacement of primary support of 96.8m; replacement of invert of 478.3m; reinforcement with 5mm-thick hot rolled galvanized steel strip of 1620m (1674 rounds for 13,944 m2).
The HSE requirements also apply to relevant stakeholders and partners of the Company.
When entering the foundation pit, a pair of leather working gloves shall be used to protect from cold, electricity, stab and oil contamination and catch on while climbing high. While climbing up and down, personnel shall step steadily and grab firmly to avoid scratches from exposed rebar and formwork. While operating on the water, a life jacket shall be worn.
● Air separation plant: two 43000Nm3/h air separation plants are installed with liquid oxygen internal compression and crude argon synergism adopted.
The product certification marks pasted on certified products are specified by the Brake Technology Research Institute for the specification, dimension and pasting location and method of the marks.
Requirements of laws and regulations related to the service, such as those for environmental protection;
With strong coordination ability, adaptability and management ability.
Highly dangerous areas are bypassed. For regularly dangerous areas, the earth removal measure is taken.
1. Description: weak current tray_x000D_
(4) It is suggested to establish a Resource and Environment Department to take charge of resource development and ecological environmental protection for Gwadar and the coastal area of Makran.
Wuhan BOE Project E&M Part, Jindal Super Thermal Power Plant Project, Cuddalore ITPCL Power Project
The arched framework trench shall be excavated by milling machine with manual coordination, and the template of the arched framework shall adopt set-shaped steel formwork.
This reservoir area is geomorphologically middle-low mountainous area and terrain undulation is large. The vegetation is dense. There are residential areas on the right bank of the lower reach. A cement road is directly accessible to the dam.
Support the queue scheduling methods like PQ, WRR, DRR, PQ+WRR and PQ+DRR.
Sleepers or steel frame supports shall be used at the bottom of the traverse track, and the distance between the two support points shall not exceed 1m at most.
The first-line manager is a key link for implementation of company systems and policies. Previous negligence for corresponding training leads to that company systems and policies cannot be implemented.
Commitment for the project quality, safety construction, civilized construction standard and environmental protection.
(7) Make resolution on increase or decrease of the registered capital:
Neutralization tank 3.5m*2.1m*2m
c) ensuring that the quality policy is understood and implemented in the Company;
10) Formulate the basic management system of the Company;
The installation deviation inspection of steel structures shall be performed after the structures form a space rigid unit and they are connected and fixed.
Geological conditions: The proposed site is located in the mountainous and hilly area of eastern Bangladesh. The soil combinations in this area may be podzolic soil, including alluvial soil.
(7)The iron core and metal structure of the grounding transformer shall be reliably grounded (excluding the iron yoke screw).
7) UPS power supply has intelligent management function for the battery, and adopts comprehensive automatic management technology for the battery.
Wind load: with the design reference period of 120 years, the basic wind speed in 10m is 39.9m/s, and the live-load wind speed at the deck combined with live load is 25m/s.
7. As it does not present explanation, the installation methods for lamps and switch sockets are unknown and they shall be considered as normal.
Newly Built Mohan–Vientiane Railway is under construction, communication lines and devices of your company that has affected the railway construction and railway operation afterwards are involved and require relocation.
Currently China and the U.S. implement generally moderate interest rates for loans. Nevertheless, changing currency policies may lead to the rise of interest rate in the future. As the loaning period of the project is long, the long-term debt financing of the project may assume big risks from interest rate fluctuation.
Prepayment _ Prepayment - Foreign suppliers
⑴ Ensure civilized construction and prevent illegal construction and brutal construction incidents;
The Party that received the Dispute Notice shall notify its determination in writing after the related documentation is analyzed and corresponding decision documents are obtained within a maximum 45 (forty five) working days from the receipt of the Dispute Notice, which may be updated until this date.
During the maintenance service period, the wages, accommodation and travel expenses of the Vendor's maintenance staff shall be on the account of the Buyer.
Bill of Quantities of Bridgehead Subgrade Treatment Works
d. Hidden project acceptance shall be inspected by the owner and supervisor together, and the next process shall be carried out after qualification.
Develop the regional armed forcedeployment, monitoring resource configuration and task assignment plan,monitor the task implementation,command and dispatch armed forces, and adjust the strength and resource allocation;
Location survey of the Ethiopia Mieso–Dawanle railway project
≥ 96％, the Tenderer shall provide the third-party test report.
However, Al industry in Laos is underdeveloped with big gap between the Al output and demand ,resulting in shortage of Al product in Laos. Aluminum supply is fully dependent on the import. Thus,the construction and start up of the project will greatly abate the contradiction between the supply and demand for alumina and electrolytic Al and promote the development of shaped Al processing enterprises.
Lump-sum Construction Contract for "Communication, Signal, Electrical and Electrification" System Integration and relevant Supporting Works for Capacity Expansion and Reconstruction of New Chongqing-Guizhou Railway
1-Closing air cylinder; 2-Connecting lever; 3-Roller; 4-Main controlling rod; 5-Insulating rod;
Refer to Annex 1, Annex 2 and Annex 3 for the drawings of axle flaw detection and half axle ultrasonic flaw detection.
This Agreement shall be valid for two years after the signing of both parties. Upon expiration of the two-year period, both parties shall renew the consultation service agreement after the summary and review.
Track determines the track height according to the tunnel section in each section, put forward technical requirements for the last process of work of civil works construction.
6kV MV cabinet kYN28A-12 31.5kA integrated operating mechanism
In case that one part is replaced twice due to failure within the warranty period, the part shall be deemed as disqualified.
See below for the color and corresponding meaning of the air conditioner status icon.
When the above standards are inconsistent, the high ones shall prevail.
Meeting Structural Requirements of Railway Vehicles for the Public Mass Transit specified in BOStrab.
Taxes shall be paid timely and tax evasion in any form is prohibited.
6: Two conducting magnetic shielding rods are adopted for magnetic shielding.
The track for gantry crane shall be made of 43# steel and shall be fastened with concrete embedded parts of the foundation.
The Feasibility Study Report overestimates the traffic volume of such supplies as farm product and pasture product, sugar and cement along the direction for loaded car of the Project, but underestimates the potential traffic volume of such supplies as steel, construction materials and ore, etc.
2) Scaffold erection: double-pole scaffold shall be erected at the outside during main body works construction.
③ For the release of temporary fixtures and connections, the structural elevation on both sides of the newly poured concrete in the closure segment of the side span shall be accurately measured before chiseling. during chiseling, the structural elevation changes on both sides of the closure segment shall be monitored and recorded in a timely manner, and release shall conducted in balanced and symmetrical way to ensure gradual and uniform release.
4. The equipment room employing gaseous fire extinction is provided with a mechanical air supply/exhaust system; in case of fire, the air supply/exhaust system as well as the 70℃ electric valves on air pipes are shut off, the gaseous fire extinction is activated; and after the gaseous fire extinction is done, the electric vales on air pipes as well as the air supply/exhaust system is activated to exhaust the waste gas to the outside.
Rigid bus shall have smooth and clean surface, and shall have correct color code.
The employee who gives birth to two or more children at the same time can enjoy one-hour breast-feeding leave for each extra child.
If electric shock is found, firstly separate the person from power supply as soon as possible, and then carry out symptomatic rescue according to the specific symptoms of the patient.
The DC cables shall be the Type A or B fireproof rubber insulation power cables of single-core copper conductor, low-smoke, non-halogen, water-proof and ultraviolet-proof functions.
STM-16 MSTP optical transmission system is used for long-distance transmission system of the Line and STM-4 optical transmission system for access layer. GSM-R mobile telecommunication system is adopted in mobile telecommunication and digital telecommunication system is used in dispatching telecommunication.
The Ethernet equipment shall be added with a hardwire interface or other convenient operation methods to realize convenient and rapid interchange of equipment hardware.
Install the snap ring and bolt, make sure that the upper and lower snap rings are in horizontal position, and tighten the hexagon bolt by hand.
USD 76.8636 million/km-main line
17) Code for Design of General Layout of Industry Enterprises (50187-2012);
Improve utilization rate of fertilizer effectively; average yield rate as indicated by the demonstration data is above 20%.
Article 41 As the capability mechanism of the Company, the General Meeting of Shareholders shall legally exercise the following authorities:
The detergent includes alcohol and so on (the concentration is ≥94% containing no grease).
1)Design Height: Ag<0.1g, the full height of pier is 25m~50m.
Mmax - the maximum bending moment of the pier body section under high-level earthquakes, is calculated according to the response spectrum method (inertia moment transformed of cracked section is used in the calculation of Mmax);
Note: It is used where the floor deck is perpendicular to the steel beam and the cantilever length is greater than 200mm but less than 7ht.
Technical Guide of Subgrade Engineering Construction of Mixed Passenger and Freight Railway
b. Reverse support is applicable to the range of 1.5m~3m from the finished surface of decorative ceiling to building roof panel.
DIN 5510-2 Fire Protection for Rail Transit Vehicles
Generally, spread foundation is mainly constructed by labors.
b. For grounding wires, measures shall be taken to prevent their cut off during earthquakes.
10. Unless otherwise stated, it is 20*50.
The project safety director takes the lead in organizing and conducting weekly inspections, and the personnel from other relevant departments and the relevant persons of the inspected work area and group participate in such inspection.
b) According to the influence of purchased products on the product realization process and finished product quality of the Company, define the control requirements and control types of purchased products and the Supplier;
1. Coupler knuckle 2. Coupler knuckle pin 3. Hook head
-- Studying of relevant standards or supplement of equipment.
For the positions where reinforcement is densely distributed, high-frequency slender vibrating rod should be used.
The structure will adopt full-space brackets for supporting; the station's middle plate and crown plate will adopt full-space scaffolds plus bamboos.
In the section of D1bK18+770.000---D1bK19+090.000, an overhead ditch shall be provided at the top of the cutting on the right side.
Power supply: 380 V, 50 HZ, three-phase and five-line.
Work at height close to or in contact with charged bodies;
3. T-shaped light steel main keel TB24\U+00D738 (or TBA24\U+00D728), with the center distance of 600, to be fixed with reinforced hanging rod after leveling
Article 20 Enterprises, institutions and other production operators that discharge pollutants into the atmosphere shall set up atmospheric pollutant discharge outlets in accordance with laws and regulations and the provisions of environmental protection authorities under the State Council.
The qualified seedlings without diseases and insect pests should be marked one by one to prevent the aging seedlings and diseased seedlings from entering the site.
According to the analysis of the world EG market supply and demand, on the whole, the global EG production suffer a capacity excess.
9.5.5 The mix proportion of super-fine sand concrete should be designed with the residual mortar coefficient, and the other properties shall comply with the requirements in Section 6.3 of this Standard.
Self-tapping screws shall be inserted into surface of boards for a length of 0.5 - 1mm without damage of surface of boards. Screw holes shall be processed for rust prevention and trowelled with gypsum putty.
2) Measure the sound pressure in the passenger rooms (type test);
Building discipline shall design signal rooms along the line according to demand and equipment layout of signal machine room proposed by signal discipline and relevant technical indexes shall be met.
"H" refers to the altitude difference of the slant geological body with the same thickness between the intersections of the interface line of two surfaces and the center line of the earth's tunnel.
(1) Click StaYardOp button and then select Counter option. The operation times of sealed buttons will be displayed. The operation times of sealed buttons will be counted separately for the control and display units A and B.
Through this strategic cooperation agreement among the three countries, the improvement of conditions of the highway transport corridor to Djibouti Port has been on the agenda.
The cement strength grade includes 32.5MPa and 41.4Mpa, and the cement consuming quantity shall be determined by test and controlled at 4%~6%.
The field education shall be examined in accordance with the attendance and the time for that shall be at least 1 hour.
Field training on use and operation of air conditioning system and door system
5.2.15 Alcohol abuse, fighting and brawling and insulting others are also prohibited in the dormitory, violators shall pay a fine of 10-100 RMB on the seriousness of the circumstances, in severe cases, shall be delivered to public security organ and put on record by the Company.
Unpacking check gears, bearings, cabinet, oil drain plug, etc and replace oil seal every 6 years
10% of net profits attributable to the parent company of the Company
Pipe surface shall be free of damaged coating, rust spot, scratching, welding paste, grinding signs or other defects.
Although this has been considered and corrected for the calculation of the rail joint gap, the centering shall be controlled as much as possible during the track laying.
It mainly includes: conflicting route inspection test; when the signal is at clear, route release and system restoration under the condition of the section occupancy caused by the axle counting equipment due to interference; when the axle counting equipment is faulty, the operation test to reduce the use, and use recovery after the axle counting equipment is repaired.
Three inclined and one vertical auxiliary heading were arranged in the whole tunnel, and five sections and six working surfaces were divided, so as to realize sectionalized excavation for long tunnel.
- Area with alternation of wetting and drying: area with changing water level due to natural or human factor;
11. Specification, dimensions and quantities of embedded iron parts or flange on the above-ground part of pile
d) Reduce the cooling water or close the cooling water.
According to above conditions, the collection and transportation time of catering and kitchen waste is determined as twice a day, after the peak time for lunch and dinner.
No repair depot for track maintenance is set for this line as there is a comprehensive maintenance center.
20.2.1 The physical quality inspection shall comply with the following requirements:
Article 28 The Construction Contractor shall refer to this chapter in the procurement activities.
8.4.3 Optimized Selection and Control of Electronic Components
Any legal person or organization who shares vital interests with the Bidding Parties and may therefore influence the fairness of the bidding cannot participate in the bidding.
5. The slope should be sprayed with C20 Concrete (100 mm thick), and Ф6.5@200x200 reinforcement mat should be hung. In addition, reliable connection between surface layer and soil nails should be guaranteed.
Calibrate the flatness and perpendicularity before plastering to ensure four corners vertical, horizontal line leveled and vertical line straight.
3.2.5 Driving of motor vehicles owned by the factory.
(5) Follow safety instructions below when installing isolating switch:
Cyclone separator (202-CY-101.0,1)
The turbine unit of Indonesia Pangkalan Susu 2X200 MW Coal-fired Power Plant Project, produced by Dongfang Turbine Co., Ltd.(hereinafter referred to as "DTC"), is of sub-critical, primary intermediate reheating, single-shaft, double-cylinder, double-exhaust, and condensing type.
2.14.9.1.The train shall be equipped with automatic train operation (ATO) device and automatic train protection (ATP) device, etc.
When the rubber element is replaced, the rubber element should be loaded with 80 kN, its static deflection must be 8~11 mm, and the permissible tolerance for the static deflection of the four rubber elements is 1 mm.
The ash deposition of the second and third channels of the heat recovery boiler and the economizer is separately collected by the bottom ash bucket and sent to the slag-falling channel.
After wiper is installed, wiper blade and arm shall rotate flexibly and be reliable.
According to the production progress of domestic sleepers, the maximum production ability is about 50,000 pieces per month and Boten - Muang Kasi Section needs about 8 months for production, so sleepers need to be produced before 4 months to meet the requirement of 4-month track-laying time.
3.2.2.1.8.Load conditions:
Hydrogeological conditions: burial depth of groundwater level and its relationship with mining conditions;
7. This box girder shall adopt C50 concrete and its volume shall be 663.28m.
The CTC system shall be designed, developed and approved in accordance with CEN ELEC standard.
c)The acceptance standard of castings is implemented in accordance with provisions of drawings.
(1) The variety and quality of reinforcement must meet the design requirements and relevant standards. Reinforcement delivered to the site must be subjected to chemical composition test and welding test, and shall not be welded until proven to be qualified.
Maximum working load of Z ratchet termination compensation device for messenger wire: 22kN, failure load: ≥66kN
The applicant has contract disputes records during March 2017 - February 2020 ( within 3 years before the submitting pre-qualification documents) and indicates the process of each time contract default or dismiss or termination of contract on account of themselves.
22.1 After the early termination or expiration of this contract due to any reason:
Analyze and fulfill safety responsibility of safety officer, strictly carry out assessment of HSE responsibility.
Currently, 8 projects are under construction, with a total mileage of 348 km.
2) The product shall meet the specified use or known anticipated use, inherent characteristics and implied requirements that shall be met without commitment.
Take responsibility for establishing and improving the fire protection network organization of masses, improving fire protection systems and supervising the implementation.
Where, RMB 8,698,800 increased due to the replacement of ordinary steel bars with epoxy-coated steel bars and RMB 15,542,900 increased due to the change of engineering quantity.
After the concrete is transported to construction site by using concrete tankers (before the pouring, the concrete shall be subject to test of slump and gas content, etc. Only after the requirements of the specification are met, can it be used for pouring), the concrete can be poured directly into the formwork or unloaded by the lifting hopper of gantry crane.
① When the reinforcement cage is placed, it shall be hoisted and lowered section by section. For the inserted reinforcement cage, the section of support shall be temporarily fixed by using the reinforcement cage lowering frame.
Resistance to sulfate physical attack tested by dry-wet cycle (for 56d)
6.2.1The air compressor and associated pneumatic equipment will be integrated into a single unit, which will be flexibly installed on the underframe to avoid noise and vibration from being transmitted to vehicle body.
11.3.3 Cooperation and Coordination Measures for Subsequent Works
The pavement edge is provided with a roadside ditch to drain the cleaning water in the hole.
The technical documents for all design and production stages shall be uniform, and the documents used by each department shall be consistent totally.
2. In the drawing, \U+201C \U+201D refers to B400C reinforcement, and \U+201C \U+201D refers to B300C reinforcement.
(2)The Seller proposes the installation scheme, the commissioning scheme and the acceptance criteria.
#1 Boiler Desulfuration and Desulfuration Utility System Maintenance Project of Junan Liyuan Thermal Power Co., Ltd.
(3) the modification of the nature or scope of the main business of the Company;
The Technical Director may not proceed to arrange the construction of next process until the concealed works are qualified for acceptance.
Any key function concerning safety shall be connected to the vehicle with hard connecting wires or directly to other subsystems.
Non-electrical operator is not allowed to conduct electrical operation.
The risk degree of risk factors is judged by identification of risk factors. The price factor is the leading risk factor of the Project, and product price is affected mainly by acquisition of raw materials and demand of downstream product market, etc.
The Company was awarded the ‘National May Day Labor Medal' by All-China Federation of Trade Unions, and was awarded the ‘Advanced Engineering Supervision Enterprise in China' for three times, which shall be the only one in the railway supervision industry to win this award for many times in recent years.
ZSFGNY [2014] No. 478
1. 202.04 Measurement and payment are modified as:
The final compaction will be conducted after the secondary compaction completes; the 6~14t vibratory roller will be used to apply the static compaction 2~3 times for every section; no roller track should be found on every surface.
In other cases, boxes shall be made of 2mm or thicker cold-rolled galvanized steel sheets (or stainless steel sheets) by folding, shearing and welding.
(6) A warning line shall be set up in the excavation area. All kinds of machines and vehicles must be strictly prohibited from driving and parking within 2m from the excavated foundation edge.
No.5 borrow site: 1.5km left of the D1K419+000~D1K421+500
The disconnect-type waterproof board is completely adopted, 1.5mm thick ECB waterproof board + 350g/m2 geotextile.
5.9.3The motor and the bogie frame have different natural frequencies, so the motor will not resonate with the bogie frame.
Main purpose of the experiment of this part: Select reasonable manganese precipitation conditions (ammonium bicarbonate dosage, reaction time, reaction temperature, dosing method, etc.) so as to achieve the optimal manganese and magnesium separation effect on the premise that Mn yield is guaranteed.
The mouth guard is intact and has a product certificate.
If it is opened, close it; if it is in the closed state, disconnect it for 15s and then connect.
Related costs for acquisition farmland plan are not prepared in the budget.
(Number of contracts filed / total number of contracts in period)*100%
5) Remove the pipe (1) from the bogie frame and seal other pipe orifices.
2. Project location: Harbin to Kiamusze City, Heilongjiang Province and other related locations.
1). The Contractor does not provide the construction drawings at the time specified in the Contract;
Pressure switch PS-MRL of main air cylinder, with the set value of 93psi (6.4bar)
Address: West Side, Floor 9, China Railway Construction Mansion, No. 40, Fuxing Road, Haidian District, Beijing
Although the government has taken measures to ease traffic congestion recently, the traffic congestion has not been completely solved.
Output is 0.05 t/d, 18.25 t/a. After unified collection, it is to be sent to landfill.
The design speed is 50 ~ 60 km/h, the width of one-way two-lane road is 10.8 m, and the speed-change lane is a single lane.
Before the demolition is carried out, there must be a detailed construction plan, with the approval from the Employer, the supervisor and many experts, so as to ensure the safety of construction machinery and personnel.
Power transmission line works includes the 132kV power transmission line and six 33kV current collecting line.
(4) Surface Karst in the crossing area of Huangguoshu Tunnel on Zhensheng Expressway in Guizhou Province
The compaction temperature of the bituminous mixtures shall not be less than 130°C, while the temperature of the bituminous mixtures at the end of compaction shall not be less than 80°C.
1) For short pile foundation, reinforcement cage shall be made into an integral one and hoisted in position.
1.3 Outdoor Water Supply and Drainage and Water Fire-fighting System
and conclude, based on the audit evidence obtained, whether a material uncertainty exists related to events or conditions that may cast significant doubt on the Company's ability to continue as a going concern.
Permanent mark, mark content includes: Manufacturer mark- classification code
(1) Conduct groundwater pollution prevention and control as per the principle of "source control, zoned control, pollution monitoring and emergency response".
The cantilever casting construction shall be carried out after the hanging basket is mounted and tested. Refer to the construction process flow diagram for construction process.
For detection of partial discharge on the site, electrical VHF/UHF and acoustic methods can be used in GIS, except for the conventional method in line with GB / T 7354.
Wherever loosening or scaling of "spring" occurs during compaction, the materials shall be dug up in time and mixed again for compaction or treated by other means till compliance with the requirement.
The Supplier shall provide convincing verification test, including:
4. For the monitoring measurement design during operation, please refer to "Design Drawing of Operation Monitoring Measurement for the Imam Khomeini Airport Tunnel".
The open channel series products of the company are provided with the standard length of 1 m. For larger design flexibility, standard pipeline products of 50 cm and 75 cm long are also provided.
The beautiful shape that the large-span curved butterfly arch bridge spends a great economic cost to pursue for is not only controversial but also its unique mechanical properties also raise very high requirements for the installation and construction technology of its superstructure.
4) If necessary, operate the operated bypass switch in the cab that has been activated now, which was originally recorded from the cab that has been closed now.
The contents mainly include name of material, specification, use location and quantity, procurement unit, time arrangement of procurement, procurement method, product manufacturing cycle, product haul cycle and planned date of delivery.
It is performed by two CPUs (2 out of 2).
(3) The Project Management Department shall establish and perfect the safety management system, set up a safety management leading group, formulate various safety management systems, and define the safety management responsibilities of the two-level management agencies, departments and key personnel.
Tube root passing through the structure should be blocked densely with fine aggregate concrete before insulating layer construction.
12.1.3 Water-proofing and drainage system as well as anti-scouring facilities for the opening and well head of service gallery shall be planned properly before construction, and water-proofing and drainage shall be performed by relevant provisions of the Specifications.
- weighted average unit operation costs of various vehicle types based on general traffic volume of existing related highways under "project scenario" (RMB/vehicle-kilometer).
11.1 Construction procedures: Arrangement of incremental launching platform → temporary pier erection → splicing first section of steel beam and guide beam → incremental launching to continue splicing → incremental launching to position → dismantling temporary pier of guide beam → casting back wall of abutment P3 and A1.
Supervisor:___________________________
42.25mm*3.25mm*100mm\P (outer diameter * wall thickness * length)
8.5 Start the motor and after confirming that the rotation speed is normal, raise the outlet pressure to the rated pressure and then gradually open the outlet valve to allow operation under the condition that the outlet pressure equals to the rated pressure.
The indoor ground of this station building shall be backfilled except for the basement roof in some parts, so the large-sized formwork supporting system of the beam slab (H: 5.4m) of Floor 1 is taken as the key control part for construction.
(4) Any major design change shall be implemented in accordance with the Regulations on Approval of Major Changes in Projects (P-GM040003C).
The rivers along the route are densely distributed. The main route is parallel to the Danube and its tributary, Tisa River. The Zrenjanin section needs to cross the Tisa River, and the location of the bridge site has a great influence on the project.
4.3.3 Unified command and graded responsibility
4.5.1 Video Monitoring Screen Operating Screen Function Test
The slump of secondary lining concrete shall be controlled at 180±30mm, and the thickness of protective layer of reinforcement shall be controlled by precast concrete cushion blocks. Concrete shall be poured symmetrically on both sides from bottom to top in layers, with the height of each layer of about 40cm.
The planning inter-city rail transit will be built with five main axes as the core area and connecting passage on the periphery. The length of new inter-city railway is 6,850km. The existing (being built) railway lines for passenger traffic of 2,600km and other rapid railways of 990km in the area are utilized for public transport transformation.
For the signal that implements the blockade, the route with this signal as the end cannot be arranged.
Geologically, there are goafs, limestone caves and coal beds under the station. The main treatment methods include grouting treatment of mined-out areas, and reinforcement treatment of sheet piles and CFG piles in the station.
Whenfreight train (loaded train)straightly passesNo.12 turnoutin the 4# turnout position of Ngutini Station, the maximum value of measured stress of a movable locking rod and a movable locking arm of switch rail is 96.5MPa and 27.6MPa respectively, both of which are less than their allowable stress value (namely 261MPa), meeting standard requirements.
The three-month rolling plans: submitted together with Monthly Report of Project Progress;
① The fire pump shall be started automatically or manually, respectively, and within 5 min minutes, they shall be able to come into normal operation and reach the design flow rate and pressure. Besides, the pressure gauge pointer shall be stable.
Mercury and its compounds (in Hg, mg/Nm3)
We also underscore the importance of adhering to minimum social standards ("Core Labour Standards") in the implementation of the project.
Project financing implementation: The main creditor of the Project is Anhui Branch of China Development Bank. The term of loan is 11 years and the loan rate is 4.9% – the base rate for over 5 years of RMB loan. The first batch of loan was appropriated on August 26, 2015.
Each welder shall identify his weldings by a mark or label adjacent to the corresponding weld, however, in any case, it shall be low impact letters and 51 mm (2 ") away from the weld.
General Drawing for QCH235C-00-00-000C70E (H, F) General Open Wagon
Ensure correct shape, dimension and position of engineering structures and components.
EN ISO 3095:2005 Railway Applications - Acoustics - Measurement of Noise Emitted by Railbound Vehicles;
Obviously, there is a huge gap if thepower supply is only from Shas Nova 110kV/35kV/10kV substation.
2. The roof waterproof level is Class I. Two waterproof layers are set, whose design life is 20 years.
Upon specific implementation of the management plan, each responsible unit (department) shall inspect and assess the provided resources, implementation process, and performance;
Start from Djibouti to GAREDE NAGAD station and go straight ahead 560 m to arrive on the side of railway guardrail
Some color steel tiles have been prepared well in advance and processed and may be installed directly. The rest will be purchased by Materials Department as soon as possible.
On-the-post physical examination: carry out such examination according to GBZ_188-2014 Technical Specifications for Occupational Health Surveillance and in combination with annual hazard factors inspection results.
TONOWO1# Super Major Bridge at DK77+542.70
The installation of flange plate bottom form is the same with that of form of box girder floor plate.
Number and date of VCS/EAS publicity and/or trainings, number of workers who have received trainings on the Code of Conduct (cumulative number during the period covered by the report);
China Construction Fifth Engineering Division Corp., Ltd./Qingdao Chengyang ShangmaSewage Treatment Plant / Trenchless Technician
Azimuth average is used for echo smoothing.
Turning no-shed-supply bypass =31-S102 to "ON" position
After earthwork backfilling, the site should be hardened to facilitate the pass of steel structure construction machinery.
The correctness of the OCS fault point calibration device and the OCS impedance at the short-circuit point are analyzed, based on the results of OCS manual short-circuit test.
(6) Concrete curing: When the formwork is removed, the top and sides of bent cap will be covered in time to use the heat and volatilized water vapor generated during cement hydration when the strength of concrete increases.
(4) Filling shall reserve a certain height for sinking, so that under the effect of piled weight or alternation of wetting and drying or other natural factors, the earth will gradually sink and become compact.
1. The schematic diagram of wiring among devices is only for reference and does not indicate any specific wiring mode.
If some devices, systems and materials require to be replaced, redesigned, changed or renewed within the warranty, the warrant of these devices, systems and materials shall be recalculated for a 2-year period from the completion date of repair.
Operating revenues include the sale of residential land and commercial land.
WURAKESE Medium Bridge AK117+687
•Each time after wheel replacement or spinning, adjust the nozzle-flange distance.
In the Project, the incoming feeders for lighting are led into by laying the power cables in the steel pipes and burying them into the ground. The lighting spools are of BV type and laid in a concealed manner in PVC conduit.
The portion of the owner's equity, current net profit and loss and current comprehensive income of a subsidiary which belongs to minority shareholders shall be presented separately under the item of "owner's equity" in the consolidated balance sheet, the item of "net profit" and the item of "total comprehensive income" in the consolidated income statement.
Outdoor parking lot is steel structure and mainly used for temporary parking or remedying for fire fighting trucks.
Check whether supporting technologies for safe construction have matched with new technologies, processes and materials and whether they are practicable.
Cut off the feeding of catalyst, TEAL and Donor and stop the feeding of liquid additive.
8.1.2.2.5Bridge and Culvert Works
Design life: 15 years, lane coefficient: 0.65.
If the domestic tenderer submits the tender bond in the form of cash or check, a copy of the license for opening the basic account shall be attached.
(10) The detachable and re-mountable fastener assembly mode shall be adopted between the sound-absorbing piece and structure.
other documents or records required by this Standard, including those needed to prove compliance with legal requirements.
Railway specifications and standard of China and relevant international standards must be applied, such as codes and standards of GB, TB, ERRI, UIC, EN, etc.
3.5.9.3 Calibration of Position Sensor (Encoder)
Figure 4.2.2-1 Regional Gneissic RocksFigure 4.2.2-2 Regional Gravelly Soil
If there is no failure identified, repeat the operations above and finish 10 round trips
The well casing must be inserted to the hole bottom without any suspension. After the well casing is inserted to the hole bottom, apply a pressure of about 2t and then fix the well casing.
It shall be issued by a reputable bank or financial institution selected by the Contractor.
All professional construction teams shall organize construction in strict accordance with construction specifications, technical operation procedures and the validated technical plans and technical requirements. The works shall be assessed and accepted according to the Quality Acceptance Standards. If the previous process is unqualified, the next process shall not be delivered.
Layout of Reinforced Bars of L=24+24m 32+32m Curve Pier Top and Bearing Pad Stone
6.5.2 The Track bonds shall be connected by studs or cold extrusion expansion nail. The center distance of the lead plug hole from the rail connection splint (fishtail plate) end shall not be less than 100 ±10mm. The distance between two adjacent pin holes is between 60 and 80mm, and the connection is firm.
Tang Gong (0755-234567866)
Due to that the surface layer of the Project is loose backfill, low but dense strikes shall be adopted for repeated impact on the pore-forming wall with appropriate clay pieces and small flagstones, so as to ensure the stability of the pile casing.
Nature of ester (hydrolysis)Nature of grease (hydrogenation and hydrolysis)
Consisting of web, flange plate and stiffening rib, the cross girder of bridge deck system is a basic component forming the bridge deck system. The detailed fabrication process is as follows:
GB10963.1-2005 Electrical Accessories - Circuit Breaker for Overcurrent Protection for Household and Similar Installation - Part 1: Circuit Breaker for A.C. Operation
Water pump house and comprehensive distribution building are constructed in the power station. Functional units such as monitoring room, secondary panel and cabinet room, offices and dormitories are in the comprehensive distribution building.
1 steel structure unit of well head, who will be responsible for the installation of steel structure of well head.
In this procedure, special types of hot work include:
2. Bidding for single-mode fiber (SMF) and twisted pair (UTP) includes wiring and commissioning, and the work content includes tests.
The main products of special glass sheet are: quartz sand raw materials, LOW-E energy-saving glass materials, ultra-white solar TCO glass materials, electronic glass substrate materials, aviation glass, high-speed train glass and high-strength fire-resistant glass raw materials.
Before spraying fire extinguishing agent, ventilation fans and fire valves on the ventilation duct shall turn off automatically.
j) The status report of the onboard earthquake detection devices received by the central system of the railway administration include information such as transmission time, the GSM-R cell and the working status. The location and working status of the onboard earthquake detection device recorded by the system are consistent with the actual conditions.
The main camp is equipped with two 250kVA diesel generators.
6. It is recommended to use GB3092-82 welded steel pipes as 2" cable conduits shown in the diagram. The bending radius at curves shall be greater than 6 times the external diameter of cable conduit. If there are too many curve points, transition wells shall be considered. The route of transition wells shall be determined based on the position of the platform scale on site. The illustrated position is for information only.
(1) Auxiliary construction projects of agricultural planting: including initial baking room and nursery pond, etc.
Be fully responsible for the safety, quality, progress, environmental protection, water and soil protection, as well as labor hygiene of the project.
For handling, lifting measures and other construction during rainy days, the workers must wear raincoats and non-slip rain boots, do a good job safety measures and do a good job of power protection; and they shall do a good job of non-slip safety measures, such as wearing non-slip shoes, laying linen and so on.
For the whole line, the quantity of earth and stone excavation for sub-grades is 5,740,000 cubic meters. The quantity of explosion excavation is now estimated at 2,800,000 cubic meters and the quantity of ballast is around 800,000 cubic meters. Since a lot of initiating explosive devices will be required, it is necessary to build warehouses for them at construction sites.
The Company shall obtain a customer concession or deviation permit prior to further processing whenever the product or manufacturing process is different from that which is currently approved.
Daxin County Headquarters of Long'an-Shuolong Expressway Project Construction
The Purchaser shall,days before the departure of the group, pay the group expenses to the Supplier by T/T.
One month before the Contractor plans to carry out the commissioning test, the Contractor shall submit the final draft of the commissioning manual and the plan to complete the testing to the Employer.
It is suggested to install a rupture disk sensitive to blocking cause by solid deposit in the upstream of every safety valve.
Table 2.2: MDBCF of Major Systems
Pre-reset operation mode and conditional reset mode:
1. All works in the Contract Section can be constructed in accordance with regulations issued by the Ministry and relevant requirements of the Contract. The self-inspection and reporting to the Engineer shall be conducted in a timely manner. The project quality is excellent.
Explosion of pressure vessels, including HRSG and steam drum;
The decoupling (white) indicator shall light up when button +111=72-S02 is pressed.
(1) In order to reduce noise, low-noise equipment shall be considered first when selecting the model of mechanical equipment. Vibrating equipment shall be replaced by hydraulic equipment and friction equipment. Besides, sound insulation measures shall be taken and shockproof base shall be installed.
Report related to information security incidents refers to Report Process of Information Security Incidents.
Control stations and points shall be set and organized as a control network as per the requirements of technical process and the characteristics of equipment.
Limestone ( ): Mainly gray mixed with other colors, with mineral composition dominated by carbonate and calcite, under significant influence of tectonic movements, with relatively broken rock masses, developed joints and fissures and severely weathered surface layer, and with small caves caused by dissolution observed in local areas.
Use a long-handled roller to coat the prepared primer mixture on the base course surface, when it is not sticky, the next step process can be carried out.
No. 2 TC02 car: First-class trailer car, transformer + pantograph
The vehicle illumination should satisfy the requirement of highway traffic illumination intensity.
To connect the traffic on both banks of Nam Ma River, a steel bridge will be respectively set crossing Nam Ma River at about 0.68km and5.3km downstream of the dam axis, and another steel bridge will be set at the outlet of the diversion tunnel to make the in-site traffic form a circular traffic network.
(3) List of technical personnel to be dispatched to the site for installation guidance.
The overlaying layer is of 3~5m thick auburnish red and brown silty clay containing iron-manganese nodules.
Compare the resistance value with the cold resistance value before the temperature rise test, and the change range of the second measurement value cannot exceed 3% of the first measurement value.
If C and m are known, , that is,.
It can be used to detect rail internal defects such as transverse crack of rail head, longitudinal horizontal crack of rail head and rail waist, and bolt hole crack, etc.
Date of Issuance: March 17, 2001
6.4.4 When connecting wires are connected with cabinets, racks and grooves, the metal surfaces at the joints must be sanded for reliable connection.
1 The pipe for escape passage is featured with sufficient pressure-bearing capacity and firm joints, and shall not be used in the tunnel until being accepted in lab test.
PP-R water supply pipes shall be adopted for the indoor domestic water supply branches. The pipes shall be connected by hot melting.
In the warehouse area, smoking and fire will be strictly prohibited. Kindling, gasoline, kerosene and other inflammables and explosives will be strictly prohibited to be brought into the warehouse area.
The construction teams and discipline team shall conduct safety disclosure during the construction works and implement the safety measures, to define the safety responsibilities of each team member.
It can be connected with the on-board storage battery in parallel to supply power for the vehicle or can charge the storage battery and control the charging current.
Article 17 The compensation to be paid by the city and county people's governments that have made the decisions on house expropriation to the Persons Whose Houses Are to Be Expropriated shall include:
2. Install template on the support and pour 0 and 1# girder section, and temporary fix the 0# girder section with each pier top.
8.2.2 Determination of Product and Service Requirements
The line is provided with 4 comprehensive maintenance areas in Muang Xai, Luang Prabang, Vang Viang and Vientiane South.
Jacking method can be used in the construction of city pedestrian passage or interchange projects for underground railway crossing ground railway (or highway) or underground pipeline crossing river.
38.5m~39.5m to the left side of culvert
<13-1> Clay sand: yellowish brown, slightly wet, dense, mainly composed of clay soil and sand, with sand content of about 70%~80% and the rest being clay soil and breccia.
Number of minutes after NTP initialized date/time (UTC)
The phenomena of surface cracks and pits are very universal.
Analysis is done to the most unfavorable eccentric condition of live load on single cable plane to calculate the torsional angle of the bridge deck.
Within the residential area, control the truck speed below 30km/h, in order to avoid dusts.
Investigation Group: Wang Pengyao Wang Xiong Zhang Wei Aikelanmu
Each train is configured with two self-contained air-conditioning units on train roof, while dedicated cars for airport passengers are provided with split-type air conditioners for the convenience of reducing interior noise in an efficient way.
Organize foremen to conscientiously implement various production plans and construction plans of the project, and conduct regular inspections. Responsible for implementing the quality plan and executing the quality objective.
Leg arrangement: 3000x102=*306000
⑥ The oily fume of the original canteen within the plant area is discharged after being treated via a purifier for oily fume.
Uncontaminated rainwater off site is intercepted via the intercepting ditch and then is discharged to the current water system at downstream site.
②Intruder alarming, door access system and passenger services system do not have the sufficient testing conditions;
The standard is applicable to HSE management activities of contractors undertaking the construction projects, renovation and extension projects, equipment (products) installation, inspection and maintenance projects, logistics transportation, process outsourcing, outsourcing manufacturing, entrusted service, etc. of Kingdream.
This tunnel project is located in the low-altitude hilly areas, with relatively large topographic relief and developed vegetation, with the starting and ending chainage at CH476+434 and CH477+296. The tunnel is 862m long, and the maximum buried depth is about 99.1m.
3. The number of edge lining, foundation and top locking anchor bolt shall be counted separately.
The supply of raw material tobacco leaves is basically in Malaysia; redried tobacco products are produced according to international standards and grades, and efforts are made to create a global high-quality organic tobacco production and processing base. The products are sold globally.
The solar modules, light poles, controllers and bases are calculated and designed by the manufacturer to ensure the stability of the solar light poles at maximum wind speed.
9.7 For the bolts in the open air and erosive medium, in addition to removing dirt and applying anti-rust paint, they shall be sealed with oil paste, putty or corrosion-resistant sealant in time at the joint of the connecting plates.
Heat pipe cold and heat recovery equipment is also considered to be set between energy-saving exhaust air and indoor fresh air.
On-site Operation Department of Chengdu International Railway Service Co., Ltd.
6.3.7 The concrete strength shall be tested for the sinking of floating caissons according to Article 6.2.8.
1) Installation and laying of all on-board signaling equipment should be negotiated and finalized by both parties during the design liaison stage.
(4)The main structure of the steel well frame can be made of round pipe profile steel, with a dimension of not less than φ190 mmX12 mm, and the specific scheme is determined in the design liaison.
(1) Large machineries and equipment such as excavator, loader and movable formwork frame shall be transported on flat trucks to the construction site by land after arrival at the port of Georgia. Dump trucks can be driven to the construction site.
Air curtain (FM110-09C; air volume: 1,320m³/h; noise: 57dB; power: 140W)
Unified command with certain authoritarian shall be formed to coordinate the relations among all aspects, in order to ensure that the Project is completed according to the requirements.
Attachment 2: Fatigue Life Prediction Report for Aluminum Alloy Car Body of Middle Car of Hongkong High Speed EMU;
The process route of vehicle production mainly includes machining of sectional bar and components, carbody welding, vehicle painting, wheelset drive unit assembling, frame welding, bogie assembling, final vehicle assembling and vehicle commissioning.
Each position is inspected repeatedly for 3 times. The average value is taken as the width of the crack (accurate to 0.05mm) and the inspected parts are marked in the Crack Layout.
Central monitoring (CSM) system is set in the works.
e. The third-party verification of measuring instruments for compulsory verification of trade settlement, safety protection, health care, and environmental monitoring: □meet the requirements ■basically meet the requirements □do not meet the requirements □are not involved
363kV, 3150A, 125kA, horizontal rotary single-static contact double-ground, main and earthing knife-switch adopt electric operating mechanism, leakage ratio 25mm /kV (calculated with 363kV)
b) All kinds of turnout rod pieces shall be perpendicular to the stock rail or extension line of the straight track of single turnout.
According to the regional hydrogeological data and the existing well data along the highway, the groundwater depth along the highway is more than 5m (excluding the accumulated water in rainy season and the river crossing area), so the influence of liquefaction may be neglected.
Highway Performance Assessment Standards (JTG H20-2007)
If the material, specification, category of metallic mesh as per design requirements;
2. Unless otherwise indicated, all lighting switches and sockets shall be concealed mounted and be of ~250V and 10A. Emergency lighting switches shall have indicator lights.
As for the jointing part between metal fittings and pipes, the pipe trap shall be set at one end of the metal fittings.
Magotteaux needs supporting bolts (locking), etc; it is necessary for expansion sleeve No. 33 passing through the shell to be described in the contract (the bolt to be re-numbered or not)
And snap a spacing control line for lath on the formwork.
3. The pipeline elevation COP indicated in the figure refers to the center elevation of the pipe
The average well spacing is about 18m, and the well depth is about 12m, with a total of 13 dewatering wells arranged in the pit. The dewatering wells will also be used as monitoring wells that will not be arranged otherwise.
(6) Recent capacity utilization of different trains;
In the cab of D1 car, the handle is at the maximum brake position
(2)Air braking system: one per axle.
(3) Systematically manage non-conformities and develop application programs.
Award: In case the requirements for control target are met and no minor injuries occur, an award of per capita RMB 40 will be given to professional plants (divisions) based on the number of employees (excluding contract employees) and such plants (divisions) will have the qualification to participate in the evaluation and selection of the annual advanced department for safe production.
At earlier stage, rain and gushing water in the pit will afflux into the 1500m3 gushing water pump sump at 238m; two 125TXD101-107A-type synchronously self-priming multistage pumps (1 in service and 1 for standby) will be equipped there to pump water into the 1000m3 production head tank (with bottom elevation at 330m) near the pit.
● Score 80-100 belongs to Class-I supplier
6.2.3 During investigation and survey, safety and environmental protection and occupational health shall be listed as main subjects frequently encountered. And while drafting relevant documents and speeches of leaders, safety and environmental protection and occupational health shall be an important part.
4.10.2 Participate in reviewing change scheme.
G.0.1 This method is applicable to test the soaking depth and range of saline soil foundation.
The ssh access can be disabled or enabled, which is enabled by default.
C. The conditions related to the water source and soil source are found out before construction. Later on the construction method statement and schedule are compiled and submitted to the Supervisor.
Ceiling of the Project mainly includes emulsion paint ceiling, ceramic tile ceiling and aluminum alloy square plate ceiling.
According to the difference in equipment layout, the air pipes of trailer are divided into T1/T2/T3/T6/T7/T8/T9 air pipes, T4 air pipes and T5 air pipes.
3.2.2 It is necessary to confirm all change orders and insurance claims, check the amount payable, address the damages and claims arising from the implementation of contract, sign corresponding written agreements, and pay the remaining amounts (excluding the deposit) to the subcontractors;
The weight adjusting range for alarming is 115Kgf-130Kgf
The installation of lighting fixtures, power boxes, wiring supports and various accessories for bridges and tunnels shall meet the following requirements:
Figure 7.11 Schematic Diagram for Division of Interface Between BAS and Station Anti-theft Roller Shutter Door
Graduated from Chongqing University in July, 2002
Please indicate system, capacity, rupturing capacity of HV switch, specification and model as well as power-off protection methods for substation of North shewa power station to identify whether it can meet the formal power demand (5815kVA) of the Project.
6.2.4.8 Welding as there is crack with other accessories; replacing as depth of corrosion and abrasion is greater than 30%.
Other inspection results related to the culvert are detailed in the Inspection Report of Culvert at K119+349 (TQE1TNDOC010165).
Safety education publicity shall be strengthened based on safety education system of the company and scientific and reasonable construction scheme shall be prepared.
If it is found out that the soil sample grade is below the required grade for test items when the samples are opened, the test shall not be carried out and the feedbacks shall be timely given to the entrusting test authority.
(1) Liability for breach of contract in case the Notice to Proceed is failed to be issued within 7 days before the planned Commencement Date due to the Employer: None.
The smoke exhaust air duct is kept away from combustibles for a distance greater than 150mm.
Technical management: responsible for the technical support for the delivery, commissioning, acceptance and various repair programs of the vehicles of this line.
The original Methods of Testing Cement - Part 4: Quantitative Determination of Constituents (ENV196-4) will be published as technical report of CEN.
the value of all work done in accordance with the Contract up to the date stated in the Taking-Over Certificate for the Works,
Stones: hard broken stones with continuous gradations should be adopted and silt content should be less than 1%. The use of reactive aggregates which would have alkali-aggregate reaction with cement should be prohibited strictly.
The lowest wear point of the liner of 1#CM material outlet (2nd Comp.) is at a height of 20mm (the original height is 40mm), i.e. at the intermediate backside plate of Liner art-no.126093. Half of the material outlet liner thickness has been worn out.
The conducting wires in the same project should be distinguished by selecting different colors for different purpose. The colors of the conducting wires for the same purpose should be the same. The positive pole of the power line should be red while the negative pole should be blue.
Before installation, equipment must be inspected in accordance with requirements in the installation instructions. If any damage or quality defects are found, related units shall be informed immediately to carry out inspection together.
6)The doorsill is equipped with step missing prevention rubber strips at the outer side (i.e., the track side), which can effectively protect trains from damages and prevent transient failure of platform doorsill.
The living area is subject to unified planning and centralized layout, with enclosures (made of color pre-coated steel) provided around.
3 Generally, the quality records of four aspects (such as body, bonnet, gate ans stem) shall be kept for common products, including:
Use the hardware DFMECA analysis worksheet to conduct the DFMECA analysis, and the specific analysis process is shown below:
Period of backwash: the backwash period of filter is 24 h to 36 h for normal filtering.
(13) The Operation Management Department shall conduct publicity for laws, regulations and rules on the management of road administration for expressways. The Operation Management Department shall carry out comprehensive and special control and other road administration management activities.
Telecom (U-4) — land for transmitting and receiving facilities of radio, television, and communication system, including the broadcast tower, relay station, transposer station, and base station.
In both cases, the decrease of sound pressure amplitude of the probe beam relative to the axis of the beam within the height range of the area to be tested will not exceed 12dB.
Where: contact area between the bearing and mortar is calculated as
+146=61-A101HVAC (air conditioner)
The timing of design and development validation shall be planned in alignment with customer-specified timing, as applicable.
The annual groundwater level fluctuation can be considered as around 3.5m.
Lake Paiku – Kathmandu: bridges and tunnels are connected with each other, tunnels dominating, and bridges are constructed by casting on site.
The time for the machines of high noise to operate is rationally arranged, and at the sections near to residents, noises are strictly controlled, and it is prohibited to conduct construction operations producing environmental noise pollution at night;
(1) Structural design should be preferentially in accordance with regulations of national standard Code for Design of Metro (GB50157-2013).
not while a Member enter into discussions or make any agreement with the Employer, the Contractor or the Engineer regarding employment by any of them, whether as a consultant or otherwise, after ceasing to act under the Dispute Board Agreement;
Select a longitudinal reinforcement under each rail as drain bar, and select three longitudinal reinforcements in base plate, middle plate, top plate and side wall respectively as drain bar. Electric connection of drain bar is available in each structural section. Drain bar is welded with attached transverse reinforcement. In case of lap joint, lap welding shall be conducted.
B 3.2 In order to remedy the mistake of nailing the sleeper bottom (sometimes it is difficult for the anti-corrosion plant to determine the face or the bottom of the sleeper), the preservatively-treated sleepers shall be attached with 20% of the same year number nails, which shall be delivered to the user to apply on the sleepers after laid.
1. Plane confirmation of some areas
9.2.1Quality Management Organization and Organization Chart
When the ATP function fails, the ground signal is displayed as the main signal for train operation, and the driver shall ensure the train operation safety.
ECD dynamic pressure control technology based on small clearance warm water mechanical model;
16.4.2 Main Functions of CTC System
10) Code for Design on Tunnel of Railway (TB10003-2005);
Description of construction period: the Subcontractor completes the works within the construction period as stipulated by the Contractor. If the quality requirements cannot be met due to the Subcontractor's problems and construction period is adjusted, the construction is stopped or slowed down in the implementation process, the Contractor has the right to make adjustment according to the actual situation. The Subcontractor understands this and shall not make any claim in this regard.
a) Quality deposit: average value of monthly supply * 2.5 * risk value of parts.
See "2.1.7.4 Automatic Fare Collection (AFC) Discipline of Chapter 19 System Integration and System Interface".
b) Form (such as language, software version and diagram) and media (such as paper, electronic media, etc.);
Causing physical poisoning, and occupational diseases due to latent harmful gas.
Mean kilometer between failure, running mileage of the month, number of mileage collected locomotives
Based on the monthly precipitation data collected by 44 meteorological stations, the (distribution) map of precipitation in related areas in South Sudan is obtained as follows,.
Test the exhaust volume, rated exhaust pressure, time limit of rated exhaust pressure and working efficiency of the train air compressor.
Breaking strength ≥ 5 Mpa;
The Vendor must provide necessary technical documents and standards as well as good working conditions for the Buyer's inspection, manufacturing supervision and acceptance personnel.
The front-handling mobile crane can straddle two rows and three rows containers and also can arrange the containers in square matrix.
4. Introduction of the company (same for the borrower);
ML-1A, (113B), (112A)
The Quality Assurance Department is responsible for the collection and organization of various quality assurance inspection records as specified in the Quality Assurance Manual.
Close all locking plates, and lock them or use lock pins to fix them;
The cost arising from the customs business, inspection and other items due to the legal inspection of goods shall be borne by the customer.
After the preliminary design review, for the significant change of construction scale and design scheme due to reasons beyond the Designer, the two parties shall negotiate for adjustment based on the scope and work stage involved in the change as well as the design fee rate agreed in the contract within a discount factor of 0.6.
Hydraulic brakes are recommended for the brake system. Under general circumstance, pure hydraulic friction brakes are used as emergency brakes.
Surveying and setting-out of the elevation control pegs for backfill at different areas and layers will be conducted according to design requirements or specifications, and the compacted thickness of each layer of backfill will be indicated.
Meanwhile, it has parking braking function and is able to apply parking braking on highway and railway.
Back cushion and seat cushion are easy to replace (one step replacement) and clean.
In case of successful bidding, we will provide complete technical documents and materials, in which manuals provided include the following, but are not limited to:
6. The position of the large crane shall conform to the scheme. The crane shall be placed in strict accordance with the requirements. The crane legs shall be firmly supported by subgrade boxes and steel plates.
(1) Specific safety disclose plans for safety measures will be compiled during the construction and be implemented carefully after approval according to the procedures.
Provisional Regulations on Supervision and Administration of State-Owned Assets of Enterprises
│ │ │ │ ├─228833 DK Frame Structure Work Spots
e. Output drawings and details for each system as planned; complete the summary, review, revise and improvement of drawings and details to ensure their completeness and effectiveness, thus preparing for the next process and production.
The Luanpula River runs 627 kilometers from Lake Bangweulu to Lake Mweru.
5) Before concrete construction, all the rubbishes and debris within the formwork shall be cleaned and the formwork shall be fully wetted with water.
The handle of automatic brake valve has a limited overcharge amount on overcharge position (higher than the constant pressure of train pipe: 29.4-39.2kPa); the overcharge pressure in the train pipe can be eliminated by returning the handle to the operation position, without risks of over supply.
The entrance, located at the gully, has the slope of 27°~40°, where is narrow; the M41highway is located in the area 200m away from the south part of the entrance, where the road is about 10m wide and has the bituminous pavement.
(1) LAF is a professional manufacturer of couplers, and is the supplier of existing passenger car couplers of Camrail. It has rich experience in such couplers and hopes to find out the reasons for the wear of the couplers through comparative tests.
10.1 The engineering is a three-storey residential building. The fire resistance time limit of the wall is 2 hours, that of the floor slab is 1 hour, that of the beam is 2 hours and that of the stairs is 1 hour.
The fire fighting foam system of the main transformer works automatically with automatic fire alarm system and it can be launched manually by pressing the emergency start/stop button. Additionally, trip signals of the breaker of the main transformer are connected with the fire extinguishing system to make sure that it starts right after the power of the main transformer is safely off.
Penetration ratio (25°C)(%), no less than
Project data released by other channels such as media including websites, newspapers, broadcasts, etc. shall also be registered for convenient statistics and summary.
The strata of the proposed site is mainly composed of the quaternary silty clay layer, the middle Jurassic shaximiao formation mudstone and sandstone, and the lower Jurassicb ziliujing formation shale.
3 The results of sampling inspection related to the structural safety and main service functions shall meet the relevant requirements.
The gas-liquid separator of all sections shall be set with safety valve.
Install the barrier in the base in such manner that operation direction of the barrier arm is vertical to the lane.
(3) Implement quality control, inspection, and management systems. For all finished products, semi-finished products, equipment, materials, and special workers that enter the site, submit all relevant materials such as product qualification certificate, warranty certificate, mobilization request form and inspection certificate, and work permit to the Supervisor as required to verify compliance with the requirements of this project.
5. Operate the air conditioning system to observe the medium speed running state of the electronic fan, and check whether the self-diagnosis can be completed by operating the air conditioning panel?
2. Correct calculation results can be possibly produced only by using this Calculation Model correctly;
Subgrade sweeping, oil spraying, mixing, paving and compaction.
DSI_INX+with X=[1..12]: positive of safety power supply input X
Chiseling of pile head shall be carried out by hands. Must not use explosives or expansion agents.
Diversion road is designed to be 3m wide and of soil pavement with the width of 3m.
The overlying layer is auburnish red eluvial-diluvial silty clay with a thickness of 5 m – 10 m, moisture, plastic – hard plastic.
ZELC-Z.CXWJ05-01-2017 Table 01
Party B: Electrical Engineering Co.,Ltd. of CTEC Group (consortium leader)
Address: No. 367, Jinyuan Road, Jinhua City, Zhejiang Province
The lower side and the upper side of the cable shall be laid with a fine sand layer respectively with a thickness of 100mm. The fine sand layer shall be covered with a protection layer such as the concrete protection plate with its width exceeding both sides of the cable for 50mm.
The carbody mainly consists of the base frame, cab steel structure, side wall framework, roof cover, cowcatcher, coupler and other components. The carbody structure is shown as Fig.5-1.
The Quality Department collects and sorts out the data of activities for creating high-quality project, and check, deploy and summarize the performance of such activities.
MVB coverplate TE9258100005 sealing plate mat TE235A000013
According to and as stated in the contract, the steel pipe may be delivered based on theoretical weight.
Software versions of output detection board of module A/B are different
Large-scale soft foundation or soft foundation with thick soft soil layer along the line.
3. Selection, characteristics and application principles of thermal insulation materials
The products on the assembly line or the suspended workpiece shall be painted in the painting room.
Install form traveler on the girder segments on top of pier. After pre-stressing, the rebars for bottom slab and web of the girder segment shall be bound and the prestressed corrugated pipes shall be installed. The inner formwork shall be installed. The rebars for top slab shall be bound and the prestressed corrugated pipes shall be installed. Concrete pouring shall be carried out for the girder segment.
Inventory can be recognized for satisfying the following conditions simultaneously: Economic benefits pertinent to this intangible assets are likely to flow into the enterprise; The cost of the intangible asset can be reliably measured.
This Manual divides the Company's quality management system into such three categories as the customer related process (CP), the support process (SP) and the management process (MP):
After the completion of beam erection, the supervision engineer shall examine the apparent mass of the beam. The bridge shall have a basically smooth and stable beam body, even joints, zero damage body, crosswise firm connection, dense concrete pouring to joints, and tidy appearance.
After the construction in the boiler room area, construction of bored concrete piles will be conducted in the turbine house area where there a total of 702 pile foundations.
The Contractor shall bear responsibility for safety accidents resulting from insufficient construction safety measures.
7) Test the network communication function between background machine and measuring, controlling and protecting devices at the interval layer
Permit for Opening Bank Account for Enterprise(copy)
Open the protective cover of the rotating part of the equipment or insert the hand into the protective cover; or sweep or operate the rotating parts such as bare gear, belt and roller with gloves.
Railway Project MOU Signed between CCECC and Ministry of Transport, Roads and Bridges of South Sudan;
Before the flood reason, the flood drainage system shall be fully checked and any problems found shall be handled immediately.
1. System: the work safety guarantee and supervision systems at all levels in operation and maintenance have been rationalized.
Requirements for electronic documents of CAD drawings in project control file and as-built documents can be edited with computer.
Loaded gabions shall be piled up and tightly packed, and the contact surface between two layers of gabions shall be smooth, in case that stone edges break the grid and destroy the gabions.
The Homak connecting line will occupy about 212.1ha land, including 42.1ha dry land, 147.4ha barren mountain, 10.6ha old road land, and 12ha seasonal stream land; the demolished buildings are about 435m2.
Be responsible for the file management of contract text and relevant data.
The installation of oil pressure gauge must be tightly. The high-pressure oil pipe used between the oil pump and jack and the connectors of each part in the oil line should be complete and tight, and the oil line is smooth. No oil leakage occurs under the largest operating oil pressure for 5min. If there is any damage, it shall be repaired and replaced in time.
The first-stage distribution cabinet shall be equipped with protective shed and anti-smashing board.
When running at the peak time (for 2 hours), the load during normal operation, the thermal load RMS of the rectifier transformer and the load of the rectifier shall not exceed 100% of the rated value indicated on the equipment nameplate.
2) For the signal design of stations of the whole line, the main tracks and arrival-departure tracks shall meet the requirements of dual-direction operation.
The geotechnical physical and mechanical properties indexes of each soil layer recommended in the survey report, are listed in table 4-1 and table 4-2. The design parameters of CFG pile in the Project are taken as references.
The main construction process includes: Transport the prefabricated components from the prefabrication yard to the girder erection station. Hoist them to the bridge deck and transport them to the tail of girder erection machine.
Our company has now obtained national industrial production certificate, environmental management system certificate, quality management system certificate and occupational health and safety management system certificate, and passed the evaluation of grade Ⅲ safety production standardization.
According to demands, duly hold survey design progress coordination meeting and quality, technical problem seminar and implement handling comments.
(6) Construct garbage pools in the site. Keep garbages in the garbage pools, and empty the garbage pools regularly.
2. Basic salary for non-frontline staff is set by the Company in a unified manner.
(6) Perform other functions and powers as stipulated in laws, administrative regulations, the Articles and rules of procedure.
The cover of the wall-embedded box shall be protected with plastic cloth. The box mounted on the wall shall be wrapped with plastic cloth to prevent pollution.
Generally, the labor protection supplies also include work clothes, work hat, goggles, raincoat, water boot, cold protective clothing, towel and gloves.
During running of the belt conveyor, clean the accumulated materials in the rotating parts such as rollers or idler rollers.
Table 3-4-5-4 Data Sheet for System Functional Test of Emali Station
1) Two 2mm-thick stainless steel plates shall be fixed on the proper places on the upper and lower ends of escalator.
3. Specification: cooling capacity: 38KW; heating capacity: 56KW; external residual pressure: 220Pa; water resistance: 38KPa; overall dimension: 850x1400x580h; noise: ≯61dB; weight of the unit: 175kg
It is proposed to use electric traction in this section, and AC drive HXD serial locomotives have been widely used for various lines in China's railway network, mainly including HXD1 and HXD2 8-axle 9600KW locomotives and HXD3 and HXD1C 6-axle 7200KW locomotives.
Switch on the balance, and inspect whether there is any display and whether the balance can weigh normally. You can perform the zero setting or restart the balance for adjustment. If the problem cannot be solved, you can call relevant person in charge through WeChat platform.
1) Stadium Station ~ Cairo Festival Station Section
As a result, the compaction standard shall serve as the acceptance standard of the compaction control on site. The pressure test shall be conducted on site to measure the compaction degree.
The Supplier shall assist the Purchaser in performing pre-acceptance of all the equipment, systems, and materials as per the provisions of Article 8 of SCC "Inspection and Test".
Information provided by the Solicitation Organization is an electronic document, which can be received only after the applicant submits a confidentiality commitment. The information is confidential and is used only for the design of the project. Do not spread it on or use it for other purposes.
During formwork installation, holes shall be drilled in the floor slab according to the formwork positioning line, and formwork positioning steel bars shall be set to ensure that the formwork is installed in correct position.
According to the wiring form and the current situation on site, excavate lighting pipeline trenches shall be and lay the protective tubes of LV cables.
The infrared high-definition camera is adopted for the cab to monitor the driver's operation.
Laws of the People's Republic of China on Environmental Impact Assessment (2016.9.1);
1. 20-thick 1:3 cement mortar leveling course
To sum up, this scheme (the generator room is located on 2F) is not recommended.
Procurement Department is responsible for the procurement, expediting, inspection, transport, delivery, warehouse management and other relevant management services for project equipment and materials of the Company; and is responsible for sending Procurement Manager and Procurement Engineer to the Project, and supervising and guiding their work.
The project shall be constructed as per the standard for closed type highway and the vehicles shall get access to the highway through passageway.
4.5During fire fighting, attention shall be paid to the following precautions: If oil or electrical wires are on fire, sand or fire blanket rather than water shall be used for fire extinguishment.
Time to open/close the door: 2.5-3.5s
Manufacturing costs _ Manufacturing costs - Third-party's service fee _ Manufacturing costs - Third-party's service fee - Cleaning fee
The People's Government of Yunnan Province has authorized the Department of Transport of Yunnan Province to introduce CCCC as a social investor by attracting investment and make CCCC lead the establishment of a project company, namely, CCCC Yunnan Expressway Development Co., Ltd. whose registered capital is RMB 1 billion.
① Learn and carry out environmental protection laws and regulations and relevant regulations of Ghana, and strengthen publicity and education so as to enable cadres and workers to realize the importance of environmental protection and enhance their consciousness.
Except for major national defense construction projects, the national nature reserves shall not, in principle, be readjusted again after readjustment due to major construction projects.
Each incinerator is designed to be equipped with two slag removers, which are respectively driven by two hydraulic cylinders so that the operation is stable and reliable.
On the basis of practical application requirement of the product, we need to remove and clean the prominent paint lumps, or which will cause an uneven installation.
6. The elevation and centerline of the girder surface must be checked before cantilevered grouting, and timely dynamic adjustment should be made in time.
Vertical installation of lightning arrester, horizontal bracket, solid and reliable connection.
rmercury-- Density of mercury at test temperature, g/ cm3.
"7.16" fire and explosion in storage tank area of Dalian Xingang Port
Do well in technical disclosure and technical verification in all partitioned and subdivisional works, contact with the Owner and the Supervising Engineers if any material should be replaced or any part should be changed in the construction, and make corresponding changes and written records based on approval the design department.
For the quality problems on the parts maintained by Party B, Party B promises to arrive at the site within 24 hours after receiving Party A's notice for immediate treatment.
(2) During the implementation of procurement process, the materials should be purchased in centralized batches by bidding (or limiting the price). The procurement shall be made from the selected sub-suppliers, and the sub-suppliers shall be compared in terms of quality, price, transport distance and services, and the comprehensive costs shall be computed.
The rotational portion is adjusted by pushing the rotor with the jack or the upper bearing pad at the thrust head, so that the center of the rotational part is on the same axis as the center of the fixed part.
After the foundation pit is excavated, the cushion shall be set up, and after accurate positioning, steel bars shall be bound, formwork shall be installed, and concrete shall be poured.
Construction foreman should be responsible for inspection and control of the construction. Before plastering the inner layer, construction foreman should conduct technical clarification to the construction personnel in written form. The foreman and the quality inspector should be responsible for organizing the operators to build sample room in advance, as well as for conducting physical clarification on the sample room. The requirements for treatment of base layer, process standards as well as construction quality should be consistent.
g. Various signs for emergency escape shall be self-luminous.
2) The computer interlocking execution circuit part of computer interlocking execution equipment has two types, which are the all-electronic module execution unit and the relay circuit execution unit.
Removing timber sleepers from the existing track - CWR track
During lining construction of tunnel, the centerline and level must be accurate, especially construction error shall be considered in advance.
The overlap between round steels shall be 6 times the diameter of round steel and welded on both sides; the overlap between round steel and flat steel shall be 6 times the diameter of round steel and welded on both sides. When flat steel is welded with steel tube, the welding shall be conducted on the upper and lower sides by closely attaching the flat steel to the 3/4 steel tube surface, and when flat steel is welded with angle steel, the welding shall be conducted by closely attaching the flat steel to the outer two sides of the angle steel.
GB/T2951.1~10 Common Test Methods for Insulating and Sheathing Materials of Electric Cables
(7) Implementation of investigation and regulation of various potential hazards in flood season as well as emergency measures;
In the process of pouring concrete, the hoisting device, funnel, string angle hook and lifting ring of the deceleration funnel shall be stable and reliable.
Surface finished with solid wood skin; polyester finishing; 5 primer, 3 finishing and 12 baking varnish.
In 3 months upon execution of the contract and reception of the end user's notice
8. The trunking shall extends from above the equipment room vertically down into the raised floor and then to the equipment cabinet.
Article 21 CR20G and its subordinate units shall formulate supervision and inspection methods of internal control, actively carry out supervisions and evaluations, and ensure the effective operation and continuous improvement of the internal control system.
1) Do a good job in the acceptance of sub-divisional works (process), where the acceptance standard of sub-divisional works shall be implemented according to the quality engineering standard.
Use non-woven fabric that has been dipped into isopropyl alcohol to clean the surfaces of qualified places where marks to be pasted at interior trim and exterior side walls.
The Seller shall ensure that the goods to be provided is brand new and unused, made of the best materials and by first-class process, and complies with the quality, specifications and performance requirements stipulated in the Contract in all aspects.
(2) When the top layer of the exterior wall is plastered, the corner connection position shall be at the dividing joint and the inside and outside corners, or behind the drop tube.
Typical cross section drawing of drainage ditch is not provided for the sectional embankment.
By harnessing the core technologies in electric drive control and motors, develop environmental electric vehicles in compliance with future urban transportation development.
6.2.2.3In the culvert section, before installing the communication cable groove, the run-through grounding cable shall be laid under the groove and close to the railway side.
To be responsible for organizing to prepare the process technical documents that the workshop itself takes charge of, and implementing these documents.
(4) Final Acceptance Certificate signed by the Purchaser.
work to be executed (including Plant, Materials or services to be supplied) by the Contractor and valued under Sub-Clause 13.3 [Variation Procedure]; and/or
1. Organization of transportation of fresh and live freight by railway; 2. Organization of transportation of exceptional-dimension freight by railway; 3. Organization of transportation of dangerous freight by railway;
Field tests should be conducted if different theoretical analyses do not ensure adequate safety or availability.
The general construction layout shall be prepared strictly according to the requirements of Bidding Document and relevant specifications of Uzbekistan, Fergana and Namangan, with full consideration of the impacts by local weather, geographic location and road environment.
Article 7 In principle, the employee on a business trip shall be given priority to live in the Company's campsite set in the travel destination. When there is no campsite or no available room at this campsite, the employee shall first live in the hotel that has cooperative relationship with the Company within the prescribed limit of accommodation fee.
1. Training on working requirements and propaganda of sense of responsibility of internal staffs of warehouse2. Do confirm to warehouse in accordance with the quality inspection conformance PASS label
Rainwater flow is calculated according to the local rainstorm intensity formula, with a return period of 1 year.
Material handling, overlapping length, opening and hole processing etc.
7 For installation works of railway protection equipment, safe protection and management for construction machinery and constructors must be enhanced.
(2) The QJJ3-4 coil of each turnout section and the GJJ1-2 coil at the starting signal in the same throat area are connected in parallel to the wire #9.
The motors of ventilator and condensate fan have protection against leakage, undervoltage, reverse rotation, overload, overheating, short circuit, and open phase.
The rated capacity of each starter is sufficient for starting 10 times.
After the culvert excavation is completed, according to the design requirements, a small rammer can be used to tamp the foundation, and temporary drainage ditches and water-collecting wells should be set up to drain the accumulated water out of the pit with submersible pumps.
1 Design techniques (main and auxiliary alternate generators,traction motors and various auxiliary machines)
The Company generally does not accept oral contracts or telephone orders.
2) When the rock block is filled to the base plane of replacement filling, it shall be filled and compacted.
Conclusion: OK □ Not ok □
A pouring channel shall be first set up in the process of pouring concrete. The personnel who are responsible for concrete pouring are forbidden to trample on the reinforcement. If there are problems, the reinforcement worker shall be on duty and correct the position of the reinforcement at any time.
Figure 4 Test Chromatogram of N-terminal Sequences of P1 of Purified Product of Test Sample (Lot No. 140729-200501)(Continued)
15cm-thick C25 precasting concrete block + 5cm thick M7.5 mortar
Containing H2S, combustible gas and formation water
3. The bridge is located on a circular curve of R=2000.
The destination is located at the eastern circular intersection of Lethem town as shown below.
40-thick C20 fine aggregate concrete, applied with 1:1 cement sand on the surface, placing and troweling simultaneously
This complies with the requirement in ADB's social security policy statement.
13. When the filling height on the culvert is less than 0.5m thick during construction, vibrating or rolling equipment is strictly prohibited to roll the earth fill on the culvert top and within the culvert scope.
5. Gold Ma granite (flamed), with a pavement of 600*600*60
6.4.2.2.1 Foundation and Substructure Works
In August 2008, the Nigerian government transferred the management right of the Bakassi Peninsula to Cameroon.
6.6 Party B shall complete the environmental protection, labor protection and safety production of inspection site according to specifications and relevant requirements.
Pipes can be transported by flat-bed trailers in sections with a highway or construction road, which shall be hoisted onto the brackets specially fabricated before transportation and fixed with dedicate binder tapes to prevent falling during transportation, and they can maximally piled in 2 layers on the trailers.
2) In field operation sampling inspections on communication machine room at Nagad Station, a few spare parts and data in some cabinets were not cleared; Automatic Telephone List attached in the cabinets were not in both Chinese and English versions.
Carrier means the bandwidth of a wireless channel. 2-carrier base stations are used for sections, and 3-carrier base stations are used for stations.
Office system equipment is interconnected with data network equipment via GE optical port, and the interface is on the outer line side of ODF in communication machine room.
1. Construction drawing design for K0+000-KO+489.52 Section of Mohan~Boten Dedicated Freight Corridor (in Laos);
Install the front lower transverse beam, and connect the suspender to the suspender anchorage beam of the front upper transverse beam.
Contractor shall regularly hold the construction safety meeting at each month. Meeting participants include Contractor's key personnel, all Subcontractors' representatives, and other relevant parties.
Maximum eccentricity of pier body : 0.7390 (2.3729) m Maximum compressive stress of concrete: 2.696 (15.3400) MPa
The Design Institute is requested to confirm whether there is any impact on the pile cap and to supplement the details of the overlap area.
Table 7.7 Summary of Frequent Combination of Max. Internal Forces under Serviceability Limit State
d. Relevant equipment such as printers, uninterruptible power supplies, mice and keyboards shall be equipment and machines with energy-saving technologies or modes.
IBP panel is a manual backup tool with the highest operation authority.
3.2.4.2 The supplier management personnel of the Procurement Department shall take the lead to organize and the business team shall take part in the qualification examination for prospective suppliers; if necessary, other relevant departments such as professional sections shall also be invited to jointly complete the examination.
Conductor connection shall be dense without damage to core line and broken strands.
The electrical part of the jumbo is still for the LV device to control the HV device. Major electrical equipment is protected, and the jumbo is equipped with emergency stop devices in all directions, to protect operators and major jumbo equipment in case of emergency.
E-mail: cepfwhw@126.com
After the completion of the recent restoration of the western railways, while providing convenient transportation for minerals and agricultural and sideline products in the hinterland of the port, it also provided an opportunity for the Takoradi Port to become a masterpiece.
It is constructed to promote urban system such as Yangon.
The Project is an intersection reconstruction project. The river has no impact on the Project. There are bridges across each existing road and railway. During the construction of the Project, traffic diversion will be conducted to ensure that the material transportation is not affected.
Site plan layout and making of signs and sign board
The exploratory points shall be arranged along the axial direction and direction rectangular to axial direction of slide and leap according to scale of landslide and leap and in combination with the demand of testing and treatment works.
According to the country guide of Guinea, the rate of corporate income tax is 35%.
One fixed gantry crane for Ningbo Port Import and Export Co., Ltd.
Effects of current on human body, such as perception of voltage threshold, muscle contraction, unconsciousness, ventricular fibrillation, respiratory nerve block, and burn, deteriorates accordingly with the increase of current amplitude.
Influence of concrete material composition on spraying operation and quality;
A special person shall be appointed to monitor the pressure gauge reading during crimping. It is forbidden to use the device under the condition of over-pressure or clamp cover removed.
6.8.4 Cars for Traffic Use and Train Allocation
The initiating department for general service procurement completes General Service Procurement Application Form for Approval and submits it to the Department Manager, Director in Charge, Deputy General Manager and Finance Chief for review as well as General Manager for approval.
5 The main dimensions of the tracks shall be gradually corrected to the acceptance requirements specified in Article 7.4.4 of the Guide after the second ballast laying and regulating.
At the same time, there are a shortage of domestic technicians and professionals in Tanzania.
(4) Prepare quality plan, quality inspection plan and quality control plan on key processes.
Wifi Network Coverage System
The port is managed by TCDD and forced to pilot.
5.2.1.10 Audit data processing
(2) The tractive force value is much smaller than that of diesel locomotives and electric locomotives.
The drivers shall have the vehicles go through regular service and overhaul according to the regulations, to prevent air leakage, oil leakage and vehicle fault caused by damaged parts and components.
■ 97-type 25-circle AC track inspection device is adopted for track circuit in stations;
5.All the signal lamps shall use different colors according to the purpose of a signal.
Realize any combination of recording, direct play and video on demand of 4 line visual signal.
ISO 6149-3 Connections for Hydraulic Fluid Power and General Use
(13) The interlocking test commissioning meets the following safety requirements:
The technical documents specified above shall include all contents required to ensure that the Party A can correctly perform installation, manipulation, inspection, repair, maintenance, test, commissioning, acceptance and operation.
Altogether 2 electrical maintenance work sections will be established at Nanyuki Station and Maragua Station.
▲2. A safety management system shall be established to implement the main responsibility of enterprise safety production, and stipulate the safety responsibilities, authorities and mutual relations of relevant departments and personnel.
Historical data for a period of time can be saved through historical data saving functions. The data includes parameters, switch status, analog values, pulse values, calculation results and alarm / incident records.
5.4.Adjust the fixed power generation of the starting generator when the air compressor does not operate.
New works shall be constructed in advance or synchronously where practicable, in order to reduce transition works and transitional closure time.
15.1.6VMS reverses the standard communication interface for all subsystem devices and can realize the acquisition and output of the train hard line signal and data interaction with each system via I/O.
Total water consumption for production 5077m3/h.
1.2.5 Slip form construction (supplementary photos for site construction process)
During the paving near the formwork, it is inserted and vibrated for a few times by a spade out of mortar, so as to avoid honeycomb.
Only "tabletop" exercise will be conducted instead of pre-entry training.
The shoulder surface shall be flat and dense and the edge shall be straight, without other debris to block the water.
During construction and using, bridges will be eroded by environment and hazardous substances and will bear the external actions such as vehicles,wind, earthquake, fatigue, overloading and human factors. Meanwhile, the performances of materials applied on the bridges will degenerate continually, which will result in damages and degradation in different degrees on each part of the structure.
2) Periphery holes are detonated by detonating fuse, to achieve air-deck charge and improve the capacity of surrounding rocks.
(1) Develop practical construction operation instructions and strictly follow the procedures during construction.
13.3~15.5m: auburnish yellow, auburnish gray plastic silty clay, C=24.3kPa，Φ=9.3°，Es=7MPa，fao=145kPa.
Accounts receivable with insignificant single amount but bad debt provision drawn on single basis at the end of the year:
The entry end of this tunnel is not far away from the Mekong River. There are no roads connecting to the sections of entry, exit and barrel, so the transportation is extremely not convenient.
Maintenance and transportation of 2 DPC2803 and 4 ZTY630 compressors
After data and graphical interface of the integrated automation system of substation at the control center are modified, relevant data and graphical interfaces in the graphical interface can be updated.
6.7.1.4 The coating of the paint film should be covered comprehensively, uniformly and well.
When the AC power is restored, air conditioning system is automatically transferred to the normal operation mode.
Management System for Environment Protection Equipment and Facilities and other instructive documents for operation needed in the construction process.
and the external waterproof layer of box is composed of two layers of asphalt.
Table 4-2-1-1Results of Train Passing through Test in Down-traffic Tunnel
The content of various rules and regulations shall implement the national lines, guidelines, and policies and relevant provisions of the group company and their own organization fully; the formulation procedures of the rules and regulations shall be in accordance with the laws and regulations and the procedures specified in the Articles of Association.
On-site quality control of energy conservation work shall comply with following requirements:
The end wall plate is a thick aluminum plate, and the end wall post is hollow aluminum profile.
Equipment such as rescue re-railing machines and tools are set in Indode and Nagad.
The conduit segments dismantled shall be immediately washed and neatly stacked.
(6) Plugs of the unit external connection cable should be arranged reasonably, and socket design positions should be convenient for regular maintenance;
Low speed: U =0.2s k =2; High speed: U =0.2s k =2; Middle stop: U =0.2s k =2
Lagos is a place without sandstorm, but with sand and dust from December to the next January affected by Harmattan from the Sahara Desert.
It meets the requirements of ISO/IEC17025: 2005 "General Requirements for Testing and Calibration Laboratory Capability" (CNAS-CL01 "Guidelines for the Recognition of Testing and Calibration Laboratory Capability"), and has the capability to undertake the testing services listed in the Annex to this Certificate, and is accredited hereby.
If the JV members do not have corresponding construction qualifications and abilities, the project company shall, in accordance with relevant laws and regulations and the project supervision authority, select other contractors through separate public bidding.
1.4.3 The representative of the company is the same person or different organizations with the shareholding and management relationship shall not participate in the same bid section or the bid of the same bidding project is not divided into the bid sections.
2. Purchase finished products of squatting pan, see 02J915, Page 70, 1-1 for details of the construction method;
8.8.1 Management Scheme for Excessive Emission Prevention of Construction Noise
3. P2 - Rated capacity of electric welding machine (kVA);
3) Treatment of horizontal construction joints on the top: After the concrete is initially set, snap another line 5 mm upwards as per the elevation line of the slab bottom (or the beam bottom), and remove and roughen the weak concrete layer at the top of the column according to the control line until the concrete stones are exposed. Finally, remove loose stones and concrete slag from the construction joints.
CRH2A model (8 marshalling seating EMUs, with a speed of 200—250km/h)
For each pattern, basic line width b shall be determined according to complexity and proportion, and then proper line width group shall be selected from the table.
Tel. exchange: +86(21) 2323 8888, Fax: +86(21)2323 8800, www.pwccn.com
2 floors, including communication, signal and power supply, depot (30 m2)
Project Manager, members of the Project Department and subcontractors/suppliers;
The bill of lading with a numberis invalid and cannot be used!
When the weight of beam body is transferred on the permanent bearing, system conversion is completed.
(13) In addition to fulfill this agreement, Party B shall also perform the related terms of "Chengdu - Chongqing Expressway double line (Chongqing section) project general contract" signed by Party A and the owner and Party A's commitment to the owners, and guarantee the rights, obligations and responsibilitiesbelongs to Party A under this Agreement shall be entitled and not compromised.
Long press to scan barcodes or input assets numbers manually to revise assets information of inverters.
The Interior Designer must have a clear understanding of the design scope and the relevant requirements of the Employer in terms of functional positioning, progress and cost control;
Design temperature (℃) -40~200
Its main functions are shown as below:
"comparing price under same quality, and comparing quality under same price and comparing service under same quality and price.
2009 Tianjing Haihe Cup of Building Structure.
Note: Because CTR323 is a single speed motor and the control system shields the low speed function, the high-speed cutting motor shall be interlocked with low-speed cutting motor.
(2) According to the design requirements, suitable sands shall be selected and can be transported into the site after passing the quality inspection and being approved by the engineer.
Several regional faults are developed in the project area. The tectonic pattern of the study area is dominated by faults, folds and fractures. The E-W and NW faults are the main fault strike, mostly developed in Tertiary sedimentary deposits. Field investigation shows that the surface structural signs are obvious, and it is necessary to consider the tectonic influence on the project in the tunnel and deep excavation area.
During the welding, reasonable welding process and sequence shall be selected to reduce the welding stress and deformation of the steel structures.
Fabrication and construction procedure for cold-shrinkable intermediate joint of three-phase cable:
The occurrence and extinguishing process of urban seismic fire mainly involves five branch systems: firefighting system, water supply system, traffic system, communication system and regional construction engineering system.
The industrial cooling water system and oil-station cooling system are in good condition.
1. On April 21, 2017, Northern Railways LLC provides the Institute with the scanned copy of formal written documents to be issued by the government for the optimization of feasibility study results.
Appendix A and Appendix B of this Standard are normative.
1. The Project is the Integrated Traffic Operation Room for In-plant Station of Special Railway for Sahiwal 2X660MW Coal-fired Power Plant Project in Pakistan.
With various instruments of propaganda and education forms, establish the unified thought of safety and continuously strengthen the staff's safety awareness, and establish a safety assurance system to achieve institutionalized safety management and regular education.
The surface layer at south portal is Qel+dl^3 silty clay, brownish yellow, very stiff, and about 3~5m thick.
After the beam bottom formwork and 1 / 2 side formwork have been accepted by the full-time quality inspector, the beam reinforcement shall be constructed. The longitudinal reinforcement shall be placed first and then the outer hoop shall be fitted according to the drawing requirements. It is strictly prohibited to diagonally tie the beam stir ruptures to ensure the mutual spacing.
Testing operability and execution of the PSMS and Ticketing System;
The average delay time of Shinkansen trains is 0.6 minutes, with the highest on-schedule rate in the whole world (including the delay caused by natural disasters such as typhoon and earthquake).
2. Instruct the assistant dispatcher to manually arrange train reception and departure routes passing through the failed section.
Pre-stressed Steel Tendon Drawing of Bent Cap for No.8 Pier in Section (EW21~EW20)
4) Self-cleaning filters, high gradient magnetic filters, degreasing machines, aeration machines, dissolved air releasers, aerators, thickeners, mixers, oil and sediment scrapers, injection pump lifters,water-water jets, and rare-earth magnet discs, etc. (Filter fillers will be mounted by the supplier).
Vertical curves with radius of 15000m shall be set between adjacent longitudinal gradient.
1.4.7.3 The equipment inside and outside shall be cleaned before delivery.
Design Drawing for Exit of Ban Nan Tunnel at D2K26+165
Response: We promise to be responsible for compatibility and applicability of products used for the Project.
Conduct quality inspection and tests for all the hardwares and insulators.
Water lifting unit (including water pump and diesel engine)
Facilities, equipment, vehicles and safety protection articles at operation site
As a new urban construction project, Dammam Oasis Project incorporates public service facility planning into the planning system at the initial stage of planning and construction, and prepares a perspective and high-quality public service facility plan. Through scientific and reasonable allocation, environmental quality and residents' quality of life can be effectively improved.
The parts of foundation base slab and patand that need formwork are built with brick tire mold and cement mortar.
RAM verification period: The RAM verification report will be prepared monthly.
The ATP auto-passing phase test result for the EMU under full traction condition is shown in Figure 4.11-6.
4.1.2 Before construction, subcontractors shall make cross-operation scheme (refer to Appendix A for cross-operation scheme), implement each safety measures, coordinate site operations andarrange the process reasonably to avoid cross-operation as far as possible.
Installation works of 400,000 t/a PVC project and 320,000 t/a ion-exchange membrane caustic soda project
Not only can I do my own business well, but also do I care about the boss.
1) It is designed as per single-track straight line and curve.
The survey section is predominated by erosion and denudation high plain landform, which is high in the east and low in the west, featuring relatively gentle topographic relief, with an elevation of 530~560m.
When perforating, wear protective glasses. The waste shall be cleaned up in time to be stacked at the designated place.
However, after his work, Yongzeng Luo also took the initiative to help the company do a lot of curtain wall design work.
4. Modify the isolating barrier from welded-mesh isolating barrier into barbed-wire isolating barrier + welded-mesh isolating barrier, which shall be properly selected based on the specific conditions of different sections of road.
Bored piles and hand-dug piles are frequently used for cast-in-place piles.
The air tightness of air system shall meet the requirements of IEC61133.
6. D4K1+760~D4K2+140 is a large longitudinal slope, and the ditch bottom on the left of the road shall be cut to be rough, to dissipate energy and reduce the flow rate.
They shall be maintained uniformly by HR specialist on the spot after verification of the materials.
2.3.7.3.5 Backfilling of Passage Culvert Back
The distance of the ceilingof toilet and wash room to the floor is 3.3m
4. Supply and discharge conditions of groundwater, relationship between the supply and discharge of surface water and groundwater as well as the influence on the groundwater level;
Dedicated gutter inlets or drainage ditches should be installed every 30m along the track and at the minimum points of the track, and should be connected with the municipal rainwater pipeline newly built in the road modification project and finally drained to rivers.
d) For the sub-divisional works failing to meet the requirements, the Engineer shall issue the Notice of Unqualified Works, and Contractor shall rectify such unqualified works.
2. Pour the wet joints of concrete slabs, cross and horizontal beams and main trusses;
(4) Implementing all-round and whole-process dynamic objective assessment, rewarding and punishing individuals, and strengthening execution.
Company name: Academy of Railway Sciences (Beijing) Engineering Consult Co., Ltd./
Preheat temperature is the upper preheat temperature limit stipulated by welding process.
2. The acceptance units are optimized to enhance the construction quality acceptance of physical structure works, concealed works, and critical construction procedures. The Contractor shall be responsible for detail control of non-critical construction procedures during the construction and no inspection lots are required for acceptance.
The Ticket shall not be updated (no data written or entry mark printed on ticket) and the gate shall return the Ticket to the patron.
For those that violate the regulations in these measures by failing to report their operations for the record, by engaging in non-commercial IIS, or by providing other services than those prescribed in the filed records, the telecommunications administration of the relevant province, autonomous region, or municipality under the central government's direct jurisdiction will order them to mend their ways within a certain period; and order those who refuse to do so to shut down their Web sites.
46. Review Report of Product and Process Design and Validation
General Layout Plan of ADAMA Comprehensive Maintenance Workshop
Provide the warning board of "No Closing as at Work" at the operating switch of the air-side DC seal oil pump of #1 unit.
40-person week (in Luoyang, twice, before and after operation)
Engineering safety management objectives: No accidents with serious injuries shall happen.
Substation automatization system equipment consists of intelligent electronic devices of main control unit in control signal panel and micro computer based measurement and protection unit in the each equipment and communication network of the substation.
2.3.2Technical Improvement and Existing Problems of Relevant Highways
The instrument air source adopts purified air, the pressure of the instrument purging air is 0.5~0.6MPa (G), the dew point temperature: ≤30℃ , oil-free and dust free, without corrosive and toxic gas.
Introduction of available water sources, power sources and fuels along the line
Voice service, short message and fax services, voice group calling service, voice broadcast service, etc.
Alarm and detailed information communication channels, including the communication tool used by the supervisor (e.g. air whistle), or the nearest alarm button;
Firestops collar, DN ≤ 110mm
Oil tank shall be integrated with base plate. Internal oil tank shall be anti-corrosive treated in accordance with manufacturer's standard.
For the materials subject to unified bidding organized by Laos-China Railway Co., Ltd. as required, our company will actively participate in the bidding work to improve the quality level of purchased materials and achieve the best purchase price through bidding.
Attend regular technical meetings, and meetings for design clarification and joint review of drawings organized by the Employer.
• At any inclined top, no matter whether to be close to the edge or not.
Pipelines parallel with tunnel axes have their certain particularity.
As shown in the results of measurement on arch axis, the arch rib alignment is basically round and smooth, without obvious abrupt change.
2) The intermittent train control and the interlocking train control is a mode of degradation control.
Cash flow statement reflects cash flow (cash inflow and outflow) in each year within the project calculation period and is used to calculate various dynamic evaluation indexes to investigate the profitability of project investment.
The shear wall horizontal reinforcement connection shall be in staggered overlapping connection. (Fig. 12).
The Owner and the Employer hereby agree to make payments to the Designer for the accounts payable as specified in the contract as the remuneration for the supply of design service in the period and manner noted in the contract.
The measured current value is used for overcurrent protection, short circuit protection, main transformer differential protection and power measurement.
The original meter-gauge railway operator RVR operation building is at the KRC headquarters near Nairobi Station of this project. Now, it is vacant and in good conditions. It is located in the central area and adjacent to KRC.
All kinds of signboards have been ranked in a list, and the specific contents are subject to confirmation of Maldives Party.
4. The bearing capacity of the foundation shall meet the design requirements. If impossible, replacement or other reasonable treatment methods shall be adopted.
5.6.6 The Project Manager is responsible for organizing the construction department to complete the construction tasks as planned every day, and feeding back the work content and completion situation of the day to the Project Management Department, and finally completing the product handover and signing the handover agreement with the users.
C15 concrete leveling layer, 100mm thick
China Railway 11 Bureau Group Co., Ltd. (seal)
1) During the construction of the three beam segments before the closure, opposite observation shall be carried out to adjust the elevation and plane position of the beam segments on both sides of the closure.
2) Prepare for commencement, review the construction drawings and make technical clarifications, and implement the construction organization strictly according to the construction organization design approved by the Supervisor, Consultant and the Employer.
Reasonably adjust the allocation of resources and continue to optimize the construction schedule based on the changing construction conditions, so as to ensure the smooth realization of individual indicators.
The Midas Civil 2017(Ver.8.6.5 R2) Space Finite Element Software is adopted for the analysis of the static wind load ofmajor bridges.
1. Original stone shall not be less than 8cm in thickness and 23kg in weight.
Load Bearing and Operation Services Construction Specification and Standards 2.01.07-90/;
② In order to improve the crushing effect, reduce the big rock rate and reduce the blasting vibration effect, use the method of big pitch and small array pitch to arrange the holes with the shape of cinquefoil, and use the nonel detonator to carry out row-by-row millisecond extruding blasting.
(7) The bulletin board shall be made, which is designed to improve the sense of integration about construction and Aids virus/Aids campaign.
The mode of road development - mining dump truck transportation is adopted.
Thirdly, the resettlement work so far has well followed the principle of being open and transparent, the affected people have broadly and deeply participated in the whole process and their complaints, opinions and suggestions have been fed back and treated in a good manner.
Telemarketing personnel may invite the customers who are communicated with for the first time to have test drive when their data are filed, or invite the customers to return to the store for test drive during the follow-up, and all depends on actual conditions.
The Contractor shall establish strict waste recycling, storage and treatment systems, the Contractor shall establish waste recycle station and treatment station on site; for harmful waste, the Owner will provide centralized treatment, and the Contractor shall transport harmful waste in centralized manners to the Owner's designated waste recycle station.
The Tenderer shall prepare, modify, and provide the following schedules:
Conduct off-board assembling of trunkings as per attached drawing, and rivet nuts for assembled trunkings using manual nut gun.
The bidding documents and the authorization data of relevant professions of the Owner
The dust shall be controlled in the light of Measures for Construction Dust Management of the Company;
We apply to join China-ASEAN RTEVEG and become one of its council members. We undertake to assume corresponding responsibilities and obligations, conscientiously comply with its regulations, protect its legitimate rights and reputation, and actively support its construction and development.
According to the tests carried out in the vibratory and impact specified in IEC 61373: 2010, the fan units can work normally, without any permanent deformation or damage.
In case of major occupational disaster at work site or designated work area, report to the competent government department immediately after the disaster occurs, receive investigation and attend accident inspection meeting.
Monkey wrench, 200mm; socket wrench, 5mm and 6mm; screwdriver (large, medium, and small), 2 for each.
12) Conduct construction technical disclosure to concrete shift. Listing system shall be selected for concrete pouring and smashing, and corresponding operator shall be responsible for quality of the concrete pouring and smashing.
The Ethernet network monitors the state of vehicle equipment and records corresponding data, and the Ethernet network is equipped with corresponding interfaces for portable equipment to download data recorded by TCMS.
1. Arrange and improve all kinds of technical data and as-built drawings, and handle the handover.
(1) Notice to Proceed is failed to be issued within 7 days before the planned Commencement Date due to the Employer: postponement of construction period.
3. The design for this works is based on the Geological Survey Report for In-plant Station of Special Railway for Sahiwal 2X660MW Coal-fired Power Plant Project in Pakistan completed by China Railway Engineering Consulting Group Co., Ltd.
The Lekki Expressway at the start point has two-way 6 lanes (yet two-way 4 lanes in some sections) and the E1 Expressway at the end point has two-way 6 lanes. Considering the current road connection conditions, the project is temporarily designed as two-way 6 lanes.
Our Company will also actively coordinate relevant parties to provide favorable conditions for equipment inspection and acceptance.
As shown in the figure, only when the contacts of the current relay and undervoltage relay are closed at the same time, the protection device can start the intermediate relay and trip.
The minimum interval for laying indoor and outdoor insulated conductors shall comply with provisions of relevant standards.
To follow the current construction quality acceptance and evaluation standards of the state, Guangzhou Province and Huizhou City.
The vehicle shall be tested for the ability of resistance to electromagnetic interference according to EN 50121-3-1, aiming to make the vehicle meet all requirements of anti-interference, and the anti-interference shall meet the performance specified in EN50121-1.
6. The arrangement of steel tendon shall be performed in strict accordance with the arrangement plan of longitudinal pre-stressed steel tendon and the table of coordinates, and his drawing only shows the section layout of steel tendon at two ends of each block member.
Address/P.C: Room 205, Building 2#, Courtyard 59, Gaoliangqiaoxie Street, Haidian District, Beijing /100044
The dispose result of supplier's misconduct will be published in Group. The supplier will be informed of the dispose decision and supervised to conduct improvement.
1.The line is more straight and the length is 2.174km shorter than that of flat option.
Research to formulate plan for site acceleration technology and select optimal drill bits.
The insulation between the mutually insulated circuits of power supply unit, between the power supply unit and ground should meet the requirements in TB/T1508-1991.
b) The NDT area where a rotary body is used shall be marked with the symbol "RT♂".
Dense vegetation dominated by shrubs, arbors and bamboos.
Industrial ethane is separated from natural gas or is a byproduct of refineries.
When drilling holes in tunnels, wet operation method or other dust removal measures shall be adopted.
6) Expansion soil: The line passes through part of area with expansion soil, whose slope is unstable. The line shall avoid to pass by means of cutting to prevent forming expansive soil slope. When passing by means of cutting, the first-grade slope shall be reduced or provided with the relevant prevention measures, along with adequate drainage measures.
According to the position and dimension shown on the drawings, the area of internal plastering of parapet wall shall be measured in m2.
To arrange construction reasonably and ensure construction period, this tunnel should be provided with 1 auxiliary gallery and trackless transportation should be adopted for the whole tunnel.
①Volume calculation for underground fire tank in coal yard
4.2.3 Equipment composition: A set of type A rerailer includes 4 jacks, 4 manual hydraulic pumps and supporting oil pipes.
Table 5 Main Technical Parameters of HV Electrical Appliance Box
7.1.10 Air Proof - Water Proof - Wind Resistance
Figure 3-2 Concrete Voids and Pits on Side Wall on Qom Side of the First Span
The Works have total water volume of 77,291m3/d, including fresh production water volume of 29,830m3/d, domestic water volume of 7m3/d, and circulated water volume of 47,886m3/d.
13.2.4 The measuring points of crown settlement and clearance change shall be arranged on the same cross-section.
5.1General technical regulations, quality management requirements, post-assembly inspection and test, used materials and accessories of the car and equipment shall comply with the technical specifications.
Does not let the signal lamp of vehicle comply with the safe use regulations;
Proper permeable materials shall be used for backfilling and tamping in a timely manner.
2. During the clearing and excavation, we will work carefully to ensure that any public facilities or private property will not be damaged and that traffic will not be interrupted due to the clearing.
When the construction of the next procedure might influence finished products of the previous procedure, it is required to gain the approval of operator and management personnel of the previous process and avoid damage and pollution. Otherwise, losses incurred shall be borne by the operation organization of the next procedure.
Special Seal for Shaoxing Transportation Bureau's International Tendering Management and Recording
B1.1Technical Specification ProposalChapter 4_Annex 5Calculation of Seating Capacity and Layout of Passenger Compartment
Passenger transportation center for transfer between trains and long-distance buses+ a pedestrain overbridge
Significant and major problems (such as plan changes, treatment plans, and process changes) discovered during the construction process are reported to the project leader, the Institute, and the Company's review department by the site design representative.
Laying of thermal insulating layer: if difficulty is found in drying the thermal insulating layer of roof, proper vapor exhaust measures shall be adopted.
Different types of data are transmitted through different VLANs;
According to the design requirements, a settlement observation shall be carried out when construction of each storey is completed during construction. After the completion of major structures, observation shall be carried out every quarter for the first year, twice for the second year, and then once a year for the following years, till the settlement is stable. In case of any abnormality, the Owner, design institute and survey unit shall be informed immediately.
7. The casing center is aligned to the well center, with the deviation of less than 20 mm;
Red paint marker, 13mm fork wrench, 0-100Nm dial torque wrench, and 5M measuring tape
The Seller shall record all identified hazards in the Hazard Log (refer to Appendix 3) and submit it to the Buyer for approval.
In case that automatic power off of electrical equipment may cause hazard greater than ignition, alarm unit shall be used to replace automatic power off unit.
This document is prepared in response to Clauses 5.2.1 and 5.2.1 of the tender document Particular Instruction to Tenderers for Hong Kong engineering vehicles.
Before coming off work every day, the quality inspector shall assist the shift leader to check the quality of the plastering works finished on that day, and that failing to meet quality requirements shall be reworked on the same day.
For double crossover, the turnout combinations must be transposed on the circuit so that a section combination could be set at a key position, as shown in Figure 2-1-14.
If the pile section does not need to be lengthened according to the requirements of the engineering design drawings, the pile section must be manufactured according to the scope of the drawings and specifications.
Perform manual testing to check whether the switch function at the reel cable-laying end is effective when the running distance is greater than the cable length and whether there are at least two turns of cable on the reel.
The exsisting Salap Station is a transfer station located at K267+454 of the exsisting line and only performs passenger transportation operations.
The vertical curve, transition curve and turnout shall not overlap.
2.2 There should be no defects of bending, wear, transfinite or loose in locating pin, guide keys, and holding pins of the form board.
Electrical control system consists of the following components: control panel, signal panel, air and water control panel junction box, flushing button, electrical control box of sewage tank.
3. This spoil yard is located right of main line K64+600 and can hold 178,000m3 abandoned earth and rock. It occupies a land area of 44.2 mu for forest land and pond. It has a 46.23m long debris dam, which can be adjusted according to the landform.
At the design liaison meeting, the Tenderer shall propose the grade, performance data and specific heat treatment status of the materials used, for approval of the Tenderee.
LDF --- the lane coefficient, as determined according to Article A.2.5 of the Specification;
3. Joint assessment and confirmation with HSE Department on whether to adopt the contents in Appendix C to the Contract - HSE Guide for Contractors and Appendix D - Drug and Alcohol Inspection System.
Interaction between Supporting Structure and Surrounding Rock of Tunnel:
C) Quality supervision key points for exposed pipes:
Curing measures, such as controlling hydration heat and pouring time and temperature for pouring mass concrete in abutment and others shall be reinforced to prevent concrete cracking.
4. Green lighting should be adopted in station building. Energy-saving products should be adopted as light sources.
An occupational health management system shall be established to ensure that the construction personnel's living place and workplace are clean and tidy, dust, harmful gas and noise on the construction site do not exceed the national standards, and labor protection complies with relevant regulations; and to prevent food poisoning, spread of infectious diseases, occupational diseases and endemic diseases.
Safety officer: Be responsible for the daily safety supervision and inspection and the correction of any misleading work.
mounted on the wall, with the bottom being 2.5 m above the ground, or recessed in the ceiling;
8.1.3 The receiving inspection of indoor equipment shall be carried out according to following requirements:
BHP Billiton's approach also shows that the world's mining giants are optimistic about the demand for nickel for batteries.
Equipped with Independent insulating cover.
Empty car shall have high center plate surface (excluding center plate wearing plate, center plate load shall be 58.3KN)
Table 6: Basis/Standard & Evaluations for Partial Tests
The concrete transfer pump shall be installed at the solid place where there is strong bearing force and smooth drainage around without any ponding. The shelter that protects against rain, sunshine, or striking shall be built at the work site, and good ventilation is required.
Have a good knowledge of the project's tangible construction and corporate culture
Conductivity (25°C): 468.0s/cm
Set up a power dispatching center at 6th October #2 station and a standby power dispatching center at Alexandria station.
has completed all the undergraduate teaching programme of Mechatronic Engineering at Henan University of Science and Technology and is hereby qualified for graduation, and is granted Bachelor's Degree of Engineering in accordance with the articles of the Regulations of the People's Republic of China on Academic Degrees.
3.1.21 Cracked gas and oil produced by the plant shall be fuel for normal operation of the plant. The heating furnace has oil-gas combustor where the two fuels combines automatically. In startup stage, other fuels such as LPG can be used;
— shortest travel time average (in hour) for each traffic zone of new highway network if there is a project;
Early curing: cover it for curing with film within 5-7d after rolling of lime-soil.
Deposits appears in the culvert and no culvert bottom is found (V=2m3).
Steel for the Reinforcement of Concrete - Part 1:Hot Rolled Plain Bars(GB 1499.1-2008)
3.Unspecified dimension tolerances shall comply with GB/T 1804-m.
Annexes Summary of Dynamic Performance Test Data
7. G3 is condensate pipe of air conditioner, which is installed at plate edges with the dimension of 30X2 (outer diameter X wall thickness). When the air conditioning condensate pipe is close to the rainwater pipe, a tee-junction access port is reserved correspondingly. For air conditioner installation, refer to 11ZJ901-29-2.
Marketing/HSE/ Party-Mass Work Department
The printing module shall have a minimum print speed of 15 receipts per minute (in continuous printing).
The Supplier shall submit documents which prove that it is eligible to submit a proposal and has the capacity to perform the Contract;
7.4 All test results should be recorded and saved.
Supervision of Civil Communication Engineering of Beijing Metro Line 1
With 9 meters of arc I-steel rail, Chinese national standard (GB706-88) -16, provided by a special arc rail manufacturer.
4.14.8 The continuous operation of powder (grout) jetting while lifting shall be ensured during the construction of piles.
The diameter of pressure gages shall not be less than 100mm, and the pressure gages shall be connected to the inlet and outlet pipes of fire water pumps by a pipe with a diameter of 6mm. Moreover, shutdown valves shall be set.
One complete train is provided with 3 compressor units integrating screw air compressors, double-tower driers, safety valves, and pressure switched. They are designed as integrated and modular units and will be mounted in one piece.
The component warranty period shall satisfy commercial terms.
There are 373 routes, including 44 international routes and 8 Hong Kong and Macao routes.
The mix ratio of concrete and slump degree shall be strictly controlled. In the construction, the vibration shall be carried out over two times, moving point to point around the template to ensure thatthe whole template is subject to vibration.
Wet the screed coat by watering. Paint plain cement paste evenly (ratio of water and cement is 0.4 to 0.5). Do not paint too much area. The area for painting should be decided by the area of paving.
Evaluation of geological structure, unfavorable geological effect and stability of the area
4.2.14 In addition to various types of monitoring holes, exploratory wells, exploration pits and trenches in the slope engineering investigation shall be filled and sealed in time after completion of field work.
According to the depth of the bellmouth, a mark is made on the socket pipe end indicating that the matching gap corresponding to the bellmouth and socket at the end of the socket is not less than 3 mm, and the maximum gap is not greater than the value specified in Table 6-11-7.6-11-7.
Receipt printing: the receipt has precisely recorded such information as transaction type, date and time, departure station, terminal station, ticket fare, quantities (pieces), ticket type (for adult or for children), payment made, change (banknote or coin), etc., and the passengers could also select the information to be added on the receipt according to demand.
According to drilling and geological mapping, the thickness of the landslide mass in this section is approximately 1.00 to 1.80m. The sliding surface runs along the connection zone of red clay and the completely weathered marl.
In this way, we can not only obtain reliable supply and assure the quality through long-term cooperation, but also gain an advantage over the purchase pricein terms of length of time and volume of purchases, which is of great benefit to reduce the cost of project procurement and improve the efficiency of procurement.
After the waterproof rolls are applied, seal the ends of waterproof rolls and pipe wrapping parts tightly with sealant.
All connecting parts (diagonal parts and horizontal parts) shall be installed on the main part. Due to its light weight, it can be erected manually with a cross-braced rod. After the main part is erected, three ropes shall be used as temporary stay wires to fix it to prevent bending under force. Then the other main parts of tower legs shall be assembled and related connecting auxiliary parts shall be installed.
For recent years, Djibouti government has planned to build Djibouti into the portal of East Africa market just like Dubai based on the significance of geographical location and geopolitics of Djibouti.
⑤-1 Silty clay (Q4el+dl): auburnish red, plastic, wet-saturated, inhomogeneous texture, medium tenacity, easily rubbed into strips by hands with sand feel, locally mixed with a small amount of breccia and sand.
Locomotive drivers must carefully and faithfully fill in the report according to relevant specifications and should ensure clear writing, complete contents and accurate data.
The terrain of this section is flat and the left line runs through this time. The existing maximum gradient is 5.67‰.
A rail inspection workshop shall be established in Tingri, and 10 work areas will be established in new stations in the section.
The iron hammer cannot be used to correct the door frame. Side edge and deformation is not allowed for the door frame. The inside and outside of the door frame must be guaranteed flat.
The construction method with minor impact on topographical and geomorphologic conditions and vegetation shall be adopted for subgrade construction section.
Project implementation results: It provides an urban main road for Anqing, connects five traverse channels, relieves the traffic pressure in north direction, drives the economic development of new town groups in the north and east directions, and plays a strategic role in accelerating Anqing's emergence and long-term development.
The following figure shows the current diagram when the DC750V air conditioner starts:
For subsequent cultivation periods continuous irrigation water is to be released to the downstream irrigable area, and this requirement must be considered in the design and staging of the diversion works.
(2) Shashemene Interchange
① All personnel entering the construction site shall accept pre-post safety education and safety technology disclosure and be equipped with qualified hard hats, safety belts and other labor protection articles.
Fig. 7-4-10 Structure of WD320 Power Stabilization Vehicle
(6) Popularize fire control knowledge among employees.
The Third Bid Section (JQSG-3) of Major Works Construction for Reconstruction and Expansion Project of Jinan-Qingdao Expressway (invested for construction)
3. Contract amount of pavement works (in words): three hundred and fifty-six million six hundred and seventy thousand four hundred and thirty seven Yuan (￥356,670,437.00.
The CTC system shall realize the transmission of station information between stations, and be able to display the train running status of train in the stations and sections adjacent to the station.
After entering or leaving of vehicles from the site, the units possessing such vehicle shall be responsible for timely cleaning of the road to keep it clean.
Needed by construction of the national modern integrated transportation backbone network of Laos
Safety devices such as elevators for external use (elevators for both human and cargo) shall be tested by statutory testing units according to the prescribed time and a test report shall be issued before continuing use.
Table 5.1.3-1: Table of Determination of Vessel Design Pressure
Number of braking output channels: 6 channels for service braking (unloading, decompression, air charging shut-off and three standby channels) and one channel for emergency braking.
4) That system is provided with the grounding zone for the shielding layer of the cable and the earth leakage protector for the circulating current of the shielding layer of the cable to prevent the insulation breakdown of the shielding layer of the cable; the external fiber reinforcement or armour shall be grounded uniformly to prevent the surge from intruding along the shielding layer and the reinforcement.
In principle, the payment shall be settled by bank transfer.
The woodworking, pulp and paper industries specialize in building parts made of wood based on plywood, plywood, wooden containers, furniture, cellulose, paper and paperboard and their products.
*EME is an HMAC used for middle surface course or lower surface course.
Table 6.3.9 Allowable Deviations and Inspection Methods of Floating Caissons after They Reach Design Elevation
All early constructed metro integrated systems at home and abroad employed the front-end processor (FEP) isolation-type access option.
The design number of lavatory and toilet is calculated according to the total number of workers in the largest shift.
The manual control is for the on-site short-term control of bar screen; when the bar screen is under the automatic control mode, it shall be possible that its startup or shutdown could be controlled via the water head before and behind screen, or that its "startup-shutdown" cycle (with a range of 0~24h) could be regulated via a time relay.
(2) Both parties of the Contract shall stamp contract seal and cross-page seal.
The yard PA system has priority setting function, so the priority can be set according to actual needs.
When the comprehensive evaluation method is used and the comprehensive scores are equal, the competitive negotiation team will recommend the winning candidate or determine the successful bidder in the following order of priority:
Aggregate used for site construction are mainly picked from local quarry and processed.
Do not start the equipment until troubleshooting and making relevant confirmation.
Composite eye washer (BTF61-A)
4) Friction angle between wall back and behind-wall filling: 20°;
Rated capacity: 2kW (tentative). It shall meet the needs of the DC24V circuit of train.
Concrete mixing plant and other works making big noise shall be away from the camping area.
Total revenue USD 2.837 billion
The existing arrangement of plant area shows there are two gates of living quarters to main plant area, but there is no special security check duty room
Layout Plan of Work Area of China-Thailand Railway Lot 4-2
Therefore, discharge of construction waste residue, waste oil and waste water into river should be avoid both during mechanical operation of bridge substructure drilling and site concreting of uperstructure.
The permeable geotextile or medium coarse inverted filter shall be provided for the seepage ditch wall. The seepage pipe may be a HPPE pipe, PVC pipe, PE pipe, soft permeable pipe and sand-free concrete pipe with holes.
When the locomotive is negotiating a 300m-radius curve at 80 km/h, the superelevation of outer rail that corresponds to cant deficiency is 139 mm~87 mm.
With a small hammer and other small tools to gently knock off the medicine seat, the stud welding operation will be completed.
The safety protection facilities, safety signboards, warning boards and ground wires shall not be removed or moved without authorization.
Mud (Q4l), whose characteristic value of bearing capacity is 50 kPa, which belongs to loose earth with bad evenness, partial exposure and bad engineering properties, and can not be used as the foundation bearing layer of the proposed building.
2.3 Cable line: construction, installation and commissioning of cable line within the scope of shop drawings (excluding pipe jacking through railway).
14) The Supplier shall define the test conditions, ensuring that the life cycle costs and quality assurance of components are not affected adversely.
2.6 In case the gradient difference at adjacent slope sections for roads of depot is greater than 1%, the vertical curve shall be provided with the radius not 5000m. The relatively great radius shall be adopted in case relevant conditions are met.
Construction of fill subgrade test road: Various tests will be performed for the materials used for test road filling 28 days before the commencement of test road works.
instruct leaders and staff of relevant departments and entities to immediately carry out emergency disposal and emergency support work in accordance with the division of responsibilities;
The subgrade bed is composed by surface layer and bottom layer. For surface layer of main line subgrade bed, group-A filler with particle size not greater than 150mm should be used except sandy soil; for bottom layer of main line subgrade bed, group-A or B filler with maximum particle size not greater than 200mm or 2/3 of the spreading thickness.
The strainers are transported by vehicles to the workplace and hoisted mechanically with manual assistance for construction.
Floor height (under dead weight): 1308mm
Applicable local HSE laws and regulations
Hinges shall be mounted when gap size is proper after second shaping of door leaf.
The brake handle meets the UIC standard, and is set with the overcharging position, the operating position, service braking zone, the maximum service braking position, and emergency braking position; the service braking zone is controlled by level, and each level corresponds to a certain amount of pressure reduction; therefore, when the brake handle is in the service braking zone, it can achieve stage braking and stage mitigation.
- Ensure that the site laboratory is used to conduct inspections and tests consistent with the application procedures and regulations;
1.2.4.5 Main Quantities of Traction Substation Works
Water reducing agent, when used, should firstly be dissolved in water and then be added into cement paste.
5. Whether the ordinary trains has the maintenance conditions;
Through investigations, it is known that there is cement supply at the project location, the supply is able to meet the demands of the Project, and cement may be transported to sleeper precast yards by truck or by train.
Deposit at portal and in culvert shall be cleared to make the culvert smooth; the position suffering jointing mortar falling of culvert body shall be rehabilitated; the mortar rubble shall be employed to pave the scoured area behind the wing wall; the wing wall at inlet shall be extend for 6m.
Supporting the eight-axis main and slave/peer working mode;
(1) Plane position of harbor basin and approach channel shall comply with specifications of the dredging plan.
Currently, the application of all-electronic stations is gradually being promoted. If it goes smoothly, more and more stations will be controlled by all-electronic modules.
(1). Maximum reaction force of double-track static live load at one end of 24m beam
2.5.2 The strength design and test of the carbody meets the requirements of EN 12663-1 Railway Applications - Structural Requirements of Railway Vehicle Bodies - Part 1: Locomotives and Passenger Rolling Stock for Category L (Locomotive).
The pier type structure mainly includes column piers and slab piers.
To check the quality of the materials delivered to the site, semi-finished products, the finished products and the equipment.
During the selection of enhanced protective measures, the performance, test method and effective protective life of the materials shall be determined.
During truss installation and welding operations, double windings must be in place and well connected with the truss to prevent welding sparks from damaging lifting rigging and equipment.
Coupling Test of Automatic Coupler at 7km/h
(2) Vehicles used by leaders of the Company shall be uniformly arranged and registered by the General Affairs Department. The vehicle use department shall fill in the Vehicle Use Application Form (Annex 6) during the going-out, apply for it half a working day in advance, and report it to the General Affairs Department for arrangement after approval by the responsible leader.
The general supervision office should convene one project regular meeting per quarter with major participants being project manager, technical, business, quality and design directors of the EPC contractors, Owner Representative, Owner and Resident Chief Supervision Engineer.
4.1.2.2 Conducts purchasing and updates the sourcing tracker according to the sourcing plan.
The Project Manager and the Chief Engineer will organize all technicians of the Project to overall inspect, assess and grade construction quality on site irregularly every week, summarize quality and realize reward and punishment every month,.
Through the analysis with the integration of the actual situation for the production at the mine, the loss is mainly concentrated at the pillar and the studding, in order to improve the extraction rate of the resources; it is required to extract as many ore bodies as possible with the guarantee of safety to reduce the rate of loss.
(3) With consideration of such comprehensive factors as the alert situations of mass incidents and social influences, the emergency leading organization of NARI Group Corporation studies and issues Level 3 alert.
It undertakes the duty and daily work of accident train rescue.
The failure to this kind of offset will not cause any actual loss related to tax payment as the actual tax burden of EPC consortium (or joint venture) in Nepal is 0.
The battery shall be able to realize uninterrupted power supply for 90min in case of any failure in the main or auxiliary power supply of the vehicle, to guarantee basic functions of TCMS.
(2). Logistics Management Departments of the Project shall organize physical examination regularly for all the employees, and establish physical examination archives for reference.
Sinotrans has once provided logistics services for Aramco's projects (EPC is provided by HQC which is affiliated with CNPC) and thus has a better knowledge of Aramco's requirements;
Conduct frequency analysis to determine the basic failure frequency for frequency calculation of pipeline and equipment; count the lengths of pipelines of each unit and number of process equipment for frequency calculation; calculate the failure frequency of each leakage event; make reasonable corrections for failure frequency.
9.2.17 Safety Assurance Measures for Drowning
(2) After the emergency, the responsible person of site construction should make a report to the Emergency Rescue Leading Group immediately.
The brief status of difference in the comprehensive unit price between open excavated foundation and pile foundation;
14.3.4.7 Before each train is shipped, CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd. shall make arrangements for pre-factory inspection by the inspectors of the Tenderer.
1. Concrete strength grade is C35, and the impervious grade is 0.6MPa. The expanding agent is added additionally;
Taking dollar currency rate as an example, market conversion rate of IRR dropped from 1: 8000 in 2005 to 1:36500 currently.
The Start-up Acceptance Committee holds that the start-up acceptance meets the requirements of the project start-up acceptance specifications, since the start-up, commissioning and 24h test run of the project (DC project is subject to the equipment contract) are normal, the performance meets the design requirements, and the project quality meets the design and construction acceptance specifications specified by the state.
Open the BPM upper computer software program, click the [System] → [User login] in the menu bar, enter the user login interface as shown in Figure 1, enter the password 1111 and click [OK];
(2) Sampling, fabrication, curing and testing of concrete specimens must conform to the relevant provisions of the current standards.
Steady State Operating Conditions at the Maximum Water Level of the Suction Sump (17.346m)
The system operates normally and features suitability, adequacy and effectiveness by implementing the control of the documented management system, management responsibility, resources provision, product realization and monitoring and management, as well as implementing internal audit and management audit.
6.2.8. Some tread braking unit with parking braking function.
(6) All short wires shall be removed after the voltage withstand test on busbar.
Personnel in the fire control room can communicate with personnel on site.
It has been used for the whole line of the tram car projects in Wuhan Donghu and Yunnan Mengzi.
In order to promote clean production, the advanced technology and equipment are adopted in the design to maximize the comprehensive utilization rate of resources and energy, and eliminate or reduce the pollutant in process production.
2.5.5.11.1 Process Flow
The adoption of self-developed 900ton standard prefabrication and erection facilities ensures the quality and schedule of bridge construction.
In the construction, each hole shall be capped or measures shall be taken to protect the hole from obstruction before the next process.
The status displayed on BAS interface is consistent with the equipment status on-site
Quality control for construction project refers to a systematic control process from process quality to the quality of sub-divisional works, divisional works and unit works; and is also a systematic process from quality control for allocated raw materials to quality inspection for the works completed.
③ The anchor bolt hole is punched and cleared to the design depth, the hole depth should be larger than the design anchor bolt length for more than 5cm, and the hole diameter should not be less than the design diameter;
The dispatcher perform preparation of the basic train operation diagram with the help of computer, and during preparation of train timetable and train operation diagram, manual modification can be effectively done at any time.
In his speech, Fu Zhimin pointed out that the space economy is the general term for the economic format formed by human beings engaged in all space activities and related industries, and all industrial activities induced by exploration, development and use of space by human beings can be included in the space industry.
Any person or inspector on site shall, if finding a dangerous case within the range of the Company during patrol inspection, immediately report to N+1 (superior) departments and the EHS Department (24h emergency on-duty telephone: 0553-5809188-8110) specific locations and on-site conditions of the hazards.
Fig. 1 Block Diagram for Logic Control of Control System (Example of Other Battery-electric Locomotive)
6 Precast of circular pipe: joints of the circular pipe should be precast with rotating process.
According to the principle of partition and in combination with the general layout, the Project is organized as an independent construction area according to the architectural design function and divided into 4 areas: stamping shop, body-in-white shop, painting shop and general assembly shop.
The floor is provided with a high area and a low area for dry and wet partition. The high floor area is paved with floor covering. Stainless steel floor is paved on the water accumulation area of the low floor area; gutters are arranged around the floor, and two floor drains are installed at the gutters to ensure no water accumulation.
Interpersonal relationship is the most difficult part. Only be selfless and non-obsessional, can interpersonal relationship goes well. - Still Thoughts by Cheng Yen
For the parts of the row-upon-row cable conduits that are 150~500mm away from the bending midpoint, supports and hangers shall be provided.
Piers and abutments are wrapped with carbon fiber for reinforcement, to improve bending resistance and thus to prolong service life.
2) The pipes shall be installed in the following order. The main pipes shall be installed before the branch pipes. After the fixation of the pipelines, the feeding and connections of the branch joints shall be carried out to control the central line and the buried depth of the pipeline.
⑵ According to the severity, potential hazards of accidents are classified into Levels A, B and C:
The traffic volume plan for all connecting roads is shown in Figure 4.2.1-1 and Figure 4.2.1-2.
Maximum brake torque 1794 Nm
The laying of electric pipeline should comply with the following requirement:
Pursuant to the inspection contract, the inspector of Purchasing Group has the right to supervise and control the inspection performed by the third party.
3. C35 concrete shall be used for the foundation and sidewall of the water-collecting well, and cast-in-place construction shall be used for it. Two layers of polyurethane waterproof paint are applied on the outside of the water collecting well wall.
Bidding documents shall be made in the form of open bid: Covers shall be designed by each bidder themselves, where full name of bidder must show on the cover, with official seal affixed, and hard cover is not allowed.
During the construction, any defectiveness or potential hazard found in safety facilities at height must be sloved in a timely manner; when personal safety is threatened, operation must be stopped immediately.
f. Appoint special person on duty to protect, inspect and rectify formwork which is installed and moulded to guarantee the installation quality of formwork.
The project has been in operation for six years, and the operation mileage ranges from 0.9 to 1.2 million kilometers.
Existing stations include Spezand station, Sari-AB station, Quetta station, Beleli station and Kuchlak station.
(Such as loosening blasting, oriented blasting and little-explosive blasting without throwing);
When the embankment slope height H is larger than or equal to (≥) 15m, the design shall be conducted based on high embankment.
(Note: We reserve the right to add more conditions as the case may be.)
In addition, each axle counting host has an axle number display to display the number of axles and the fault status of the segment; the axle counting of each segment can be separately reset to zero.
Employer: DTSP Foreign Fund Utilization Project Office
For the algebraic difference of gradients between adjacent grade sections on the EMU running track greater than 3‰, the vertical curve of the circular curve type should be adopted, with a radius not be less than 5000m, and not be less than 3000m under difficult conditions.
2. 11.2.9 Suitable instrumentation for measurement of the expected pressure drop across the filter.
As per "Specification of Final Acceptance and Handover" of Ministry of Railways and Kunming Railway Bureau, the Construction Headquarters has arranged the constructin contractors, the design unit, the supervision units, and railway operator to carry out 2-month spot inspetion by different disciplines and static and dynamic acceptance for the completed works since July 2010.
Communication with customers should be carried out within the specified period upon completion of negotiation, contract fulfillment and contract completion to understand the expectations, opinions and suggestions of customers, so as to achieve higher satisfactory degree of customers, including communication on product performance and quality issues.
1.5.5Common fault analysis and troubleshooting method are shown in Table 4-2.
The [host] indicator of the DCP on the side is on, and the LCD screen shows the message of "Host".
The rubber shock pad of the door stop shall be tightened without falling; the surface shall be free of crack and notch.
Provide the status of all lighting circuit of the intelligent lighting system, including operation status and fault alarm information.
Deadline: 09:30, October 18, 2018
The construction period stipulated in the construction contract is delayed due to insufficient supervision of the Supervisor;
The measured reference sound source at 1/3 frequency band with the mid-frequency of 80Hz LWA:
During reconstruction and expansion, the line passes through around the city and the round-the-city line is about 10km long; the existing T1 urban road section is changed to an urban road, which is connected to the round-the-city line by a two-way interchange ramp, to make traffic more smooth and fast.
3) The interval for the bounding shall be equal, and the reserved cores shall be long enough for terminating twice to thrice.
Check the explosives and blasting equipment before blasting operation; the checking must be performed by over two persons with check records provided; loss accidents shall be strictly prevented.
Additional components of converters include: EZ900F digital monitor, PU900F cache battery, and FU900F calibration pulse output.
The purposes are to confirm the characteristics of traffic flow, modes of travel, frequency of travel, economic and financial feasibility, road and junction improvement, road safety, etc.
For ordinary simple-supported beam pier and abutment inspection equipment, in general conditions, fence, cradle (set up at both sides of the pier) are set up at abutment and the place from bridge deck to pier and abutment is provided with an inspection ladder.
The power generated by the waste heat power plant can meet the demand of the cement plant to some degree. The waste heat power plant is connected to the main step-down station through 10kV busbar. The operation mode is grid connection instead of on-grid mode.
(k) Formal letters and drawings of changes to the contract agreed upon by both parties through negotiation during the construction;
Generally speaking, after many times of analysis and optimization, the recommended T1 route shall be located at a more proper location with fine topographical and geological conditions.
Various faults can be set, such as pedestrians, foreign bodies, vehicles and other obstacles;
The equipment shall, when the ticket fails to pass the verification, send the ticket to the invalidated ticket box and try to sell the ticket again at the same time.
5. Valve seat leakage shall conform to FCI 70-2.
After detailed analysis on the formation lithology, engineering geology, geological structure, hydrogeology, special geology, tunnel technology, and other factors of the Tunnel, the "Cloud Top Tunnel Risk Assessment Rating Table" is prepared according to the statistics.
The violation behavior shall be handled timely and the principle that lawbreakers must be prosecuted, laws must be observed and enforcement of laws must be strict must be implemented. Any illegal operation by misuse of authority or act of accepting bribes is prohibited;
Karst fillers can be divided into two categories by their formation: chemically deposited filler and clastic deposited filler.
(Informative Annex) Critical Hoisting Operation Plan of Mobile Crane
In this phase, the overall construction schedule will be prepared by following the principles below:
The east yard is the main courtyard, there are three yards in total from the main gate to the rear court, in which there is one yard from the gate to the Laojun Cave; there are two yards from Hushi to Zhengyang Gate; and there is three yards behind the Zhengyang Gate.
Supply Department shall be responsible for the selection and use of appropriate statistical technology to collect, transmit, analyze and process the data of those products provided by the supplier.
If the height of the last-built filler wall is higher than 4m, at the middle of the wall height, a horizontal collar beam tied with the frame column, shear wall and structural column and through the whole length of the wall shall be set .
Before the end of design or planned design phase, or before the end of construction action, all risk mitigation measures can be stopped in time.
Economic and reasonable tools shall be chosen according to actual geological conditions on site.
If any sign indicates that impairment is incurred in project under construction on balance sheet date, the corresponding provision for impairment shall be withdrawn according to the difference between book value and recoverable amount.
The photometers not used for one year or more shall be calibrated before using.
According to the requirements of the code for fire fighting, ground fire water pump adapters should be arranged outside the building to achieve the goal of putting out a fire rapidly.
(2)The rotate speed fluctuation rate ψ<1% at 400r/min and no-load conditions. In these two operation conditions, the maximum rotate speed nmax and the minimum rotate speed nmin are measured within 1min.
② For installation of horizontal air duct, the allowable error of levelness is not more than 3mm per meter; total error shall not be more than 20mm.
Applicable to all people suitable for peripheral blood collection;
It can be seen from Table 4-2-2-2 that the measured maximum transient pressure change extremum in 3s in the tunnel is 0.51kPa and the maximum peak-to-peak value is 0.62 kPa at the time of the CRH380AJ-0201 comprehensive test train passing through K2417+180 at the highest speed of 220km/h.
Kality Depot Mixed Traction and Step-down Substation Grounding Plan
Manufacturing quality of circular reinforced concrete poles shall meet provisions of current national standard Circular Reinforced Concrete Poles.
Asgat and Sukhbaatar County cultivate fine wool and semifine wool sheep. Erdenetsagaan cultivates Ujimqin sheep. Bayandelger County cultivates cows for meat and milk.
Refer to design of construction drawing for outdoor pipelines for layout of outdoor hydrants.
The waterproof construction project does not need personnel involved in special type of work. Labor service source is abundant and the price is stable with reference to the market labor service salary. The price is determined according to the average salary standard of employees in the first three months.
The main raw materials for steelmaking are 100% stainless steel scrap with small quantities of alloys.
RS485 communication two-bus WDZCN-RYJS-2X1.5
Serves as Project Chief Engineer in the EPC Project for 220 KV Transmission and Rewiring Line of Jiayan Hydropower Station in Luquan County, Yunnan Province from April 05, 2016 to March 22, 2017.
The new buildings of the Project are all located in the existing university campus with complete power supply and water supply facilities.
Under the conditions of running serving, complete the replacement, adjustment and supplement, etc, and conduct inspection for state and performance of each part in the meantime, and conduct the maintenance operation at the utilization interval of rolling stocks when the occurrent failures are found.
(5) For qualification of project manager: please refer to the pre-attached table of Instructions to Bidders;
Flexibility: 2-car formation and 4-car - 12-car formation
Systematic management procedures for tooling / tools are provided which stipulate the relevant management elements, and there are proofs showing the execution is almost perfect and fully meets the requirements.
These Measures apply to the project procurement with its budge approved by the USA Center.
h=4.2m, one blow continuously; or h=2.5m, two blows continuously
Bogie frame consists of two side beams, one front end beam, one lateral beam and one rear end beam. It has complex structure. Deformation of beam always happens in bogie frame assembly and affects assembly dimensions.
After treated and meet with the emission standards, the construction wastewater and domestic sewage (see section 4 for the treatment measures) will not produce adverse effects on the surrounding waters of wharf.
Input "Name", "Description", click "Create Backup" to complete the backup!
·Storing the images of cameras on roads, toll stations and rest areas uploaded to the monitoring sub-center.
The international standard gauge of the main railway line is 1435mm. At present, most countries in the world, including most European countries, Turkey, Iran, China and the Korean Peninsula, all adopt the standard gauge, and the total length of railways with standard gauge is 780,000 kilometers, accounting for 60% of the total railway length in the world.
1. Unless otherwise stated, all dimensions in this drawing are measured in mm.
2.2.5.3 When the container ship is used, it is necessary to use port shore cranes to lift EMUs to transport vehicles.
Technical Code for Maintenance of Highway Cement Concrete Pavements
China Railway Finance Company, Ltd. ("CRFC")
From the commencement of the project to the project completion and final accounting, all worth preserving documents and materials related to the project such as text, data, drawings, icons, audio, video and other media.
Post Certificate: EJA C(2016)12704228
Given that the unit is huge while the transportation channel is narrow, Parts of the unit shall be disassembled for transportation.
5.5.3 Information Communication, Participation, and Consultation 45
1) Construction of abutment body is completed (the back wall of abutment is constructed after prestressed tensioning).
Table 6-2 CWC Results (m/s) Corresponding to Different Vehicle Speed vtr and Different Unbalanced Acceleration aq at Wind Angle βW = 90°
For adjustment, it is required to keep the axis of the tail shaft vertical to the center line of the conveyor.
Intensive training for activists of party application in 2020
Woodland, featuring mainly arbors, shrubs and a small amount of economic forests, and slightly undulating terrain.
(4) When the mast is hoisted in position, prevent the collision with foundation bolt. And the dropping of mast should be handled with slowly to prevent the thread from being scratched.
1.13.2 General Description of Proposed System Solutions and Main Advantages
The prepared paint shall not be stored for a long time, and it is better to prepare it on the day of use.
4.6.3 Effect of Mineral Admixtures on Concrete Performance
6.5.5.3 The lower lock pin assembly, if affecting the three states of the coupler, shall be completely replaced.
Adjust the altitude valve on standard track and record AS pressure.
Choose competent service providers to provide full-time nursing services, including baby sitting and elderly care.
ε - Solar absorption coefficient, taken as 0.7 for dark-colored painted surface with dust, and 0.5 for light-colored painted surface with dust;
The validity of guarantee performance shall start upon the date of when you and the Contractor sighed the contract and the execution of the contract until you sign and issue or the date should be issued project Taking-Over Certificate.
6) Community service: 2 public parking lots, 2 property management offices, 1 comprehensive supermarket and community vegetable market are set.
With the rapid development of China's economy, many cities have started or planned the development and utilization of urban underground space such as subway, light rail transit and underground shopping mall. The development and utilization of underground space in China has entered a period of vigorous development and Chinese Journal of Underground Space and Engineering also is welcoming unprecedented development opportunities.
3) Sidewalk (with structural thickness of 39cm.
The top of the T-beam or hollow slab being prefabricated shall be cleaned with clean water after the initial setting of the concrete to remove laitance on the surface and slightly expose the aggregate on the beam top so that the bonding strength between concrete layers shall be increased during bridge deck pavement. Besides, prior to the casting of bridge pavement concrete, the bridge deck shall be carefully cleaned to ensure that the bridge deck is clean and free from any pollution.
The lightning arrester meets the requirements of IEC 60099-4.
1. Description: ceiling exhaust fan TP1.5
Design Drawing of Cross-Section of Single Track Embankment with Bottom Layer Filled with Group C Filling Materials
In the on-site inspection of Hurso traction substation, it was found that switches of control panels such as the integrated auto-control panel had no switch identifications.
The Regulations apply to the expediting of process machinery, electrical equipment, instrument and utility system equipment purchased by the Company for the project.
To strengthen the international coordination on the cooperation mechanism of China Railway Express, two joint working group meetings were successfully held in Kazakhstan and Poland in April and October this year, with important results being achieved.
(2) Try to reduce the number of trains used under the premise of satisfying passengers' travel requirements, improve the train operation efficiency, save train procurement cost, reduce operation cost and improve operation benefits.
Provision of labor protection articles on schedule is an effective way to prevent and reduce safety accidents, which must be paid more attention by the construction management personnel.
2. A weekly work schedule must be prepared according to the approved schedule plan and submitted to the Project Management Department on every Wednesday. The work in the last week will be summarized while the work arrangement for this week will be coordinated in the coordination meeting.
Communication power supply equipment: high-frequency switching power supply equipment and valve controlled lead-acid batteries are installed at each communication station and station along the railway, to provide reliable DC power. The UPS equipment in different capacities are newly provided, to provide uninterrupted AC power.
5.2 The main body (side wall, bottom slab) of the underground works is protected by combining with waterproof concrete and waterproof coiled materials.
All departments implement HSE principle.
2 The content and quantity of relevant engineering should be comprehensively corrected in the investment estimation based on the evaluation opinions of all disciplines.
Law of the People's Republic of China on Prevention and Control of Water Pollution (revised in 2017).
The test method shall comply with Annex C and Annex B to GB11836-39.
Employer: Yizheng Power Supply Company of State Grid Jiangsu Electric Power Company
In the interface management, the requesting party is responsible for proposing the technical requirements and parameters of the interface, and the implementing party is responsible for implementing the technical requirements and parameters in its work.
For determining the layout of stations and selecting the site of passenger stations and freight stations, such factors as the railway network planning, overall urban planning, industries layout, transportation demand as well as characteristics of passenger flow and freight flow, natural and engineering conditions, etc. shall be taken into an overall consideration. Passenger stations shall be connected into cities, and meanwhile connected with other transport modes.
"queryText": "Query\xa0\xa0\xa0\xa0\xa0\xa0",
that are made of screw-thread steel as per steps indicated in the second article of 8.4.5.3. The stirrups should be set between the above reinforcement stirrups of the upper layer and the below reinforcement stirrups of the lower layer with an interval of 1,000 mm.
Inspection of measures for controlling environment pollution during improved soil construction.
There shall be no electrical connection between the reinforcement of main stray current collection network and the main structural reinforcement of station, section tunnel, U-shaped slot or bridge.
Long-period vehicle storage site (emptied wagon CII:1-20weeks-3500unit)
The project refers to an integrated carrier with functions of high-end mall, office building, commercial apartment and six-star hotel, and will be constructed with brand-new-concept and ultra-luxurious residence, and world-class polo club and large area of high-end commercial cluster.
Address: Floor 4, Block B, Yunnan Copper Technology Building, No. 625, West 2nd Ring Road, KunmingPost Code: 650000
7)Complete the design task during contract breakdown:
6.7.7 The on-site responsible person is entitled to make decisions on the following issues according to the fire extinguishing and rescue needs:
Water supply pipe for higher zone of the tower DN80(L19 - L25)
dPS, y—primary spring lateral distance [mm], Y direction;
- EI EQUIPEMENT;
Cable tray should be set up horizontally to avoid deviation during laying.
10. Work Instructions for Shakeout and Sand Processing
Before one locomotive leaves the garage and after it enters the garage, visually check to confirm that the appearance of the main transformer cabinet is normal and external connectors are fastened well;
Pay attention to the overhead power lines when moving the excavator or unloading the earth in the dump truck. Do not work under the overhead power transmission line. When anyone is working at one side of the overhead transmission line, the vertical and horizontal distance from the person to the overhead line should be not less than 2.5 m and 4~6 m respectively (when the power voltage is 110~220 kv).
b) Content of the meeting: the internal audit team leader shall reiterate the audit objective, read the nonconformity report; propose the requirements and date for completing the corrective measures. The organization leaders shall give a speech.
△—displacement measured by displacement meter;
5. Since the vehicle is not subject to bidding, the specific parameters of the vehicle are unknown, it is temporarily designed according to the domestic vehicle parameters. After the vehicle bidding is completed and the specific parameters of the vehicle are determined, the corresponding adjustments shall be made.
Moreover, the usage rate of safety facilities/tools at the level crossing also needs to be explained.
Before changing the driving machine (vehicle) type, the drivers must take corresponding technical trainings and pass the examinations.
In the on-site inspection of NAGAD station, the sand source was not determined and there is no guarantee for locomotive sand.
This Project includes making necessary adjustments to itself based on the information shown in the diagram and issuing the final drawings of this Project.
The bolted plate surface must be dry and the operation shall not be performed in the rain.
The maximum bending moment: M=24P (N.m)
1. Disconnect the power supply to the air conditioning system and air switches CB1 and CB2 in the air conditioner cabinet.
Ponding occurs in local sections of this project.
Provide and configure network devices/routers to prioritize sufficient bandwidth for travel agency internet ticketing services.
(4) Positions where the new highway will cross with main roads parallel to it, and some traffic section may be occupied by the new highway;
According to the national, provincial and municipal laws and regulations on land and housing expropriation, a special compensation and resettlement standard for Luoyang Metro line 1 will be formulated and publicized, and an emergency plan will be formulated for possible situations.
In conclusion, all platforms of 10 passenger stations can be extended to 550m, and the investment will need to be increased by about RMB 28.80 million. Among them, for extension of the platform, the location of the comprehensive repair section in Na Teuy Station needs to be adjusted; the subgrade retaining protection works of Na Mor Station needs to be reconstructed; 2 culverts in Muang Nga Station need to be extended; 1 culvert in Luang Prabang Station needs to be extended.
Train management system (with the train control unit as the core component), traction and braking control system, door control system, air-conditioner control system, illumination and indication control system, passenger information system, fire alarm system and video monitoring system.
15) Heat exchanger, steam distribution header, and temperature and pressure reducer, etc.
The construction width of punching and rolling is the exact width of filled embankment. The subgrade surface is repaired to the design elevation of shoulders after rolling, and the requirements for subgrade drainage are met.
During the hoisting, first put two lifting hooks on the steel wire rope of the tower crane, then open the self-locking part of the hook, put it in the hook hole of the formwork, and then close the self-locking part, and start the lifting; or perform the lifting at the specified hook position on the formwork.
1. All dimensions in the drawing are in cm, H stands for the height of the relocated road; and B stands for the width of the relocated road.
7.1 After the effectiveness of this Contract, three months before each batch of goods is shipped, the Supplier shall prepare the export product packaging design scheme to achieve anti-corrosion (including salt corrosion), rainproof, shockproof, sun protection, drop resistance and other requirements.
Linear Relation Diagram of Settlement at Measurement Point and Times of Compaction
If the conditions are met, the train can reinitialized and carry out ATP monitoring.
Output: DRES outputs low level to ground. Voltage: 0~+3V, TJ indicator light (the green one) off.
5) After the wet joint concrete reaches the design strength, lift PC HOUSE to a certain position synchronously with the lifting and lowering system. Remove the PC HOUSE assembly platform, and slowly lower PC HOUSE onto PC HOUSE BRACKET.
The purging mouth shall be arranged at open section and strengthened. Safety area shall be provided during the purging and no person is permitted to stand in front of the purging mouth.
3.2.1 The client shall organize the training and assessment of the main management personnel of each participant in view of the characteristics of the track construction project and the quality control focus.
Participate in work accidents investigation and deal with these accidents, verify implementation of safety accident report and prevention measures;
This procedure applies to control management of company's equipment and facility.
Expected Service Life and Maintenance Cycle of Major Equipment Components
(5) 100% instrument and equipment used within valid calibration period during testing and inspection.
For TRUSS D, TRUSS E, TRUSS G and other plane trusses, bulk members will be transported to the wharf, and then overall assembly will be completed in fabrication workshop of Shengbaowang Wharf.
The three-level terrace is designed vertically according to the site situation, and the main structure of building adapts to the contour layout.
Note: each operation post in the Notification Board for On-duty Commander corresponds to one piece of board. The subsidiary company can adjust the information of the personnel in the notification board (such as waste heat power generation central control, and local control) according to the actual situation on site. For the template for the details of the content editing, see the Attachment.
The responsibilities, procedures, and methods for receiving, confirming, and addressing the design changes by each organization in accordance with the Management Measures for Secondary Operation of CR20G are as follows:
Party B: Shanghai Civil Aviation New Era Airport Design and Research Institute Co. Ltd.
N:3787333.62 E:484336.92 GK46+103.37 right 21.38
Fan Jixian, the General Manager of company has the overall and final responsibility for HSSE in our company and he is the first person responsible for HSSE work.
Connect the reinforcement in the column as the downlead on the floor 1, and use a \U+03A620 reinforcement to lead out of the outdoor underground 1 meter to connect with the outdoor ring-type grounding body. At the position as shown in the figure with 0.5m from the outdoor floor, a grounding resistance test card is reserved.
4. Layout of stations: all the stations are arranged in a transversal form except that the frontier station (Dawanle station) is arranged in a longitudinal form.
Check fire-fighting equipment regularly in accordance with applicable requirements.
3.6 Before mobilization, necessary training shall be given to the workers, and the workers for special and key posts shall have efficient post certificate before taking post.
Carbon steel reducerDN50/32 ASTM A105-N SW ASME B16.11 CL3000
Design of the communication system should meet the requirements of transportation organization and maintenance management at the line, provide a stable, reliable, smooth and high-quality communication platform for the traffic control, and also meet the requirement of train control and official communication.
Possess automatic switching function of wide dynamic, be able to automatically enable/disable wide dynamic when the environmental brightness changes;
Step 3: Based on the trend flow rate, the induced flow rate is obtained by using the impedance change matrix.
7.3 Application for Inspection (ZTT/QEOR84-07-GL)
g.Network card: at least two 1000 Mbps self-adaptive Ethernet cards, RJ45 interface;
Ventilation system structure description and ventilation calculation
9.7.2 The workflow and main process of FAI are as follows:
The calculation method of the actual critical speed of the vehicle with worn wheels is consistent with that of the vehicle with new wheels, and the actual critical speed is 390km/h.
Geological conditions and evaluation of emptying tunnel body section are basically the same with the diversion tunnel. Main engineering geological problems of the tunnel: stability of cavities with weathered rocks in shallow buried tunnel section; local fault (F1) and stability of cavities in shear broken zone; stability of cavities with fractured rocks in thecontact alteration zone of intrusive rocks; water burst in local tunnel section.
1. Open flame: The open flame of matches, cigarettes, electrogas welding, blast burners, etc. can cause gas explosion.
Unit 1 Car TC1 DXMe communication fail
3. Cost for management: Refer to the Rules for the Preparation Of Investment Estimates For Foreign Aid Packages issued by the Foreign Economic Cooperation Bureau of the Ministry of Commerce (Trial), it shall be taken as 8% of direct costs.
5.4.4 The archive data about the scrapped equipment shall be separately archived and kept by the user organization.
EN 14363: 2005 Railway Applications - Testing and Simulation for the Acceptance of Running Characteristics of Railway Vehicles - Running Behaviour and Stationary Tests;
11. In the loading and unloading links of the transportation process, the aggregates will be segregated, that is, when the materials are loaded, the aggregates will produce the first segregation in the compartments and form the segregation interface; during unloading, due to hypsokinesis of the dump truck and secondary accumulation of aggregate, the second segregation is formed.
(2) Protection for roadbed slopes and reclaimed slopes at station yards is reasonably designed. Plane and subgrade protection is properly arranged for sand areas. For subgrade and station yard works, fillings are compacted in time without loose surface to avoid soil erosion.
Blast capacity: 100003/h, humidifying capacity: 5Kg/h, external static pressure: 400Pa
Layout Plan for DK18 Camp (2# Auxiliary Camp) of No.1 Project Management Department of Nairobi-Malaba Railway Project
③ When the surface layer of cutting subgrade bed fails to meet the requirements, replacement, soil improvement and other measures shall be carried out.
Max. weight of axle load and allowance of load of each axle;
During paving, it shall be paved 5~10cm on the paved layer and the overlapped part shall be removed manually.
The pressurization medium of the circulatory impulse test shall be water or oil; the test pressure waveform shall meet provisions of relevant standards; the peak value is 1.33 times of rated working pressure (320kPa) and the frequency is 0.5Hz-1.25Hz.
19.1 The Sales Department is responsible for delivering products and related documents to the user as per the Contract, meeting their other needs for sales service. The QA Department is responsible for dealing with quality problem at the delivery site and answering the user's questions on product quality.
Q: flow l/s (unit: L/s)
5.8.2.4 Selection of Structural Forms of Bridges and Culverts
Operating lighting I for entrance/exit E-A of NS24
After the construction of plot ridge, the plow layer soil can be laid on the leveled plots. Before laying, the leveled plots shall be leveled by labor at the areas where their elevation is higher or lower than the standard. Soil used for the plow layer shall meet the relevant standards and be laid by labor.
See Table 1 below for long-term test performance requirements of structure adhesives
Design Specification for LABU-INDODE No.7Double-track Super Major Bridge
Organizing the acceptance for concealed works, and filling acceptance date for concealed works.
The Commercial Department selects interested suppliers and fills in the Review Form of Primary Selection of Suppliers, according to the aforesaid information obtained.
2. Design elevation and thickness of original bridge deck slab shall be inspected prior to construction. New bridge deck uses waterprood concrete and guarantees that the original elevation of bridge deck shall be maintained after construction.
One circuit of the 115kV outgoing line is connected to Mengsai traction transformer, wherein the line length is about 1.7km, and the cross section of wires is 240mm2. The other circuit of the 115kV outgoing line is connected to Meng'a traction transformer, wherein the line length is about 63km, and the cross section of wires is 240mm2.
During the lifting or lowering operation with the hydraulic lifter, a certain length of steel strands must be reserved at the top. If there are too many strands reserved, the strands may greatly influence the operation of the strands during the lifting or lowering process and the locking and opening of the top anchor and upper anchor of the hydraulic lifter.
Diesel generator room, oil storage room, power distribution and transformer room
6.2.7 The density of pre-laid ballast bed shall not be less than 1.6g/cm3.
Party B does not have the right to refuse. All expenses incurred have been included in the total contract price, and Party A will not pay any additional fees.
Determination of profile design standards mainly based on the following two aspects:
e) Consultant and expert group shall participate in emergency rescue work, give advice on disaster salvage method and dos and don'ts about chemical disaster fighting, and participate in decision making involving technical content.
b. The mirror light is set above the mirror, and lamps with metal casing are not recommended as the mirror light.
Comprehensive Energy Demonstration Project of Innovation Pioneer Park of Zhuzhou Railway
The design plan shall include the list of Project Engineers/Project Team Members, the overview of design development project, the review, verification and confirmation activities in various phases, and the responsibilities of activities.
3.8.2 The Joint Venture Agreement shall be deemed as an annex to the Contract upon confirmation by the Employer.
It is located in Shangzhou to Gaoyao (in the territory of Luonan County). From the north of the resurrection fault to the northern part of the southern margin of the Mangling granite (at the county boundary), it is a complex anticline structure composed of the deep metamorphic rock series of the Taihua Group in Archean Group.
│ │ │ │ ├─216200DK Bridge Work Spots
Above test curves indicate that, during such conditions as train separation, low pressure of main air cylinder (down to 588kPa), insufficient braking force, removal of brake controller handle, power failure of emergency solenoid valve, and power failure of control source (DC110V), emergency braking is applied to the EMU.
Intake valve of ozone generator is closed automatically 10 minutes later.
In accordance with the document of Notice on Qualification for Promotion of 126 (Su Qing etc.) Senior Technical Title (CQZGBF [2017] No. 11) and the job demands, we have decided upon research that:
Broadcast line of ZN-RVS-2X1.5-SC15 and fire telephone line of ZN-RVVP-2X1.5-SC15 are used.
The production equipment and production tooling (Attachment 6) shall meet the needs and the functional requirements in accordance with national regulations. The number and variety of tooling shall meet the needs of the product.
Political quality, professional conduct, decision-making ability, executive ability, innovation ability, team building, work effectiveness, ability to fulfill safety duties, training effect, labor discipline totaling of 10 indicators.
Side beam (with width of 2.85m): 99.6; side beam (with width of 2.40m): 91.7; medium slab: 92.5
The Buyer is entitled to request replacement of disqualified or incompetent installation operators.
Taking computer as main technical mean, computer interlocking system can realize real-time control on basic signaling equipment in stations, such as signal, turnout and track circuit in compliance with specified requirements, to complete signaling system of station interlocking, including computer interlocking equipment, signal, switch machine, track circuit equipment and indoor relay, etc.
For the schematic layout of Butuah station, see Figure 8-4-2.
In a tournament, the lighting in the Stadium of Fourth Precinct shall create an enthusiastic and unbounded scene, while after a tournament, it shall bring a cozy and peaceful atmosphere.
Heavy cast iron manhole covers are adopted for manholes on existing roads and planned roads, light cast iron manhole covers for those on the grass land and river banks, and "Five Prevention" (noise prevention, hopping prevention, theft prevention, falling prevention, and displacement prevention) manhole covers for those set outside the water plant.
During the construction process, attentions are paid to establishing and improving the quality assurance system, which can operate effectively.
1. Based on the soil test result, it's found that (7)2-1 completely weathered mudstone and (7)0-1 completely weathered basalt have strong expansibility, belonging to filling materials of group D. (4)1 fine-angular gravel soil and (6) blocky stone soil belongs to group A and B. Only qualified filling materials can be used for embankment construction.
e. For the driving motor, the three-phase 380V and 50Hz power supply is applicable; the ingress protection of motor shall be 55.
2. Any discrepancy toward natural ground level following the rechecking is proposed, the Contractor shall submit a corresponding revised elevation table listing the wrong ones to the Supervisor. Elevation in dispute shall not be disturbed until correct elevation is determined by the Supervisor, original design organization and Employer.
In consideration of the fact that Party A is the General Contractor of "the ‘Communication, Signaling, Electrical, and Electrification' System Integration, Information, Disaster Prevention and Safety Monitoring, and Related Works for Hunan Section of the new Changsha-Kunming Passenger Dedicated Line" project.
Main training subsystem mainly refers to the main training software operating on instructor console PC, which is displayed via main training display.
Use a piece of white cloth sprayed with Loctite 7063 to clean the outer race seat of non-transmission bearings of the axle suspension bearing box and then apply a thin layer of MOBILUBE SHC 80W-140 grease evenly on the mounting seat with a brush.
Refers to tun off the switch, and unplug plug fuse or fuse head.
 Fault caused by an accident irrelevant to the normal operation of the component.
Equipment and pipeline in the frame, strengthening framing at door and window openings shall be installed firmly and in the proper postion.
Purchase enough plastic cloth for rebar storage area to protect rebars from corrosion due to snowy whether.
Preset construction built-in fitting and reserved facilities at the closure section
It will take into account all factors that contribute to displacement of the contact wire with respect to the pantograph, including:
1. Description: washbasin for the disabled _x000D_
(3) The unique geographical conditions have brought the advantage of high-quality leaf tobacco.
The awareness of all personnel participating in quality work is further strengthened through activities of the QC group.
When the concrete is not unloaded within 3 hours after the delivery from the factory and the initial setting time of concrete is not reached, a certain amount of superplasticizer can be added when the concrete slump does not meet, so that the concrete slump can satisfy the design and construction requirements.
(1) The specification, model and quality of the portal structure drop post shall meet the design requirements.
⑤ Damage to pipe orifice due to excessive pressure.
Chapter 6 _ Annex 3 Technical Proposal of Gangway
(XCI) Assets with Limited Ownership or Use Right
Sheet No.: TKSG/R-JS/T-030201-007 Rev: A/0
Concrete shall be pumped, concrete is poured as per horizontal layering and concrete is duly vibrated when it is poured into the formwork.
Jaw 2 for intake sand AJC1021062A
Balanced charging shall be carried out periodically, usually once every three to six months.
Final version of the operation instruction, maintenance manual, driver operation manual and troubleshooting guide in both Chinese and English and English version
6. Unpack and accept equipment, on-site handover, and review storage measures
Refer to Table 1-4 below for new shunting locomotives of each station of the line:
3. Prepare the progress plan of the project and hereby prepare the annual, quarterly and monthly project progress plans;
Cable construction: cable route construction shall determine the electric cable path according to the construction design drawing and site conditions. Before the excavation, the underground metal pipeline detector shall be used to carefully detect the underground pipelines on the route and identify them clearly to avoid digging injury.
Discharge of domestic water and washing water of the staff shall be calculated as per 95% of their water consumption.
4.3 These management regulations shall come into force upon August 12, 2019.
Table 3-5-3 Mechanical property of 7050-T7651 and 6061-T6
Figure 12.5.18 Schematic Diagram of Cross Section of Longitudinal Pre-attached Grouting Pipe Method
We have accomplished the (divisional works) and it has passed self-inspection. Please review and accept it.
3. Recognition condition and measurement method for transfer of financial assets
All lighting devices on the double-headed train were switched on when corresponding instructions were give on the master control train, as shown in Figure 4.30-17;
The range of the main feed water system is from the deaerator outlet to the feed water header inlet of the economizer of the heat recovery boiler in the incineration room.
3.1.1 The coordinate systems of railway engineering 3D geographic information should be classified into the following 4 types: the spatial rectangular coordinate system (Cartesian coordinate system), the geodetic coordinate system (ellipsoidal coordinate system), the plane projected coordinate system and the project coordinate system.
4.1 Overall Structure and Installation Dimensions(With Chassis)
44 0.555467E-04 -0.315834E-03 -0.635744E-03
If the chief inspector or the same supervision engineer assigned to the site by the supervisor serve on the Uganda construction site for each full year, the client shall directly give the chief inspector or the supervision engineer a one-month incentive fee according to the amount of remuneration for the supervision post in the agreement, and the bonus shall be paid immediately upon the expiration of the service period.
[25] Mu Jiancheng. Development and Outlook of Railway Centralized Traffic Control (CTC) System in China. Railway Transport and Economy, 2004, 26(13): 6-8.
The datum control points is projected onto the first floor; the pre-embedded iron parts shall be pre-embedded at the corresponding positions on the floor and be welded firmly with the floor-slab reinforcement.
a) Mapping and recording of the existing situation and certification of basic data.
(4) The problems existing in the process of project construction or needed to be solved by coordination will be fed back in written and then implemented.
With the continuous development of urban traffic, new demand appears constantly, different traffic volume demand and different terrain conditions, has produced a variety of new rail transit types.
(4) Decide the handling matters of illegal personnel according to the authority.
The backfill material shall conform to the design and specifications.
The protruding cornice, window frame and waist line will be reserved with 3% water slope and water drip. The water drip channel is 15-20mm deep and 15-20mm wide, with a uniform width.
Major machining products: motor rotor support, gallows beam of high-speed railway paving and erecting equipment, axle box and other large-scale steel structural part.
For the purpose of further doing a good job in special disaster and loss prevention and training services during the insurance period, Party B shall establish a specialized risk control team under the insurance project according to requirements of Party A and the Insurance Broker, to assist the Insurance Broker in preparing disaster and loss prevention suggestions which shall be submitted to Party A for reference.
6. Energy-saving and environment-friendly green station: The project has been constructed adhering to the design concept of building a green station and an environment-friendly station from the beginning of design.
16) Visually check all fire extinguishers and ensure that they are in place and their seals are not damaged.
(2008) BLRZ No. 0001317
When the thickness of underlying layer of foundation base is greater than 3m, the powder jet mixing pile may be adopted for base treatment.
The landslide mass in this zone is mainly composed of plain fill, red clay, and completely weathered marl.
4. Prepare detailed operation instructions for live crossing operation, and carry out careful technical disclosure.
Fire-resistant hose and interlayer insulation materials shall be made of noncombustible materials, and the insulation thickness shall meet the design and specification requirements; the Contractor shall provide samples in advance for confirmation by the Employer and the Supervisor, the disqualified products shall be replaced.
Germany gmp International Architecture Design Co., Ltd.
For single wrap elevators, prepare the rope damp before hang up the wire rope.
1. The overall implementation plan of the highway transportation organization of this project:
The rotation speed of the condenser fan is about 1670 rpm; it is a single-speed fan and is unadjustable in speed;
Including a static investment of USD 569.7624 million and economic and technical indicator of USD 11.7136 million /main line km.
The compaction criteria of filling materials shall comply with relevant specifications.
Anchor hoop Y400 JL51-00
After a drill, the assessment contents shall be determined according to relevant drill scheme. A field evaluator shall give his/her comments on the drill and conduct an overall evaluation for the drill in combination of the assessment results.
Strictly follow the relevant local road management regulations and laws; seek a great quantity of opinions from traffic police, road administration and other departments, obey the arrangements and direction made by them, and observe relevant rules and regulations.
When the trains enter into areas with normal wayside ATP/ATO equipment, trainborne equipment receives valid ATP/ATO information and prompts drivers. Drivers may, without stopping the train, switch the train to operate in ATP or ATO mode.
Materials should be carried and put gently during handling in the room. Sundries within the site need to be removed timely. Construction tools and materials should be stacked neatly to prevent damage and pollution to doors and windows, wall face and corner bead.
(1) Vehicle and equipment purchase cost: RMB 1279.4645 million (EUR 164.0339 million), all financed by foreign government loan.
4. If C30, C31 and C32 interfere with longitudinal pre-stressed pipeline, they shall be properly bended; if A4, A4' and A9 bars collide with anchor recess, they shall be cut off.
Review the technical qualification certificates of the subcontractors on the construction site.
Via structural splitting and conversion, it is possible to effectively realize mechanized undercutting and prefabricated construction for large rectangular sections of underground projects.
1/3 of a wooden screw shall be nailed in and the rest 2/3 shall be screwed in.
This equipment shall comply with the mandatory national and local environmental protection standards and relevant technical specifications of Turkey.
The water flow indicator shall be installed horizontally without large inclination and the vanes shall be able to move sensitively; there shall be straight pipe sections the length of which shall be 5 times the diameter of the installed pipe both in front and rear of the water flow indicator; during the installation of water flow indicators, it shall be ensured that the water flow direction is in conformity with the arrowhead on the water flow indicator.
6.3.3 The circulating water system shall be adopted for the rainfall device, in order to ensure that the recovery rate meets the requirement of 70%.
1) Undertake the import and export of bulk cargo from Nairobi and surrounding areas;
Other filter materials e.g. ceramics or stainless steel may be used, provided that these achieve a 3 µm filtration and that none of the substances to be analyzed adhere to the filter.
4.2.1 For items where new technologies, new processes or new equipment are used, the approval from the superior authority is required and the trail operation for a certain duration must be performed to proof the new things are safe, reliable and technically advanced before they are used on the operating lines.
1) In the overall planning, Luang Prabang Station is located at about 5km of the southeast side of Luang Prabang( Luang Prabang is the major cultural and tourism resort as well as the world famous historical and cultural city) and near to the existing ring road.
Hosted construction monitoring and test on prestressed friction loss of the Grand Bridge (60+100+60m) crossing Qiqihar-Tailai Highway on Harbin-Qiqihar Passenger Railway and the Grand Bridge (60+100+60m) crossing Qiqihar-Siping Railway in 2011.
Meanwhile, the advance support of pipe roof has the following features:
1-4.0m slab culvert, crossing angle 30\U+00B0 (overpass concurrently for flood drainage)
Passenger flow (morning peak hours) in the short term 2031
② The thickness of the selected flange, the number of bolt holes, the water line processing, the relevant diameter and other geometric dimensions shall meet the corresponding requirements of the working pressure of the pipeline.
5.5.9 "First-in-first-out" (FIFO) is required for the products that are required by the warranty (storage).
○ Earth works (ground works and structures)
Water inlet on the right is almost blocked; coping concrete at water outlet suffers edge failure.
Maximum limit of allowable lateral edge (m)
Each functional area of the building is adapted to local conditions, combined with the site topography, and the elevation difference is used to make rational zoning. Forest theaters and forest parks are set up on the tour routes between the buildings, which not only ensure the convenience of traffic, but also increase the interest of the tour routes.
3 # Bridge is a new bridge, and the bridge site is located at a perennial waterless gully. At present, the passing traffic makes a detour through the local mountain road. It is proposed that the current mountain road will be used as a relocation road for local traffic and construction access road after renovation.
Cable sheath shall be intact, cable shall be accompanied by factory quality inspection certificate, and the related batch cable performance inspection report shall be attached.
◆Detection method: pumping (at a rate higher than 500 ML/min)
13.2.4 The construction of ballastless track bed in the rail expansion joint section shall meet relevant requirements stated in Chapter 9 of this Standard.
According to SIL0 requirements and Appendix A in EN50128:2011, ACU software in design will adopt the following technical methods:
Construction process (including construction, material supply, supervision on equipment manufacturing and construction inspection)
The quarry, which is near the Expressway, is controlled by local private person and has not been exploited yet. However, it is estimated that exploitation procedure is difficult to be handled. The quarry is mentioned in the Tender Document and geological report. Specific exploitation procedure shall be coordinated and handled by Uganda Highway Authority.
(2) The main parts and components (compressor, motor, electronic expansion valve, solenoid valve, temperature and humidity sensor, microcomputer controller, etc.) of the multi-connected air conditioning system, multi-connected split air conditioner and rooftop mounted split heat-pump air conditioning unit shall be of international famous brand.
Responsibility cost management, labor force management and secondary operation
Trailer: 2 sets, two shifts of drivers, RMB 2,000/D (24 hours)
When cabinet height is taller than 0.8m, the center is 1.6m from the ground;
The inverter part takes the voltage of the support capacitor as the input, and the traction control device controls the turning-on/off of the IGBT.
The block line can be the whole section between two stations, i.e. block section, or part of the section, i.e. block subsection.
a) The inspector shall inspect according to the drawings, process and inspection procedures on the basis of qualification in the self-check of the operators.
Therefore, there is no optimum value of stiffness and damping in the horizontal plane of the seismic mitigation and isolation bearing.
Total of 16-rebars in A-Type anti-collision separation guardrails for motor and non-motor vehicles of whole bridge/kg
4 One-star to five-star internal trainers are corresponding to assesses assistants - experienced internal trainers.
6-3-1 Silty clay (Q3al1): The bottom elevation is 287.08and the thickness is about 2.7m.
Lr,b - A-weighted sound level measured at the sound receiving point of equivalent location before installation of sound barrier (dB(A));
Left side of N-S line YDK12+082~YDK12+128 with a length of 46m.
Firstly, examine any conditions which endanger the injured, including massive hemorrhage, asphyxia, blowing wound, and severe poisoning, shall be treated and rescued promptly.
Contract Agreement for Special Maintenance for Asphalt Pavement of Some Expressway in Anhui Province in 2017-2019 (Contract No.: GSXB-2017-01A)
Project Manager: Ye Xiangyang (ID number 310108196506064017); Chief Engineer: Liu Xiaodong (ID number 372323198709261850).
Establish and implement corrective measures for existing unqualified / non-conformance items.
(7) Train relevant technicians and management personnel designated by Surinamese side in Paramaribo, the capital of Suriname. Chinese Side only provides Chinese Side teachers and teaching materials.
During normal use, the discharge pressure drop of acetylene cylinders shall not exceed 0.1MPa/h. If a large flow rate is required, multiple acetylene cylinders shall be used for converging gas supply.
Evaluations are made based on the C-116 report of ORE.
Table 4-17 Stress and Deformation Conditions of Steel Shell under Different Cases
Adjust the high-pressure grouting pump to the designed grouting pressure and then start grouting. The grouting shall be ended when the designed top elevation is reached.
First, each panel and cabinet shall be subject to rough horizontal adjustment, and then the adjustment shall be made from the first surface at one end of the column panel and cabinet, and the foundation channel steel shall be bolted according to the requirements of the equipment after the adjustment is qualified.
11.3 Breach and Liability of Party B
The reinforcement meter shall be set around pile tip (about 2m) to detect bearing capacity of the bearing stratum.
Develop quality management systems into documents and maintain the effectiveness?
The Chinese Side is responsible for the design, installation, supply and commissioning of electrical equipment and distribution lines from the lower part of the transformer's low voltage terminals.
The Contractor shall bear all costs arising therefrom and extend the construction period.
(5) The water spray device shall be capable of spraying water to the body end, sides and top simultaneously and uniformly.
8.4.8.Air conditioning unit shall be provided with protections such like overload protection, short protection, overvoltage and undervoltage protections, open-phase protection, compressor overpressure protection, low-temperature no-start protection, etc.
P6 EPPM system adopted for project management software
(2) The smoke detector should be arranged reasonably based on air flow characteristics of saloon during train operation.
2000m in general conditions, and 1000m in difficult conditions;
Hygienic Standard for Communal Toilet in City Municipality (GB/T 17217-1998)
When the filling surface is tilting and c ≠ 0, the earth pressure calculation result is only for reference.
2. For the project, ± 0.000 is equivalent to _______ m; the anti-floating design water level is _______ m.
After operating the isolation device, the isolation indicator will light up.
Clearly specify the process conditions for storage of insulating materials in system or process documents, and give clear indication of the warehousing date of insulating materials, for the purpose of first-in-first-out (FIFO).
Capacity: max. slide stroke of test cone: 70mm
The clay backfilling shall meet the provisions of specification Article 4.2.1.2
Analyzing whether the accident is a company-level accident of SINOPEC (including the accident reported to SINOPEC for archiving)
The shaft centers of the connecting flange of the main reducer and cylinder and other main equipment shall be marked,and then the shaft center of the main reducer shall be the benchmark, and centers of the connecting flange and cylinder shall be inspected and adjusted by the level.
The gas supply pipes, pipe fittings and valves of the instruments are made of stainless steel, and 1/2″ and above pipe fittings shall be of but welded type and in slip-on connection after the stainless steel ball valve. Generally, this section of stainless steel shall be of Φ8X1, Φ10X1, and adopt other specifications in special conditions.
5 The maximum gas concentration measured in the stable return air flow close to an excavation face shall be taken as the gas concentration at this cross-section.
Major scope of civil engineering contracting includes but not limited to:
Table 6-7 Multiplication Value Between Bending Radius and Diameter of Cable
⑫-1Sandstone (C): highly weathered (W3), yellowish brown, arenaceous texture, stratified structure, greatly developed joint fissure, rock core in block shape and partially weathered into soil shape, hoarse sound heard when hammered, low recovery rate of rock core.
The situation is comparatively simple, only causing certain harm or threat to the life and property safety and the living and production order of overseas personnel in a small scope of an overseas production and operation unit and affecting the reputation of the Company
Certificate No.: CJCZ (2004) Z 1956
During the switch of lubricant filter, filter of speed controller oil and oil cooler, the balance valve between two parts shall not be opened until the oil pressure on each side is balanced.
The opening line of the slope behind the plant is EL.831m, which is currently excavated to EL.734m.
After installation, the total eccentricity should not be greater than 50 mm.
It can be replaced by measuring the insulation resistance with 2500V megohmmeter.
(2) A 60mm concave shall be set respectively at both sides of beam profile for the installation of power supply track.
2.4.2.1. Management Organization for Interface Works
3.5.3 The new 4-car train will be set with a train communication network conforming to IEC61375. MVB-EMD bus will be used for both the train bus and vehicle bus to ensure compatibility between train sub-systems.
Since the issuance of the first railway product certificate to an overseas manufacturer in 2006, as of October 2018, CRCC has issued 506 railway product certificates for overseas manufacturers, covering 98 overseas enterprises in Europe, North America, Asia, and Africa.
Then, move the operating valve handle to Position 4. Reduce the pressure of the brake pipe to 400kPa and move the handle to Position 3. After the pressure stays stable, move the operating valve handle to Position 2 and charge air. The pressure of the brake cylinder shall be released till below 30kPa within 45s by the Valve 120-1.
The Bid Inviter will draw up a list of the frequently used components and spare parts list and the quantity required for the operation cycle specified in the Bid Data Sheet, and calculate the total price at the unit price provided in the Bid, and include in the bid price.
It is suggested that EPC mode shall be applied to the construction of the Project, which means that the EPC Contractor shall be in charge of the design, the procurement of equipment and materials, the construction and the test run of the entire Project, and submit a complete deliverable engineering project.
b. Check whether the following components are provided for the tester: a ZC29B-2 earthing resistance tester; 2 pieces of auxiliary grounding rod; 5m-, 20m- and 40m-long conductor (one piece for each specification)
(5) If any quantity supplied falls short of the quantity agreed in that list, the Employer shall supply the margin; if any quantity supplied exceeds that agreed in that list, the Employer shall transport the excess out of the construction site;
C2——Mass of filtrated substance and filter after drying, g, rounded to 0.01g;
The basic intensity of earthquakes along the line is Magnitudes 7-9. Bridges in all basic intensity areas are listed as follows:
4. Stainless Steel Single Basin Sink and Fittings for Dishwasher
Meanwhile, the embedding of steel bars for frame top stopper shall be completed.
Secondary feeding process is adopted in mixing, with flowing sequence: mixing of water, cement, admixtures and additives for about 1 min into cement mortar, then adding coarse and fine aggregate for mixing.
The construction quality of cable tray shall meet the requirements specified in Article 4.12.3 of Standards for Construction Quality Acceptance of Power Supply Project of High Speed Railway Electric Traction (TB10758-2010).
(1) Supervise and inspect the Subcontractor's implementation of the resolution of the safety committee, put forward opinions in handling major safe and civilized construction problems and submit them to the safety committee for decision making.
1. Only for water pipes of Φ50 mm or less
The supervision and inspection of the certified product factoryshall be conducted at least once every year (according to the certified product category and stable status of production), to ensure that the necessary daily work and procedures are kept at an acceptable level.
If necessary, the Contractor shall prepare two copies of photos with signatures, one of which shall be kept by himself, but the cost of the extra one shall be borne by the Contractor.
DIN 53436-5, Producing thermal decomposition products from materials in an air stream and their toxicological testing — Part 5: Method to calculate the toxicity ISO 13344, Estimation of the lethal toxic potency of fire effluents
Bridge deck concrete pouring could refer to Figure 3.10.1-2.
G. Clean and check whether the three-point combined oil tank is normal.
16.1 The bid shall become valid from the deadline for submitting of Bidding Documents as specified in the Bid Data Sheet and shall remain valid within the period specified in the Bid Data Sheet.
Step 3: use the total station coordinate measuring function to review the positioning points of each building.
The Project Department shall be set up according to the mode of "six departments and three offices".
Limitation on mixed radionuclides in Type A packages
Insulation resistance of the motor with 10KV rated voltage at room temperature shall not lower than 1MΩ.
Establish the connection channel with the local meteorological station, collect the weather forecast and achieve the prevention in advance;
(9) In order to prevent the lifting pole from sinking when it is erected in silt and water-logged ground, two sleepers shall be clamped at the root of lifting pole, fixed with bolts. In addition, the root of lifting pole shall be padded with stones or other things.
Director of Engineering Survey: Hu Huihua Title: Senior Engineer
e. Electric poles shall be lifted and removed by a 25t crane.
The implementation of this project not only can make the sections along Wushuihe a new highlight of cultural landscape of Huaihua City, but also is of profound significance for enhancing urban flood control, improving living environment and city grade, strengthening investment capacity and promoting citizen's happiness index.
2. During removal of lateral formwork, the strength of concrete shall ensure that the surface edges and corners will not be damaged; and during the removal of bottom formwork and the support thereof, the strength of concrete shall conform to the design or specification.
A observation period shall be 2 hours. If the elevation variation of a observation point stays within 5mm for 48 hours, the settlement is deemed to be over and the settlement result of the last day shall be the elevation after loading.
Properties of Customers includes intellectual property and personal information.
Each Ticket Office (TO) shall be equipped with two or more Points of Sale Terminals (POST), which are capable of analyzing and re-validating all types of Fare Tickets and Fare Cards.
②Interlock microswitch 471 acts to close the circuits 244 - 801.
Install above -40x4 hot galvanized flat steel at the position +0.3m from the indoor ground
Code for Acceptance of Construction Quality of Underground Waterproof (GB 50208-2011)
(1) Safety Glazing Materials in Building (GB 15763.2-2005)
The regular foundation and ground treatment method in this work is to replace for crushed stone sand. Parts seriously soaking in water and other special sections should be replaced for macadam or block stone. The strength of materials for replacement should meet the requirements of design or specifications.
(2)After repairing the insulation or equipment replacement, it is necessary to carry out insulation and dieletric test.
Cold expansion machine
HSE Manager verifies correct behaviors, correctly executes quality standard and takes necessary actions to meet quality standard for a project and accessory contract requirements.
A circular fire-fighting access is planned around the site, and auxiliary rooms such as equipment rooms are arranged in the downward direction of the south ramp.
4) It shall be possible for the input and output circuit breakers (fuses) to be reliably disconnected in the case of short circuit or overcurrent, and the overcurrent value shall comply with the specifications of the product manual.
(4) For cracking defects of the pile foundation of piers, it is recommended to repair the cracks and expand sections or increase piles for reinforcement after proper excavation according to cracking situation. Meanwhile, panniers or paving should be adopted for protection.
Through various cameras, operation management personnel can check main areas of each station, operation dispatching center and vehicle base on the monitors installed at the control console in the dispatching center.
Responsible for specific construction of the Project and general contracting management
Article 13 The enterprise must implement the responsibility system for work safety and clarify the work safety responsibilities of leaders at all levels, organizations at all levels, project managers and functional departments.
3)For the system designed by Puzhen Bombardier, the engineering department designer needs to carry out subsystem hazard analysis, and RAMS team is responsible for reviewing the designer's subsystem hazard analysis report. For specific implementation, please refer to the SSHA part in the Safety Design Specification;
The workshop evacuation lighting is for reference only. It will be deepened later based on actual workshop layout.
≥ 0.6 m/s² (0-30km/h)
They are invited to participate in the summing-up meeting, evaluation meeting and some activities of the Supervisor, so that they can give sufficient support and cooperation to the supervision work.
g. Tension the belt and adjust the spring compression length including the thickness of the 2 spring clamping plates.
Cross work is prohibited (cross work, please stop working)
2. This building is a frame structure with the building area of 332 m2 and totally a floor of 3.60 m-height.
2.1 The heat source is the solar heat collection system and supported with electric heating.
After marshalling of fixed length, single pantograph operates, the scheme of extra-high voltage bus running through the traction transformers of two cars is adopted to favorably solve the problem presented in the relation between pantograph nets when current is running through two/three pantographs at the same time after coupling for multiple operation of short marshaled train.
Water consumption points and power consumption points of high-pressure washers, arranged in the open air
The technical requirements for concrete based on characteristics of the works shall be submitted in written form to the on-site concrete mixing station, including the design strength and impermeability grade of the concrete; requirements for concrete raw materials: cobblestone grain diameter and category of cements and additives; slump and initial/final setting times of concrete; concrete construction commencement date, concrete construction site and concrete volume.
Document No.: PJSG BMRCL PHASE-2 (2020) No.001
ISO 3381: "Measurement of Noise inside Railbound Vehicles"
Table 1-7 Unit: mg/L (except for pH)
3. High subgrade and long high diversion structure are built behind and on both sides of the abutment respectively, to control bridge size and contract channel at river crossing area.
When the specification of frame is too long that it cannot be included in this sheet, the roadway composition and pavement structure shall be presented in separate sheets.
ATP cabinet terminal block T5 (car 1)
If the oil motor always stays at the "load reduction" position, this means that it is seized up.
1. The content of this article only represents the opinions of the working group of News Report on Technical Regulations in China of Beijing CATARC.
In order to better serve students and teachers in school, the low-intensity community-type TOD shall be adopted for that station.
The surface of the cast-in-situ slab is vibrated by plate vibrator at the speed of 250 ~ 300mm/s. At the same time, the next vibration must have a 50mm overlap with the last vibration on the edge to prevent omission of vibration and inadequate vibration.
Calculation result shows that the AW4 train with 1/3 power lost can start with normal tractive effort on the maximum slope.
The mixing mode of lime soil shall be chosen reasonably in accordance with the actual conditions so as to reduce the environmental pollution.
1. The Project is of cast-in-situ reinforced concrete structure and frame structure system for the 1 floor underground and 2 floors above ground. The steel-structure sloping roof is adopted for other floors above 2F.
(5) Safety and Environmental Protection Department is responsible for the identification and management of potential work safety hazards.
The system can compare the signal strength and automatically select the strongest operator signal access according to the strength of the 4G signal received by the rolling stock from the ground base station, and automatically switch the SIM card of the operator used;
Work out practical shipment schedule, organize the transportation of goods, and ensure safe delivery of the goods to the construction site within the planned date.
In the process of construction, in strict accordance with the "Project Quality and Safety Red Line Management Regulations", implement the quality and safety post responsibility system, construction technology, prevention and control measures, strengthen the quality and safety inspection on the construction site, promptly correct any signs of red line problems, and prevent the occurrence of red line problems.
All machinery sheds shall be tight and waterproof. Rainproof and lightning-proof measures shall be taken for electromechanical equipment. Safety earthing devices shall be provided. Overload, short circuit, earth leakage protective devices for mobile power switch box shall be reliable.
2.2.8.4.1.1 Method for Crimping the Connecting Plug in the Rack
Elevation of Column Support Column Support Plan Details of External Corner of Column Formwork
For detailed technical parameters of equipment, see List of Technical Parameters of Large-size Equipment for Module Assembly Project in Zhuhai KIPIC ZOR Project Process Area in the next page.
(12) Test Methods of Cement and Cement Concrete for Highway Engineering (JTG E30-2005), etc.
Setting out after cleaning construction surface → removing embedded parts of tie bars of welded walls → trying to laying bricks, arranging modulus and erecting story pole → laying under the cooperation of water, heating and electricity disciplines → laying to design elevation → acceptance.
The driver is forbidden to modify the level in shunting mode. Besides, it shall not select the level (press "level") after pressing "shunting" under ETCS-2 level but there is no shunting result shown on the DMI.
12.5.5 No one may enter the completed area without the permission of the Project Manager.
If properties are unqualified, normalizing technology can be adopted for heat treatment. The heat treatment process shall be specified otherwise.
£¨ֱּׂ״ַׁ-Hurrutta)
The multiple unit is an efficient transport means which can achieve small formation and high density operation of intercity and suburban railways. It is flexible in formation, convenient, fast, safe, reliable, and comfortable; therefore, it has gained popularity in the railway transport and urban rail transit of all countries in the world.
The air compressor shall be designed as per continuous working system and the average working period of air compressor is greater than 30% during normal operation of train.
According to the Project Feasibility Study Report, the composition ratios of all kinds of automobiles are shown in Table 1-2.
Flange thickness: 33mm (new), 26.5mm (previous)
When the saw dust is removed or the parts are adjusted, it is essential to cut off the power firstly. After the machine stops, the saw dust can be removed or the parts can be adjusted.
T211 re.4 transmission case has a mechanical reversing device that can change the output direction of transmission case through the switch between internal and external gear clutches to increase or decrease the quantity of gears in the transmission chain.
Make an elaborate material plan half a month before and communicate with associated suppliers to ensure the implementation of the plan; as per the schedule, coordinate with the Employer, the Supervisor, the Designer and the quality inspector about the drawing questions, inspection and acceptance of sub-project and sub-division works and submit relevant routine forms in advance.
The protection device or relay installed on the power distribution cabinet shall be tested manually and automatically under the condition that the original cable is not disconnected as much as possible, and can be compared with the set equipment parameters, and the test results can be automatically judged and saved.
a) adapt to the purpose of the Company and the environment in which the Company is located (including the property, scale and environment impact of its activities, products and services), and support its strategic direction;
Figure 2-4 General Plan Layout of DMU depot
See table 2-2.4-1 Labor Schedule for details.
Disposal of production and domestic sewage should conform to relevant local environmental protection acts. A railway station where it is near urban drainage pipelines, fecal sewage pretreated by septic-tank, oily sewage pretreated by oil separator and other sewage in the station will be discharged into the urban drainage pipelines.
The Company determines the report divisions based on internal organizational structure, management requirements, internal reporting system and industry divisions.
After fire alarm mode is launched, locking electromagnet of automatic resetting device will be powered off, and the door will be closed by mechanical door closing unit and kept closed if the door has been opened.
The static brake shoe pressure test for the empty vehicle shall be carried out according to the following steps. Repeat the test from the second step to the fifth step for no less than twice, and collect the date for no less than twice.
If it finds that the function of culvert cannot be well reached as designed, communicate with designing unit about it in time.
(5) It has the function of manually changing the working mode and selecting the running line;
The bed slope is 1:1.75 and the ballast shoulder height is 15cm.
The air supply system should adopt industrial compressed air to keep stable pressure at 0.6Mpa to ensure the temperature rise speed. The moisture from the compressed air shall be removed in order to prevent influencing the combusting effect of diesel and prevent fire extinguishing.
(1) In order to ensure the normal production and living of workers, improve the safety level of construction site, ensure the safety of workers, the fees for security protection must be used for improving construction safety quality on construction site.
6.5.3 New changes caused by any non-conformance identified in the configuration review shall be controlled in accordance with Article 6.4.
4. Within the railway protection zone, it is strictly forbidden to draw groundwater.
2.2.1.This maintenance base can at least hold 40 trains and can be used for major overhaul and fault handling.
The underlying bedrock is Upper Cretaceous (K2) mudstone mixed with sandstone and conglomerate, and locally mixed with anhydrock. The rock mass is relatively broken and soft.
Civil Works Construction for Yemen AL-Qaicah Sewage Treatment Plant
6.8.3.4 The alignment of bolster spring and damper spring must make sure that the spring will fall into the spring positioning navel and flange, free from jamming.
Maintenance should be implemented immediately after the construction of concrete surface course is finished. Maintenance period in summer should be more than 7 days. The road surface can be covered by plastic films for maintenance. In winter, a straw mat should be placed on the plastic films to avoid freeze of the surface course.
During the peak period of project construction, the arrival rate of engineers in each discipline will be assured to reach 100%.
During construction, the equipment shall neither be used as the scaffold (or the supporting point of scaffolds) nor be used as the suspension center for lifting and dragging objects.
Q/CR 236-2014 Top Coat for Railway Locomotive and Rolling Stock
The 11kV and 0.4kV power distribution devices are arranged in the zero meter floor of the main room, and the generator PT cabinet and outlet cabinet are arranged in the generator outgoing terminal cubicle.
The quality management of TCU Software for the HCMT Project is conducted based on the quality systems and standards of ISO9000 and ISO90003-2004.
For the accumulative damage analysis as per EN12663, the design life can only be estimated as 30 years.
3. Wall damp-proof course: 20mm-thick damp-proof course made of 1:2 cement mortar (added with 5% waterproof agent) is coated on the wall with elevation of +0.20m.
As per the over-peak load of AW4 (7 persons/m2), the load of our single shaft is calculated to be 23.175 t with reference to EN13749 and UIC615.
The transportation engineering discipline that the laboratory relies on ranked the first in the discipline evaluation organized by MOE in 2003, 2008 and 2013.
- Stop 071-P606 A or B when the flushing is completed.
All temporary facilities must meet required standards. The construction site shall be clean and tidy. The roads shall be flat and straight. The drainage shall be smooth. The markings shall be clear. The production environment shall meet standard operation requirements.
2 The testing personnel shall carefully perform the maintenance as required.
Mobile crane (XCT12L4)
The length of each section shall be integer multiples of the pieces of side and curb stones used (including joint width), for the avoidance of relatively large empty spaces at too many places.
(2) In case the safety valve is not mounted at the ontology of the equipment, but at systems connected to these devices, then the impact of system pressure drop should be considered for maximum working pressure of these devices.
Translation of the language of FEED (foundation) design documents into the local language
Emergency brake relay and traction converter hardwire interface
If GDA is adjusted, the corresponding institution shall be set to undertake the function, if GDA is reserved, the GDA management system shall be designed in detail.
Table for Parameter of Main Workshop
Inspection method: inspect with wire and steel gauge, or observe.
12.2.7.1 Requirments of comprehensice protection for signal room
Poor safety performance and low intelligentization: Most existing inspection vehicles are of double-track mechanical structures with poor synchronicity while traveling; therefore, sticking with track easily occurs.
1. The construction of the project is large in scale and of great significance. The total length of the tunnel in the main channel of the water diversion project is 24165.83m. The tunnel is constructed by double shield TBM with a diameter of 5.93m. The TBM continuous tunnelling section is 19940.83m.
In general, the clay mud with the plasticity index of more than 25, particle size of less than 0.074 mm and particle content of more than 50% can be used.
Clause 8.6 of IEC 60322:2001
2.1.3 Height above sea level: ≤2500m.
The issuance of corporate bond financing instrument reached RMB 140.3 billion, increased by 44.5%, 12.8% higher than the national growth rate.
④-1 Silty clay (Q/4al+pl/): brownish red, brownish yellow, plastic or hard plastic state, saturated, easily rubbed into strips by hand and with sand feel, uneven soil texture, high dry strength, medium tenacity, slightly smooth section with few round gravel and coarse sand.
In order to prevent misoperation that results in looped power supply or closing with the fault location, it needs to set necessary interlocks for the emergency interconnection switch.
According to the entire line material requirement and the material supply plan, one gravel processing plant for this bid section is arranged on the left of DK434+100 to supply materials for the entire line in a centralized manner.
Table 1-1-2-1Information on Measuring Point of Dynamic Response Test of Comprehensive Inspection Train
Geological survey reports (detail survey) (Paper + CD)
TVM's front panel shall have necessary shield and niche design to ensure passenger privacy and provide a safe and comfortable ticket purchase environment for passengers.
The route runs along the expressway channel, and its stations have a longer distance from the economic hubs along the line, which has a poor driving effect on the regional society and economy.
(1) Checking the deviation of the support: Pull the rope outside the wabbler on the top of the support, and re-check the distortion and other deviations in the middle by steel ruler. The large deviation found on the deck support shall be timely rectified until it meets the requirements of sheet installation.
During truss preloading construction, construction personnel shall fasten safety belts.
According to characteristics such as geomorphic characteristics of the mine area, widely distributed deposit, thin ore body, fast plane advance speed and poor operating conditions of the pit in rainy season, the mode of highway development - self discharging vehicle transportation shall be adopted.
2. The specification of single-piece protective barrier shall be 1500x1500 (the length can be adjusted according to the size of the elevator shaft), and the door frame shall adopt 25x25mm square pipe.
.00Kg HRB400: 2999.26Kg
24-core mix-melting integration sub-rack (relocation of optical cable)
3 Sampling: sample the representative and specific ground water, soil, and rock in control drill holes for laboratory analyses and experiments to obtain physical and mechanical parameters of each rock and soil stratum and chemical properties of water and soil.
Whether there are documents specifying the requirements for working environment to ensure conformance to product requirements?
(3) Desktop equipment such as displays and printers shall be mounted according to the following requirements:
a. Carbon or low-alloy steel shell: C2=3 mm.
Equipment composition: block diagram of constituent equipment of subsystem, network topology, composition diagram of panel plate and equipment function description (including protection mode), introduction to human-machine interface of equipment, description of advanced technology used, product description, necessary technical description and sample of the equipment used in the tendering.
25mmM50 hard dry non-shrinkable mortar
(2) Observe whether the air pressure meets the specified requirements: the pressure value in air pressure gage is 7.0 ~ 7.5Kg·f / cm2.
3. For those not specified, please refer to relevant designs and drawings.
d) The requirements for the application software interface of the central system of the railway administration are set out in Appendix A.
1. Tunnel: Design and construct 1367m long two-way 6-lane open-cut tunnel, a single-lane exit ramp, and 4 escape shafts. The tunnel is of single-layer double-span structure. The open-cut and bottom-up construction technology will be adopted according to the design; the cut-and-cover and bottom-up construction technology will be adopted for the parts overlapped with existing road.
For specific operation instructions of the rolling stock, refer to General Specifications for Rolling Stock.
(Email 1611469889@qq.com, Tel. 13893131348)
5. Filling Materials Beneath Embankment Subgrade Bed and Compaction Standard
2)The two channels CAN output from the X5\X6 socket communicate with each other.
During the study years, after the completion of the line, this will effectively improve the transportation conditions here, provide a rapid and convenient high-capacity channel for goods collection and distribution here, and play an important role in promoting the rapid development of Port-au-Prince.
According to WOS 01.284 "Static Vehicle/Bogie Swing Test," the minimum horizontal curve radius is 70m.
Production and construction equipment; experimental equipment; office equipment
In a double track section, the uplink and downlink of feeding section at the same side are used for parallel power supply through switchgear (or electrical connection), as shown in Fig. 2-1-15.
Special bridge connecting plate is used for cable tray connection. The bolts between the cable tray and the bracket and the bolts of the bridge connecting plate shall be fixed and fastened without missing. The nuts are located outside the cable tray.
3. Further detail the quality review of raw and subsidiary materials and packaging materials in 8.3.2;
and —— Mass of wet test sample, in g.
See Annex 4 for the calculation of the material storage area and the size of the storage facilities.
Hongshi is striving and will strive to become the respectable and excellent corporate citizen. While enhancing the economic efficiency of enterprise, Hongshi actively shoulders the social responsibilities, pays taxes honestly in accordance with the laws, promotes energy-efficiency and emission reduction, participates in public welfare undertakings, and makes contribution to social comprehensive and coordinative and sustainable developments.
For the part 0~-80m, rotary drilling rig will be used for boring, for the part -80~-120m, slewing drilling rig will be used for boring. A 13m3 movable muck pool will be arranged for each borehole to transport the muck produced from boring to the designated muck storage yard.
Refer toi Software Requirement Specifications for JZ.GD-1 Microcomputer Axle Counter§ 4.1 for interfaces for CPU software and hardware.
Note: The construction scope of Package 2 of the Project includes one line, with a total length of 62.497km.
Lan-Xin Railway Ganqing Co., Ltd. ("Party A") has already accepted the Third-party Test Bid of Beijing Engineering Test Co., Ltd. under China Railway Fifth Survey and Design Institute Group Co., Ltd. ("Party B") for the bid section BLJC-1 of the New Baoji-Lanzhou Passenger Dedicated Railway (Gansu).
Hope Chongqing Fuling District Zhonglong Traffic Construction Co., Ltd. to continue doing the following work:
The fire water supply pipe is subject to welding and flanged connection, while the indoor water supply is subject to welded steel pipe.
Particularly, the on-site project coordination becomes obviously important during the rush hours of the construction or divisional commissioning. In addition, the daily coordination meetings shall be held to solve the problems emerging that day to ensure smooth progress of the Project.
Insulating tape (0.5mmx19mmx10m)
See Fig. 2 for the conditions before beam erection; temporary support and thin jack shall be placed beside 4 bearing padstones of one-span beam (jack shall be set with spherical hinge to adapt to beam rotation, as shown in Fig. 3~5.).
Table 6.1-22 List of Sewage Output from Service Facilities of the Project
According to work quantities, construction characteristics, construction schedule and labor organization plan in the Lot, the living and office houses with an area of 35000m2 and production house with an area of 55500m2 will be established. Work houses will be close to the work points.
Regularly inspect and test the dedicated tire or platform such as single element assembly, to ensure the flatness of steel members and accuracy of assembly position.
Based on CRH380A the door of barrier-free washing room in U.S. Northeast Corridor EMU shall be designed to match will the appearance of ADA washing room and moreover conform with ADA laws and regulations as well as the tender.
During transportation, mobilization, storage and application processes, the frame, cover panel and other materials for ceiling shall be strictly managed to prevent transformation and dampness.
(2)If the State issues new standards and specifications during the performance of this Contract, the Contractor shall be obliged to submit the proposals related to new standards and specifications to the Employer.
(2) Whether the structure members bear repeated loads directly: No
(In words): RMB three hundred and twenty-three million two hundred and three thousand three hundred and eighty-two point zero three;
9.5.5.3. Assurance Measures for Organization and Management
14.1.1 Basis and Scope of Study and Study Years
1.10.10 Articulated passage and coupler
1. Except that the reinforcement diameters are in mm or otherwise noted, all the other dimensions are in cm.
According to the distribution location of the process equipment, the general layout, the system composition, the load center and other factors, two substations (AC380V power load center) below will be provided for each set of sintering system, namely:
10.2 Prior to brick wall building, the positioning control line shall be set out first and the elevation should be controlled with the theodolite. Concrete foundation top surface should be leveled with 1:2 cement mortar in order to control the elevation of the whole masonry.
40# secondary spray pump P0462MP0740
3 A row of bushes is planted from toe of slope to drainage ditch and a row of bushes and a row of arbors are planted from drainage ditch to land boundary. In specific 1.0m from the drainage ditch is planted with bushes with a space of 1m and 1.5m from the bushes is planted with arbors with a space of 4m.
The PCC cabinet panel is provided with indicator lights, operating buttons, changeover switches, the display, the mouse and keyboard as well as USB ports for the convenience of personnel to carry out monitoring and tests.
i) Disposal options, abnormal response measures, and improper change control:
The maximum foundation contact stress is 116.6kpa.
(8) Subgrade filling at the slab top and the outside of side wall shall be conducted after the structural concrete reaches the design strength. The short side-wall side shall be firstly filled in the scope of trapezoidal slab at the end and the long-side-wall side shall be filled later.
Technical Specification for Temporary Speed Limit Server (Provisional) (TY [2012] No. 213)
Disconnect all cables of XP173.1, and then connect them with electronic circuit (where the self-equipped cable of braking speed sensor is not connected with electronic circuit).
Each motor is equipped with 2 pcs., one train has 6 motors, and 10 trains have a total of 120 pcs.
Future audit shall also take full consideration of result of last audit.
70t wagons shall be used for freight trains, with dead load being 24.071t. Average net load shall be 66.343t. Traction mass shall be 2,700t. The number of marshalling shall be 30 wagons. See Table 7-4 for the number of pairs of passenger and freight trains.
The entire line is 15.996km long, with height difference of 790m.
9.6.4 Each time before the mobile shuttering system is assembled, all the members and accessories shall be checked for their integrity.
Correspondence Table between 36K Feeder Module and Feeder Circuit (72-circuit Full Rack Example):
Hilly area, sharp slopes, gradient 45\U+00B0~50\U+00B0.
6.10.8.1 Construction of Upper Roof Boarding
The system can ensure the power supply of high-power electric locomotives, improve the tonnage rating and running speed of electric locomotives, extend the distance between traction substations, reduce the cross section of conductors, and significantly reduce the construction investment and operation cost.
Responsibilities for risk control are specified and recorded at the project planning stage.
6.2.2 Smoke emission volume should be calculated based on the formula in 6.6.2:
Inspect and confirm that the inspection and maintenance of #2 hydrogen-side sealing oil cooler of #1 unit are completed and the work ticket is taken back.
Communication, Signal, Power and Electrification System Integration Project for Rizhao-Lankao High-speed Railway (Rizhao-Linyi Section and Linyi-Qufu Section)
Recently, CSCEC has successfully won the bids for two five-star hotel projects in Algeria, Constantine Marriott and Annaba Sheraton hotels, with a total contract value of more than USD 400 million.
Be considered as conforming in the inspection when the SIN is in two-way lighting pattern; otherwise as nonconforming.
All kinds of quality data, original records, quality status analysis.
The VAT is included in the tender price according to the general method of tax calculation
The aluminum formwork bent and deformed during construction shall be adjusted in time.
1.5.12.1 When there is lightning in the adjacent area of the machine, the operator shall never ever perform following operations:
[5] Study on Evaluation and Optimization of Tunnel Construction Organization Scheme Based on Fuzzy Analytic Hierarchy Process [D]. Southwest Jiaotong University, 2012.
10 Frost-proof medium sand and coarse sand shall be back filled to the side faces of foundations, foundation beams, walls and columns within the range of frozen earth, with a thickness of not less than 200mm.
Besides rotational motion, the single-wheel set has vertical, side rolling and transverse motion together with the framework.
If it is necessary to arrange these production facilities in a multi-storey building, it is recommended to arrange them on the ground floor and take effective measures to reduce noise and vibration.
Flying objects may cause serious injury, such as serious eye injury.
For projects that have a greater impact on the surrounding residents, the Project Department will actively communicate with the streets (villages and towns) and communities (villages) involved in the project, master the basic situation of the streets (villages and towns) and communities (villages), and strive for the understanding and support of the local streets (villages and towns) and communities (villages).
Advanced construction experience and technology shall be employed and the construction shall be in strict accordance with relevant technical specifications to ensure the project quality; rules and regulations shall be established and improved and various effective measures shall be taken to ensure the safety of construction; environmental protection shall be carried out during civilized construction.
Apply with rubber scrapper vertically for the second time, with the materials and methods being the same as that of the first layer of putty. After it has become dry, grind it with sand paper and then clean the surface.
The steering angle adjusted during the initial 2s shall not exceed 120°. The total angle shall not exceed 240°.
For the continuous girder bridge with a span more than 64m and major bridges with complicated geology, the shear wave velocity test shall be conducted and the prospecting hole shall be drilled to the design depth as per the test requirements. When the bridge is longer than 2km, the test holes can be added.
Various materials for the design submission and approval are prepared through cooperation with the Employer.
① Under normal situations (non-strong pumping mode), after the main reservoir pressure is more than 10 bar, the single or two air compressors shall still work as instructed and continue to compress air for 6 min and then shut down. Within such 6 min, the compressor(s) shall operate under no load;
5. The wastewater produced in pipe washing and pressure tests should be discharged to nearby drainage channels after being settled and filtered.
Indoor demolition: organize segmented construction by 3 construction segments according to the construction layer, and demolish the wall ceiling plastering layer and floor by segment and floor;
Exhaust gas of the operation period are mainly vehicle off-gas of the road engineering, odors from sewage treatment plant, non-methane hydrocarbon emitted in an unorganized manner from charging/ gas station, oil fume emitted from schools or hospitals and the odors from garbage gathering works.
④-8 Cobbly soil: grayish brown, loose, saturated, with a grain size of about 20~80mm and a content of about 51%, mother rock mainly composed of limestone, containing about 10% filling sand and 20~30% clay grain.
When hanging the cable, it shall be pulled upward from the lower end of HDPE pipe. During the lifting process of steel strand, cushion and guide shall be provided to avoid the damage of HDPE of steel strand.
10. Train Operation under Abnormal Conditions and Handling of Emergent Fault
③ Gross profit rate: based on the average gross profit rate of historical operating results and the expected gross profit rate of market development.
Telecommunication wire:WDZN-RYJS-2\U+00D71.5+
When it is snowy or the wind speed at the welding site exceeds 5.4M/s (3rd scale), the welding joints will be covered to avoid the joints hitting the ice and snow after cooling down.
The lines shall be connected in stations, and meanwhile the train operation safety and train smooth operation in main direction shall be ensured and the level crossings shall be reduced.
The all-staff, all-process, all-dimensional and all-weather dynamic safety management must be adhered to during work safety activities.
Stability: Total variation of measured values when a certain property of a part or benchmark of the measurement system is measured in certain duration.
Through comparison, it can be seen that CQ-WOM of oil-based drilling fluid is better than Halliburton and Macba common oil-based drilling fluid system in filtration loss, rheological property and emulsion-breaking voltageat high temperature and high pressure than the drilling fluid system of foreign service providers.
The emergency office is set at the Safety Guarantee Department, in charge of daily management, and with main responsibilities as follows:
Clay manometry is used for natural gas pressure monitoring, and the gas-bearing section is tested every 5 ~ 10 meters.
1.3.2.3 Equipment for Construction of Cast-in-situ Box Girder
2. Material of frame and fan: dark gray aluminum alloy film _x000D_
Power Transformers - Part 5: Ability to Withstand Short Circuit
Then, arrange axis locating points required by the Project at periphery of the foundation pit with the polar coordinate method according to the coordinate relation among corners of property line:
These changes shall be deemed as a part of the contract, and shall be implemented by and become binding on the Purchaser.
Awareness rate of AIDS knowledge of people receiving AIDS knowledge teaching from AIDS controllers as of the end of the quarter
All construction sites meeting the mobilization and construction conditions shall carry out preliminary construction preparations, in order to commence constructions as early as possible.
The DCU sends the command of connecting the short circuit contactor and the circuit contactor is inspected as failed to be closed after delay. Namely, failed to connect the contactor that should be closed.
Ensure the efficient operation of the company's financial system; organize and specifically promote the company's annual operation/budget planning procedures, including planning for capital requirements and normal operations;
The administrator/teacher and students carry out system operations, file transmission and mailing via the Web server.
When the applying of primer plaster is completed, arrange special personnel to scrape the lime mortar 5cm around the slot and box of the electric cabinet and use cement mortar to smooth and level this place.
The number ofgenerated based on input value is greater than 1, and there is abnormal data in system!
3 The connection between main cable for street lamps and branch street lamps shall be of OCM-3 buried cable junction box.
Water stability base: March 15, 2023 - June 12, 2023;
Assessor needs to find vulnerability which is possible to be used from each identified asset and corresponding threat.
Be responsible for coordinating internal and external work and ensure smooth implementation of project maintenance.
(1) Strictly follow the national laws and regulations concerning work safety, and cautiously fulfill related safety requirements in the project contracting contract.
If the Company forces the staff to work by means of violence, intimidation or illegal restriction of personal freedom or commands against rules, forcibly orders the staff to run risks to work which endangers the personal safety of staff, the staff can immediately terminate the labor contract without prior notice.
④-2 Silty soil(Q/4al+pl/): light gray, slightly dense – medium dense, slightly wet, mainly composed of silt grains, slightly sticky.
12" drawings including disposable pens and linear circles (0-100%) shall be included without errors, and shall have the finally printed text in the eccentric oval, and high strength paper with waterproof red ink applied.
Note: one worker tightening the bolt and the other making locking mark is not allowed; nor tightening all the bolts and then making locking marks is allowed.
d. During operation of bar screen, the moving parts such as rake and drive mechanism shall operate flexibly and smoothly and shall be free of clamping stagnation, collision, blocking, abnormal noise, and so on, and the whole bar screen shall operate smoothly and reliably.
See National Standard 02S404 for specific construction methods of water-proof casing.
Rolling Stock - Testing of Rolling Stock on Completion of Construction and before Entry into Service JIS E4041-2009 9.15
MC1 car: specification: 16.6m, quantity: 2.
Purchase and supply plans for materials and equipment should be well arranged according to operative construction organization design, which should be timely adjusted according to conditions on site.
Office Building #1, No. 1302, East Laodong Road, Yuhua District, Changsha City, Hunan Province
4. "Specialization" means that the internal organizations of CR5 with corresponding professional expertise shall be responsible for the construction management of all overseas projects in principle. Subsidiaries are not allowed to participate in overseas projects beyond their professional expertise.
3.6.2 Check the sequence of actions of line contactor and pre-charging contactor.
\U+00B7 waterproof paint for exterior wall (one coat of primer and two coats of finish)
Silty clay: grayish brown or brownish yellow, hard plastic, with sand grains.
7.2.3For eccentric tension members in rectangular section, the calculation for normal section strength shall meet the following requirements:
Portable workstation (laptop) Precision7510
2. This is a layout of the cross-shaped grade crossing at K5+201.006.
3.4.1.2 Main contents of HSE engagement (including all staff):
All the cover plates shall be replaced and the damaged area of the culvert body shall be rehabilitated. The deposit in the outlet and the culvert shall be cleared.
Peripheral equipment is connected with BTM and TCR via CAN communication interface and internal equipment is connected with RS485 bus and main board via CAN bus.
1.3.1.5.5.3. Attaching Great Importance to Major Project and Less Importance to Decoration
Among them, there were 12 retirees, accounting for 5.06% of the unemployed population; 76 housekeepers, accounting for 32.07%; 1 waiting for school enrollment, accounting for 0.42%; 97 unemployed persons, accounting for 40.93%; 51 students, accounting for 21.52%.
The new energy accumulation power supply and electric propulsion traction system are adopted.
Under any working condition, the return oil temperature of each bearing shall not exceed 65°C and sight glass and thermometer socket shall exist on the return oil pipe of this bearing.
2. Enamel panel and substrate are installed firmly; the used materials and dry hanging fittings must comply with design requirements and national current relevant standards and regulations. Rust-proof and preservative treatment is conducted for carbon steel fittings.
The battery meets the requirements of IEC 60623 standard.
Compliance Evaluation Form CNCEC16-HSE-CX-09-02-001-2017
We hope that all relevant departments can cooperate actively and speed up the promotion to complete the construction earlier, and provide better infrastructures and and more tax revenue and employment opportunities for Daya Bay District, Huizhou City.
(1) Methods to Prepare Feasibility Study Report for Highway Construction Projects (2010)
From January 2016 to November 2018, he participated in the construction of the most complicated airport reconstruction and expansion without suspension of flights in China. He knew well the airport construction process, various problems and solutions in the process of airport reconstruction and expansion without suspension of flights, and played an important role in the procedures of application and approval, construction drawing design, design optimization and procurement.
Left front bremsdruckleitung(HG-3506040A)
Note: 1. The direction of 0° in this drawing is the same as that of 0° in drawing 6111201D1000-EQ-308/001.
g) In principle, the vehicle and the driver are subject to designated management. If necessary the driver's designated vehicle can be driven by other drivers after it is approved by the manager of Administrative Department.
④ Contract AJHC-7: By the end of December 2018, the project was fully completed.
System test and acceptance test usually need mass (real data) test data approaching actual running data as may be.
Operators are forbidden to chat with other persons and only respond to the signals made by the designated command personnel. However, operators must follow the emergency stop signal at any time, no matter who makes the signal.
Schedule 26Summary of Rock Erosiveness Results
The terminal equipment of the dispatching center and the border inspection service complex of the port station shall be connected to the switch through the cables of the generic cabling system. The terminals in the customs inspection and quarantine complex, production complex of freight yard and inspection rooms shall be connected to the port management information system of the border inspection service complex of the port station through optical cables of the surveillance system of the port station.
Mineral insulated cable NG-A-0.6/1kV-1(4x50+1x25)mm2
With beam slab formworkforwork erection height of 3.6m11°19′ to 26°34′ labor *1.15, material [05030080] content *1.05, material [03019021] content *1.05
Construction of pile cap for (32+48+32)m continuous girder of Fengtong Super Major Bridge
For the network of the control center, 2 high-level network switches serve as the network trunk of the LAN to which TCP/IP protocol is applied, and form a switching ethernet with a double-redudancy network structure.
Monitoring measurement of the open-cut tunnel mainly includes the following aspects:
For the Project, the quality management shall be standardized in strict accordance with the quality management system of the company.
The Bidder's documents related to environmental and occupational health and safety management system and their requirements;
Design Drawing for Construction of Dawanle Station Buildings
The bill of quantities of main temporary works is shown in Table 7-1-5-2.
2. Samples of surface water, underground water and construction water at the site shall be taken for retesting.
In order to build itself into an enterprise valuable for people's life, the society and the future, Jiangsu Zhongtian Technology Co., Ltd., based on its practice, released the first Corporate Social Responsibility Report in China's manufacturing industry which was thought highly of and welcomed by relevant national departments, local governments and the public.
6. Shuang Long reservoir irrigation project
Khammouane Province produces rice, corn and cardamom, raises cattle, pigs and poultry, and has the Nam Pathene Tin Mine, the most important mine in Laos.
After the drill tool is reached to the chuck at the bottom of borehole and the rod is chucked, the pump output shall be 10~20L/min.
165L components of TKQ600RE08 air cylinder
Other subsystems include data telecommunication system, dispatching communication system, conference television system, emergency telecommunication system, telecommunication integrated network management system, clock and time synchronization system, integrated video monitoring system, telecommunication power lightning protection and grounding system, power supply and environment monitoring system, etc.
Where, MWR refers to wage used in financial evaluation, and CF2 refers to SWR conversion coefficient.
It is located on the south side of the route, where K0+000~K5+500 is adjacent to the river, and K13+690 is provided with the Shuolong Medium Bridge to cross the river
Incoming line switch of the power distribution cabinet shall be breaker or low-voltage load switch with fuse, and the outgoing line switch shall be low-voltage plastic shell air breaker with a rated breaking current of no less than 6kA.
Beams, main reinforcement of longitudinal beams and beam reinforcements are connected to round steel of Φ10
During construction, any discrepancy found between geological exploration and design shall be timely notified to the design institute.
Window-sale Machine Fig. 3-12-5 Automatic Ticket Checker
In 1825, the first train in the world was led by a man riding a horse with a signal flag in hand and running in front of the train on a British railway.
5. Monitor and control key parts and key procedures as per the methods regulated in detailed rules for supervision of disciplines.
2) Road equipment: street lights, reflective road studs, speed humps, vibration strips, flexible beam guardrails, concrete crash barriers and raised zebra crossings.
Floating articles shall not be placed on the surface of a lathe, and touch, inspection and measurement of workpieces with hands are not allowed during machining. Turning scraps shall not be touched with hands or be blown with mouth.
Long-term inhalation of cement dust may result in cement pneumoconiosis of operators.
For the main construction machinery equipment, see Exhibit 3: List of Construction Equipment.
Remove the turnout analog, fix the outdoor cable of the turnout on the wiring cabinet, and send the DZ220, DF220 power supply to the combination frame. After installing all kinds of circuit breakers, separate operation of each group of turnouts shall be conducted, with the test content as follows:
Variable lease payment depending on index or ratio;
Identify the risks by using the following three simple methods: Checklist of Risks, regular meetings (weekly meeting) and daily input (daily morning meeting);
8.1.2.4 Impact Analysis on Decentralized Drinking Water in Villages along the Line
(2)While directly dumping concrete from the high places, the free height shall not exceed 2 meters, subject to no segregation.
Deputy group leader: Yu Jiangwu, Wang Jinxing, Li Tao, Cao Minghui, Zhang Lizheng
Indicate the maximum power to be consumed by each device.
The non-conformance processing plan will be notified to the submitter after review
5. In abutment construction, M16 nut should be embedded on related abutment body position based on pipe clamp requirement.
Noise is less than 60db (distance 1m);
The demarcation height of the road and bridge is determined by the subgrade and the bridge disciplines according to the geological conditions. The starting height of the bridge is 8 ~ 10m.
The contents of the plan shall include: the purpose, scope, contents, principles, preparation and specific implementation time of internal review, departments subject to internal review, and composition (team leader and members) of internal review team.
If construction joints are not allowed, the interval for concrete pouring between the areas and the upper and lower layers shall not exceed the concrete initial setting time.
Generally, the mix ratio (by weight) of the cement mortar should use one portion of alumina cement and three portions sand;
Such section is applicable to the trunk utility tunnel in which DN1200 water supply pipes, DN1200 reclaimed water pipes, 115KV power pipes as well as 13.8KV power and communication cables are arranged.
(2) Establish and perfect various work safety and environmental protection rules and regulations for the Project Department, standardize the management over work safety and environmental protection, and ensuring that there are laws to follow.
The subsidiary company shall ensure that the operators can obtain written operating procedures, and shall, through training, help them master how to correctly use the operating procedures and make them realize that the operating procedures are mandatory.
The specific speed limit will be finally determined in the design stage.
5.13 The risks in the process of infrastructure management are specifically implemented in accordance with the relevant provisions of Risk Emergency Control Procedure.
Woldya ~ Mekele Railway is an important part of the main skeleton of Ethiopian national railway network, access to the sea and the international transportation passage of Ethiopia. The long-term project connects with the east section of Line 6, and will become the backbone of collection, distribution and transport system behind Tadjourah Port.
a) The Tenderer shall propose a Main Maintenance Depot located at a site yet to be determined, in the vicinity of 6th October City #1 Station.
2) Whether the work location of the welding production line in the base, and the composition of the main equipment (welding, straightening, grinding, normalizing, cooling, flat grinding, fine grinding, flaw detection, etc.) can ensure the welding quality, the track laying progress and the requirements of safety and environmental protection.
+160mm graded crushed stone base course +200mm cement stabilized soil subbase course with a total thickness of 410 mm for road surface is recommended for pavement of carriageway.
7.7.1 Survey of concealed karst in the base and periphery of tunnels and in subgrade base for New Construction for Yichang-Wanzhou Railway
Laying of flame retarding cable WDZB-YJV--5x4mm2
Appendix 4 Questionnaire on Risk Assessment of Project Procurement
Technical Code for Engineering of Ground Anchorages and Shotcrete Support (GB50086-2015);
Therefore, there are fixed requirements for some interconnected parts, such as coupler, wheel, pantograph, sewage connector and water injection connector.
The surface layer of south portal is Qel+dl^3 clay, brown yellow, stiff, with a thickness of about 2.5~5m; Qel+dl^3 clay, brown yellow, very stiff, with a thickness of about 2~4m; T mudstone, highly weathered and earthy, with developed joints, of broken rock mass, earthy, in fragments.
MVB, Ethernet or USB 3.0
There would be a determined arrangement of commissioning in this stage.
(3) In the refining process, the viscose fiber is bleached using sodium hypochlorite and hydrogen peroxide.
(3) Primary support shall be set for part ①, i.e. 4cm thick concrete shall be sprayed, reinforcing net shall be paved, steel frame shall be erected, I18 steel frame (cross brace) shall be set, and temporary invert shall be sprayed;
(3)The train hook shall be compressed for starting with pressure retained.
The transformer transported as a whole may not be subject to overall sealing test.
(3) Check whether the excavators, loaders and other machinery are in good condition before the commencement, whether the brakes are valid, and whether the cables are exposed.
Function: the main function of portal type variable message sign is toprovide route selection for vehicles passing the pivot overpass, release information on road traffic and weather for the vehicles passing the expressway, or limiting speed of incoming vehicles on the expressway.
2 Arch ring of arch culvert shall be calculated according to hingeless arch. The influence of curvature and shear force on arch ring can be neglected.
Kigali International Airport in the capital is a dual-use airport, which is located in the east suburb of Kigali city and is able to take off and land Boeing 747 air bus.
3.1.3 The promptness of process document change and the implementation of change procedures.
1.2 Draw construction plans based on building layout and shape and on-site realities.
Environmental factors: land use, landscape, water quality and deposition, slope stability, endangered animals and plants.
VVVF: the voltage to ground at point 33 of plug X1 of +176=11-A102 is DC 0V;
5 The airflow within 20m of electric motors and switches.
In addition, video monitoring terminals will be arranged for the monitor room, duty room, and so on.
Reply to the Change of Personnel to be Mobilized of the Project Management Department for Lot-Ⅲ of the Electrification Reconstruction Project of Harbin-Mudanjiang Railway (China Railway Wuhan Electrification Engineering Group Co., Ltd.)
GA892.2 Fire Robot-Part 2: Fire Robot is submitted for approval.
(1) Doors: As for houses used for production, office and living, composite wooded doors will be used for internal doors while aluminum allay doors and thermal insulating doors will be used for external doors as per specific demand.
(3) The pressure gauge on the storage containers should face the operation surface with a same installation height and direction.
1 Low welding cost, fast deposition rate and high deposition efficiency;
The group is provided with a part-time quality inspector, to form an internal audit system with complete system and clear responsibility.
The Contractor shall clear all equipment, materials, soil and wastes out of the Site upon construction completion, so as to make the Site handed over for use at any time.
[TB/T 3074—-2003, definition 3.8]
Preservation includes identification, disposal, contamination control, packaging, storage, transmission or transportation, and protection.
During the construction process, according to the actual status of the project progress, compare the actual value of the progress with the planned value, and take effective correction measures in time to ensure the planned target of the construction period.
GB/T50081-2002Standard for Test Method of Performance on Mechanical Properties on Ordinary Concrete
Whether the water volume is enough or clean in the emulsifier cooling and lubricating water tank for pump machine should be checked at any time, and the replacement should be implemented usually every eight hours.
1) According to the Japanese Monorail Structure Design Guide, the allowable value of vertical deformation of simply supported track beam shall not exceed L/800.
The Integrated Service Center is the organization for emergency response to food poisoning incidents of staff and is responsible for coordination and handling under the leadership of the Headquarters.
The formwork sidelines shall be set out according to foundation dimensions. Steel formwork wih the structural dimensions in compliance with requirements are employed. The formwork and formwork support must have enough stiffness, strength and stability and could bear the lateral pressure of poured concrete. Moreover, the accuracy of foundation dimensions shall be ensured.
It is currently divided into ten provinces, 43 cities (including one municipality) and 141 districts.
1.6.6.4.6 External Scaffold Erection and Scaffold Body Protection Measures
For the quality issues found out by the Supervisor and the Project legal person during the acceptance inspection, the project department shall timely feedback to the construction team to eliminate the defects, and then conduct the re-inspection; after passing the re-inspection, the project department shall submit it to the Engineer for acceptance inspection until they are all proved to be qualified.
The process shall be implemented before and after each shift as well as before the work starts at a new place.
In order to meet this requirement, the Tenderer shall provide to the Tenderee, install and use reliable virus detection softwares and tools.
Project Name: Feasibility Study of Construction Project of Boten (Luang Namtha) - Houayxay (Bokeo) New Expressway (Option K)
The belt drive device used allows you to adjust the belt tension to eliminate the possibility of belt sliding, and can meet the requirements to adjust the belt tension for every 12 months.
As for the base plate, use set-shaped steel formwork around the pier stud and use plane steel formwork at the center. The base plate shall be spliced in a leveled and tight manner to prevent grout leakage during concrete casting.
After the test is finished, conduct exterior inspection, insulation test, and no-load test.
The Employer shall perform the pre-acceptance of all as-built archives submitted according to relevant regulations.
14.3.7 By the review of the monitoring and testing records of the clock synchronization network, the performance of the clock synchronization network shall conform to the relevant technical standards, such as Node Clock Set of Digital Synchronization Network and Its Timing Feature (YD/ T 1012).
Table 2.1.3-3 Information Table of Main Equipment
2. Lightgage steel joist (joist section shall be verified for manned ceiling)
The geological layers revealed by the exploration are divided according to their formation age, lithological characteristics, and engineering geological features. The characteristics are described in layers as follows.
(Adopt fine bubble diffuser with oxygen transfer efficiency of around 6.5% in case of sinking per meter in liquid).
9. Operating Sequence of Commissioning of PLC/RTU System
(2) Because there is no clear power supply system, the Technical Proposal of the Bid is based on AC25kV and 50Hz power supply system for the time being. If a different system is required by this Bid at later stage, it will be discussed and determined at the design stage.
Confidentiality principle: Members of the bid evaluation committee and relevant staff acquainted with bid evaluation shall keep the Bidder's business secrets.
The outgoing water from the sewage treatment plant meets the water quality requirements of B of Grade 1 in the Discharge Standard of Pollutants for Municipal Wastewater Treatment Plant (GB18918-2002).
Multi-split (fresh air) indoor unit VOA-L2-3/7/13, Qcool=28kW, Qhot=18kW, N=0.88kW, air volume of 2800m3/h
The defined color attributes, gloss tolerance, coating structure, and dry film thickness shall meet the requirements of the project contract, national standards, industry standards, and national laws and regulations.
When handling and installing, it is necessary to prevent squeezing hands, feet and equipment on plates and cabinets.
1. Be responsible for assessing products and suppliers and for selecting qualified suppliers;
In case of joint ventures, each Joint Venture Partner must fill out this form separately and provide the Joint Venture Partner's name below:
When the 24V power supply is connected, the power indicator turns on.
Forestry is an important industry on which the Lao government is currently focusing. Laos produces many precious woods and forest specialties, such as rosewood, teak, mahogany, styrax, gum dammar, shellac, kudzu vine, amomum villosum, fennel, padauk,.
The risks in this aspect lie in the formulation and execution of government policies.
Many factors should be taken into account when selecting the buffer material, including the reasonable requirements of buffer design and the comprehension of fragility of the goods. At the same time, the possibility and extent of the rude loading and unloading of the goods should be estimated.
Formulate the Group' s management policies and targets which should be in line with environment and strategic directions of the Group;
For the drilling rigs, power generators, electric saws, electric planers, air compressors and other strong noise machinery equipment, if necessary, the project department will take the effective noise-reduction measures to meet the local environmental management requirements.
Promote comprehensive use of coal ash, gangue, slag, waste tier and other industrial waste.
At this moment, status of the application in the system is "waiting for uploading of checking document". If the application is in such a status, it will not enter the work queue of the loan approval staff.
a. ZC29B-2 earthing resistance test is carried to measure resistance of the electric power system, electrical equipment and grounding device (for example, lightning rod), and also to measure resistance of low-resistance conductor and soil resistivity.
Two sets of roller press final grinding system are used for raw material grinding; the exhaust gas of the stage 1 cyclone at the kiln tail is cooled to 220 °C after heat exchange in the SP furnace, and is sent to the final press system of the roller press final grinding system by the high temperature fan at the kiln tail to dry the raw materials.
The first refueling shall be after 200 hours of operation. Afterwards, oil shall be added once a month in normal situations.
The welding process shall be carried out as per approved welding process regulations.
If a use the Class Ⅱ Highway standard, design speed is 80km / h, many sections of the route cannot meet the Chinese design specification requirements and need substantial reroute. Considering the current status of traffic flow and the development trend, the use of the Class Ⅱ Highway, 60 km/h standards can meet the development needs in the future.
19.1 Other Common Prerequisites of Credit Line
400V Incoming line 2 current IB (A)
All kinds of filling and compaction shall meet the requirement, once tested unqualified, the next working process's construction was not allowed.
(1) If the design water head at upstream of test section does not exceed the interior wall of pipe top, test water head shall be calculated as the interior wall of pipe top at upstream of test section with 2m added;
Dealing with the cargo consignment and receiving procedures as well as such business as reserving, clearing and inquiring the tonnage of cargo.
Suggestions for teaching: Before teaching, bring the students to the training room to observe the corresponding facilities and equipment, thus improving their direct understanding of rail welding.
Error needing to pay attention to in simple regular operation
Input 4 ~ 20m ADC signal to the analog input card with corresponding tag number;
The commuting travel is relatively complex. It is necessary to analyze the process of travel by public transport in personal commuting travel.
The following methods are mainly used for construction in the bedding section.
Due to uncontrollability of simulated actual adhesion coefficient of wheel rail during operation. The test only passes wheel sprinkling in heading direction to simulate low adhesion status of rail surface and adhesion coefficient achieved via this method is not required.
Under the specified pressure, when the injection rate of consolidation grouting is not more than 0.4 L/min, and the injection rate of multi-hole grouting is not more than 0.8L/min, after the grouting further lasts for 30min, the grouting will be terminated.
2) The foundation pit shall be excavated manually with the excavator and transported by the dumper.
13.1.2. The tenderer must ensure that all requirements for system assurance are met in all stages of the Project.
1. If the examination and approval formalities are not handled in accordance with the operation of extreme-risk level, the operation inside the preheater is strictly forbidden.
The system should have self-diagnosis and failure logging functions.
3. After pouring, the concrete should be vibrated and compacted densely; at places such as wall between windows, and dense steel bar or pipeline areas, small vibrating rods should be adopted for vibrating;
Buildings for the gas prevention station: gas prevention duty room, gas prevention battery charging room, gas prevention equipment storehouse, and gas prevention office.
Our company performed an investigation for hidden dangers on MM/DD/YY and found the following major hidden dangers and we have took emergency measures to rectify them. Hereby we report the relevant information to your company.
2. Model: normally closed; opened in fire emergency; fused at 280°C; φ800
Key measures shall be jointly studied and determined by the Contractor and the designer.
In preliminary stage and in short term, single bus section wiring is adopted for 15kV side of substation at depot and traction substation at NS27, and bus section circuit breakers are supplied. Two ways of independent and reliable 15kV incoming power sources are introduced, and they are respectively connected with 15kV bus in different sections through circuit breaker.
After the construction of the surface course, the four sides shall be enclosed for protection. Special personnel shall be assigned to protect the floor until it is strong enough for people to step on it. The protection time is at least 2 weeks later.
The thermal insulated aluminum alloy window with double hollow glass is applied to the multiple-use building and comprehensive maintenance center of the rolling stock depot.
8. Surface leveling and fixing with 1:3 cement mortar with thickness of 30, with periphery set into small-sized reversed-V-shaped corners
6.2 Matters concerned with the liability for breach of contract, acceptance, transfer, warranty and maintenance of the Project shall be stipulated in an additional implementation agreement signed by the Foreign Affairs Office of the Guangdong Provincial Party Committee of China and the competent department of the Federal Government of Micronesia (i.e., Ministry of Transport, Communications and Infrastructure).
During the process, use GPS construction measuring system for auxiliary positioning. Move the elements out of the semi-submersible barge and complete the unloading. Then move the elements out of the semi-submersible barge by cable to installation site.
For special labor protection articles, the user department shall, according to the provisions and actual demand quantity, report the demand plan to the General Management Department (Safety and Environment) for review.
(3) Due to changes in above investment, the reserve costs and budget reserve for price increases increased by USD 3.115 million.
The cabinet (rack), equipment and accessories shall be free of deformation and surface damage, with complete plating and coating and clear nameplates and identifications.
In the case of any fault of a plug-in, it may be exchanged with another plug-in of the same type as emergency processing.
TC000-90JTI Technical Conditions for Part and Component Printing of General Assembly of 240 Series Diesel Engine.
The outline dimension of line marking sample is-0.5 mm.
The lighting brightness inside the passenger compartment shall be consistent. The average illuminance 800 mm above the floor shall not be less than 200lux.
4. This Certificate shall be properly kept by the holder. In case of loss, the holder shall immediately report to the issuing authority to that effect and apply for a replacement.
Reasonable time limit means the time necessary for the Employer to make efforts to modify and supplement the drawings without delay after receiving the report from the Supervisor.
3 The arrangement of hump shall be in line with the direction of the main traffic flow and based on the terrian condition and the prevailing wind direction;
7) Each jack should reach the same load at the same speed in a synchronous manner during loading. The loading speed should not exceed 3kN/s.
1) Embedded parts, such as the steel plate, casing, and sleeve, shall not be installed until the reinforcement is installed onto the formwork. Embedded parts shall be properly lofted before installation and fixed by spot welding with additional steel bars, then fixed on the mold by spot welding with steel bars in upper, lower, left, right, front and rear directions, to prevent displacement of embedded parts during concreting.
In 2010, the Parliament of Mongolia passed the National Railway Transport Construction Plan, and proposed the construction of the infrastructures for the 5683.5km railway in phases.
Figure 4.2-3 Active Power–Speed Curve of Traction Motor Under Normal Mode
Therefore, the project in this district has indisputable competitive edge.
1 water feed station is arranged in the DIREDAWA station of the whole section, which is a newly built station water supply station.
4. Light gray background and black character on the key not marked.
Steel floor laying composite floor, concrete plate h=120mm, with \U+00848@150 double-floor and double-directional steel bar equipped.
One set of variable frequency water supply equipment, 1 set of chlorine dioxide, 1 set of chlorine dioxide equipment, 1 set of reinforced concrete clean water reservoir will be installed in the water supply station of Station 12.
Warning signs are not hung in the confined space, but there are operations in the confined space.
The specific application materials refer to the relevant provisions in Article 8 of the Guide.
We are the first to carry out comprehensive study for the traffic and transportation system.
Address: No. 63, Heping Rd., Chengguan District, Lanzhou, Gansu Province
Divide the developing tank into two parts (or use two water tanks), and put the films taken out from the fixing solution near the water outlet, after partial developing, move the films to the water inlet to develop them finally in fresh water.
Ultimate bending bearing capacity of transverse single row bolts of web when pulled off:
After self-inspection by the Construction Contractor and sampling inspection by the Supervision Company, it is hereby agreed to handover.
Process operation environment includes physical environment and other factors, such as smoke, dust, noise, temperature, humidity, illumination or weather. In order to meet the requirements of products, ensure the operation performance of the environment and health management system, it is required to keep the working environment tidy and orderly, and consistent with the needs of products, production processes and management system operation.
SCR (5 sets of reciprocating compressor units for overhaul, 2 sets of induced draft fans and 4 sets of centrifugal pumps for overhaul)
a) The customs declarer shall apply for customs clearance and release of the goods with waybill, declaration documents and documents accompanying the train.
The bedrock where the tunnel passes through includes sandstone, argillaceous siltstone and mudstone from Middle and Lower Jurassic (J1-2) .
Examine regularly the situation of civilized construction and exchange experience with each other. In this way, disadvantages can be found and remedied. A reward and punishment system will be strictly observed.
C) When the accident investigation is completed, all departments related to the accident shall submit the accident report to the project department and HSE manager of the company, and send a copy to other departments of the project.
12.2 Basic requirements for construction project information management
●Combination at stable water level ○Combination at flood water level
According to the mineral composition and other characteristics of ores, the type of potassium salt ore in this area can be divided into three categories: carnallite ore, potassium salt ore, and carnallite ore containing tachydrite and bischofite.
4.1.1 Before an employee takes its post, competent human resource department shall verify the authenticity and validity of personnel archives of the employee, and may reject or dismiss the employee in case of false information.
Before piling, generally, a mixture of butter, sawdust, etc. should be applied in the locking part. After the steel sheet piles are driven completely, the excavation should be started in the steel sheet pile.
According to the 12th Five-Year Plan for Energy Development of the National Development and Reform Commission (NDRC) of China, the energy structure will be optimized in during the "12th five-year plan" period, namely the proportion of natural gas consumption to primary energy consumption will be increased to 7.5% and that of coal consumption to the same will be reduced to 65% approximately.
It is compiled by CCCC First Highway Consultants Co., Ltd.
The concrete cushion with thickness of 15cm shall be poured at the bottom of the ladder to fix the ladder base.
Departments involved in the passenger service provision should collaborate to form a close service chain.
The mechanized handling is mainly adopted, supplemented by manual handling.
6) Participate in quality, environment and occupational health and safety goal planning of the Project Department and carefully implement them; be responsible for documentation of responsibilities and authorities of each department and issuance and communication of decisions made by leaders of the Project Department; undertake work relevant to personnel management and training of the Project Department.
d) Earthing and bonding
The maximum allowable deformation shall not exceed 8 mm when a centralized load of 1, 500 N is applied to the center of a single door page.
The air treated by the AC unit enters the main air duct, then is sent to the air outlet through branch air ducts or air delivery hoses and finally is distributed to areas where AC is needed.
Contract Agreement for No. N4 Contract Section of Subgrade and Bridge and Tunnel Works of Yulin Shangluo Line Yulin to Suide Highway Page 1 of 2
The finished cable connectors should have reliable electrical performance and mechanical strength, and meet the requirements of electrical tests. During the fabrication, they must be clean, dry, and cable insulation layer and insulation strength should not be damaged. The cable insulation test must be performed with a megohmmeter before and after the fabrication. The insulation resistance must meet specification requirements.
Contents of overall mechanical ventilation shall be set for toilets, bathrooms and canteen. And operation room of canteen shall be provided with exhaust hood for partial ventilation shall be complemented in chapter 2.4.1 ventilation design principles in the documents.
Inspect the contact force and the height of the boot every 270 days
In addition to the above provisions of this article, other matters deliberated by the Board of Shareholders shall be approved by shareholders representing more than half of the voting rights.
Post-construction settlement of widened subgrade: The pavement cross slope change after post-construction settlement of widened subgrade shall be controlled within 0.5%, and the double control standards of post-construction settlement and cross slope change shall be adopted.
Reply: The line in K77+000-K78+260 section crosses and parallel to the natural ditch and the line in K77+300-K77+670 section occupies the natural ditch, which will be relocated. Other positions which intersect with the ditch span the natural ditch in the form of bridge.
The project economic internal rate of return (EIRR) of total investment is 9.55%, greater than social benchmark yield 8%; accumulative economic net present value (ENPV) is USD 2.20786 billion. The calculation results demonstrate that this project is basically feasible; the sensitivity analysis results demonstrate that this project is capable of strong risk resistance.
(2) Dispatch skilled construction teams with experiences in similar projects from the close construction sites to construct the project.
Note: Do not repair without our factory's consent.
4.10.8 The test and inspection method for the thickness of the inner anti-corrosive layer and the electric spark of the epoxy coating shall comply with the requirements of Table 4.10.8.
Emergency braking is also taken as a plan of redundancy design.
Postion and spacing of horizontal rebars fail to meet the requirements: the first rebar of wall shall be 50mm and the stirrups shall be lowerd to a postion 30 away from the ground in case of conflicts; scaffold shall be provided for the rebar binding of wall rather than stampping on the wall reabrs, so as to avoid displacement of horizontal rebars.
See table 6.1.1 for main structure calculation parameter adjustment of cast-in-place reinforced concrete frame structure and see table 6.1.2 and table 6.1.3 for main calculation results of business district andguest room area:
In case of fire or emergencies, whatever the public broadcast volume status at the public areas and other areas is, the automatic forced switching can be realized and the different fire control broadcasts (evacuation and alarm information) can be played at the maximum volume simultaneously at the accident areas and at the adjacent areas.
Maintenance Shop in Vangvieng Service Area - Layout Plan of Foundation in Area A and B
Vibration at each vibration point shall continue until concrete surface is level, there is no visible subsidence and air bubble and there is mortar running out of the surface. Neither excessive vibration nor inadequate is allowed.
Construction environment and conditions known from site survey and investigation;
The quality, abrasion and fracture conditions of steel wire ropes, the arrangement and friction of angle blocks as well as cable arrangement should be inspected.
Word's color shall be obviously different from the marked component's color.
1) Two sets of indoor fire hydrant pumps (one in service, one for standby) and two automatic spraying pumps (one in service, one for standby) shall be set in the first floor water pump house.
(1) Electric telemechanical construction mainly includes telemechanical terminal equipment installation, cable laying and commissioning in railway power supply dispatching office.
Letter of Acceptance for Lot WGZF Ⅴ of Station Building and Supporting Works of New Wuhan-Guangzhou Passenger Dedicated Line
Unless otherwise noted, the distances from bolt center to the member edges along the internal force direction both are 45mm, and that vertical to the internal force direction is 35mm.
The factory inspection of products shall be conducted by the quality inspection department of the supplier according to table 10. The buyer can conduct the inspection and acceptance according to the standard.
3. Precast hollow slab top surface shall be roughened and anchored end surface and hinged joint surface shall be roughened to be concave or convex surfaces of not less than 6mm for the bonding of fresh and old concrete. Prior to the pouring of hinged joint concrete, loose scales on the bonding surface must be removed and cleaned with water. It shall be watered to keep a wet hinge joint.
9. The substrate of the ramp plates at the both ends of stations of the left line shall be filled in the later period until reaching the top surface of cable trench. For the filling requirements, please refer to the relevant drawings and instructions.
(4)、 The metal case of lighting fixture must be grounded or connected to neutral .
Annual Average Growth Rate 1985-2013
2) Close cooperation with the civil construction company and companies responsible for other disciplines shall be realized during construction, and proper construction schedule shall be arranged, and holes shall be reserved and bushings shall be embedded as required, to avoid collision and rework.
Specification of Railway Signal Axle Counter Application System (TB/T 3189-2007);
The examples of continuous monitoring that automatically switches to backup system include:
4.1.1 According to relevant regulations for work safety accident reporting, investigation and handling as well as the actual situation of the Company, four levels of electric shock accidents are specified in the contingency plan:
The variety and quality of the reinforcement must meet the design requirements and the provisions of relevant standards.
The modes of pneumatic and hydraulic vibration damping are adopted for the pantograph
Notes: ① Workplace: Please indicate the second-level unit, third-level unit, grassroots unit and worksite;
The Owner: Xiamen BAICHENG Construction Investment Co., Ltd (seal)
The front leg is made of 4 I36a profile steel, and the parameters are shown in Figure 4.4-1. The fulcrum span is 1.2 m, and it is calculated as simply supported beam.
Ensure that after the completion of civil works, all damaged lands are restored to the same standard as before construction.
The designed route passes through the section in the form of filled embankment, culvert, or bridge, having little impact on the stability of the subgrade.
The outlet of the safety valve should be higher than that of the main pipe when the medium that containing condensate or condensable gas is discharged into emptying master or the torch master , otherwise, measures should be taken to discharge the liquid.
The power monitoring system(PSCADA)'s working station is separately set on the PCP.
Joint between interlocking blocks shall be dense, not wider than 5mm and filled with joint filler.
6.1 The dowel shall be provided with clear permanent factory logo, product mark, and manufacturing year mark.
Protection against stray current refers to protection of underground metal structures, pipelines and other facilities against the corrosion incurred by stray current.
The impulse withstand voltage between the live parts of the contact circuit of driver controller insulated from each other and between the live parts and the ground: 2500V (peak value), 1.2/50μs, with positive and negative polarities 3 times respectively, disruptive discharge shall not occur
2. All hardware of signal system shall be highly reliable and steady, and shall be provided with fault tolerance and safety measures, for meeting the requirements for work continuity, steadiness and reliability.
6) To master and statistics on-site construction personnel attendance at any time, avoid labor disputes and provide basis for labor cost accounting.
When the control, signal, and other non-power return conductors are laid out in the same metal conduit or metal tray, the total section area of conductor shall not exceed 50% of the section area of the metal conduit or metal tray.
1. JV shall shorten the review time and give written approval to the tunnel plan ASAP.
6.7.1.4 Notes for Transformer Installation
Mainline of the project: The highway standard is adopted for the mainline, with a construction mileage of 10.911km, of two-way 4-lane standard, and with a design speed of 100km/h and a subgrade width of 26m.
Wire-size blowing: blow wire size with electric dryer as per Specification for Heat-shrinkable Tube Blowing. Adjust the temperature of hot air fan before blowing. Keep blowing unit the bush will not fall off easily; the wire size shall face to a direction along which the characters can be easily observed;
The toilet will be automatically locked to prevent passengers from using it.
Production and living facilities include fire pump room, circulating water pump room, sewage treatment station, power distribution room, office, staff canteen, and staff bathroom etc.
The surveying and mapping accuracy of topographic maps must meet the requirements of current surveying and mapping standards and specifications. The surveyed number of topographic feature points shall not be lower than the theoretical number. Self-inspection shall be carried out according to the specifications and the self-inspection report shall be submitted to Party A.
Commercial Contract Procurement Engineer is the responsible person for the commercial contract procurement of the Project, and is mainly responsible for business-related HSE management;
Safety directorwith the assigned team of the responsible engineer
Marking of workshop repair period and shed repair period on the #2 and #4 side frames of the car body shall be applied based on the year and month of overhaul. The years and months of next workshop repair period and next shed repair must be counted as of the next month when the shed repair is completed.
The equipment is mainly composed of the main part of the painting room, the air supply system, the exhaust system, the paint mist treatment system, the air purification system, the fire prevention system, the electronic control system and the operating system.
(5) The assembly jig must be designed and calculated. The bar specifications are selected according to the design requirements to ensure sufficient rigidity and stability, and the horizontal level at the upper opening of the jig must be ±1mm. In addition, in order to facilitate the lifting of the truss, the position of the positioning block of the jig shall have no collision with the hoisted truss;
1. The surface of anti-glare screen shall be free of bubble, crackle, scar, delamination of end face.
3.4.2.5Safe Maintenance Conforming to Ergonomics
(4) Expanded Diagram for Nam Ou 1 230 KV Power Transmission and Transformation Line Tower (LAO-OU-1-D103) One copy
Source: official website of the World Bank: http://www.worldbank.org
12.3.1.3 All materials should be set up in accordance to the layout plan and piled up according to the specifications and types, which should be used out and empty on the working surface when job is done; build an enclosed garbage station and empty it in a timely manner.
Constant value management, including query, modification and archiving of constant values
It is brown-grey, hard plastic and strongly-sticky with approximate pure texture; the core will craze naturally after being air dried. It is distributed below the clay (black cotton soil) layer in a layered way, with the thickness varying from 0m to 11.2m.
Inspection quantity: inspection on 2 points for each testing layer of each abutment by the Contractor; witness inspection on 1 point for every 2 testing layers by the Supervision Firm.
The weeds and reeds in surrounding areas shall be removed manually. The removed weeds and reeds shall be stacked in a centralized manner and cannot be directly thrown into watercourse. In addition, the hot work permits shall be handled for incineration disposal in accordance with the safety management requirements.
Modules in the alarm area do not control equipment in other Alarm Areas.
RAMS control and implementation analysis strategies, analysis approaches and analysis methods at all stages of the Project.
Provide two-way UPS and numbered wiring terminals of circuit breakers; Cooperate with commissioning
Size 3,00х1,65х0,59 m, 1pc=0,73 m3
UPT40040401-00198=Whether to be used for tax
After steel formwork members are dismantled, the temporaty stacking place shall not be less than 1m fron the floor edge and the stacking height shall not be over 1m. no dismantled objects shall be stacked at the floor edge, passage opening and scaffold edge, etc.
Corrosion resistant gaskets must be added at contact surfaces between key keels and steel fasteners (support).
The painted lower 1/4 annular segments shall be lifted first and then arranged to the assembly station of the 1/2 annular segments. During the layout, the jig shall be aligned with the reinforced structure in the 1/4 annular segments so as to avoid deformation of stress position.
In April 2019, the document from Prime Minister's Office of Laos did not agree to build Vientiane South Station (freight station) on 450 Avenue near Saysettha Development Zone and agreed to build the freight station at Thanaleng.
Pour 5cm thick sulfur mortar into the joint between the top of the temporary support and the beam body, and embed resistance wires.
1. Before commencement of the project, we will cooperate with the design unit to carry out technical clarification.
After product shipment, the Tenderer shall immediately send the shipping note to the Tenderee by express mail.
1. Columns with position not indicated shall be subject to centered positioning relative to axis;
Adjust the rest time during summer construction to facilitate construction.
Receiving the supervision and inspection by technicians and quality inspectors, and providing inspectors with corresponding conditions and data.
The design period covers the preliminary survey and design (June 2014 to October 2015).
Note: Passenger flow density refers to the density of the passenger flow in the direction of Lumbini-Kurintar.
The temporary benchmark in the working pit shall be rechecked timely so as to check the elevation.
1. The scheme applies to moderate-heavy work, with 10 minutes of rest and heat preservation in warm places; for mild-moderate work (limited physical activity), the scheme's use criteria can slightly reduce costs.
(2) The height of contact wire on both ends of the section insulator shall comply with the product's technical documents and design requirements.
Communication rate: 9600bps/100Mbps
Travelling mechanism shall adopt Mecanum wheel to ensure equipment travelling in any direction and realize platform sway to any angle through control system.
The temperature set value in the passenger compartment is adjustable, with the range of 22~28℃ (the specific adjustment range can be finally determined according to the client's requirements during the design liaison phase).
The fan foundation is the massive foundation. Cast-in-place beam slab or steel structure is used for the service platform.
3. The monthly/weekly work plan of the Project Department should be uploaded to the company website before 12: 00 on the first working day of each month/week.
disconnect the micro switch or close the circuit and to power on or off the air compressor.
Power and lighting loads are divided into three grades according to their use and importance:
The area is topographically flat and open, so the layout of interchange is not restricted by topographical conditions or villages.
Materials transported from areas where disastrous weather occurs.
3.1.2.3 1 Shallow buried section of tunnel
A series of classic projects, such as Beijing South Railway Station, Terminal 3 of Capital Airport, and China Science and Technology Museum were born from the hands of Libeiya. Our projects has won many honors, including "Luban Prize for Construction Project", "National Award for Architectural Engineering Decoration", "National Award for Scientific and Technological Innovation in Architectural Decoration" and "Award for Architectural Decoration Quality Projects of Beijing".
(15) The lifted members shall be reinforced at a reasonable load-bearing point, to prevent deformation of the tower. The orientation of main wire shall be controlled and adjusted as appropriate. Forced pulling and hauling are not allowed.
The anchor reinforcement of pile top and pile cap shall be firmly connected according to the specifications and design requirements to form a whole. The reinforcement shall be embedded at accurate position at the foundation base and shall meet the requirements for reinforcement protective layer; appropriate number of cushion blocks shall be bound for reinforcement framework to maintain the accurate position of reinforcement in the formwork and the thickness of the protective layer.
Carry out standard charging for the battery cabinet at room temperature and then discharge the battery cabinet at a constant current of 240A after being left at an ambient temperature of (45±2)℃ for 12 hours until the voltage of any single cell reaches 1.5V (monitored by the battery management system).
Signaling equipment shall be resistant to lightning and electric magnetic interference, and make full allowance for lightning / surge / overvoltage / overcurrent protection, earthing and anti-EMI. The electromagnetic compatibility indicators shall meet the requirements of relevant standards.
Under the stop state, after operations are performed based on prompts, release the service braking instruction, switch to manual driving mode and turn the isolation switch to "isolation" position.
When the oil temperature is too low to start the main motor, the electric heater should be started to heat the oil.
Split type, output: Ethernet, power supply 220VAC,
Signature of Representative from Acceptance Office of Ministry of Railway at CSR Qingdao Sifang Co., Ltd:
All tunnels in the line is laid with asphalt pavement; for extra-long tunnel, the warm-mix asphalt shall be used and the ventilation during construction shall be enhanced to ensure the construction safety.
After the work permit is handled, the Construction Contractor shall organize all installation personnel to carry out safety disclosure.
7.5 The Contract is made in 7 copies, with 3 held by Party A and 4 held by Party B.
Project Name: Gaoqing-Guangrao Section of Changchun-Shenzhen Expressway
⑥ Brush the cement mortar binding course: before paving the cement mortar, brush a layer of cement paste with 0.4-0.5 of water cement ratio (the left ash after the plastering of mortar cakes shall be totally removed before brushing, and then the layer shall be watered to wet). The brushing area shall not be too large and the surface course mortar shall be paved during brushing.
6.1 The Agreement is made in decuplicate, with five copies for each party. It shall come into force after being signed by both parties.
Graduated from Chongqing Jiaotong University in March 1997, majoring in Highway and Bridge Engineering for three-year school system (junior college).
The review of suppliers shall establish a review team to pre-examine the supplier's capability, product quality, price and reputation and establish a list of qualified suppliers of materials.
Engineering Design Certificate: Grade B, A241004045
The table shall be filled by each member of the tenderer or a joint venture.
(12) National current fiscal and taxation system and relevant provisions.
3.1 See geologic columns for the distribution of foundation soil layer and performance indexes.
Structure design drawing of anti-slide pile preliminary shaft, dado, and ladder at Ta-Ji Road K314+000~K314+100 sections
(1) Install a new filter, and check the installation status of the new filter with fingers and eyes to make sure the filter is fully installed in the mounting hole;
Earthquake occurs randomly, and it is significant to calculate annual average earthquake disaster loss (expected annual loss) from the perspective of investment decision.
Figure 4.19-4 Scatter of Wheel Load Reduction Ratio for Axle 1 of Car 1 Measured in the Test Conducted at Changyi Section of Shanghai–Kunming High-Speed Railway (Down Line)
The temperature-rise test shall be carried out on a special test bed at the maximum load and maximum speed from forward and reverse directions.
First, the intellectual property rights of all imported technologies still belong to the seller, and the importer can use these technologies for production within the permitted scope, but must pay according to the quantity of products produced.
The legal disputes among member enterprises (units) shall be handled according to relevant provisions of internal economic dispute resolution of the Company.
Voluntary movements of operator, and undefined technical requirements
Note: recording the vehicles entering and leaving on duty, the articles carried, the approver of materials to be transferred out, foreign personnel and important events.
Code for Design of Automatic Fire Alarm System (GB 50116-13) Code for Electrical Design of Civil Buildings (JGJ16-2008)
When the train has a voltage of DC 110 V, the knob=52-S02 (including under multiple operation condition) can be operated in each cab of the train. The test method is shown in the table.
In terms of software, line extension only needs to modify the line configuration database, not the core software.
Before the construction of waterproofing sheet of the Tunnel, the measurement shift first scans the initial support surface, and observes whether there is any initial support intruding the line. If any, it must be well treated before the waterproof can be constructed.
Rationality of the organizational structure, division of works, and resource allocation;
Pile body strength of cement-soil mixing pile shall be tested prior to excavation of foundation pit, and must meet the design requirement. It shall be inspected by strength test on pile core and validated by strength test on grout test block;
2) Location and material of additional waterproof course: The additional waterproof course is set on the upstream face (namely exterior waterproofing).
Recording and flashback function: it can record the operation order, content, time, operators, various control order, alarming confirmation, system equipment condition, etc. It also has the flashback function of train operation and signal system equipment.
10.1.2.Emergency rerailing requirement of bogie (in case of derailment)
And the Design Institutes are The Third Railway Survey and Design Institute Group Corporation and CCDI; the Consulting Institutes are China Railway Eryuan Engineering Group Co., Ltd. and China Railway Engineering Consulting Group Co., Ltd..
Surveying and setting-out shall be conducted before excavation of pipe tunnel according to the construction drawing and control pile of each block.
Planning should systematically consider regional economy, industry, transportation and other factors with overall planning thinking, so as to make the planning scheme scientific, guiding and operable.
The construction sequence is : underground structure→ earth refilling→ surface structure construction→ roof works. Pre-embeddment and reservation for installation as well as lightening protection shall be conducted along with the structure construction.
12.3.3.3.Installation of antenna and antenna feeder of train radio set
Take charge of asset reorganization, asset and capital verification, reform, and other related financial work.
Process influent is condensate water and the mixture of makeup water and purified water used for boiler. The quality is as follows.
Class-Ⅳ and Class-Ⅴ wall rock sections in the tunnel adopt φ25 hollow grouting anchor bolt, with the bolt length of 3m and longitudinal spacing of 75cm.
The area for storing and loading liquid or semisolid dangerous waste containers must be built with corrosion resistant hardened ground and free of cracks on surface.
Emergency rescue equipment and personnel have played an important role in many emergency rescues.
The project quality shall conform to the following standards: 90 scores and above for quality assessment on the handover acceptance of bid section works and 90 scores and above for quality assessment on the completion acceptance of bid section works.
Finance Dept.: be responsible for collecting and paying project funds to ensure adequate working capital, and timely analyzing and preparing cash flow statement to control capital flow.
Check the organization chart and staff list of the project manager department of construction contractor; ensure the construction contractor sets a production safety management organization and arranges production safety management personnel; assign full-time and part-time production safety management personnel with good sense of responsibility and capability of management for all levels of organizations;
aDetermine test items in the factory and prepare factory test programs according to test scope of the Project.
Regarding your bid submission for the Construction of 1880mu of Organic and Ecological Tea Garden and 1506mu of Green and Ecological Tea Garden in Juifeng Town of Pinghe Subproject of Farmland Resources Sustainable Utilization Demonstration Project in Fujian Funded by ADB, the clarification is as follows:
(11) The masonry height of the brick wall shall not exceed 1800㎜ per day.
(2) As the passenger flow and outdoor fresh air parameters of the station are constantly changing, ACU should adapt to the changes in air conditioning load.
Temporarily, the rolling stock standard of China is applied; P70 rolling stock is considered for freight trains and YZ25G rolling stock is considered for passenger trains.
Code for Construction Quality Inspection and Evaluation of 110 kV~500 kV Overhead Transmission Line (DL/T5168-2002)
As shown in the diagram, it is a bearing device which bears the load jointly by center plate and side bearings.
By 2020, the breast feeding rate shall reach 84% and the rate of malnutrition shall decrease to 9%.
There shall be no sharp corner and burr in accessible range.
External line requirement: solid loop resistance ≤ 2000 Ω
Check items determined by the user and manufacturer.
1. Foundation of the water pump is for reference only, and the actual dimension shall be determined in accordance with the pump model provided by the manufacturer.
4. Ring beam (QL) is set along the internal, external, vertical and horizontal walls at the elevation of the beam bottom of 2.700m in the design, which shall be casted in situ integrally while crosses with the lintel or awning beam.
15.4 The maximum number of people, safe evacuation width, number of evacuation exits and safe evacuation distance of fire compartments shall meet the requirements of Code for Fire Protection Design of Buildings.
The check and acceptance of accident treatment quality shall be carried out in strict accordance with the relevant provisions of the construction quality acceptance specifications; if necessary, reliable data shall be obtained through site survey, site measurement, load test, sampling pressure test, instrument test and other methods to make a clear conclusion on the accident.
The color of bricks used for building drywall shall be uniform.
The fireproof performance of the heat preservation material of the water chilling unit shall meet the requirements of national codes and standards.
Rail pieces of turnout shall be lifted with crane, matched with special sling.
For example, for the pulsating pair circuit shown in Figure 1-13, its excitation circuit is as follows:
(7) We will extensively carry out law popularization and publicity on education to enhance the awareness of high-quality development of all members
13. Gradient/slope length 14. Horizontal curve element 15. Ground elevation
The specific classification of types of telecommunications services is provided in the Classification of Telecommunications Services attached hereto.
June 2000 – July 2000 Participated in Solid Edge three-dimensional CAD software technology training in Beijing
Receive and distribute the manufacturing instructions and the model change drawings;
30mm round tube + 25mm cold-rolled round tube
3.3.3.8 Cast-in-place Reinforced Concrete Slab
Exposed finish tile on external wall of 1:2 waterproof motor (concrete wall)
10.6 Measures for Return Visit and Maintenance Service of Project
3.3 Analysis on Cause of Crack Damage of Outer Cap for Axlebox
Radiation-related workers shall take radial alarms with them to avoid radial injury. Meanwhile, special persons shall be assigned to guard important road junctions and the crossings where personnel often pass through.
622M b/s two-fiber bidirectional path protection ring
Surface settlement measurement shall be started at a height (buried depth of tunnel + tunnel excavation height) in front of excavation surface, till the lining structure is closed and settlement basically stops.
WB1 -self - gravity of wall toe (kN);
6)Processing of steel material: Plates or sections shall be prepared by shot blasting (sand blasting) to thoroughly remove the scale, rust and oil stain, and then immediately applied with anti-rust primer paint.
Certificate marks are provide to customers for their use, which conforms to the requirements.
Due to the impact of uneven terrain and greater slope, the overall planning area is not large; moreover, the planned production projects are small and medium-sized factories, and the floor area and dimension (length x width) of each planned plant are limited to some extent, which requires that the planned floor area of each plant shall not exceed 2,000-2,500 m2.
The operating personnel complete the subpackage of normal and deletion reference substance in a reference substance room.
6.2.4.3. Handling procedure for long-term parking
The term "medical wastes" refers to wastes that are directly or indirectly infectious, toxic and otherwise hazardous generated by medical and health care institutions during medical treatment, prevention, health care and other related activities.
Inspection method: shall meet the requirement of Code for Soil Test of Railway Engineering (TB 10102).
Air Separation Unit Engineering, Procurement, and Construction (EPC) General Contract
All information on the operation of the module can be transmitted to the monitoring module through the bus interface (RS485 or RS232 interface), which is convenient for real-time monitoring of the status of each module at the background.
This section is constructed mainly in the form of subgrade. The subgrade surface consists of filled soil mixed with crushed stone. The underlying bedrock is thicker than 5.0m and with high bearing capacity, which provides favorable basic engineering geological conditions.
2 The reinforcing mesh should be welded by steel bars with a diameter of 6mm ~ 8mm, and the mesh spacing should be 15cm ~ 25cm.
4. Products are high, large and deep and outdoor aerial work is much and the construction duration is long; if constructors work outdoor in the open air, working conditions are bad and risk factors are many.
Blower room: 21mX21mX6m, one blower room with main equipment of three centrifugal blowers, two in operation and one stand-by, each blower Q=4800m3/h, P=78.9kpa, N=110kw;
Concrete shall be vibrated and compacted, and then the plate surface shall be plastered.
Installation of horizontal air ducts shall be from top to bottom, from inside out, and trunk line first and branch line second. The starting point to installing air duct of each system depends on the field condition.
Projects that do not need to be developed shall be controlled according to the processes specified in this Procedure and its processes shall be appropriately deleted or reduced as required.
For masonry works above EL 0.500, M5 composite mortar will be used for laying fired perforated bricks or solid bricks.
Sections of GK0+000~GK0+040, GK0+100~GK0+190, GK0+210~GK0+280 and GK0+320~GK0+388.792 need to be evacuated and replaced with a depth of 1m.
JL/TL10.013DFactory Test Report of XYN(JYN)-31.5 Electrified Railway Metal Enclosed Switchgear
Frequency of events causing hazards and severe injuries.
Masonry structure at No.2 construction area (skirt building and garage), with proper indoor plastering and ground bedding
C. Specimen of each bored pile shall be properly made according to the rules, and sufficient support shall be provided for the site supervision carried out by the supervision engineer during tests.
The temporary barriers, warning signs and signal lights shall be set for the protections of all excavation works to prevent the accidents and property loss.
In order to quickly and effectively put out any kinds of fires, all the places nearby configuring fire fighting facilities should have no barriers for shielding.
Selection of test instruments shall be determined according to the voltage withstand strength of the cable to be tested.
To strictly abide by the relevant laws and regulations of Nigeria and comply with the relevant provisions of health, safety, quality and environment;
Construction of overground reinforced concrete (incl. prestress)
Bund Shanghai tunnel (13.95m outlet diameter of the segment)
The longitudinal reinforcement is anchored into ground ring beam and the upper end is anchored into top ring beam.
The connection between the 6th of October City Line and the conventional public transportation is mainly realized through the entrance and exit of the railway station and the bus station. Therefore, the adjustment of the conventional bus stations, including the first and last bus stops and the half-way bus stops, is the key point to be considered in connection planning.
As shown by the figure, the operating area of operator on the driving position can be divided into two parts:
All of them belong to liquefaction soil layer, and the sand liquefaction has a certain influence on works, so check and calculation shall be carried out for subgrade, bridge and culvert works, and engineering reinforcement shall be conducted for liquefied sand layer.
Auxiliary inverter: AC 400VRMS, 3-phase 4-wire, 50Hz; AC220V provided by transformer
If d > 300±(0.025d+6) mm;
The liner layout of terminal makes operation more effective, and also accords with local cultures and regional characteristics of the architectures rationality of the city.
The front panel of PECU consists of a button (built-in "ALARM" indicator), a microphone, a loudspeaker and 3 working status indicators.
Routine tests will be implemented according to TB/T2433-1993, TB/T1804-2009 or equivalent standards and factory test conducted on each HVAC unit.
It shall be consistent with technical requirements of the manufactory. The breakdown voltage shall not be less than 25kV in general
1.13.3 Datasheet for All Main Components
During the test, the pressure in the pipe section shall gradually increase to the working pressure (the working pressure shall be determined according to the design and specification requirements). Pipes and interfaces shall be inspected. If there is no leakage in the pipeline, the pressure in the pipeline will be increased to the test pressure again. At this time, the pressure should be observed for 10 minutes. The test is qualified when the pressure drop does not exceed 0.05Mpa.
Aluminum alloy color light signal mechanism XSL-A4 dwarf, four-aspect
(1)The transducer shall be parallel to the moving direction of the rail-lifting unit;
(1) Reinforcement (including steel strand) must be accepted batch by batch as per different types of steel, grades, marks, specifications and manufacturers;
As an advanced system, Hesop system can not only provide traction voltage to the network, but also recover braking energy from vehicles. Furthermore, the system can be integrated into the existing system through transformation, or being built into the new lines in their construction stage.
□ Yes □ NoAC separated from DC for plug connector:
(2) Investigate and check the sources of fillers of the bed; collect relevant materials such as production and supply.
Agriculture is one of the pillar industries of PNG. Although the agricultural population accounts for 85% of its total population, agricultural technologies are relatively backward.
The China Harbour Engineering Company Ltd. is a taxpayer within the jurisdiction of our bureau and has already gone through tax registration with our bureau according to law. The tax registration certificate number is 91110000710933796P.
Lower heat value of high-quality waste = 9630kJ/kg (2300kcal/kg)
[Constitution] On May 26th, 2003, the new Constitution was adopted by a referendum in Rwanda, the main content of which is the implementation of a semi-presidential system.
(2) The interior and surface of the building enclosure structure are free from moisture condensation and mildew;
Salary standards: the average monthly salary of the professional technical labor is about 12,600 Birr (USD 700) and that of other labors is about 1800 Birr (USD 100).
Note: The solid solution heat preservation time is generally not less than 2h.
If there is mud on the steel bar, rebar wire brush shall be used to wash it with tap water.
Bill of Quantities of Main Works of Detouring via Short Bridge Scheme (Option IA) and Straightening via Long Bridge Scheme (Option IB)
Four 4kg portable dry powder fire extinguishers, eleven 8kg portable dry powder fire extinguishers, two 5kg portable CO2 fire extinguishers and two 35kg wheeled dry powder fire extinguishers.
Test and verify loop of control valve.
The recommended route passes through the city center at the urban section in Alisabieh and makes use of existing abandoned railway passage, to improve the transportation capability of the raod network of the urban section in Alisabieh.
Real-time monitoring for card holder and equipment is available through transmission record monitor.
b If the quality certificate documents are incomplete, the materials to be inspected should be processed and then marks shall be properly marked and verified, and the identification should be done after the documents are complete.
The fastening piece shall be without looseness and the operating mechanism shall be flexible;
Table 8-2-9 Post-construction Settlement Control Standard of Subgrade
After the ZFTW-series channel surge protector fails, the tripping device in the surge protector will be automatically separated from the signal transmission line, and the display window turns from "green" to "red".
The 6m spacing among main frameworks and the 3m spacing among supporting frameworks will be placed with C15 concrete. The intercepting edge will be made of C15 concrete.
4) Code for Design of Fire Protection of Buildings (GB50016-2006;
(3) Establish and improve the rules and regulations related to quality control and quality control operation programs.
All microprocessor-controlled devices should build in a diagnostic program that runs periodically and can locate board-level faults at least.
Table 4.3-2 Number of Allocated Cars for Operation of LOT1A Line of Abuja Urban Rail
Wuxi Modern Logistics Information Trade Center Intelligent Project
Table C.0.1 Contents of attribute information collection of railway models
1. The tip of steel pipe earthing electrode is cut into four sawtooth shapes at the section 120mm long from the pipe orifice, and the tip is welded inward.
SV40_PL_ODD_LEVER_CAP(optical drive lock cover) screen printing parts
There are twelvecopies, six copies to the Employer and six copies to the Contractor.
(7) Power SCADA system: to realize remote control, communication, measuring and adjustment for main electrical equipment of power supply system along the line by dispatching terminal, communication channel and actuating station (automatic system in substation) in rail transit control center.
After the heliostat in the MAC installation, place the support frame in the MAC, handleit to the goods stockto conduct the leaving formalitieswhen it is shipped out of the heliostat surface construction area by the forklift of 15T, then return to the heliostat production and processing factory;
(6)Party B shall accept inspections by relevant government departments according to law and shall not refuse or obstruct the inspection;
Lighting up when the wheel passes the main sensor head 1
9. 1-1.5m slab culvert at DK144+841, DK149+921
8.1.1 Requirements for stockpiling of finished goods: reinforcement products, concrete members and metal products, embedded partsshall be stored outdoor; aluminum, decorative finished goods stored indoors.
Test 3 randomly chosen embedded sleeves independently, and all embedded sleeves shall be deemed qualified when all 3 of them are qualified.
2.7.1.6 Commissioning Scheme for Substation Discipline
Use a high-pressure water gun to manually and repeatedly flush the soil body up and down to form holes, and the hole diameter shall be greater than 200mm, and the hole depth is about 0.5m deeper than the bottom of the filter tube.
This procedure is made to ensure the mutual exchange between the internal company and the external organizations on relevant quality/environment/occupational health and safety information of the Company.
The arbitration institution or people's court instructs to stop working.
Bolts, socket countersunk head screws, spring washers and stopper seat washers on the door leafs shall be replaced.
The track-laying works is the major works in control period for the design section. Key measures to determine timely completion of the track-laying works are as follows:
1. Materials and glasses for window frames and door frames on balcony shall be selected as per the specific design for energy saving.
Construction of embedded road pipes must be finished before pavement construction.
(5) Road traffic Signs and Markings (GB5768-2009);
R&AM Sub-system shall generate data for Mainland ticketing system in accordance with the requirements as specified in Section 7A.8.6. In order to generate the required data for Mainland ticketing system, R&AM Sub-system shall be able to extract the raw data from the central repository and/or receive the raw data from other Sub-systems of Central System.
3) For its laying, the optical cable must be laid out from above the cable tray and keep loose arc shape.
2) A refuge storey shall be built on the 16th floor of the Tower No. 10 (office and commercial). The two smoke prevention stairways to the refuge storey shall be separated upwardly and downwardly on this floor.
This specification will be an integral part of the supply agreement once approved by the buyer.
The main objectives of environmental protection are shown in Table 1-19 according to the field survey, and the specific location is shown in Attached Figure 1.
Large track maintenance machine operation is adopted for the line, and small refuge recesses in the tunnel are canceled. Instead, only large refuge recesses are set on both sides at about every 300m in staggered arrangement.
For on-site deployment of earth-rock work, try to utilize the excavation and the tunnel spoil, and determine the source, the filler group, the transportation distance and tools based on the terrain, the formation characteristics, the filler source, the filler demand, the traffic conditions, etc.
Indoor and outdoor signal equipment of all stations, like display and intelligent power supply panel, should be energy and electricity saving type;
The structure's maximum inter-floor displacement angle under X-axis wind load condition fails to meet the requirements in specification. Refer to the table below for details:
Therefore, bauxite process for the Project is designed as three-stage ore washing process to ensure stability and reliability.
The water content of compaction shall be strictly controlled within the optimum water content range of +2% ~ ˉ1%.
(b) LCD display screen/arrival and departure notice screen
The car adopts hydraulic transmission, equipped with two sets of two-axle power bogie and two sets of power transmission system (engine power rating: 388kWX2).
Check whether the "Working" state of the friction roller is disconnected.
Only when aluminum profiles are inlaid can they be installed with high requirements.
After the rescue train is dispatched, organize the rescue train to return.
j) Responsible for directing the development and design, process planning and appraisal of contract products, and undertake overall responsibility for the technical quality of the products;
Formwork and reinforcement: Before and during placing, maintain temperature at 35°C.
Since 2000, the imported and exported cargoes at the container terminal of DaresSalaam port increased rapidly, resulting in large-scale overstocking of cargoes in DaresSalaam port.
10-M12, hole depth: 35, thread depth: 30
The part below ±0.00 will be built with Mu10 clay solid brick and M10 cement mortar; the part above ±0.00: wall, staircase etc. will be built with M10 clay porous bricks; partition walls without beams will be built with GRC hollow slabs; partition walls in toilets will be built with clay porous bricks.
Be responsible for self-inspection and declaration inspection of concealed works, fill in the working procedure quality form correctly, properly make all kinds of original records and data processing, and be responsible for all kinds of data and text problems filled in.
Simulate magnet interference for one time by rolling simulation wheel over the head at outdoor head points in 48s, and observe rise and drop state of the relay of corresponding track sections indoors.
In the implementation of Quality/Information Security Management System (Q/ISMS), when the person in charge of the activities fails to perform his/her responsibilities, he/she can authorize other person to perform the responsibilities.
We have done inspection before commencement to ensure that the instruments and equipment are in good conditions and the instruments have complete records of routine verification and calibration.
1) Briefly describe the relevant documents followed in the design, the sanitary standard of the plant, the scope of design, and the basic data used in the design.
Low upstream pressure of inlet pneumatic butterfly valve of #2 vacuum pump
According to the above-mentioned current situation in the study area, three alternatives are mainly studied, namely alternative of coastal route (MOT proposal alternative), alternative of route in parallel with expressway and alternative of inland route.
The allowable current carrying capacity depends on three main factors:
Locomotive & Car Branch ,Product Quality Supervision and Inspection Center of MOR
(2) Complete the jacket drawings of seven (7) turbines by March 31, 2020;
1. In the technical requirements No. 15 on sheet 1, the serial number of welding inspection documents is undefined. Please provide the document number.
Enterprise Mailing Address: No. 921, Beibinhe Road West, Anning District, Lanzhou City, Gansu Province
The train public address system shall be equipped with a background noise detection device.
First conduct cutting blasting in the middle of working face of the foundation pit, and then conduct bench blasting excavation in surroundings after a certain free face is formed.
Since the total income depends on making the right choice, it is very important to choose the right rolling stock.
Figure 11 Mounting Bolts of Bogie Cowcatcher or Sanding Device Installation Arm (CR400AF-0207/0208 Train Only)
Strata of various ages along the Railway are relatively completely, with numerous sediment types, from Cenozoic quaternary loose sediments to Paleozoic Ordovician sedimentary strata. The magmatic activities are strong, with large-scale magmatite.
The manufactures should determine the wind load resistance, the water tightness, the air tightness, the sound insulation, the thermal insulation, the fire prevention, the glass thickness, the position of the safety glass and the anti-explosion requirements based on the building function, the local climate and the environmental conditions, and should design, manufacture and install these parts in accordance with relevant specifications.
The Vendor shall, at the design liaison stage, provide the vehicle lamp design scheme for the Buyer's confirmation.
13.2.1 The location of reserved holes, embedded parts, rails of the stairs and balconies shall be checked in accordance with the drawings of different disciplines prior to the construction of concrete structure, to faciliate construction.
After the test-assembling, polish formwork and apply the release agent centrally.
7. The 230kV Pakmong 2 substation is located in Luang Prabang. For primary works of substation, the 115kV section is connected by double busbar. In this project, the backup bays are used for one circle of outgoing line.
President Rachmat Yinbang Trident expressed commendation to teaching facilities, school-running characteristics and achievements of our school.
(2) Foundation treatment: If a sludge layer or soft soil layer is found in foundation excavation, soil replacement will be required and the specific circumstance shall be reported to the supervision engineer or the Employer for approval; only after the approval is obtained can the construction be started.
Total planned residential units are 3256, and the planned residents are 19530.
1 The curing time of the concrete mixed by Portland cement and common Portland cement shall not be less than 7d. The curing time of concrete mixed with admixture or with permeability resistance requirements shall not be less than 14d.
Pull down all fuse heads to keep the fuses in the disconnected state;
There are bricks, tiles and lime supplied from towns and villages in the Lot, which can meet the demand for construction.
The dimension of stand surface is 762mmX762mm. The load of vibrating stand shall conform to the total mass requirements of
The company shall configure necessary inspection, test and measuring equipment, which shall be conforming with required inspection and test capability or meet the requirements of calibration regulations.
Drink more water. Otherwise, dehydration will immediately lead to compressed air illness. Or take some clean clothes inside.
Specific control actions will be developed for schedule implementation.
The stratified stacking is carried out by a rotary cantilever stacker, and the material is reclaimed by the scraper reclaimer.
Four bricks shall be laid at both sides of post-cast strip and water shall be retained for 2-week curing.
2. The wall with seams of block work and concrete structure parts measuring at no more than 150, apply a strengthen layer of polymer cement mortar andadd a layer of alkali-resistant fiberglass mesh;
See Figure 4-3-3 for details.
Description Table 6.3.2-1 Common Rocks Containing Active Alkali Ingredients.
The description on electrical interface of the on-board earthquake terminal is as follows:
Expansion joints shall be flushed without lapping, and shall be filled with waterproofing materials tightly.
Station: means the dividing point with assigned lines which handles the receiving and departure of trains, passing and the passenger and freight transportation.
To inspect divisional and sub-divisional works and final products, and participate in the final product quality evaluation where the quality and safety inspector can exert the quality supervision authority during construction.
Appropriate anti-stripping agent adding method shall be adopted to adjust the mineral powder adding method, and avoid the phenomenon that the particles less than 0.075mm are insufficient in the mineral mixture.
Bp0-benchmark concrete pressure bleeding rate, expressed in percentage (%)
When the train is stationary (V≤3km/h, tentative), the door opening/closing command is valid;
Using fraud, bribery, cheating, colluding in bidding and other means to trade, seeking for improper interests.
This mode is very useful for situations where the train is required to reverse when the train exceeds the stop point at manual driving.
Approval, distribution, extension, closure and cancellation of permit shall be specifically managed and implemented in accordance with the Operation Permit Management Procedure.
Therefore, it avoids the disadvantages of the instable water pressure/ flow rate and poor reliability of the solenoid valve because currently a large pump is often used to supply water to multiple workplaces and the solenoid valve is adopted to control the water supply to each workplace. Furthermore, for conventional water supply mode, if the water pump fails, the entire car washing machine is in the status of shutdown.
All load powers exceed that of many 5mA testers
This shall be done by civil engineering specialty according to electrical specialty's requirements.
The main throughput of Mombasa Port is for the container, dry bulk cargo, general cargo and liquid cargo; this part of transport volume is centralized in the 1# -19# berths of the Port. Except for 19# berth, the remaining berths are provided with railway loading/ unloading line into the Port area.
3. The office table is of split mounting type as a whole, provided with adjustable foot. Bolts and rivets are adopted for connection in a concealed manner wherever possible.
When emulation DC net voltage is in DC1300V, at timing of 0.5s and the short circuit point is in back side of the electric reactor, the emulation results are as follows.
Inspection Record for Machining and Manufacturing of Key Parts No. 1
For the section from Songbei Shimao Avenue to Jiangxin Island, the starting and ending mileage is K1+089~K3+610 (including pier No. P48 and those added in the modification), and the total length of the line is 2521m.
Re-stringing 1.614km and dismantling 1.8km of the original line, totaling 4 towers.
4. The subgrade slope outside the tunnel indicated here is only for reference. Refer to related design drawings of the subgrade for details.
The distance from both ends of the turnout to abutment tail shall not be less than 50m.
4.1.5.2 Serviceability Limit State
The Regulations apply to the bidding work of the marketing departments with bidding documents in general contracting projects at home and abroad.
1. In resolution area, the exhaust fan directly blows for resolution for more than 6 hours;
③ Whether the design instructions, the bill of quantities, and the specification and quantities of main equipment and devices are in compliance with the drawings;
RMB Two Hundred and Eighty Five Million and Five Hundred and Forty One Thousand and Six Hundred and Thirty Only
P5. All the reinforcements in the drawing are of B500B type.
(4). Unloading and movement shall be subject to Article 6.
Sedimentation or blockage of drainage systems like rivers, water channels and irrigation canals by any earth and rocks excavated during construction shall be avoided.
(1) According to design drawings, the posts shall be drilled to be consistent with the road alignment.
Part 4: Emission and Immunity of the Signaling and Telecommunications Apparatus
This construction site is located at the small mileage end of Suha Medium Bridge. In the hilly area of the plateau where the terrain is fluctuant, gullies are developed, the bedrocks of some locations are exposed and the flat section with wide distribution of clay (black cotton soil) is dominated by cultivated lands, the line is constructed by excavation and locally by fill.
3. There is access to the existing Port Harcourt station, and the amount of demolition is large;
Impact on water source mainly reflects on the pollution to water source during construction.
M train series use the velocity sensor (PG sensor) installed at the main motor, while T train series use the signal sent out by the speed generator installed at the axle head of each train for calculating the speed of each axle during each calculation cycle and detecting the empty sliding state.
According to the design requirements, the concrete cushion layer is set at the bottom of the pile cap ground beam, and each side is 100mm wider than the foundation beam or cap edge; the 50*100 timber is used as the formwork on the cushion side.
Table 2.5.7-2 Comparison of LED Energy Savings
When external directors or more than one-quarter of the directors think that the information is insufficient or the argument is not clear, they may propose to postpone the meeting of the board of directors or the issues listed in the notice of the board of directors' meeting, which shall be adopted by the board of directors.
Valves of all the fire pipes shall have opening/closing signs.
The cargos loaded and unloaded in Kisumu Station are steels, cement, containers, grains and bulk cargos, and the station is equipped with equipment such as portal crane.
Working system of comprehensive working hour calculation: The average daily and monthly working hours shall not exceed the legal standard working hours.
31535915-5917 Fax: 31535867
To Baldher (8.250Km)
100RE-12.8m 1520 Nr./km Concrete sleeper (remove mainline)
1.Please inspect the sensor connection 2.Please inspect the installation of speed sensor 3.Please replace board card MB03B
Article 57 The director of auditing department shall report the work to the General Manager.
However, the management is responsible for monitoring interest rate risk and would consider to hedge important interest rate risk when needed.
The best freight train speed matching with the passenger train speed of 120km/h is 80km/h. If the speed difference is too large, wear of the freight train's inner rails will be increased, resulting in significant increase of track maintenance workload.
Due to the large amount of alkaline oxides in the kiln, most of the SO2 will be absorbed, and the SO2 emission in it is about 105kg/h; and the SO2 emission in the power plant boiler is about 85kg/h.
(2) Be responsible for preparing, reviewing and revising the project quality and safety assurance system documents according to the requirements of the Reconnaissance Project Department on project quality and safety objectives.
During the construction period of Shree Ugrachandi Higher Secondary School, the southern sports ground can be used as the site for the turnover classroom. After the construction of the teaching building is fully completed, the temporary turnover classroom will be demolished.
2. The atlas is applicable to the space of truss aluminum alloy 6082-T6.
Project Office for Rural Drinking Water Safety in Lanping County / 8613988605720
Thika~Nanyuki meter-gauge railway in Kenya
Clay, weathered marl and sandstone, the rock mass is relatively fragmented, the attitude of rock formation is nearly horizontal, belong to typical unfavorable combination, resulting in poor stability of surrounding rock.
2. Flow construction is organized between all roads in the Construction Area 4. The construction sequence is: RoadC6→RoadB4→RoadB3→RoadB2→RoadC7.
By combining the statistical results and the vertical average flow velocity vector diagram of all the observation stations in Table 5-1-3-1, it can be seen that reciprocating flow appears at each observation station, because of the difference position of the stations and the topographic influence, the flow direction varies.
Check whether the pipeline sleeve is not damaged, the pipe clamps are complete, the installation is firm and not loose, and the accessories are not missing.
The construction of railways in Pakistan can effectively improve regional traffic conditions and drive the exploitation of domestic mineral resources so that the resources can be transported from here to other places largely and rapidly, thus further promoting economic and social development of Pakistan.
It is forbidden to seal CTBU and axle box with plastic bags, as this will lead to condensation.
Materials that are likely to raise dust during transport shall be put below the side and tail gates, and shall always be covered with canvas;
Attachment: Project Manager(Zhu Zhe) Scanning copy of Constructor Qualification Certificate (1)
Mortar strength shall be subject to the results of sample test of curing for 28 days under standard conditions.
(6) Interface commissioning in vehicle manufacturing factory and its test line
When the concrete outer tube is constructed to two plates above the smoke vent, install the external lifting scaffold, and set the 16-beam electric-controlled raise scaffold for the chimney electric climbing formwork system.
2. This drawing is a schematic drawing for design of single-hole reinforced concrete circular culvert.
Reinforced Concrete Works: concrete pouring of important structures and parts.
During construction of the second section, mix the materials for and level and compact the second section and the part not compacted of the first section together.
Surface clearing and road: March 1, 2021 - May 29, 2021;
Karl Fischer method is a typical method for analyzing and measuring trace amount of water in substance. At present, analytical instruments adopting the theory are used for measuring the content of water in LiPF6.
Once the work of the mooring of the structure is concluded, PEP and the marine guarantee inspector shall be notified to make a joint inspection to verify that all work has been finished in accordance with the loading manual and that the area is completely clean and free of loose elements and garbage.
The standard viaduct section has a width of 25.5m and the ground road has a total width of 40m ~ 84m.
Operation information of HSE management system in the branch company
Cement: cement with the initial setting time of more than 3h and longer final setting time (preferably 6h or more) should be used. Fast-hardening cement, high-early-strength cement, and cement that has been deteriorated by moisture should not be used.
Be good at communication and cooperation; Willing to express his/her opinions; has polite learning and asking attitude.
Disconnect self-equipped cable of load pressure sensor of =28-B107.
Light current cable incoming/outgoing holes shall be reserved in the network communication/cabinet room, including 300mmx300mm openings reserved on base plate under the raised floor against the wall at the lower position the cabinet room.
ATP trainborne host equipment, track circuit information receiving unit, balise information receiving unit
At the end of period, the monetary items in foreign currency are translated as per the spot exchange rate applicable on the balance sheet date.
Customer service center: 023-67032695
Take charge of the receiving and acceptance of the procurement products (including asking the material controller and the Supplier for the qualified certification materials and detection report) to avoid the unqualified materials entering the warehouse. Make relevant record and submit the report forms of materials receiving and acceptance balance in storage to the company work management department regularly;
High-strength grouting materials shall be poured into the steel column base and equipment foundation;
According to the evaluation based on the design locomotive routing and transport demands of this line, it is agreed that 25G way train will be adopted for passenger train and 30 will be allocated in the preliminary stage; in addition, it is recommended that the number of increase of the passenger trains for the short term and for the long term will be suitable for the passenger traffic development.
Accounting policy change due to the execution of new Accounting Standard for Business Enterprises
In combination with the conceptual plan, we will develop a comprehensive understanding of project tasks, base environment, and project positioning, and develop overall positioning, function types and scales for the project, and finally confirm appropriate development indicators.
See "Design Drawing of Waterproof and Drainage System of GK24 Under-cut Tunnel" and "Layout of Blind Pipes in GK24 Tunnel" for detailed drainage of under-cut tunnel.
--End of the 823B (Civil) and 852 (Ticketing System) Interface Requirements Specification--
3.The Agreement shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with laws of the People's Republic of China .
5.2.2.7 Clearing of weeds in surrounding areas and base slabs of water intake pump house and open diversion channel.
The Contractor shall submit the samples to the Supervisor 28 days before the scheduled procurement.
2. The rotating parts (such as top driving parts, tensioning parts) must be provided with protective net covers or isolation devices.
Provide external power supply for the communication UPS power supply system to meet the power supply requirements of communication system equipment.
Intercepting around the pit (trapezoidal ditch with the average bottom width of 50cm, height of 50cm and
The railway administration shall formulate Instructions for Organization of Train Operation for high-speed railways according to the principles as stipulated in this regulation and in combination with the specific conditions of local high-speed railways.
License No.: 10110116322
Since the beginning of this year, the daily car loading on China's railway system has exceeded 170,000 seven times.
Emission of tail gas form construction machinery such as trucks, loaders, excavators, bulldozers and rollers will cause waste gas pollution in the construction area, which will reduce the quality of ambient air.
The lighting system can become an organic composition of the whole building space.
(1) Welders must carefully check the welding machine and welding seam fit-up before welding, and are allowed to weld after confirming that the welding machine, fit-up clearance and tack welding are qualified.
Taiyuan Vehicle Depot of Daqin Railway Co., Ltd.
Time for switching from mains supply to emergency power supply: ≤0.2S (except online EPS)
3.3 Interface with DC1500V Switchgear Section
Whether the thermal insulating materials is well bonded and whether the surfaces are even;
For equipment provided and deployed by the Tenderer at the public security sub-bureau of Luoyang rail transit, it power supply is provided by the police communication system.
Based on the principle of economical use of land in the design, earthwork and stonework excavated along the cutting shall be utilized as much as possible. For sections requiring borrow fill, soil shall be taken from nearby wastelands at both sides of line and isolated hill near the line in a distributed way.
The cut pipes are threaded according to the pipe diameter one by one and the quality of the thread is guaranteed at the same time.
① Taking full advantage of on-site management team, construction team with organizational system, package of construction equipment and temporary facility of our company.
Overall organization - Liaison with local government and public
The automatic detection gauge of contactless sensor shall be adopted to measure the straightness of welded joint and the straightness deviation shall be displayed on the display window.
The main grounding downlead should be installed on the same side of the equipment grounding end along the line direction, with the end of the grounding downlead protruding from the parallel groove clamp by 20-30 mm.
Field Test Methods of Subgrade and Pavement for Highway Engineering (JTGE60)
Layout Plan of Water Supply and Drainage of TRANSPORTATION CENTER
and subject to any requirement in the Contract as to the order in which the Works shall be executed, the Project Executing Agency will, with the Engineer's Notice to Commence the Works, give to the Contractor possession of so much of the Site, and:
After the bridge reaches the design strength, D-shaped temporary beams are erected at right track, and the frame bridge is jacked into the position between the two tracks.
Table 4.24 Evaluation Statistical Table for Quality Indexes of Borrow Area I
We strive for overall improving the project quality and construction safety along with the building of excellent projects.
The circuit shall be relatively fixed with the frequent inspection and maintenance. At the place whether the vehicle often passes, the hanging height shall be no less than 5m.
(1) According to geographical structure, turnout position is to be proved correct using DBJ and FBJ ↑ contact of line 7; ↓ contact of SJ is used to contact line 7.
a. According to the design requirements, in the construction process of filling embankment with loose and soft soil, displacement observation piles shall be set at 2m outside the slope toe on both sides, with a distance of 20 ~ 50m along the route. According to the settlement observation, control the filling rate and record the settlement during filling and placement.
Special nano-particle modification technology endows the coating with excellent corrosion resistance.
8. July 31, 2011, Reply of Ministry of Railways on the Design Alteration for Rerouting of Crossing Wuhan-Guangzhou High-speed Railway Section of the New Changsha-Kunming Passenger Dedicated Railway (TJH [2011] Doc. # 499);
Manufacturing costs _ Manufacturing costs - Import freight _ Manufacturing costs - Import freight - Freight charge
Before placing the pipe, the flatness of the bottom of the groove must be checked, and the pipeline can only be installed after the requirements are satisfied.
□ Salary per Qty. () □ Salary per time (RMB /month)
Only after test of three continuous stations ( no matter from Dhaka or Singia or from the two stations at the same time) are completed, and the Employer or its representative believes that it conforms with the safe operation of the train, hand over and operation of this signaling, telecommunications and information system can start.
4.3For butt joints without grooves, tack welding shall be as low and flat as possible.
6.1.4.1 "Dead weight+earth pressure" working condition
5.5.3.2 Quality Control and measures of Line concealment Engineering
3.3 The site design cooperation personnel shall participate in the inspection and confirmation of the engineering geology timely in accordance with the quality standards of acceptance, participate in acceptance of the completed project and provide the necessary design documents and data.
8.1.1Party A shall ensure that the insurance information is complete, true and reliable, unless it involves the scope of confidentiality mandated by the state.
Test started on＿＿＿＿＿ Test ended on＿＿＿＿＿
Operate the turntable to rotate: turn the switch SA10 and select "positive" or "negative" rotation control, then the turntable will rotate.
2) Within thirty (30) days after Party A agrees to move, if Party A moves the items owned by Party B without permission, which causes depreciation or discard of the equipment, Party A shall bear the compensation therefrom;
2) Wooden doors and aluminum alloy windows are used in the office buildings.
(6) Conduct site patrolling based on aerial photos by using advanced UAV technology in this Project, to timely know site operation information and construction situation. Meanwhile, monitor the position unavailable by manpower with UAV, to effectively reduce safety risk in construction.
The results will be submitted to the chief engineer of the project and analyzed by the geological engineer, geological studio staff and relevant experts under leadership of the chief engineer. The necessary safety measures for possible geological problems will be put forward to direct on-site construction.
According to the transport volume forecast, the scale of inspection and maintenance for the station repairing depot is designed as per the initial term for the research with 1 station repairing track, 1 car storage track and 5 station repairing position. The station repairing facilities and the station repairing equipment, such as one station repairing shed and wheel storage shed and the auxiliary production workshop will be set in the section.
● When the fixing the self-tapping screws, the strength should be controlled by the strutting piece and hand feeling, and the strength should be moderate. Excessive force will cause depression on panel, and understrength will cause insufficient fixing.
Operation process: Taking station 101 as an example, start up and press the material feeding button M101, then the indicator light is on.
Insulation board hook, flat steel 4 X 40 X 100
Sino-US Rail Transit Equipment Joint Research Sub-center
(1) spatial integration: "Cloud valley" expands the traditional one-line city corridor into a cross-shaped comprehensive transportation system, reducing the dependence of stations on line-side transportation connection, so that the north-south direction can be fully integrated with urban development facilities, and the functions of "station" and "city" are mutually benefited without interference.
(2) It is required to submit 8 copies of draft for preliminary design documents and 40 copies of preliminary design in abridged edition in 40 days upon field acceptance for preliminary survey;
Before installation, the anti-corrosion inspection shall be carried out on the steel strand in the hole of the tensioning section of the frame beam. Inspect and make sure the coated butter is not contaminated and the outer bellows not damaged. The anti-corrosion treatment of the steel strand in the hole shall be carried out before the anchor rope anchor is found not to meet the requirements. The next process shall not be carried out until the inspection by the supervision engineer is qualified after the treatment is completed.
Many foreign countries have made great effort to achieve weight reduction of high-speed trains. For example, the train body weight at Japan Shinkanshen is reduced to 537 kg/car and the railway weight at the outskirts of Copenhagen is reduced to 360 kg/car.
After the large clinker is crushed by the crusher at the discharging end of the cooler, it is sent to a Φ40m clinker silo by the bucket chain conveyor.
The station subsystems can stimulate the set of the station equipment, graphically monitor the communication, operating and faults of all the equipment on the station. The changing conditions or fault can be displayed exactly on the screen in time.
The operator shall be able to inquire about the fault alarm of equipment at the workstation.
Turn the handles of operating valve 1 and 11 to the ‘open' position respectively and the bottom door controlled by them will be opened.
Dual redundant communication controllers, network switches and communication channels shall use hot standby operation mode, which means they shall be able to automatically switch to standby equipment in case of failure of main equipment.
8.11 Planned Subcontracting List Form PS-1 ( Commercial Department or Marketing Department)
Single bus wiring is adopted for DC750V side.
6.Check whether the replaced bolt will affect release effect.
See process card AJA1012997G090-24-10
5.3 Countermeasures for Reducing Engineering Environment Impact
Handling: Check the load condition and adjust timely; inform maintenance personnel for handling.
We have taken all other measures to meet the requirements specified by the letter of invitation and the contract.
At present, the goal of Sarawak has been determined by the government: By 2020, Sarawak will become the highly developed area in economy with other states of the country.
The rail standard should meet EN14363:2016 Annex M regulations, and it shall be prior to QN3 level.
First of all, they shall understand the design idea and know about the layout by the construction contractor.
6) The convenience of project implementation will be considered for the selection of cable types.
During the work in tower for packing, the scaffold erection is not required. A rope ladder shall be lower into the manual as the working passage.
No. 〔2016〕64 of Yun Gui Yun Railway bureau
Based on the drawing, the outlet is connected to M10 mortar rubble drainage ditch and soil ditch.
Moreover, 14 DEU30 locomotives of electric transmission manufactured by the Krupp Company of the former Federal Republic of Germany were purchased to solve the problem of power shortage.
The disinfection rooms are equipped with explosion-proof axial flow fans for overall ventilation.
The test items include overall dimension inspection, weight inspection, coupling function inspection; electrical performance inspection and air tightness test etc.
The upright pole of the cantilever must be reliably connected with the cantilever steel to prevent sliding;
Code for Commissioning Test Run of Chemical Large and Medium Plant
Whether the identification, marking, isolation, analysis, review, handling and tracking of nonconforming product are recorded; whether the nonconforming product (internal, external and supplier's) is calculated and analyzed, and whether constant improvement measures are proposed.
2.The preparation personnel did not carefully identify all work packages when preparing the Project Scope Management (WBS) Schedule, and did not consider the car-body purchasing work package.
⑤Located below the cover for non-inert waste use;
As one of the conditions of giving hard wire traction command, the traction shall be locked when the train has triggered emergency brake.
The standard format of project name all be "Project xx of Puzhen Bombardier"
Approval of Proposal for 2017 Annual Financial Statement Report of the Company (Headquarters)
Name: Qiu Yu Signature
This standard specifies the handling procedures of the Group Company for emergencies that may cause pollution of the environment and endanger the health and safety of staffs.
Used for reparative grinding of rail, configured with self-running power and dust suction device.
For construction personnel, properly conduct the self-protection work for works high above the ground; that is to say, wear the safety helmets and fasten the safety belts. Forbid throwing objects downwardly.
When stay wires of the concrete pole are provided with insulators, the distance between the stay wire insulators and the ground shall not be less than 2.5 m.
\U+00B7 8~10 thick light color face brick
② Rings shall be fully checked before buckling.
During construction, building materials, waste soil, old materials and other sundries shall not be thrown at will, and it is strictly prohibited to pile them up randomly.
The surface layers of the proposed site are mainly distributed with ① layer of plain fillers, mainly composed of silty sand and coral reef fragments, which are slightly dense and uneven with a thickness of 0.70-3.74m, or 2.18m on average.
The scheme is the scheme recommended by KOA company, wherein the junction point is the Exton Station on CN railway; Exton Station has 2 arrival-departure tracks and a special track to the timber mill; now the station is out of service, the turnout has been dismantled; and there are only the abandoned arrival-departure tracks and the special track.
The Board of Supervisors may conduct investigations if the Company's operations are abnormal, it could hire the accounting firm to assist its work if necessary, and the expenses shall be borne by the Company.
3) Audit of machinery use cost: audit whether the machine group statistics are complete and true, machinery is used sufficiently, there are excess consumption and wastes due to misoperation, and apportionment of expenses is accurate and reasonable.
1. One 22 KV power supply from the local power grid and one 10kV power supply from the 10 KV power distribution station are introduced to Luang Prabang Station. A 10/0.4 KV substation in the station building is newly built with 2X1000, 2X630 and 2X1600 KVA transformers respectively.
Fig. 17 Integrated Stress Contour of the Bogie Frame under the Load Generated by the Cornering Force of Running Wheel (Curve Negotiation)
The arch rings of the open-cut tunnels belong to the arch structure type. When the arch ring span of the open-cut tunnels is less than 8 m, the concrete strength of the arch rings shall reach 75% of the design strength according to the Standard for Construction Quality Acceptance of the Standard Gauge Railway Concrete Engineering in Kenya, when the arch support structures of the open-cut tunnels are removed .
Disassembly: Place the buffer pie vertically on working platform, and add load to it in a certain way, with the stroke of 10 ~ 60mm, and then bend the cover plate on the shell of the buffer and take out the key.
2014-2015, Constructor in new factory building of Shanghai Green Valley (Benxi) Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd.
83Mx0.95m two-layer steel structure work platform (elevation: 1.250; elevation: 2.800 )
Power Lighting—Bill of Quantities of South-North Line and Main Line
The speed limit on Site is to be restricted and signs displayed advising drivers of the limits imposed.
Clean up the dust and mortar at the base course. Sprinkle water on the base course the day before the surface layer is made, but there shall be no water accumulation during construction.
≥900 (space reserved for ventilation)
Fundamental map background and planimetric features (shp)
Design Specifications and Standards of the Manufacture, Installation Quality Control and Inspection of Equipment and Materials
Flammable and explosive materials should be stored in warehouses with good ventilation performance and far away from fire sources, and equipped with complete fire control measures (such as fire extinguishers).
1-Filtering element; 2-Casing; 3-Upper cap; 4-By-pass valve
③-1 Mucky soil (Q/4l/): grayish black, soft plastic, saturated, containing a little organic humus, smelling stink, low tenacity, composed of silt and clayed soil.
Guidelines for the Preparation of Prevention and Control Plans for Enterprise-Level Work Safety Risks
Stipulate product release methods, delivery conditions and modes and relevant procedures, and how to provide corresponding services after delivery.
Screw hole quality: up to Grade 6H, by standard thread test;
Pump concrete shall be selected for all suspended pouring and cast-in-situ. In order to prevent pipe blocking and energy consumption increasing during the concrete pumping process, the aggregate gradation and sand factor of the concrete raw materials shall conform to the technical pumping requirements. In addition, it is necessary to add admixture such as pumping agent, to enhance the mobility and work ability of the concrete, and speed up the construction speed of suspending pouring .
At 5:26, Trains 0901 and 0904 reported [VORS communication failure], and the onboard CCTVcould not be invoked.
In this project, each of the four camps is arranged with 1 reinforcement processing yard, where numerical control reinforcement processing equipment and closed management are provided. Material storage area, finished product area and working area should be separated or isolated from each other. Reinforcement should be piled at least 20cm above the ground, and the support beneath should ensure that the piled reinforcement is free from deformation.
In case of major change of crossing plan confirmed in design, the Contractor shall submit to the Employer for approval before implementation.
Use cells which are transferred with target genes in the selective media sieve method
The vertical and horizontal displacement of the primary and secondary suspensions of the bogie at Position 1.
Name of insurance Company: PICC/Ping An/CPIC
(3) All relocation/reconstruction projects and expenses arising from the acquisition of land ownership.
Composite pavement is adopted in the main tunnel, in which the asphalt concrete in the upper layer should have the flame retardant effects.
The key to such continuous improvement lies in the coach bogie with advanced technology, matching parameters, excellent performance and safe and reliable operation.
See Table Ⅳ-19 for the side friction force and friction coefficient when concrete pile foundation is applied in the proposed site soil layer.
b)Carefully insert piston (16) straight into cylinder casing (1) without damaging O-ring (12).
Buses required being shielded shall be provided with plugs with EMC function only.
1. For those died from a sudden illness, check whether the patient is dead, if not, try hard to rescue him and call the emergency number simultaneously, and report it to the superior leaders;
2. All tools, appliances and machinery used in the system installation should be properly protected and kept, so as to avoid environmental pollution and meet the daily work requirements.
Whether positions of control button, switch and valve are in favor of operation?
Code for Design of 110kV-750kV Overhead Transmission Line (GB50545-2010)
│ Drainage System Survey.xls
2.3.2 The Management Department shall be reviewed mainly in the following asepcts:
3.2.3 Specifications, properties of materials used in reinforcement and maintenance and construction shall be in accodance with current relevant criteria.
HQCEC also possesses the ultra-precision rectification proprietary technology for production of high-purity butene-1.
The replacement of steel bars must comply with the following two principles: ① Equal-strength replacement: When the components are controlled by strength, they can be replaced according to the principle of equal strength; ② equal area replacement: when the components are reinforced by the minimum reinforcement ratio, replacement can be carried out according to the principle of equal area.
After the installation of bottom formwork and side formwork of the box girder, the support shall be preloaded before the binding of steel bars.
As for the section which is constructed with shield tunneling method, when the overall project planning is arranged, the project which is constructed with shield tunneling method shall be taken as the key point, and the construction progress of the neighbored stations shall be arranged, so as to meet the demand of shield tunneling;
The design speed of main track of Ethiopian railway is 160km/h (225 km/h conditions are reserved for ADAMA~MIESO section), heavy tracks of Chinese railway track design standard are employed, trans-section continuously welded rail tracks are laid at a time, and ballasted tracks are laid for the whole line.
The emergency lighting system shall be turned on in the tunnel to facilitate fire fighting and personnel escape. The tunnel traffic flow control system shall be started, and lane indication signs in the tunnel shall be adjusted to guide personnel to evacuate.
2) During excavation, the mechanical rotation speed shall be controlled to reduce the damage to the integrity of rock stratum around the hole, so as to prevent the rock stratum on the hole wall from falling into the hole after the hole is formed.
4.5Law of the PRC on Public Security Administration
Refer to the following table for part of the experimental reference of the provisions of AASHTO and Overall Specification of Pakistan:
3. Further development of the model to LOD400 model can solve the collision problem of the upstanding beam, ring beam, structural column with equipment and pipeline in the secondary structure, as well as the collision problem of the pipe fittings, valves and equipment in the electromechanical pipelines.
The personnel getting access to the work zone are not allowed to perform any operation irrelevant to commissioning and construction activities. Once found, the Safety and Security Team is entitled to dismissing them from the work zone. If they do not take advice, they will be dismissed by force or put to local police by reason of disturbance to construction.
In the hazard installations, handling and storage quantity of hazardous chemicals exceeding the critical quantity is an emphasis in general survey of hazard installations.
Process transfer and inspection card record, hardness test report
1. 25-thick granite steps and skirt boards, jointed with cement mortar
Meanwhile, under the conditions of the same limited gradient and the same alignment cross-section and profile, the traction tonnage of standard gauge railway is larger than that of meter-gauge railway.
The radius of remaining fiber drum in the splice case should be as big as possible so as to reduce bending loss at the splice.
the connecting pipe of brake main pipe is free of leakage; the pipeline is free of erosion; the fastening clips, clip seats and fastening bolts are free of looseness or loss.
2.1 Special technical safety measures shall be established for work at height, special works and the new technology and process involved projects.
The dimension of WTD equipment is 224mm*129.8mm*72mm. The natural air cooling method is adopted and the power consumption is less than 10W.
In case of rock strata in the hole, the pneumatic pick shall be used for removal, and the depth in rock must meet the design requirements.
Prepared by: Zhengzhou Road & Bridge Construction Investment Group Co., Ltd. (ZZRB)
Management unit: China Railway Construction Corporation Limited
3.3.5.2.7 Construction Progress Network Planning and Gantt Chart of Housing and Other Works
Multi-disc decimal-type bulk capacitor/RX7-A
5. Undertaking the skills contest for nationwide students of the railway signal discipline;
In terms of execution of the Contract, all parties to the construction project complied with the Contract Agreement and Tendering Documents, and met the contract management procedure and requirements, the documentation is basically complete, and the project entity quality meets the design requirements.
This tunnel, a single-portal double-track tunnel where trains run at the speed of 200km / h, totals 6437m in DK451+595~DK458+032 section, and has the maximum buried depth of about 183m. The tunnel alignment moves towards WWN~EES direction from the entrance to exit. The direction is basically consistent with that of west wind, prevailing wind direction at local areas in winter.
6. This drawing is applicable to longitudinal drainage channels of ballast top type (b=0.4m (0.2≤H≤1.2m), b=0.6 (1.4m<H≤2.0m)) at main track side in the range of station yards of high-speed railways.
Aerial photography and mapping for 1:2000 topographic map
Radio frequency (RF) radiation refers to non-ionizing radiation with a frequency between 300 kHz and 100 GHz.
43.4.3.8.3 Server under User Technical Requirements
ISCS archives various data and files, control center keeps data in 13 months, and event data storage shall have automatic rotation function.
This part gives special considerations for certain apparatus, which are expected to be installed within 3 m from the nearest track center line.
Equipment suppliers for relevant disciplines in structures (civil construction and steel structure, etc.).
11. What is the current average monthly output?
(2-10+2-10) m frame bridge
Super major bridges, major bridges, minor bridges, channels, culverts, interchanges, service areas, parking areas, toll stations, etc. are provided for the main line.
The structural form is a portal frame light steel structure.
Safe production responsibilities of deputy general manager in charge of production of branch company
The battery charger shall cause no damage to the batteries which are being charged for an excessive period of time.
Thickness of anti-corrosion coating of equipment box, post, flange and anchor bolt
In addition, send the electronic version (Annex 1 and Annex 2) to the mailbox of China National Tourism Administration.
Under other network modes than ATO, application of brake maintaining is automatically carried out by the brake system.
3.5.1.7.The Tenderer shall provide schematic diagram of control and relevant technical parameters.
(7) Take out the left and the right supports (50) from the pipe shaft (110).
Bill of Quantities for Subgrade Works of Main Line in Mieso ~ Dewenle Section in Ethiopia
⑤The computer monitoring system can conduct measurement on the reactive power compensation device of the LV distribution system of each substation.
5) In equipment arrangement, full consideration shall be taken for the rationality of traffic routes, the transportation of raw materials, empty tanks, finished products and waste materials so as to make them go their own ways, form a convenient transportation and reduce excessive overcrossing, interfering and cross infection.
It shall be stored separately from oxidants and alkalies to avoid mixed storage.
4) There are 5 or more than 5 (8 Class2 weld joints and 12 Class3 weld joints) dense indications in the rectangular area of 100cm² and the rectangular is selected in the most serious trace indication part and its longer side shall not exceed 20 cm.
As there were incombustibles such as glass etc. in waste at that time, Japan classified domestic waste into combustible waste and incombustible waste. Incombustible waste entered landfills.
Fig. 6.37 Partial Von Mises Stress Contour of Empty Spring Seat and Longitudinal Stiffening Sill
7.7.6.2 Risk Evaluation Method and Process
(3) Air pressure test shall be conducted after the installation of chlorine dosing pipe.
When the conditions permit, a 10 min test is conducted on the rain leakage test bench. There should be no abnormal leakage of rain in all parts of the locomotive. When the conditions are not met, all parts of the locomotive should be observed in heavy rain, and there should be no abnormal leakage.
The drilling depth for every time of short-hole blasting is 30 ~ 80cm.
Each dispatcher in the control center is provided with operation dispatching console, electric power dispatching console, environmental control (disaster prevention) dispatching console, maintenance dispatching console, general dispatching console, etc.
The construction plan must be approved by the Owner and professional engineers before construction.
Currently, there is no engineering design and acceptance specification on PSD system of urban rail transit, which is not good for the standardization and development of PSD system installation in the future.
This test is a type test. The measured quantity, measuring steps, operating conditions and other parameters will be taken into account when measuring noise values.
(1) The intangible asset has been substituted by other new technology, so its ability of creating economic benefits for the Company is significantly and adversely affected;
The main line of the Project is in single track, and the type of block can be either automatic or semi-automatic block between stations.
Two sets of circulating water pump for heating network with variable frequency are provided in the Project, with parameters as follows:
As the major equipment of a railway, a track is the foundation of train operation.
4 Production Safety Responsibilities of Vice General Manager in Charge of Production Safety
Coordinate and agree with Contract 851 of the location and position of the TB as well as the number of E1 trunks.
2. Collect the fore-station discipline materials, such as railway line, station yard, bridge and tunnel, etc.
The subgrade bed at the section of expansive soil should be filled and replaced, the filling and replacement thickness of the filling materials at the bottom layer of the subgrade bed for the weak expansive soil cutting should not be less than 0.3m, the filling and replacement thickness of the filling materials at the bottom layer of the subgrade bed for the moderate expansive soil cutting should not be less than 0.5mm, and the filling and replacement thickness of the filling materials at the bottom layer of the subgrade bed for the strong expansive soil cutting should not be less than 1.0mm; see Table 2.3 for the filling materials and the compaction standards for detail.
The Client is responsible for the procurement and supply of operating desks in main control room and office desks and chairs.
Tunnel length: 4650 m (including 2600 m bored by shield tunneling)
5) The distance from live parts of overhead contact systems shall meet requirements.
Anti-floating by Applying Anchor Rod (Mainly Applicable to Projects with Preferable Engineering Geological Conditions)
The unit price of the combined power supply is 0.99 Yuan/kwh.
12) The installation of bearing shall be carried out in strict accordance with the process and standards stated by the manufacturer and in relevant standards.
2. After the product is assessed for approval , Party C shall pay for Party B RMBXX as technical service fees in one shot.
The curing agent shall meet the requirements of the Curing Compounds for Cement Concrete (JC901).
Leakage and spill of dangerous chemicals, oil products and flammable and combustible materials on the construction site during transportation and use; potential fire/explosion risks.
Such strategy avoids the influence of traditional maintenance strategies such as "more overhaul, more maintenance" and "overhaul after failure", and makes the maintenance of monorail vehicles more scientific and reasonable.
In principle, the general labor protection articles shall be replaced according to the time specified in the standards.
The dimensions of materials of isolating layer shall comply with the design requirement.
The small pipe shall be processed on site, with an external diameter of φ42mm. The small pipe shall be made of seamless hot-rolled steel pipes, and drilled with grouting holes (φ8mm) around the pipe wall with a spacing of 25cm spacing in quincunx. The drilling angle, depth, density and slurry ratio shall conform to the design, and the grouting pressure shall comply with the specification.
The drivers or the maintenance personnel can also set the wheel diameter through the wheel diameter setting interface of HMI and HMI will send the latest wheel diameter setting value to the TCU via TMS after each power on.
Sagging moment: M=23.6kN\U+00B7m hogging moment: M=17.7kN\U+00B7m
Establish protective fence around the construction site where warning signs are erected and special personnel are on guard, to prevent non-relevant person from entering the site and causing accident.
In this project, spare bays (2 in total) are used as middle bays, and there is no need to expand the site or extend the busbar.
Dust around holes shall be cleaned out; dust in hole shall be cleaned out by hair brush, and then dust in hole shall be blown out by an air pump; the process of "three blowing three brushing" shall be adopted.
The west entrance of the tunnel needs to be filled at deep trenches so it can be the working platform of the tunnel entrance
(Before compaction with large-scale compaction machinery is carried out, the bearing capacity of pipe body shall be subject to a recheck).
The attitude of rock stratum of its NW wall is N74°E/78°SE while that of its SE wall is N78°W/81°NE. Its dip angle and dip are unknown.
3) Polyurethane coating waterproof layer, coating thickness are uniform, the bonding is firm and tight without defects such as falling off, cracking, holes and loose applying and pressing.
Contractor 7) Metal shield single point grounding is adopted, and the specific grounding method shall be confirmed during design liaison.
JD3 I-38°27′43.6″(Z) R-197.73 Ls-35
Pressure relief devices are installed for pipelines and storage tanks to reduce the potential of overvoltage and protect staff and environment.
The bridge is laid along the median separation zine, causing little impacts on the traffic at the roundabout
The on-board earthquake panel is provided with LED indicators or LED digital tubes to indicate the working status of the on-board earthquake mainframe, as shown below:
Construction waste shall be frequently removed; the construction site shall be cleaned and tidied once a week, so as to keep the site image clean and tidy.
One famous company in the field of internet security software and internet service in China dismissed several senior staffs due to normalization and optimization of operation flow.
Displacement in along-bridge direction of universally movable bearing and longitudinal movable bearing: ±50mm when the designed vertical bearing capacity of the bearing is below 3000kN and ±60mm for the rest conditions;
1. Mainline is located at the foot of the mountain with unstable geological conditions and falling rocks;
As is described above, the technical input of the Project Department was seriously insufficient, and the technical schemes for construction on site could not be prepared in time and in accordance with the quality requirements, so that there was no rule for the field operation.
Fasten flange 62. 08. 3063 with stud bolt M16X35 DIN912-8.8 and spring washer 6 DIN7980 and protect them from looseness.
Components/modules installed in the machinery room are required to be IP5X as stated in IEC60529 Degrees of Protection Provided by Enclosures (IP Code).
Wiring of C1, C2, D1 and D2 positions at the incoming line port:
During the long-term reservation, with the sealing bag unclosed, take the brake disc out from the sealing bag every six months, apply rust-preventative oil on the machining surface of brake disc, and put the brake disc into the sealing bag and then in the packing case after the rust-preventative oil drains off.
1) The first responsible person for work safety on the construction site shall be fully responsible for establishing and improving the responsibility system for production safety and relevant rules and regulations for work safety.
All auxiliary structures for water supply and drainage shall refer to the standard atlas, and shall be designed in details when the detailed construction drawings are designed.
At the same time, the network management system should be reserved with access capacity for subsequent works.
The 2h high temperature test (50°C) shall be conducted according to requirements of standards. In the temperature decreasing and keeping process,the input voltage of DC(1300±50)V and effective rated output current of AC(460±10)A are applied to the inverter, and it shall keep operating for 2 hours.
Some parts will be charged and have potential risks during operation.
In stead of the improper practices such as "greening deliberately", according to the survey and research on suitable plants along the line, various native plants shall be provided to create a natural plant community landscape and build ecological landscapes.
For example, the second volume of process calculation sheet of XXXX project is named as follows for online transfer:
Traffic Volume at Each Section along Mainline of the Project (absolute number, vehicle/d)
Prepare testing plans and collect statistics on testings workload.
CNNC Technology continues the parent company SUFA's main valve businesses, including such factors as brand, business reputation, quality management, technology, production and customer.
Design status, including approval and review of design document;
Strengthen transportation organization and scheduling and arrange train formation rationally to improve scheduling level;
Maximum transmission power: -14.0dBm
TEC invited the president of China Region and technical team of ABB to Zhuzhou to analyze what caused the problem.
(Continued) Schedule 4 Statement for Cash Flow of Financial Planning Unit: USD 10,000
Completion acceptance: Provide the following review services for completion:
Wipe cement mortar with 1:3 rate for screeding, 20 in thickness
Rectangular tunnel of underground station: the net clearance height (to rail top) at the structural air duct is 5200mm.
The fresh air valve is closed; the air conditioner runs in full heating mode and operates in the full return air mode to quickly increase the temperature in the driver's cab.
(2) There are many cross relations between steel structure and other disciplines. Relevant exchanges and communication shall be carried out in the detailed design to avoid the problem on site.
When the concentration of inhaled nitrogen is not too high, the patient initially feels chest distress, shortness of breath and weakness, and then appears irritability, extreme excitement, running, shouting, trance and gait instability, known as "nitrogen ebriety", which can make patient be in lethargy or coma.
Beam top elevation-0700~-1.600
<5-3> Completely weathered tuff: grayish white, with rock core in sandy soil, difficult for dry drilling, with primary rock grains not completely weathered observable, with rock core being air-dried and naturally cracked, with rock core collecting rate of about 80%.
From the side view, it can be seen that the fracture area is deformed in inclined manner from left to right. In the direction of the starting area, the extrusion deformation of fracture edge is chamfered, indicating that cracks are related to abnormal extrusion, as shown in Figure 8 - 2.
Subgrade and Track Works in Depot Section of Dalian 202 Track Extension Works, located in Dalian of Liaoning Province
4.1.3 Progress report is one of the main parts of regular project meeting.
The Seller shall compensate for loss and impact to the Buyer.
One construction gate will be set for the Works. This openwork iron gate is 6 m wide in accordance with the requirements of scenic construction site in Panzhihua.
(2) Elevation system adopts local mean sea level elevation system.
8.2.1.1.1 As one of the measurements of the performance of the quality management system, the Sales Department shall monitor information relating to customer perception. The monitoring of customer perception includes customer satisfaction survey, information feedback data, user visit reports, analysis of lost businesses, and customer praise.
Cost of ore car covered with special waterproof tarpaulin (proposal 3)
If it meets nutritional needs after the fertilizer that does not meet prescribed analysis isimproved, a supervising engineer can determineif it is used.
Quickly joint two heated surfaces, boost the pressure to the fusion pressure, maintain the pressure and then cool it down.
Evaluate relevant requirements (such as agreements, contracts, product specifications or product standards) one by one, and communicate and negotiate with customers to clarify each requirement in the contract or agreement;
6.1.4 During construction, various kinds of water shall be diverted to the drainage system and must not be discharged at will. Watering curing should not be allowed for concrete foundation. Certain distances shall be kept from each water consumption point to foundation of building (structure), with the minimum clear distance in compliance with Table 6.1.4.
Domestic sewage is collected by pipelines and then discharged to outdoor sewage inspection wells by gravity.
Wiring from FAS to the local control box (actuator) of smoke exhaust fan, positive pressure blower, smoke exhaust vent and smoke exhaust damper is carried out by FAS.
The Joy City in Hangzhou is the 8th Joy City project set up by COFCO group in July 2015 after in Beijing, Shanghai, Tianjin, Shenyang, Yantai and Chengdu, with a total investment of about 8 billion yuan. It is one of the provincial key projects in Zhejiang.
Supplies and logistics system of CRSG CONGO SARL
2.4. The design of the steel structure works shall be in accordance with the following design specifications:
1) Identify environmental factors, hazard sources and their risks during the project planning, and establish corresponding control measures;
5.15.8 When conducting routine inspections, all units shall check the control of the working environment required for the product.
Railway electrification, electric traction & transmission control technology, urban mass transit automation, locomotive & rolling stock, mechanical engineering, or similar disciplines;
Wuhu parking lot and Daohuihe car depot integrated engineering : Contract No.2 of Yangluo Line (Line 21), Wuhan Rail Transit
Finally apply torque to all bolts, make locking marks and apply rust-preventative oil evenly.
Table 2.5-1 Functional Classification of Singapore Public Transport System
A total of 15 PDL tests (37.5m in total) were conducted for the logistics center, providing basic data for the treatment scheme of wetlands within the scope of the Project.
Review the method statement and relevant technical measures of the Construction Contractor, equip with protective articles and install protective facilities.
Answer: Yes, the grounding cable usually refers to the cable installed on the axle end of the wheelset or the gear box, so as to connect the vehicle to the ground through the wheelset.
Including different fault priority, query time interval of network equipment, and so on, setting of fault alarm modes and strategies for different priorities.
The Chief Supervisory Engineer shall report to the Employer before issuing the Order of Suspension or endorsing the Application for Review Concerning Resumption of Works.
It shall be ensured that all parties timely get latest information about the Project and various data required for their business.
5.3.2.4 Excellent design plans, design rules and recommendations of relevant experts, from which the project needs to draw lessons when necessary.
9. In this figure, the spacing between the gear blocks and the top of the piers is not more than 50 cm.
Flow chart for Quality Control of Reserved Holes and Embedded Parts
Guidance or directive documents issued by superior authorities refer to documents issued by relevant superior authorities that are of guidance or directive nature and are related to the management system or testing activities of the institute and the center.
(4) flexible connection method shall be employed to connect attachments on the oil immersed transformer such as oil conservator, oil immersed pump, cooler and its connection pipe, as well as coolers in concentrated arrangement, with the transformer.
3.2The warranty period of the axle, big gear and bogie frame should be 220XX104 km or 120 months after the signing of "Motor Car Completion and Handover Record" (whichever comes first).
 Monitoring and operating functions of turbine during startup/shutdown and operation;
The brake equipment is assembled and the test on brake performance of the complete vehicle is conducted with the single car testing device as per test items.
2The stability of axial compression members shall be calculated according to the following formula:
Draining Pipe System Diagram of Heating Network Heater.
The risk level of the identified hazard shall be confirmed and the risk evaluation shall be conducted.
Introduction of channel detection device and obstacle detection system.
(2) A safety management system for construction personnel and machinery should be developed and adapted to the tunnelling by TBM. A work safety leading group should be established, with the Project Manager as the Leader, to implement the work safety requirements, level-by-level responsibility system, mutual supervision and strict inspection of potential safety hazards.
Leading wire diameter: d=0.6±0.05 mm
The following issues shall be noticed to ensure construction in smooth progress and avoid unexpected conditions:
-WX -- standard internal force under wind load in -X-direction
The main performance indices of emulsified asphalt (Emulsion A) shall comply with the technical specifications and design requirements.
High return oil temperature of support bearing to the DCS system
Wang Nan, Liu Lan, New Interpretation on Passage Capacity of Passenger Station Bottleneck and Research on Its Calculation Method [J]. Journal of Railway, 2002.24 (6): 39-41
To sum up, the project has large scale and great uncertainty. There are many factors that will affect the traffic volume and investment of the project, causing great fluctuations in the profitability of the project.
The laboratory floor shall be paved with shallow-colored floor tiles.
Current sensor SC12 detects the charging current of battery;
(1) The Employer fails to provide the drawings and commencement conditions as agreed in the Special Conditions;
5.2.6 Safety accidents that have happened shall be considered in the review process of safety policy.
CA1250-SGP road-rail rail welding vehicle.
The CTCS-3 train control system meets requirements on operation across lines.
Drainage of bridge deck adopts natural drainage of the bridge deck and the drainage by providing water collection wells.
Maintenance and testing should be recorded and signed by the relevant personnel.
The following measures are taken to prevent the high-potential counterattack of nearby metal objects or electrical and electronic system circuits by lightning current flowing through the downlink and grounding devices:
4.2.6Slope failure is a geological phenomenon under the action of gravity, and it mainly involves slippage and buckling along the direction of vertical slopes. Therefore, the investigation line shall be set along vertical slopes.
Technical Specifications for Exterior Wall Waterproof Works of Buildings (JGJ/T235-2011)
2) "Drain": it indicates that it causes the difficulty to the construction by draining the karst cave water (the water karst cave is provided) and groundwater, and the karst cave water floods into the tunnel, to cause a great damage to the constructors and mechanical equipment.
450kN bitt bollard is arranged in the west of the east quay; SA400HX1500 rubber fender is provided at the front edge and D2-150-50 rotary rubber fender is provided at the north end.
Indoor Inspection and Evaluation of Vibration Reduction Performance of Steel Spring Floating Slab Bed
Inspect and guide the work of the central laboratory.
To comply with laws and regulations of the project located country and region.
4.2.4The Company has established a quality system that complies with ISO9001, EN15085 and ISO 22163 standards. This Project will combine the documented procedures and processes established by the quality system to manage system assurance activities.
When spreading the admixture with the special vehicle, it is necessary to set the vehicle parameters according to the calculation of required admixture for the unit area.
(1) Test whether smoke detectors at stations can detect smoke;
The commissioning for vehicles at the user site is defined as the recommissioning of vehicles, because the commissioning of vehicles before leaving has been carried out at the place of the Tenderer.
a) Implement the Company's quality policy and quality objectives, formulate and perform the procedures and responsibilities of the quality management system of the department, and implement the annual quality objective plan of the department;
(6)Strengthen the monitoring of surface water and groundwater quality and cooperate with local environmental monitoring department of Guinea to do a good job of consensus propaganda and supervision. Also strengthen the control of construction wastewater along the line, solve the new discovered pollution problems without delay to prevent the deterioration of water quality.
Longitudinal and transverse supports of the roof form a closed support system to enhance the integral rigidity of the workshop.
The back of the mounting frame is a panel, which provides power for each functional board and realizes communication between boards.
b. Temporary drainage facilities should be combined with permanent drainage facilities .
Ci represents average concentration of the i-th pollutant, mg/m3;
Hydraulic self-climbing formwork and wood girder plywood formwork system are adopted for upper concrete structure of main bridge of Nanning Bridge; in comparison with conventional full support and formwork, manpower and materials are saved, and higher economy and practicability can be realized, and the superiority of hydraulic self-climbing formwork and wood girder plywood formwork system in deformed concrete structure can be reflected.
The red-green-blue trichromatic theory can be utilized for the LED light source. With this theory, 16,777,216 colors will be produced and thus the LED light source will be greatly expressive.
Check the halfbreadth on right and left of the vehicle and adjust the symmetry of the complete vehicle (bogie and body, etc..
Layout Plan of Pillar and Sill Anchor for Canopy in MT24 Belt Conveyor Driving Device Area
Considering the complex structure and joint of the Project and the wide range of involved specialties, we propose to establish the detailed design group governed by the Chief Engineer as shown in the figure below.
Protection by sprinkling grass seeds and planting shrub shall be provided in the framework.
1 The main survey results for handover are as follows:
The general supervision engineer should issue the Certificate for Payment of Construction Cost for the completion settlement.
It is required to establish an Environmental Protection Department，which should be manned with 3 persons for the management of the mine environment and afforestation.
The plant measure shall be implemented in stages and batches in accordance with the construction schedule of the main works. Moreover, maintenance shall be carried out for the vegetation to bring the benefits of plant measure into full play as soon as possible.
C35 reinforced concrete (environment grade: H[1])
If it is judged according to relevant agreements that the Company does not have rights to the net assets of the separate entity, the separate entity shall operate in a joint operation, and the Company shall recognize the items related to the share of joint operation interests and carry out accounting treatment in accordance with relevant accounting standards for business enterprises.
a) Raw material market shall be investigated. Approval shall be obtained from the Employer and Engineer before material supplier is determined.
4,000Nm3/h VPSA oxygen generator is designed with three-bed ultra-large adsorption and vacuum desorption process with advanced level in the world, and has high production capacity, low oxygen production cost, and flexible operation.
Trail operation will be carried out on main line before formal test to ensure that drivers and test personnel are familiar with route conditions.
If there are ambiguous contents, obvious words or calculation errors in the tender documents, and the Tender Evaluation Committee believes that the tenderer's quotation is lower than the cost price and other issues require necessary clarifications and explanations made by the tenderer, it shall notify the tenderer in writing.
11. After blasting, the site must be ventilated to discharge the smoke, for no less than 30min.
Use high precision theodolite and steel tape measure to ensure the accuracy of pile position.
The current width of Dachan Channel is 300m. The dredging is carried out in the sequence of south half and north half. Now the construction of south half is taken for an example. The schematic diagram is as follows:
The No.1 Tunnel of Nairobi ~ Malaba Railway is 4498m long in total, with its entrance at DK34+826.00 and exit at DK39+324.00.
When rockfall collide with rock intercepting net, the flexibility of the net firstly dissipate the impact force and load the left bearing load from impact point to around step-by-step, ultimately transfer it to the foundation of anchorage foundation and stable stratum. In the end, the left bearing load bear by anchor rod and foundation has already been reduced to very little bearing load.
The work is the divisional work of Ore Stockpile of Heap Leach Pad 1# and #2# - M24 for Myanmar Monywa Letpadaung Copper Project (100kt/a Cathode Cu), with architectural design service life of 50 years.
The bridge structure shall be determined as per principles of "safety, reliability, durability, economic rationality, and attractive appearance".
1) The mud and rust on rubble surface shall be cleaned before masonry.
Seismic intensity as the seismic fortification basis of a region is approved according to authority stipulated by the state.
①The system must have no error on data access and logic processing, and can operate normally for 7 x 24 hours.
Main control points: ramp start/end elevation, cross-line structures
External wall of Wastewater Treatment House and pressure disinfection room thickness of one brick
Procurement (acquirement), issuance and management system for labor protection articles
4. Lighting will use energy-efficient green products as much as possible. On power distribution, the power distribution zones will be reasonably divided, and grouping settings will be controlled to create conditions for lighting power saving.
Freight and tariff of uninsulated attenuation-redundancy controller
Tianyu ZHOU, Civil Engineering iJanuary 2016 to June 2018
In processing system, NF concentrated liquor sparys back to incinerator, while RO concentrate liquor is used as water supply for slag remover and fly ash stabilization.
11.3.2 Procedures for changing of quality manual
When the capital fund ratio is increased to 75 % and depreciation is not taken into account, it is in a loss state in the operating period for 2 years, with an average annual loss of RMB 5.19 million. When depreciation is considered, the loss in operating period exceeds it in the calculation period, with an average annual loss of RMB 332.91 million.
Inspection system for major hidden troubles and major hazardous sources
The project's safety objective: no major engineering safety accident; no major casualty; no major mechanical equipment damage accident; no major fire accident; in order to achieve safety management objective, the guarantee measures are as follows:
The Project Management Department establishes progress and quality reward and punishment system, and deducts 0.5% fund as incentive fund in monthly construction examination and valuation, to reward groups and individuals who make contribution to progress, quality or safety.
At present, major European international trains are called European intercity train (Euro City, EC), domestic trains are called intercity train (Inter Cities, IC).
Exterior car numbers, destination displays, train sidelights and other equipment for external display were normal, as shown in Figure 4.29-2.
(3) 34 rock-socketed turbine positions; through preliminary calculation and analysis, 8-10 turbine positions can use core column rock-socketed jacket, and the remaining turbine positions use embedded rock-socketed jacket.
(3) The materials purchased by ourselves shall be compared with the ones sold at other places, and the materials with high quality and low price shall be selected and purchased. The material procurement bidding system shall be strictly implemented for large quantities of materials, so as to reduce the cost of materials and put an end to the phenomenon of "kickbacks" in the procurement of materials. Once found, people related shall be severely punished.
Performance and main dimensions of running gear of the vehicle shall properly match with the rail parameters so that it can ensure that the vehicle can safely and smoothly run at the allowable maximum speed under the conditions that its relevant components are within the allowable limit of wear. In addition, even when the suspension or damping system is damaged, it also can ensure the vehicle can safely run to the destination on the light rail.
GB5599-1985 Railway Vehicles – Specification for Evaluation of Dynamic Perforamcne and Accreditation Test:
Siemens ECC/XCM target controller
⑤ Conduct classification of hazard, determine its hazard degree and find out the hazard installations that shall be under key control;
□ Code for Design of Civil Air Defence Basement (GB50038-2005)
The types of equipment and elements are selected in the principle of safety and reliability, advanced technology, economy and rationality, energy saving and environmental protection, easy access and maintenance and in combination with CINF's successful experience in the design of several high-altitude mine projects such as Pulang Copper Mine in Shangri-la, as follows:
b) Wash, check and replace oil for the spindle, gearbox, hydraulic device and cooling system of the equipment;
The high level water tank with steel bracket is adopted for all domestic water supply stations as water storage and distribution structure for production and domestic water, and the fire water supply for intermediate station is provided by water storage tank of 500m3.
It is preliminarily judged that the present bank shape of the southwest corner at Hulhule side belongs to a bank slope zone with better stability.
Note: 1. As of the end of this period, the accumulated amount paid is 25%;
Document confirmation: Interfaces shall be subject to the latest paper document with both parties' signature and an electronic copy with version number in .dwg, .doc or .xls format shall be provided.
Prior to the installation of the external wallboard, the installation quality of the wall girder shall be checked and accepted to meet requirements. After that the external wallboard can be installed.
See KB0-CC-34 for control collective drawings
Remove the coupling safety cover, check the coupling centering, and set the positioning mark of the coupling.
Supplementary agreements may be signed separately through amicable negotiation, which shall be deemed as integral part of the Agreement and be of equal legal force.
(8) The inspection and acceptance systems at all levels and stages shall be carried out in a targeted manner, during the installation and use of the aluminum formwork.
P = 1.05~1.1 (k1PD /COSΦ+ k2 PH + k3 PZ1+ k4 PZ2)
11.2.4.2 Distribution of External Power Supply
(3) Test section: The length of the fill test section will not be less than 100m. Temporary drainage ditches will be excavated around the treated in-situ foundation to ensure dry ground.
November 2015 to May 2016
5 Response Time: The time when the operation and/or maintenance personnel arrive at the site after receiving the failure notification.
Brine from the mining workshop is preheated and mixed with the carnallite from carnallite belt filter according to a certain proportion to enter carnallite decomposition stirring tank for thermal decomposition (~70°C), and the slurry is pumped into sylvine thickener.
A total of 8,136 m /6 bridges (in full width, the same below), 12,521 m/34 bridges and 19 culverts are set up along the whole line.
Final inspection: start-up tests shall be commenced for 3 times continuously under rated power and voltage and each start-up interval shall not be less than 16s.
4.3.1 Design and development output shall:
4. Treatment of Soft Soil Foundation (in accordance with the construction scheme through communication with the design institute)
The 50kg/m rail shall be employed for the yard track and test track.
(10) Insert the pantograph horn (80) into the left and the right support assemblies (50), and install M6 fastening bolts (when installing the compression nuts of air pipe and slider air inlet connector, a torque wrench must be used to apply a proper torque (torque: 3Nm)).
The warehouse has the RoHS product logo, and the RoHS testing report of main raw material is prepared
8.1 Materials and Engineering Equipment Supplied by the Employer
Reporting by groups (50%), oral defense (50%); the comprehensive assessment of these 2 modules accounts for 20% of the final examination score.
Surveying and setting out→slope-making and leveling→waterproof layer→insulation layer→surface layer
There will be electrical buttons mounted outside and inside the left door leaf. With the button enabled by the driver through control, passengers may use the electrical button to open the door.
13.1.1 The Engineer shall submit a written application for postponing 24 hours in advance if he can not conduct the acceptance work.
The right side door closes automatically and the left one keeps closed.
A passenger emergency communication unit (PECU/B) is provided in the vestibule area, so that passengers can talk to the driver at any time in an emergency.
Therefore, undercharging mode,on period of the Project is the construction period (from the beginning of 2017 to the end of 2020) plus 45-year usage period after its completion (2021 - 2065).
Cover the gasoline pan with a cover plate, and test the test object in this state for 60S.
12.2. Suggestions on Resettlement Work in the Next Stage
We adopt hot melt docking connection construction, its main steps are:
Personnel attendance without records during working time shall be treated as absenteeism.
Article 30 While making decisions on major issues of the Company, the Executive Director shall solicit opinions from the Party committee of the Company in advance.
The addition of silica fume increases the impact energy exposed to concrete at first crack and at failure by 2.62 times and 3.06 times respectively.
After the resettlement, purchased a 115m2 commercial housing in Shuilijiayuan Community, Shiqihu Road, Tianshan District, and planned to live there in 2019; the living conditions and supporting facilities have been greatly improved.
DF12-0035 overhaul and accident repair
The work content of this section includes 10~100kg embankment core rocks (underwater) in perimeter structure.
③ Thick wall galvanized steel pipes shall be selected for cable protective tubes provided at hazardous areas. Explosion-proof materials shall be adopted for all pipe fittings. Pipe threaded joints shall be used between protective tubes and between protective tube and junction box. The effective mesh of thread shall be of over 6 thread pitches, and the connection shall be treated with electroconductive antirust grease.
1. This drawing is designed as per materials from station yard, house building and water supply disciplines.
The construction of the fourth lot of the Hohhot-Junggar Railway starts from DK20+900 and ends at DK60+200, and the main line is 39.3km long.
7.3.3 The Quality Management Department is responsible for organizing to prepare, review and determine the major quality research projects regarding the management system, and transmitting for implementation after the audit and approval of the vice president in charge.
The device requires that the bandwidth on the side of the Ethernet layer 2 switch board system should not be less than 2 Gb/s, to achieve non-blocking line-speed switching (not provided through external devices).
Review of product and service requirements is of traceability.
Remark [11] Schematic Diagram of Chamfer Size.
Refer to 03J926-71 for detailed accessible toilet installation
The new table shall be recorded at the document manager.
External window (northward, double window or double glass window) K≤3.4 W/ (m2.℃)
Expediting engineer shall track the progress and situation of each sub-contractor (especially sub-contractor of key equipment/material) closely to ensure the delivery is made on time.
One copy of Business License for Enterprise Legal Person of Project Company issued by business administration department and the Articles of Association registered for records shall be submitted to Party A or its authorized department for archiving.
Installation of solar energy pump, plastic water storage tank, defluoridation equipment, defluoridation tank of water storage tank and support and automatic control device, as well as the laying of power cable, signal cable and protective sleeve
Without the prior written consent of Party A, Party B shall not assign all or part of his contractual obligations which he shall fulfill.
Click the "Query" Button on the Menu, the Dialog Box as shown in Fig. 2-32 pops up in the pull-down menu, choose the checkbox before the "Attribute" and select "Service Wagon" in the DropDownListBox and then click the "OK" Button, an interface shown in Fig. 2-33 pops up.
Railway applications - Testing of rolling stock after completion of construction and before entry into service
The design is firm and durable, and can continuously perform the specified tasks under the main operation site conditions. Its minimum service life meets the following requirements:
See the crossing design in Table 11-2-2.
Only the user, who is equipped with releasing permission after the system administrator in the control center gives authority, could carry out such operation.
It is the same as the work contents in Bill of Quantities of Divisional Works and Subdivisional Works.
During construction, operation record of quality management system formed by each department shall be kept by the department itself, and the formed records shall be kept by the Technical Quality Department.
At bending part of the busbar, fleams, burrs and fins due to raw materials and processes should be removed with a file before bending. The smoothened face largely affecting appearance quality of the busbar should be placed in inner surface of the bending corner (in a direction not affecting parts).
The post-cast strip shall be re-cast after retaining for 60 days. Before concrete placing, residues shall be cleared away thoroughly and the strip shall be washed to be clean with pressure water. After it is fully wet, one course of higher grade of cement paste is poured. The concrete prepared from non-shrinkable cement with the grade higher than original design strength shall be adopted and curing shall be strengthened.
5.2.2.1 Items of supplier quality evaluation are as follows and for more details, please refer to Rules on Quality Evaluation of SQE center.
Hardness change: -5~+8 IRHD
Measure the vehicle speed value, constant speed function and impact rate under various working conditions.
DL/T 5355-2006 Code for Soil Test of Hydraulic and Hydroelectric Engineering
2.6.3.2 Statistics table of the number of mileage collected locomotives and people at each service point
List of Vulnerable Parts/Consumable Materials (Within 2-year Warranty Period)
Prior to construction, the formwork surface shall be coated with release agent.
The islands are of volcanic or coral reef type and are mountainous.
2. Number of main lines: double-track, distance between centers of lines: 3.8m.
Some of the raw materials needed for the production of the industrial project, such as iron ore, phosphate and limestone, are supplied locally, while other raw materials, such as coal, clinker and so on, are imported from Mombasa port.
5. The warehouse shall store the unqualified materials separately, mark them as "unqualified" and indicate the reasons for unqualification, and make corresponding records or ledgers.
Risk-based thinking should be applied to the product realization of every project.
Aperture: 1-1.5m Fill Height (Hmin≤H≤3m)
Compared with polyethylene, the distribution of polypropylene production capacity is relatively scattered, and its international trade volume is less than that of polyethylene.
[1] Ling Bo, Shi Xueshan, etc., Design of the First Slurry and Earth Pressure Dual-Mode Shield Machine in China [J]. China Venture Capital, 2014-6-30
Left carriageway: 40+40+3 x 40+4x40 prestressed concrete (post-extension) simply supported T-girder/prestressed concrete (post-extension) T-girder, simply supported + continuous girder Length of bridge: 375.0m
2. The underfloor wheel lathe operator shall enter the wheelset ID, machining type, operator name, car type, traveling kilometers, etc. onto the "Identification" interface.
[14] Analysis on Pullout Mechanical Deformation Characteristics of Anchor in Heterogeneous Foundation [D]. Tang Yu. Hunan University 2014
5The braking force or traction is not calculated when the special live load in the railway train load schema is used.
In the design stage, General Contractor shall submit the riding comfort test procedure which shall be proved satisfactory by related tests.
◇ The power consumption indictor for underground garages does not include the power for charging piles of cars, and it will be considered at the construction drawing phase.
The joints of two roughening layers on the walls around the doors, windows and holes must be staggered in roughening the external walls of tiles with waterproof mortar.
(3) Quality records of relevant subcontractors are the materials of these data.
Procurement of Party B supplied equipment: The technical documents for procurement bidding, inquiry technical documents, equipment procurement contract technical documents and design drawings for above-mentioned Party B supplied equipment must be confirmed by Party A.
The reinforcement cage is transported to the pile position by a self-made two-wheeled trailer, and is lifted into the hole by truck-mounted crane.
The physical and mechanical properties of rock and mineral in Nakhao ore block are detailed in Table 3-8.
7.3 The Seller guarantees to arrive at Jinhua Water Plant within 24 hours after receiving the Buyer's notice to provide services for the goods and equipment specified hereunder.
Its density of population also ranks the first in Africa, with a total population of about 198 million (estimated by the National Population Commission in 2018).
The higher and lower levels shall sign the responsibility for environmental protection objectives, to define the environmental protection objectives, related work, and terms of assessment and fulfillment, and link the work assessment of relevant responsible persons with environmental protection work.
Centering: the end faces of the two welded pipe sections should be completely centered. The smaller misalignment, the better. The misalignment should not exceed 10% of the wall thickness.
4.3.1 Filling materials shall not contain crushed stone or damp aggregate chips.
Check whether the pressing device of the lathe retracts and drops in place.
At 20±5 °C, use a bridge to measure the heating element resistance of the front window glass.
And according to the quantities of work and the size of working face in different construction stages, the labor force is arranged for effective mobilization and demobilization so as to make full use of labor resources.
The lower part is a component element which only insulating sound but not absorbing sound, and its structure is a color steel sandwich panel.
The garbage collection point should be designed as the closed type and provided with good rainproof and sun block measures, and the trash cans should be designed with covers. Generated garbage should be cleaned out every day, and the smell should be certainly covered up by some deodorant.
As for rail traffic projects, construction scale is large, construction cycle is long, affected scope is wide and amount of investment is great, so that the project construction management shall last through the whole process from feasibility study report, engineering design, project construction, project acceptance to official operation.
The newly added permanent land area of the Project will result in the loss of the original land use function in part or in whole, which will bring a certain impact on local agriculture and aquaculture.
All the materials for the use of the contract technologies by Party B under the authorization of Party A are listed in Annex 1.
During project implementation, data shall be collected and procedures for project change shall be handled in time; the Employer and the Supervisor shall be urged to carry out intermediate acceptance and settlement in time.
5.2.2.7 The variety, batch number range, country/region, etc. involved in the scope of products to be recalled.
(6) A total land area of 360600 m2, of which 288000 m2 is formed by backfilled soil, and 238700 m2 needs foundation treatment in the near future, and highways or yards are to be formed;
Permanent-magnet synchronous traction motor is adopted fully enclosed structure, so the motor air gap keep clean and there is no need to clean the air inlet filter, reducing the daily maintenance workload.
The train door is equipped with reliable mechanical lock mechanism, fault isolation device, emergency unlocking and other safety facilities;
b)Swing connecting rod (20) and fork block (28) outwards of the electric coupler head.
Detailed design, material supply, construction and testing of viaduct section, transition section of slope section, prefabricated beam track rail, pier, pier bearing, including but not limited to the following:
C.2.5 Any of the following situations occurring in the anchor test can be seen as failure, and the loading shall be stopped:
Under effects of longitudinal, vertical and transverse fatigue load conditions (acquired from Table 15, Table 16, Table 17, Table 18 and Table 19 of "EN 12663: 2000"), life cycles of the key welds under assessment of car bodies and undercar equipment cabineta of Hongkong EMU are all greater than 10 3.
B.Muang tunnel exit transverse gallery and 10# mixing station
For specific model of palisade energizer, KWS recognition shall prevail.
15.1.3 Slope surface protection engineering is generally divided into two categories: engineering protection and plant protection.
Allowable deviation in reinforcement binding; inspection standards for reinforcement works:
Mainly to renovate and reinforce asphalt roads, and to change the old dilapidated roads into new double-surfacing roads and anti-skid brick roads in the city.
Agent (contact): Qiu Yu Gender:
For the reamed bolt hole, the punching nail shall not be used.
— the coefficient of pavement structure type; 1.0 for the asphalt pavement of semi-rigid base course; 1.6 for the asphalt pavement of flexible base course.
Non-woven cloth shall be paved in proper tightness to be in close contact with the shotcrete surface without tear due to too high tightness or impact on waterproof board paving due to too low tightness.
During construction, disturbance to the original ground shall be reduced as much as possible to reduce damage to ground vegetation.
When any production accident happens, the safety supervisor (namely the Project Manager) is responsible for accident treatment. If he is absent, the division manager or team leader may take action first and report to the Project Manager soon and also to the superior safety authority for the record.
Dark gray zinc steel railing and wooden railing _x000D_
5 Cables are led to holes of the electrical cabinet/panel or control panel/console.
Fig. 2 Detailed Drawing of Bridge-tunnel Grounding Terminal (straight pole)
The aggregate is used as the skeletonand asphalt and filler are for cementing and filling.
Concrete shall conform to EN1992-1 and EN206-1.
The initial rolling of the asphalt mixture should comply with:
The initial and final measurements shall be taken under the same conditions (for example, temperature). In order to enable the equipment under test to attain the same conditions as existed for the initial measurements, (if necessary) a period for recovery shall be allowed after testing and before the final measurements are made.
Not all the site electrical switchgears are provided with covers and part of the conductive parts is exposed.
Cement-soil mixing pile, with 0.5m diameter, 1.1m spacing and 8.0m length, is set in the foundation at DK42+822.045-DK43+089.730 section in regular triangle arrangement.
For sandy soil area, cement-water glass slurry shall be adopted for grouting with good effect.
Subgrade engineering is stated in this chapter, which involves the construction of subgrade earth and stone works, drainage works and subgrade protection works and their related work.
28.3 The seller shall, at the time of signing the contract, propose to the Buyer the delivery plan of Buyer-supplied equipment according to the overall contract implementation plan. The buyer shall deliver the equipment according to this delivery plan.
The seismic action produces a large additional seismic force, which changes the inertia force borne by the slope and leads to changes in the form, occurrence state and hydrogeological conditions of the slope.
Contact: (e-mail: xiao shi@icloud.com, tel:13283383282)
2. Elevation in this drawing refers to relative elevation, and its corresponding absolute elevation can be seen on the general design drawing; water supply pipe elevation shown on the drawing refers to the pipe center elevation; drainage pipeline elevation is the invert elevation.
Four emergency relief and rescue teams are set up respectively in Chengdu, Beijing, Shanghai and Basic Products Business Division.
4.The general contractor provides the installation rack and material for the secondary clock, shall coordinate with the contractor regarding the manufacture of supports and hangers for the installation as per the site condition, the product is with the beautiful installation interface accompanied with the detailed installation drawing, and provide rest installation accessories for the secondary clock (like the wall-mounted secondary clock).
6.15.1 Take responsibility for the safety and environmental protection work of the department.
The problems found out in the internal audit and stage-I external audit were analyzed in time, and corrective measures were taken, to improve the business process and strengthen the risk management.
Provide necessary accessories and hardware. Mount all the equipment linked safely to the standard EIA19" equipment racks.
The above mentioned solid wastes shall be piled by category at the solid waste yard where the signs for different solid wastes are put up, and shall be transported out regularly.
Be directly responsible for the quality and safety accidents on site due to poor arrangement, improper methods and even illegal construction.
1. General information of the project (hereinafter referred to as the Project) entrusted to the Supervisor by the Client is as follows:
The surface bearing padstones shall be smooth and level. Certain thickness for leveling may be reserved on the top surfaces of bearing padstones during construction.
The system administrator must make sure the user is confined in the authorized privilege, and is accessible to authorized information.
2. Longitudinal dimensions in the drawing are dimensions of the sections unfolded from the centerline of the box girder.
In the comparison scope, the line is located in the Lesser Himalayas, with large terrain height difference and violent fluctuation. The Gandaki River flows southward on the east side of the line.
The routing, number of channels and laying position of the DC power cable shall meet the requirements provided by construction drawing; the specification and fuse capacity of wire must conform to the design requirement;
5.3.10 For the preparation of physically improved soil by the crushing and sieving method, the crushing and sieving phases as well as the crusher type shall be selected according to the mechanical properties of rocks, the maximum particle size and the design requirements for filling materials at different filling parts.
As a transmission bearing platform of the Project, function of the transmission system is mainly to transmit quickly, accurately and reliably the information such as voice, data and image that is needed for operation and management of all stations, depots, substations and the controlc center of the Project. The information mainly includes:
b. The welds polished on the current day shall be pasted with ceramic backing and welded on the same day.
As shown in Figure 2.10, the test data import menu includes functions of selection, analysis, graph, up/down button.
The star design of the core area of Liaoning Bora Petrochemical Co., Ltd. makes the network architecture simple, easy to maintain and deploy.
Uneven forces must be avoided when the flanges are fastened. Screw the flanges in symmetrical and crossed directions.
Moreover, the exact time and place can be viewed on the screen by moving the pointer to the desired location.
Onboard and trackside ATP equipment also has self-diagnostic function. It will give an alarm in case of failure and transmit such failure information to the maintenance support subsystem, noticing maintainer to handle the failure as soon as possible.
Deep foundation ditch construction plan shall be optimized to reduce earth excavation and backfilling volume, minimize land disturbance, and protect peripheral natural and ecological environment.
For non-round tubes, the characteristic length can also be taken from other flow lengths: such as hydraulic radius .
Understanding your role, functions and related business interfaces in the AFC system
Construction of Chuxiong into a large characteristic city in Central Yunnan is not only the active demands of elevating the regional competitiveness to accelerate the development, driving the whole prefecture to quicken the industrialization and urbanization processes, and realizing the change of economic growth mode but also the urgent need of the whole province's implementation of the development strategy depositions of Central Yunnan City Agglomeration.
Common safety accident hidden dangers and their identification, emergency treatment measures; accident reporting procedures and requirements.
(a) Any company and its holding company;
Pore water stored in Quaternary loose soil is the main water source to ground water which mainly exists in cobble soil, with abundant water. There is also a small amount of bedrock fissure water, with a small amount of water.
2. For the Project, the piles are designed as per the Geological Engineering Investigation Report on Duke Kunshan University (Project No.: 2010004) provided by Kunshan Construct Engineering Quality Testing Center in April 2010.
1) The maximum grain size of the filling materials for transition sections shall not be greater than 150 mm.
(2) The continuous section of connection pier shall be reserved with reinforcement, the cast-in-situ cross beam reinforcement shall be bound, and the corrugated pipe of joint plate shall be set and bundled.
The Supervision Notice send to the Supervision unit and the Owner and Nonconformity Notice should be rectified, replied and closed by Project Technical Quality Department in time.
Protective rights are not taken into account in determining whether or not there is joint control.
Visually inspect main components of diesel power pack which show no leakage.
Note: If the thermal processing and heat treatment process of alloy steel material blank is required to be outsourced, the requirements for personnel of outsourcing enterprises shall not be lower than homemade requirements.
⑥ Inspect the sturdiness of coarse aggregate through sodium sulfate solution circulation immersion method. The weight loss rate of the sample shall be in accordance with the provisions in Description Table 6.3.1-5 after 5 times circulation.
0.05t and ≤2.0mm (t refers to thickness of cutting surface)
Structural displacement monitoring of important construction parts of the main building;
Invest the environment first to avoid damaging on-going or completed buildings when project materials, construction machines and tools, and revolving materials and tools are transported.
Appendix F, H and N of Design Standard for Energy Efficiency of Residential Buildings in Guizhou Province (DBJ52-49-2008);
3.2.2 Fabrication of Cold-shrinkable Terminal of Three-Phase Cable
The transition section at both sides of transverse structures should be constructed in a symmetrical and simultaneous manner in layers; small equipment assisted manually should be adopted for parts behind abutment, transverse structures, transverse structure top and subgrade at both sides of rigid transition section where large machinery fails to reach.
The skirting shall be firmly connected with the wall face in high consistence. The thickness above the wall shall be even.
Fig. 5.5Force-Displacement Curve of Collapsible Tube
In accordance with the joint research with the State Administration for Market Regulation and relevant divisions within the commission, the basic conditions for the implementation of gas energy measurement are basically in place in China. Therefore, the Measures clearly specifies the requirements for gas energy measurement.
See Table 12-4-1 and 12-4-2.
Fill soil (Q4me): with breccias on the surface layer, roundstone mainly in the lower part, partially with boulders, yellow brown, grey brown, medium dense ~ dense, slightly wet, filled with sandy soil and silt, and with a layer thickness of 0.5~3.0m.
④If the pipeline exceeds a certain length, a junction box shall be installed at a position convenient for threading, specifically: 45m; when there is no bend; When there is a bend, 30m; When there are two bends, 20m; When there are three bends, 12m.
The panel and cabinet shall be earthed solidly, and the openable panel and cabinet equipped with electrical appliances shall be reliably connected with the earthed metal frame through flexible conductors.
The Project Supervision Department, upon receiving construction drawings, shall timely organize discipline supervisory engineers for familiarization and preliminary review.
1). Building stones Crusher-run stone or natural rubble may be used.
Prepare procurement plan of the Project and organize relevant personnel to fulfill it;
When the cross slope of the ground is 1:10-1:5, the surface soil should be scarified and compacted; when the cross slope of the ground is 1:5, original ground should be excavated to steps with width not less than 2m. Top face of the step should be made into a slope tilting inward, with gradient within 4%.
Select "System Curve Configuration" in "System" on the main menu, to display the "System Menu Setting" dialog box as shown in Fig. 4-1.
Personnel of the investigation group shall carry out investigation works of the accident site after the rescue work and site protection have been conducted, make inquiry records of the accident witnesses and relevant interested parties to ensure the accuracy of accident and proactively cooperate with the superior investigation group in investigation and handling works to formulate investigation report as soon as possible.
Technical support: Sichuan Province Hongye Building Software Limited Liability Company
These modes are controlled by manual traction control elements, semi-automated train operation ATC system and traction brake control unit.
C. Re-planting: dead trees should be cleaned and re-planted with plants of same trees varieties and specifications with the original trees and management should be strengthened.
­ Allocation from our existing human resources pool.
Two diagonal rods are installed to increase horizontal rigidity of the upper arm.
The Company shall identify, review and control changes made during, or subsequent to, the design and development of products and services, to ensure that there is no adverse impact on conformity to requirements.
Railway bureaus will, according to the tasks assigned by China Railway Corporation, actively organize and carry out collection and summary of passenger flow plan data.
Manufacturing costs - Employee's compensation and welfare - Salary
Specialize in our major business, pursue achieve excellence, and build the first-class enterprise with international competitiveness.
The roller can do nothing on the section which is not yet rolled to shape including steering, making U-turn, adding water or staying.
The Regulation on the Safety Administration of Dangerous Chemicals (Order No. 591 of the State Council, implemented on 12/1/2011)
In-field checking in maintenance workshop: Hoisting equipment was not configured with lock-hook devices.
During construction in high temperature season, reasonably arrange works and provide a thermometer to measure temperature of the operation points exposed to sunlight. Outdoor operation is exhibited during the period under temperature of over 38°C (excluding projects under crash duration, or special procedures that cannot be suspended, but these processes must done safely and well).
It provides hierarchical QoS scheduling mechanism and supports multi-level H-QoS scheduling for access side and MPLS H-QoS scheduling for network layer;
Post control refers to the quality control of the products after construction. When it is found that there are still certain quality defects, measures shall promptly be taken for rectification so as to make the same meet the acceptance requirements, and the stipulated quality assessment standards and methods shall be followed for inspection and initial evaluation of the completed unit works, individual project items.
1. Striking from foreign objects during the operation; 2. Aging sealing strip and sealant shedding may cause water enter the inside due to un-tight sealing.
In the future, under the background of a new round of scientific and technological revolution, such technologies as cloud computing, big data, Internet of Things, artificial intelligence, and broadband communication will develop rapidly. With scientific and technological innovations as the driving force, the application and transformation of new technologies, new materials and new processes will be accelerated. The HSR industry is in need of significant technological innovations and faces development opportunities.
A separate device specially used for change replenishment is equipped for the coin processing module as well. This device could store at least 700 coins (taking one Yuan as the benchmark) for each kind of coin (half-Yuan and one-Yuan coin).
3) Check the traction/brake /L_EB2/L_EB signal of I/O module, EBCU and traction container of D2 car
② Organize the engineering management department to collaborate in the inspection and examination;
Currently, the geological investigation is underway and the information is to be supplemented.
High-frequency switching power and batteries are used to supply power for DC equipment in the communication machinery room of control center, communication machinery rooms of stations along the line, sectional wireless base stations and communication machinery rooms at other access points; new UPS is used for AC power supply.
(Maintenance services during the warranty period are free of charge)
6. Lighting control mode is reasonably selected, combining centralized and decentralized control.
The line length for scheme of passing through Boten and B.NaTeuy is 7.581km longer than that for scheme of passing through Menghai, resulting in a higher cost of RMB 442,310,000 Yuan.
According to the drilling, this layer is mainly distributed in GK130+000~GK130+080 section, with a burial depth of 1~3m in general.
Size of gap between protective cover and air duct shall not be less than the thickness of insulating materials of air duct. Gap shall be infilled with rock wool or mineral wool materials. Head face of protective cover shall be at the same horizontal with the undersurface of floor slab or a little higher, and it shall be 30mm higher than the surface of the floor slab.
Reliability Modeling, Allocation and Prediction Specification (PBTS-QP-xxx);
Demolish the temporary facilities within the construction and clean the construction site after completing the Project.
2.4.2 Organize the correction of minor and major nonconformities, analyze the reasons where necessary, take corrective actions and collect the relevant evidence;
LGJ-300/40 steel-cored aluminium strands (single conductor) are adopted for the conductor of the newly-built 132kV line.
- HQCM-MUHc-0100-01-2002, HQCM-MUHc-0100-01-2006, HQCM-MUQc-0100-01 -2010, and HQCM-MUQc-0100-01-2014.
After independent actual measurement of large scale strip topographic map in complex areas, the original smaller scale strip topographic map shall be continuous without interruption.
Special technical schemes must be prepared for high formwork erecting works. The technical schemes shall include at least the design of the formwork and its supporting system, the erection and removal, the concrete pouring method, the observation of the pouring process, and safety control requirements.
The roof works include R1 concrete roof, R3 steel structure roof, R4 profiled steel sheet roof, R5 metal sheet explosion-venting roof and R6 planting roof etc.
Base course treatment: Remove the foreign matters on the concrete base, remove the dropped mortar with a chisel, and clean the laitance layer with a wire brush.
The quality personnel shall regularly (such as once a month) make a statistic analysis to the quality conditions of process inspection to seek for opportunities for improvement.
8. After the column installation is corrected, the anchor bolt shall be welded to the bottom plate and the anchor bolt shall be tightened with double nuts to prevent the nut from loosening.
During the implementation of the construction schedule plan, the schedule planner shall precisely know the project progress, and analyze the project progress regularly. The analysis mainly includes the following aspects:
1. When export transportation of Mongolia goes through the territory of Russia and the People's Republic of China, the railway department of the country was agreed to enjoy favorable conditions in similar cargo transport, the lowest cost, transport time, as well as other expenses and long-term preferences.
The economic and geographical position of Ukraine is conducive to the development of its aviation potential and integration with European and world transportation systems.
Control of capability of constructing processes/sub-divisional works/divisional works
Kericho County: Located at the west edge of the Great Rift Valley, and between Bomet County and Kisumu County, it is the largest tea production center in Kenya.
Once RCF branching cracks arrive at the contact surface, spalling will occur, leading to RCF failure of the sample.
There are more than 10 branches/subsidiaries and over 20 Project Management Departments.
Notice of change and notice about other proposals of public security.
where is the friction velocity at bottom and ∆zb is the height of the first vertical mesh counting from the bottom.
This is to certify that, student Chu Haojie, male, born on November 28, 1983 and majoring in Civil Engineering in our university from September 2001 to July 2005 has completed all 4-year undergraduate courses required by teaching plan and passed all examinations,, and is hereby approved to graduate.
(3) Shareholding proportion or equity and the change of the subsidiary enterprise
5. The numbers on the guide plate and stability plate are the numbers of 2 # beam correspondingly; and the numbers below the guide plate and stability plate are the numbers of 3 # beam correspondingly,;
(9) All the quality assurance data must be synchronized with the construction and cannot be supplemented later so as to ensure the completeness and authenticity.
3.1.1.2 The Technical Specification only specifies the minimum technical requirements, provides in-exhaustive technical details, and does not make full reference to the provisions of relevant standards and codes. The bidders shall provide quality products conforming to the Technical Specification and industrial standards.
3) When overlapping adjacent steel wire meshes, at least one transverse spacing shall be overlapped and the thickness shall be plus 50mm, and measurement shall be made from the outermost transverse wire of the mesh.
■Monitoring DC power supply voltage, current values;
The file DO536117 as reference in the technical requirements on sheet 1.
Due to the difficult construction for steel structures of the Project and high quality requirements, the leading on quality management must be strengthened; specifications and standards shall be strictly performed; construction shall be controlled as per design requirements; construction quality shall be put into the first place; the realization of quality objectives shall be guaranteed by meticulous management and careful construction.
a) The concrete pouring and tamping are strictly in accordance with the construction specifications to prevent the occurrence of voids and pits.
Note: Since LCD display screen is set in public area of the station, to ensure coordinated overall fit-out of the station, the Seller shall provide customized supporting hanging (from ceiling)/wall mounting device after on-site measurement, with specific specifications to be determined in design liaison stage.
Main electric equipment shall be those which are modulized, standardized, free of maintenance and fewer repairs.
The toll method proposes to adopt the semi-automatic charging method of "manual vehicle type identification, manual charging, automatic license plate automatic identification, closed-circuit television monitoring (adding station number, vehicle type, job number, lane number, charging type on the captured picture), computer management, entrance card issuance, implementing weight-based charging for trucks at the exits.
At present, the mine is in the preliminary survey stage, and the exploration depth is small. In order to ensure the utilization of resources and the smart management of mine, a geological survey report for the mine as detailed as possible should be provided, and a comprehensive analysis should be conducted for all components such as boreholes, exploratory trenches, etc. (including ore, intercalated bed and earthing).
There is a creek with a water depth of 0.2~0.3 m and width of 2m; the water surface is flush with the drilling hole at 4m north of the creek; the riverbed is of purplish red sandstone rocks, with grain size of mostly 0.3~1m, and stone layer thickness of 1~1.5.
Responsible unit organize emergency training or fire drill
2. Requirements for filler (graded crushed stone): The graded crushed stone shall be produced by crushing mountain rock block or pebble; in the case that pebble is used, 3% of cement shall be added. The graded crushed stone employed for filling of transition section shall meet the requirements of relevant technical conditions and the gradation shall conform to the provisions of Table 2:
Technical Specification of Pipeline Works of Plastic Composite Pipe for Water Supply of Building
d The reinforcement wire head should meet the precision requirements of Grade 6F, and shall be inspected by a special straight thread gauge. The go-gauge shall be able to screw in smoothly and reach the required screw-in length, and the screw-in length of the no-go gauge shall not exceed 3p.
After theengineering quality/safety problem (accident) on(DD/MM/YY), we have proposed handling scheme after careful study. Please review and approve it.
① The fine aggregate concrete is adopted for the floorings with heavy bearing load or severe wear expectation;
The Ministry of Finance/Shanxi Provincial Department of Finance/Houma City Finance Bureau assume the role of project loan guarantee and project implementation supervision.
Production of casing billet shall be organized in accordance with the requirement of the contract. Attention shall be paid to the requirement of the contract during heating sampling and cutting off by pipe saw mill.
Case 3: The hydraulic arm swings left 45°. The propulsion beam remains horizontal and extends forward to the limit position. The rock drill moves forward to the limit position.
1. General layout and related design requirements of depot
Refuse depot: arranged in southwest corner and northeast corner of the site.
│ │ │ │ │ 223585 Frame Structure - Skew Section Results.hdm
When nonconformities occur, the responsible department's person responsible for improvement shall immediately take temporary containment actions to prevent expansion of the nonconformities;
5.6 The keys to the Ir192 source equipment shall be separately kept by two specially-assigned persons, and the key to other special instruments and equipment for radiographic testing shall also be kept by specially-assigned persons.
Built-in or external FC switch requires full duplex read and write.
Fig. 21.3-1 Schematic Diagram of Distribution of Depot on Lot3 Line
Legend: 1-suction pipe; 2-water pump foundation; 3-ground; 4-water pump base; 5-bolt. Note: The plane size of the water pump foundation can be determined on the assumption that each edge extends 100 mm-150 mm out of the edge of the water pump base.
5.3.1.1 Individual office supplies are distributed every two months.
All these show that the theoretical research on the correlation between the length of straight line and driving safety, and the impact mechanism is still significantly insufficient, and there are great differences on the understanding of up limit of straight line length.
Fixed hydraulic type stop buffer is adopted on the line outside the depot and friction type stop buffer is adopted on the line in the depot.
g) Responsible for analysis and diagnosis of quality management of international engineering products, investigate and handle quality issues of international engineering products in current department, and conduct quality improvements;
The allowable stress of HRB400 reinforcement shall be determined according to Clause 3.3.4 of Code for Design of Concrete Structures of Railway Bridge and Culvert, and the allowable stress amplitude shall be determined according to Clause 3.3.5 of Code for Design of Concrete Structures of Railway Bridge and Culvert.
Tools and materials brought into the reactor must be registered, and their registered number be cancelled when they are brought out. Any instrument or material is prohibited to leave inside the reactor.
Except as noted, use -25x4 hot dip galvanized flat steel, which is buried or laid in the column plastering.
2.17 ① If any reel of optical fiber ribbon is judged to be unqualified, then the unqualified items shall be described in the record card and the pending stamp shall be stamped; ② Issue the quality feedback sheet in the quality feedback system and isolate the unqualified optical fiber; ③ Place the pending optical fiber ribbon in the pending placement area;
3) Flat washers shall be provided on both sides of connecting bolts. There shall be high extra stress between adjacent washers.
Fever clinics will receive fever patients to distinguish them from ordinary patients.
Design optimization, factory processing, precision measurement and control, automated installation, dynamic monitoring, and informatization management.
6.2.9 Inserts shall be installed according to the following requirements:
Control the whole process of quality to ensure the effective operation of quality management system.
Test date: March 07, 2014.
In the event of power failure, elevators shall go directly to the standby floor and stop there.
185 (H) X 68 (H) X 30 (D) mm
KTZ's railway system is in a structure that integrates railway network and transportation, with more than 30 business sectors (including sub-departments) in charge of rolling stock, passenger transport, logistics, infrastructure, marketing, transportation safety, etc.
The high voltage cabinet is made of Q235 material, with the yield strength of 235 MPa, and the yield stress in the weld area is S/1.1, i.e. 213.6 MPa.
11.4.5 Sewage Treatment and Drainage Schemes for Domestic Water Stations and Points
Decoration works include flooring works, interior wall works, exterior wall works, ceiling works, doors and windows works, etc.
27.5kV indoor monopolar manual isolating switch
The semi-finished rebars shall be marked with the division, layer, section and component name. The rebars of the same part or component shall be put together and clearly marked with the component name, position, size, diameter and quantity.
High elastic painting for the external wall, with extension capability of better than 350
2. Basic snow pressure: 0.70KN/m2(return period of 50 years)
4. Bottom reinforcement zone of wall tie rebars is8@450X450 and the rest zone is 8@600X600. Tie rebars are located in a staggered way and hooked to the outer rebars.
BH SENS Management System Documents
In order to meet the requirements of signal-to-noise ratio and reliability (the time-location coverage probability is 95%), the following parameters are taken for the minimum receiving level as wireless coverage design parameters:
1. Cast-in-place brackets of 0 # box beam segment at P19#, P20# and P21# piers are erected.
Material management complies with Regulations on Goods Warehousing and Delivery Management (HUALU3506-2014) and Measures for On-site Warehouse Management (HUALU3503-2014).
The unreeling device consists of a wire coil rack, wire coil shaft, and caliper-type brake, etc.
Target size not less than 1/1.8", resolution not less than 2 megapixels, DC drive, auto aperture, manual zoom, support infrared mode;
g)All data and process documents shall be simultaneously provided to the design unit, the Tenderee and its authorized representatives, and the quantity shall be determined at the design liaison stage.
During excavation, elevation of trench bottom should be measured at any time. The earth 150 mm above the trench bottom should be subject to manual treatment to prevent the trench bottom from being disturbed by overexcavation.
7.4.3 The surface of the bottom layer of replacement shall be provided with drainage slopes to both sides, with the gradient of 4%. During the construction, protective soil layer with a certain thickness shall be reserved on the surface, and removed when constructing the top layer of subgrade bed.
0.3 score will be deducted for one percentage point higher than the best evaluation price; 0.2 score will be deducted for one percentage point lower than the best evaluation price.
1.3.2 Stage 2: Gantry Crane Lifting Girders
3. Implement the acceptance system for construction machines of various types. Machines that do not pass acceptance are not allowed to be used.
2) Pay attention to the interchange shape, the line type shall be as smooth as possible, and pay attention to the plane and vertical scheme design of interchange, so that the line type will be smooth and the traffic route will be clear, and all indexes are conform to the requirements of relevant codes and regulations;
For the commencement ceremony, office rental costs, office supplies rental fee, etc. during the project start-up period, the total amount shall be controlled and implemented to specific departments and people.
Including the address, time sequence, quantity and range of action signals of alarm and linkage facilities after fire and the range of fire control and smoke resistance of firefighting facilities.
The department that requests the correction for the unqualified products shall verify the disposal situation.
Rectangular busbar supporting fittings, MNP-102X100
Press - Press the emergency stop button Rotate - Release the emergency stop button
Before cleaning, please add washing into the water tank and the water volume shall not be less than 80% of the water tank.
Customer groups, demand characteristics and customer behavior.
1.7.4Packing, Storage and Handling Conditions
(3) Cohesive soil shall be moderately watered and the tree species with underdeveloped roots shall be relatively heavily watered.
1 new arrival-departure track is provided at the same side of the station in this design, with the effective length designed by the existing size.
Record of Measurement of Insulation Resistance of Cables (Wires)
This Certificate is made in 4 copies. The Contract holds 2 copies (as the completion documents). The Contractor and the Supervisor each hold 1 copy.
The construction specification of soil nail supporting requires that the lower soil layer can be excavated only after upper soil nail reaches 75% of the design strength.
When the lining is reinforced concrete lining, the reinforcement shall be made in the processing shed, and the reinforcement shall be installed manually on the reinforcement bench. When installing the reinforcement, the reinforcement position and the thickness of the concrete protective layer shall not be less than 3cm.
Handle a train route and occupy the approach section; after approach locking, handle total cancellation for the beginning signal, clear the approach section, and reopen the signal machine.
The land occupation area is the newly-added area beyond the boundary of land use of the existing line.
All cable markers and components codes shall be complete, clearly visible, and neatly arranged for convenient review.
Contract No. 2008000068200018 – Wuhan Disaster Recovery Center Project of China Construction Bank (Contract Sum HK $1521.6 M)
Take charge of development, revision and implementation of special emergency plans of the Company for natural disasters;
Where joints are designed for field applied sealant, seal joints completely with specified sealant.
The topsoil contains plant rhizomes, with poor engineering performance. The underlying medium sand, silt, breccia and crushed stone have some bearing capacity, and can be used as subgrade bearing layer with the bedrocks.
Before accessing the information system, we will follow the unified technical specifications of the Boten-Vientiane Railway to complete the network access and hardware system construction.
Distance travelled recording and modification of mileage via PTU;
It is allowed to balance the pressure of the system for 5 minutes. Read the value 1P1 (Kpa) of pressure gauge of leak test device. 10 minutes later, read the value 2P2 (Kpa) of pressure gauge of leak test device and fill in the test record as per requirement.
12.3.6In case cantilever retaining wall and counterfort retaining wall are on the slope with longitudinal gradient of more than 5%, foundation should be made into bench.
The above content shall be subject to the station yard drawings provided by the civil engineering discipline at the construction drawing stage.
All buttons in the driver's cab shall be of the quick-action button with good performance.
The Contractor and the Supervisor shall measure one position for every 20 m.
Blow off seawater in the ballast tank of submarine to make the submarine float upward rapidly;
The construction sequence should be from bottom to top, from far to near, and be focused on the details first and then on large-area.
1 Before construction of suspended ceiling works, construction site, drawing and design description should be known well.
Changsha Rail Transit 5 Construction Co., Ltd. / 166 Duhua Road, Yuhua District, Changsha
(3) Combined with the engineering type, the further investigation for engineering characteristics and distribution rules of liquefiable soil layers shall be conducted through drilling, sampling, in-situ testing and other means.
Table 9-7 Frame Shears of Towers on Each Floor under Y-axis Seismic Condition (kN)
The plumb may be hung and wall construction may begin only if the flatness and perpendicularity fully meet the requirements.
For the overhead lines required to be relocated and with a voltage of above 10kV, lifting cross way shall be applied for relocation according to the electrochemical standard. If the technical economy is extremely unreasonable, the possibility of cable crossing can be considered for the lines with a voltage of 10kV and below.
(8) ASTM A307 Standard Specification for Carbon Steel Bolts, Studs, and Threaded Rod 60000 PSI Tensile Strength
Provide system hardware and software required for communication test.
On busy existing single-track railway, before carrying out insertion of double-track sections or double-track expansion and reconstruction, it is very effective to improve the passing capacity of sections by adding temporary demarcation points using this diagram for some control sections with tight passing capacity.
Table of Connection Parameters of Beam Column and Beam High Strength Bolt (Grade 10.9)
According to the analysis of inspection results, the thickness of the protective layer of this culvert is too discrete, and about 77% of the reinforcement protective layer thickness is less than 50mm, which does not meet the requirements of Chinese Codes.
(3) The putty shall be solid and firm without pulverization, peeling and cracking. After the putty is dried, the surface shall be polished and cleaned.
Communication and coordination are strengthened with track-laying organizations and traffic interference is reduced between construction organizations of engineering lines to ensure construction safety.
2. The quantities of C40 seal head are 0.30m+000003 for each slab.
When the steel rope gets close to the rear face of the stator, place the connecting shoe block of rotor on the arc sliding plate.
Security Department shall be responsible for on-site protection, order maintenance, emergency handling, casualty rescue and evacuation, etc.
9.1.4 The monitoring methods, items and control benchmark for tunnels in squeezing surrounding rocks shall be compatible with the surrounding rock deformation grade, supporting method and construction method.
b) concrete surface chloride diffusion coefficient Dmigis calculated according to formula (F. 2):
After the design requirements are met, reinforce it to make sure that the formwork will suffer no deformation or displacement in the process of concrete pouring.
1. Bid price of the Supplier: including fireproof portable house, skeleton material, door, lock, window and other vulnerable spare parts, transportation (customs declaration and clearance), delivery and installation fees, but excluding ground foundation, water supply and drainage, and indoor and outdoor wiring cost; 6%GST cost is separately counted.
Samples shall be stored in the environment with temperature of -25°C~-30°C for 24 consecutive hours.
Independent current sensor is configured at return current point. Correct phase overlapping of independent current measurement within corresponding frequency range shall be considered;
The secondary application and development technology interface should be disclosed, and related software packages should be provided.
5.5.3.6 The prestressed concrete girder shall be poured at one time quickly, stably, continuously and reliably.
The hardware controller of the propulsion system is of the DSP+FPGA hardware control framework. The inverter control strategy, control parameter measurement, fault classification and fault protection logics, etc. are introduced in detail.
2.Check if the elastic coupling is loose or replace the elastomer.
(2) Long-term equity investments obtained by other methods
Many factors affect the prediction of induced traffic volume, and mature method and model are not available at present due to different conditions in different areas. In general, the induced percentage of the project impact area is determined at the macro level, combing quantitative analysis method and qualitative analysis method.
1.5 Installation of lockset, door stopper, and other hardware fittings: Generally, keyhole is better to be well prefabricated at factory to avoid touching and damaging the paint during installation process. Meantime, the slot side must be smooth and level. Slotting on the cleading is generally completed at the site. During slotting process, the slot must be parallel and level to ensure a beautiful external appearance.
The construction of the monitoring center building of this sub-project is finished in April 2017. The building is partly operational in May, and will be fully operational in August, 2017, so the expected project goal will be broadly achieved.
1.1.2.3 Construction Contractor: China Railway Wuhan Electrification Engineering Group Co., Ltd.
3. Remote fault handling (such as remote bypass switch operation, and remote rescue operation);
3. Capitalization should cease when the qualifying assets under acquisition and construction or production is ready for its intended use or sale.
The secondary wiring shall be performed as per the electrical schematic diagram and the wiring diagram. Once it is completed, the cable inlet shall be sealed by sealing material.
The Construction Contractor shall prepare the protection plan for intermediate and final products, which is required to be submitted to the Project Department for approval and to the Employer for approval if necessary;
Material of rotary knife: 1.4021 (chromium alloy), provided with hard alloy blade;
d) The Company shall periodically perform random inspection of implementation of technical regulations for safety and demand the responsible unit to take corrective actions to correct non-conformance identified during inspection.
There are 31 grade crossings in the design scope, wherein, 9 level crossings with main roads and 22 level crossings with ordinary roads.
1. Except the reinforcement diameter, all the other dimensions of the drawing are in cm.
Within six months prior to the expiration of the warranty period of PRT system, the Supplier shall assist the Purchaser in carrying out comprehensive inspection and maintenance for whole PRT system, and all costs shall be borne by the Supplier.
single hole width *and height is 4.0m*3.0mdouble holes reinforced concrete slab culvert wing wall
Now classification of steel bar quantity of 10-17# approach span pier shafts is made as per the above principles, i.e. epoxy-coated steel bars shall be employed for pier shafts with elevation lower than +5.37m and ordinary steel bars shall be employed for pier shafts with elevation higher than +5.37m, and the ordinary steel bars and epoxy-coated steel bars shall be connected with effective measures.
For integrity system, it means the time period from the change of on-site equipment to the update on workstation display.
According to the specific conditions of each station, different construction methods, such as open excavation method, covered excavation method and subsurface excavation method may be selected as appropriate.
Provide relevant training for TVM management personnel of the station, operators and repair personnel for basic business, system software and hardware.
3. In FACU-S-202, the positioning of partial columns is modified as below:
Attached Figure: Flow Chart of Control Procedure for Permance Measurement and Monitoring:
5 The ballast shall be leveled from the center of route to both sides of route by graders.
3) Before concrete mixing, measure the water content of raw materials (sand and gravel), adjust the mix proportion of concrete in time, and control the slump of concrete;
This analysis is carried out in a tabular form, with the analyst being required to take each component failure mode in turn and assess its effects at the appropriate higher levels, and then record the results on the worksheet.
Lifting and installation of pole, installation height for +5.0m (the remaining is same)
Three specimens form a group and the average of the three is deemed as a statistical data.
1.3 The sales manager, together with the project manager and the system engineer, interviews customers for survey, and then prepares Original Requirements of Customers and List of Customer Input Materials; the system engineer organizes benchmarking analysis in cooperation with product development engineers.
(1) The measurement of the bill of quantities shall be carried out in accordance with the technical specifications in the Bidding Documents for Standard Construction of Highway Engineering(JGLF [2009] No.221).
Rice field, soaked for a long time, with soft soil thickness of 2 ~ 3m, located in low-lying and gentle area of intermountain gully opening.
The sole timber shall be properly arranged along side frame and middle grid with distance from ground not less than 40cm to prevent damping and deformation.
Deviation of axis of shield departure (incoming) section from design
(10) The geological conditions of the Kafubu bridge site are complicated. Soluble dolomitic limestone is distributed in the bedrock, and caves and cavities are extremely developed. After the scheme of the bridge and lower foundation are confirmed, the geological conditions of the bridge site shall be investigated in detail by means of pile-by-pile drilling.
11.3.4The dry or wet method may be used for the maximum dry density test which shall comply with the following requirements:
Including signal lines, power lines, ground wires, etc. The cost is of lump sum.
9) For concrete design, it is recommended to refer to NACE Standard RP0187-2005. Item No. 21034, Design Considerations For Corrosion Control Of Reinforcing Steel in Concrete.
13.10 If the Seller is not able to present the certification of stipulated insurance range in the contract, the Buyer can purchase such insurance and keep it effective.
1) Supervise the safety management of Project Department, participate in the project safety planning, and have one-vote veto for the project construction safety.
3.6.1.2 DCU sends signals to TCMS
Note: only the works within the bid invitation scope shall be filled in the above table.
The height of the cushion block is pre-determined based on the thickness of each net protective layer, and the strength of cushion block is not less than that of the bent cap.
It shall be consistent with specifications of the manufacturer, and transformer test items shall be referred to.
Reinforcement shall be fabricated in the fabrication yard in a centralized manner, and then be transported to each wind turbine foundation by the flat cars for installation. The joints of main reinforcement φ25 and above shall be connected with direct thread sleeves, while the ones below φ25 shall be connected with lap joints. The joints of main reinforcement shall be fabricated and installed in strict accordance with the design requirements and relevant specifications. The reinforcement fabricated shall be stacked by categories, and be managed by specially-assigned personnel.
14.3.7.18.Pre-acceptance of follow-up trains
It is also assumed here that the new project will provide the necessary safety measures at the level crossing, so the possibility of increased accidents will be very low.
During the 180th to 209th weeks, the north wing building is finished wholly, and the deck is finished for viaduct SR17.
The inspection results of typical reinforcement quantity and protective layer thickness are shown in Tables 9 to 10.
Project Completion Date: August 30, 2008
all mixtures (or pellets below 26.5mm) should be included.
According to characteristics of the project, erection of steel structures needs to be synchronized with civil construction and should be carried out in an intermittent manner in accordance with the progress of civil construction.
Waterproof coiled materials, thermal insulating materials and assorted materials shall be provided with product qualified certificates. Materials shall be subjected to sampling and retesting before mobilizing and shall be provided with re-inspection report.
Muang Kasi Nam Lik Super Major Bridge L-1009m;
We can't control the outside temperature and can only take extra measures to ensure the equipment can work normally in high temperature environment. Therefore, I suggest the following measures:
The government has devoted greater effort to attract foreign investments and made some achievements. The LNG project and RAMU nickel mine have made important progress and played an important role in promoting the sustainable growth of the PNG economy.
According to SIL0 requirements and Appendix A in EN50128:2011, TCU software in design will adopt the following technical methods:
Type: double column horizontal open type 123KV, 2000A, 40KA/3s, with single ground knife (left grounding)
The drawing is applicable to the reinforcement under the anchor of 160 expansion joint end.
The integrated passenger service system platform functions normally; the functions such as train arrival/departure service, public address and guidance service can be implemented correctly.
The deposit in the water inlet and the culvert shall be cleared; the locally edge failure of coping concrete shall be rehabilitated with epoxy mortar; the area of culvert body with spalling of jointing mortar shall be rehabilitated with mortar; the chute end at water outlet shall be rebuilt.
1-4m Transportation and irrigation, skew 40°
According to visual inspection, no cracks can be found except aggregate peeling. The strength of pavement base course is not enough. The pavement can be used if the potholes are repaired and seal coat is duly applied.
In case of uneven strata and geology and uneven hardness of horizontal strata in the hole, the drill bit will incline towards the softer side during the drilling process. Fill the weak part with concrete at the inclined hole position so as to drill evenly after the concrete is hardened.
The maximum number of concurrent users that the diversified payment platform subsystem can bear instantaneously shall meet the passengers' demand for buying tickets in Luoyang rail transit network without paralysis or unbearable time lag, to ensure passengers' good ticketing experience. Besides, no data loss or error is allowed;
Interface between reader-writer and "financial IC card" (consumption)
To unify fault diagnosis types and alarm threshold.
Once the winter construction is commenced, it is necessary to organize the related personnel to carry out special inspections, and anti-skid measures shall be taken for pedestrians, scaffolding springboards, and working places.
And we have also put a lot of information on the company website, covering technology, environmental protection, immigration, social responsibilities, etc.
The motor is mostly or completely supported by the car body underframe.
3. When walking up and down stairs, the receptionist shall mind safety of the visitor.
The road leading to the outside is located in the southeast of the plant. In addition, the southeastern terrain is relatively high, on the other hand, from the perspective of the windward, the facilities that may emit flammable gas will have minimal impact on this area. Therefore, the front area of ​​the plant will be located in the southeast of the plant.
Thickness is 0.2~20m. There is an obvious boundary between the layer and underlayer.
The third floor is the platform floor in island shape, with the effective platform length of 120m, and two effective platforms have the width of 9m.
Equivalent A-weighted sound level, exposed sound level or maximum sound level are measured respectively when EMU passes through the sound barrier section and contrast section.
. The disconnect clip should be set at each downlead with 1.5m away from the ground, which could be led to and welded with the grounding grid.
(3) No geological borehole can be found for abutment and pier of this bridge. Geologic prospecting shall be supplemented, and relevant design drawings (including general layout (mainly foundation design)) and the bill of quantities of main works shall be modified as per completed engineering geology data of bridge site.
training demand research; staff's competence management requirement; requirement of each system; ④ knowledge management.
The model is mainly composed of shell elements and solid elements. The A car is connected with the B car through hinge body, and the hinge body is connected with the carbody by a rigid unit, wherein the anti-climber and the hinge body are classified as solid elements.
JD Yarlung Zangbo River-Brahmaputra River Basin
Cushion cap: 195.23m3 pile foundation: 186.53m3
After the completion of the foundation inspection, the foundation construction is organized in time.
4 In case of night construction operation, the measures shall be taken to minimize construction noise, and the sound insulation cloth, low-noise tamping rod and other methods may be adopted.
To promptly inspect, repair and reinforce pier platforms after the flood retreats.
There are no exposed bolt heads, nuts, burrs or cracks on the surface of the equipment case.
Because the steel structure is constructed firstly , laser spot position of the upper floors of poured concrete floor is not required in the main core of the side wall welding survey control points cantilevered steel platform, the laser control points measured on the cast steel platform and well marked.
1. Type: wedge gate valve with internal thread and concealed rod _x000D_
(1) The construction of cast-in-situ bored piles shall be conducted in the dry season as far as possible. During the construction in the rainy season, canopies shall be erected at the borehole opening, the borehole opening shall be properly covered, and construction measures in the rainy season shall be taking such as constructing an enclosure with an appropriate height on the ground around the borehole.
a. Large mechanical equipment operators must hold professional certificates, while fixed operators should take fixed position in strict conformity with the operation procedures and prohibited operating rules.
Gas shielded welding machine, pneumatic angle grinder, magnetic defect detector; platform
During the testing and construction process, the testing personnel shall apply the means of distance, time and shield, etc. to protect the area.
The spacing of the beam bottom support is 1200mm, the width of the beam bottom early dismantling head is 100mm, and the 1100mm aluminum formwork is used between the early dismantling heads.
Insulation resistance meter, grounding resistance measuring instrument, sound level meter
Per system configuration, the gate shall give an audible tone indicate acceptance;
The Abuja International Airport is one of the five largest international airports in Nigeria. It has one airport terminal with a runway length of 3609 meters and a width of 60 meters.
In addition to the convenient and efficient MRT system, Shenzhen Airport can provide fast and convenient transit services based on the premise of convenience for passengers during the process design of the satellite concourse through systematic design of the building space and route of the satellite concourse, so as to further enhance its transit support capability as an international aviation hub.
OTMS shall offer patrons the online means of purchasing Tickets on a self-service basis.
Turnouts, routes and signal machines of the whole station can be under its centralized control and supervision.
According to the factors such as the class of the intersecting highway, the scale of the interchange, the size of the traffic volume, and the design speed, the standard subgrade width used for the interchange ramp and the connecting ramp in the parking area are as follows:
3) The rechargeable torque wrench battery can carry out the tightening and torque application of more than 1,000 bolts or has a duration time no less than 2 hours per charge; the duration of full charging of battery shall not be more than 1 hour.
(3)Before the excavation, the borrow area should be cleaned up to remove the topsoil and non-applicable materials.
When the test pile or the anchor piles are under-reamed piles or those with branches and plates, the distance between the center of test pile and that of anchor pile shall not be less than 2 times the diameter of the under-reamed end.
Manufacturer/supplier: Anhui Tiankang Group Co., Ltd.
And if upon termination of the warranty period, the EPC Contractor fails to accomplish rectifying defects found during the warranty period, the warranty period shall thus be extended accordingly till the relevant defects are rectified by the EPC Contractor.
4 Arrange a vehicle washing platform respectively at the inlet and outlet of construction site to wash the tires of vehicles getting in and out;
It ensures that the locomotive crew can learn the wind pressure condition of the tail at any time. In the process of forming a 10000-ton locomotive, the locomotive can also carry out digital voice communication and train-tail data relay communication to serve the safe operation of the train.
Bridge Project Crossing Nanxi River at Wanfo Road (West Taoxi Road ~ Fast Lane) in Shucheng County
(4) The number of sidewalk, angle steel railing and cable trough (power) is wrong and shall be checked and modified.
(13) Operation platforms of steel members must be well grounded, and the grounding resistance should not exceed 10Ω.
Failures that may reduce the comfort of passengers and train operators.
The reactor can filter the higher harmonic on input side of traction inverter and restrict the current of main circuit, thus to avoid the transient mutation of the circuit and protect relevant electrical equipment.
To conform to the development trend and management characteristics of the modern real estate industry, the Group established two major business units of Mingxin Real Estate and Youju Property in 2017.
② The power supply line is of three-phase five-wire system.
5.1.6 Immediately apply cardiopulmonary resuscitation if the injured has no pulse and heartbeat.
Two working conditions are comprised in the open-wire operation, that are, conditions with crosswind or without crosswind.
Circular reinforced concrete water storage tank without underground water, capacity: 300m
(6) Distance from Main Buildings and Equipment to Track Center Line
Actual L3 cache per grain ≥24MB
Measurement of circle run-out of end faces of thrust disk, impeller and coupling.
An access device is provided for the telephone helpline system in a train based on the passenger information, and the interface is at the on-board exchange and is of TCP/IP type.
Sewage: train washing, oily waste water—→bar screen well—→regulation, sedimentation, and oil separation tank—→sewage lift pump
In this cause, we hope to introduce the advanced technologies from Germany.
Therefore, it is very suitable for Chinese highway traffic development.
Come to site of the customer as a frontline person and complete work with assistance of personnel of second-line and third-line.
Final cost baseline, at the end of Stage 3.
The Contractor shall take charge of the on-board fixation of the jackets, piles, drill conductors and attachments.
Set railings at free face of the and platforms; see 02(03)J401-LG2-10 for construction practices of steel railings, and change the banisters to ∅42 steel pipes.
The excavation of the tunnel face shall be closed by spraying C25 concrete based on geological conditions with thickness of 10cm.
Please clarify the above question and provide relevant supporting materials.
6.This Letter of Commitment has the same legal effect with formal contract.
File drawings (for design and sales personnel)
2) Base treatment: Pour the concrete cushion as soon as possible according to the design drawings. When concrete strength of the cushion has reached 70%, break the pile head, adjust the reinforcement of the pile head, and set out centerline and sideline of the cushion cap.
b) The resistance value of the brake resistor detected by the bridge shall meet RCH=11Ω (-5%~+7%).
However, any insurance insured by the Subcontractor does not relieve the Subcontractor of any responsibility and obligation that it has to undertake under the Subcontract.
3.1 Quality improvement: A part of quality management to strengthen the capacity to meet the quality requirements.
10.For pumping concrete downwards, open the air valve on the conveying pipe, and then close the air valve when concrete at the lower section of the conveying pipe is at certain pressure.
The surveyed area features middle and low denudative mountains with the ground elevation of about 880–1020m and relative height difference about 140m. The terrain undulates greatly.
The plumpness of mortar in horizontal mortar joint should not be less than 90%, and that in vertical mortar joint should not be less than 80%, and it is forbidden to use water to flush mortar and fill joints..
One train collides with a 80t freight truck at the relative speed of 36km/h;
All the data and process documents shall be provided to the engineering design unit, Tenderee, and their authorized representatives at the same time, with the quantity determined at the design liaison stage.
Storage tank for raw material 6φ1600X3500V=7m³
A layer of zinc chromate primer shall be painted on the damaged part of the galvanized steel plate; before the installation of supports, hangers and flanges of air ducts, rust removal shall be conducted firstly, and then two layers of red lead paint shall be applied, followed by two layers of colored paint.
Damp atmosphere (RH ≥50%), without wind or direct sunshine exposure
The burial depth and protection of optical and electrical cables are the main control items of concealed works. Optical and electrical cable trench and other concealed works shall pass the self-inspection and be submitted to the Supervision Engineer for inspection. When the Supervision Engineer inspects, all protection must be in place. Only after the work passes the inspection can they be buried and the signing and recognition procedures will be completed.
Basic Procedure of Management in Contractual Dispute (see Fig. 11)
The construction machinery and vehicles should use low-grade diesel oil. After the daily construction is completed, the residual water in the water tank should be drained to prevent freezing. For the machinery with special requirements, put them into the garage for heat preservation.
The water outlets usually are rectangular (0.15m high and 0.1m wide) or round (the diameter is 0.1).
List of Demolished Power, Telecommunication and Other Pipeline Facilities
During construction, all operations shall meet the requirements of electrified discipline.
the stability requirements for slope could be meet after setting protective measures.
All sizes of a profile randomly selected from each extruded batch
GZFZH [2014] No. 107
When the required results have not achieved, the corrective measures shall be taken to ensure that the products and daily work meet the requirements.
1)It shall perform the control commands from the equipment in the equipment room.
The filament woven geotextile is adopted with its mass of 400g /m2 per unit area, the radial rupture strength greater than 100kN / m, CBR bursting strength greater than 10.5kN and tearing strength greater than 1.5kN.
(12) Seismic Macrozonation Hazard Map Of Iran (Standard 2800)
List the names, materials, manufacturers, places of origin, positions installed on the equipment and functions and principles of all major components of the equipment.
(d) Supply of Construction Water, Power and Communication
Each time the rivet is reused; one convex point on the rivet head shall be removed. When the two convex points are all removed, the rivet is not allowed to be reused.
The open or concealed electric metallic tubing shall be connected by socket fastening or thread.
Except the waste acid and alkali liquor produced during mixed bed regeneration, this process basically belongs to environmental protection clean production.
Fixed signal commanders shall be assigned for fixed tower cranes, and may not be replaced at will without special reasons, and signal commanders may not change shift in private without the consent of the person in charge.
Repeated accuracy of flange height, thickness and QR value: ±0.2 mm;
If there is balance between actual design fee and estimated design fee, another supplementary agreement shall be signed by both parties.
11.7 The buyer shall have the right to monitor and control the key manufacturing process of gear, and carry out random sampling for retesting and checking parameters.
Monitoring the schedule and technical level of the equipment supplier.
5.6 Monthly performance appraisal during probation (observation)
Fig. 11-5-5 Control Circuit of the Air Compressor of SS3 4000-series Electric Locomotive
Organize safety education regularly for all staff that participate in the construction.
Risk points, claim points and key terms encountered during execution of project
4) Leaky coaxial cables are erected in the tunnel with a height (from the rail surface) of 4.5-4.8m and hung on one side of the equipment chamber in the tunnel.
Swing angle of the coupler over the S-curve (R150-10-R150)
Check the rusting condition of connector head of pantograph (including pantograph horn and connector head suspension device), ball valve of automatic dropping device, insulating hose, air line clamp, etc. Carry out rust prevention for the rusted connector head and replace it as necessary. When replacing the connector head, the contact strip support shall be applied with Vaseline.
4.3.2 For product audit, the VDA6.5 Product Audit Checklist is recommended;
08 Special Topic of Environmental and Social Impact Assessment - Social Impact
Right front door rubber strip ( FB-6107040)
The technical conditions of the scheme, system and equipment selected for the design should be in harmony with the functional requirements, and design basis is reliable, standards are reasonable and results are accurate.
The horizontal pipe brackets of the thermally insulated air ducts shall be located outside the insulation layer and heat preservation sole timbers shall be added between the air ducts and the cross arms of brackets.
(1) The permeability resistance grade of the concrete for secondary lining should not be lower than P18.
e. Monitoring and measurement devices should be managed, used and maintained according to specifications, provided with suitable storage and maintenance conditions, and operated by qualified personnel to prevent equipment from being damaged and ineffective during use;
The pollution emergency procedure shall be established according to the requirements of the Engineer, including:
Cash in bank _ Cash in bank - BOC _ Cash in bank - BOC - RMB 3729
The observed result: The existing maximum verticality deviation is 40 mm, exceeding the deformation limit (H/450=24mm) specified in 6.3.5 of Standard for Appraisal of Reliability of Civil Buildings (GB 50292-2015).
21.1.1The vehicles of Luoyang Metro Line 1 adopts variable voltage and variable frequency inverter (VVVF) for speed regulation, AC transmission system driven by asynchronous motor, semiconductor static inverter power supply (SIV) and other high-power equipment with variable harmonics.
Bulk-density of Grains More Than 40mm
Wherein, section 3 also includes a branch line in Pugnido, which is 1.153Km long.
Evaluation by the public is industrial or external evaluation, where a particular aspect is evaluated based on passenger complaints, media exposure or letter of recognition.
For self-designed product drawings and technical documents, the right of change belongs to design department or preparation department.
CuCs*/ AFC Station Computer Room/ CTER
There will be left and right door enabling switches on the left and right sides of cab, which will be connected to the enabling trainlines of the left and right doors respectively.
Thickness of concrete cover: foundation slab 50 mm, short column 35 mm, and foundation beam 35 mm.
The main control processes of the subdivisional works of cast-in-situ bored piles are: embedding of pile casings, slurry preparation, hole forming (punching), fabrication and hoisting of reinforcement cages, concrete pouring of pile foundation and detection of pile foundation.
See the following table for pairs of passenger trains and routes in Vientiane terminal:
Installation of Signal System of Southern Extension Line (Zhifang Line) of Wuhan Metro Line 7
A 2.5m wide country road (earth road) is provided on the site, without level crossing (interchange) and a new interchange shall be constructed.
Figure 1Mounting Appearance of Bolts between V-shaped Link Seat and the Axle
Trunkings and cross arms will be fixed by bolts (roundhead bolts), the bolts should cross over the trunkings from inside to outside which aims to avoid the bolts from abrading the insulation layer of the cable.
This standard is developed in the case of valve product development, application material increase and standard production needs.
Total: twelve characters, 4240 Nr., total power 4000W (reserved), 100 Nr./m2, dot pitch 40*85
Mc car (Mc1, Mc2): 15,500mm
The arrangement of organizations and staffing should be as concise and efficient as possible.
1. Take technical and management responsibility for specific work related to quality management of the project.
Control the drilling speed properly and drill the bottom of the casing slowly; make sure the wall on the bottom is well protected; after drilling to 1m below the casing bottom, drill at normal speed as appropriate.
D1 – length of measured distance imputed to the surface of reference ellipsoid of projection (m);
The transportation fee does not include the unloading fee and the second transfer fee.
The environment and occupational health and safety shall comply with the laws and regulations about environment and safety in China and relevant provinces.
The inspection and test of the building materials shall be entrusted to the external laboratory by the Project Management Department;
It is hereby notified that the Conflict of Interests Avoidance System has been modified by the Group for the purpose of enhancing the personnel management, standardizing the employment system and strengthening the integrity and incorruption construction of numerous cadres staff, and is hereby issued to you all for observance.
Isometric Drawing of Air Compression Pipe in Exhibition Halls A1~A4
3) Cable terminal components and wiring terminals shall comply with the design requirements. Cable terminals shall be reliably connected with lead wires. Lapping surfaces shall be clean, flat, free of oxide layer, and coated with power compound grease, and conform to the specification requirements.
Distribution of UT1 typical harmonic voltage ratio at Shek Kong Substation on 2017-07-30 is as shown in Figure 4-3-1-9.
(3) In accordance with the Code for On-site Management of Railway Construction Projects, we shall perform on-site layout of construction sites, set up on-site safety protection facilities, warning signs and equipment for safety protection items, ensure on-site safety, safe use of electricity, safe use of dangerous blasting items and create safety standard construction sites.
and gradually move from one end to the other end along secondary beam in large area.
For the transition section between fill subgrade and cut subgrade, special design and construction measures shall be taken as necessary, to prevent differential settlement.
Quality documents include all kinds of documents, manuals, work instructions, relevant standards, specifications, procedures, test and inspection quality activity records, etc.
Construction Supervision Section ZWJL-2 of the New Zhengzhou ~ Wanzhou Railway Project (Henan Section)-Contract Agreement
Buildings with no all-air system get 3 points under the first Item.
48. First-in first out, old before new, and scattered before integrated principle shall be followed.
13.4. Construction Method
The 1:2,000 strip topographic map used for the design is digitized, and GPS satellite positioning system is used to collect data and establish digital topotype.
B5.2.20 Spare Parts of the Car
API 6A NDE Specification for Body, Bonnet, End, Outlet Connection and Clamping Hub Connection
Door Status Indicator Inside and Outside A Door and Sound Reminder for Closing A Door
2 One pore, slag inclusion or sand inclusion with the maximum dimension of not more than 1 mm is allowed in the area with a radius of 2 mm on the boundary between the jaw of rail head and the edge of welded bar.
It is the technology through which pavement structural layers can be formed by using special mechanical equipment to treat the old or reclaimed asphalt pavement and adding a certain percentage of new aggregate, new asphalt and rejuvenating agent (when necessary).
1.12 "Technical Services" refer to whole process services provided by the Seller related to the Contract Equipment, such as technical guidance, technical cooperation and technical training during engineering design, equipment manufacture supervision, inspection, civil engineering, installation, commissioning, acceptance, Performance Acceptance Test, operation and overhaul.
e All operating characteristics (such as: output power, speed, pressure, etc.)
Black half cow leather couch: 1. cow leather surface; base material: log couch bracket.
Table 3.3 - 13 Model proportion (%) of Starting Point ~ Tegina
Provide special training and education on first aid knowledge to employees who directly contact dust, poisonous gas and other poisonous and harmful materials, such as welder, gas welder, fireman, painter etc.
For connections of the tray, when using connecting plates and connecting with bolts, the bolts used shall be galvanized round head square-neck bolts. The bolts are to be inserted from the inner side of the bridge to the outside and be fixed. For connections by welding, the welding quality shall meet the relevant requirements and measures to prevent deformations shall be provided.
Through the cost analysis of various cost items, we can get knowledge of the constitution ratio of total cost and the weakness of cost management.
Where the buyer specifies a certain manufacturing method, it should be specified in the contract.
7) After the installation of signs, check all the signs to confirm whether the appearance, visual, color, mirror glare, etc. meet the requirements of the drawings in the day and night conditions.
Note: The soil looseness coefficient is not investigated in the project, so the initial soil looseness coefficient in the project is set as 1.2 and the final looseness coefficient is set as 1.03 temporarily for the calculation of earthwork volume.
Table 4-5 Passenger and Freight Train Pairs Unit: pairs/day
The Employer fails to issue the instruction of return to work without justified reasons, which causes the Contractor fails to return to work;
(seal) Valid until May 1, 2019
The current arrangement, however, is basically limited to an operation and maintenance contract; capital injection to upgrade and expand treatment and disposal facilities is very limited.
(3) In terms of organization and system setting, after the completion of the Project, clear energy management functions and organizations shall be established to ensure that there are personnel responsible for energy conservation and there are measures to realize energy conservation, the responsibilities of relevant personnel are clearly defined and a relatively sound and complete energy management network is established.
2. The formwork shall be painted with insulation agent, and the pouring in layers shall be adopted for concrete construction, with the concrete elevation strictly controlled during the course.
TXS will receive information sent by CPU through the motherboard.
Pricing Method for Cost of Construction Machine Shift of Yunnan Province (YJB [2003])
Construction record shall be filled in promptly during construction. Relevant personnel shall be notified for confirmation, signing and verification.
The specification, weight, installation center line and levelness of packed bed laminated board shall meet the requirements of design drawings;
Technical requirements for leno selvage: the binding wire must be made of the same material as the mesh steel wire. To ensure the connecting strength, the steel wire shall be twisted in single loop - double loops alternately at intervals of 10 ~ 15cm.
The Owner authorizes the Supervisor to supervise the Construction Contractor in strict accordance with the specifications, rules, standards and design requirements, and to carry out quality control throughout the process.
1. Install new oil separator into the compressor housing.
Information interconnection shall be achieved between CTC center in Ethiopia and CTC center in Djibouti.
"Six Channels": Unblock the six major road networks and promote the interconnection of railways, highways, waterways, airways, pipelines and information superhighways.
Nitrogen is an indispensable component of protein and therefore widely exists in municipal sewage.
Many earth canals intersect with farmland, which shall be relocated along the right side to guarantee irrigation, in accordance with the U shape concrete channel with 0.5m in top width.
Refer to the updated HS2 T16.05.121 (Issue 02) 5.3.
(3) The framed green text "management right of vehicle base" is displayed below the transitional track (TZ1) route, and green direction arrows are still displayed at vehicle base side, which shows that the operation management right of transitional track (TZ1) has been transferred to the vehicle base, as shown in Figure 2.
Ships, deviating from the sea route, are given anti-collision warning, to reduce the ship's risk of colliding with piers;
The modulus of resilience at graded gravel subbase is taken as 225MPa and integral elastic modulus of resilience at roadbed top as 50MPa.
VVVF inverter consists of two inverter module units and is used to drive 4 traction motors. Braking chopping unit is integrated to inverter module unit.
The principle of reasonable layout: According to work amount specified in the Contract and the requirement for each management objective and in combination with the site construction site plan supplied with the Bidding Document.
Evenly add bearing grease, Mobilith SHC100 synthetic grease, to the bearing outer ring.
2 The transfer container operation should be dominated by loading and unloading of containers and should be supplemented by coupling and uncoupling operation.
The Tenderee shall determine the successful tenderer according to the order of the candidates recommended by the Tender Evaluation Committee.
18.2 Function: To supply power when maintaining the locomotive station.
See "Locomotive Overall Layout" for the overall layout of the locomotive.
2. 353 boundary markers (51 boundary markers for immigration and relocation land; 214 boundary markers for cultivated land and garden plot; 88 boundary markers for other lands) for measurement and setting on the right bank of the reservoir area of Nam Ou River cascade I hydropower station;
2. Each functional department will prepare work safety rules and system and implement safety measures.
4 wells (fixation) plus 6 wells (optional); according to the unanimous agreement between the Chinese and foreign technical decision-makers, the following work items will be included in the general contracting drilling services:
It shall clean up the residual concrete slurry bonded on the formwork and supporting to avoid impact on concrete surface quality in next time use; during clean up it could use carpenter's hammer, small shovel and steel wire in way of brushing or vibrating; don't strike the formwork or supporting part to avoid damage.
Observe whether the tool rest moves normally in X direction and Z direction. In case of head swinging of the tool rest, adjust the X and Z jibs of the tool rest.
When the concrete surface in the hole enters the reinforcement framework for 1m ~ 2m, the tremie shall be properly lifted to reduce its buried depth and increase the buried depth of the lower part of the reinforcement framework.
Information storage and inquiry: The fire alarm controller can record and store the fault information and fire alarm information, and the memory can reach the capacity of recording 999 pieces of information.
5.3.2 Current Setting Conditions of Existing Bridge and Culvert Structures
49. Supervision Fee of 500MW Solar Cell Module Project of JA Solar in Yanchi County
The consignee is ZTCC CAMEROUN SARL.
The average delivery price of cement is 68 USD/t excluding tax.
For such moist rooms as toilets and washrooms, anti-slide floor tiles shall be used, with waterproof layer provided.
During construction, attention should be paid to protect the installed jumper wires during the antenna installation and adjustment to avoid damage.
Confirm that the [Disconnector] of ATP equipment is in the [Normal] position and the [Redundant switch] is in the working position that is requested on that day.
Strength of concrete with admixture St(MPa)
Establish a unified system to manage general construction layout plan and allocate the utilization and management scope of the general layout plan. Specified personnel should be responsible for each area and strictly control the position, occupying time and area of each material, component and machinery equipment.
4.3.4 The site verification sheets of each discipline design shall be filled out by the Supervision Company with each participant holding one copy and used as technical management document and one of the bases for commencement application of construction points to the Supervisor.
Be responsible for the operation of environmental management system and supervision and implementation of objectives.
The final accounts of the Project shall be audited by the national auditing agency where the Project is located.
Conform to the national design, construction and acceptance standards of photovoltaic power station as well as the quality standards and technical requirements stipulated in the Contract and the Technical Agreement. In case of any inconsistency, the highest standard shall prevail.
Install ground wire G24 between cooling tower and truck.
Construction technology of the insulation layer: the thermal insulation materials entering the field shall be sampled for inspection. The same batch of materials shall be sampled at least once.
Railway under construction; with 8~15m high existing slope and 4m deep foundation pit, featuring a gentle terrain, overlaid with silty clay and fine sand, locally mixed with a few round gravels and pebbles, with an overlying thickness of 8-15m.
1. Form:﻿Finished support frames and supports and hangers of cable trays
The failure to submit results or the submission of partial, incomplete or incorrect results will be recorded as a noncompliance item.
8.2.The efforts on environmental protection and civilized construction management shall be strengthened for the Project,.
The tunnel is located between SHISHINDA Station and DICHI Station, and close to DICHI Station. There are rural earth roads leading to N7 highway at the entrance and exit of the tunnel, so the transportation is convenient.
Plastic strip-type gusset plates, colors, specifications and patterns are selected by single project design.
Criterion of acceptability for quality of appearance of displacement observation stake:
Conduct due diligence on the legal environment of the host country to identify legal risks of the Project comprehensively;
On August 26, SKODA provided the document STRN-KMC-OF14082116270, in which the two tread shapes provided do not match the wheel width of 120mm and the rail cant of 1:40 that are actually needed by the 27T bogie, thus it is required to provide the matching tread profile.
Name of unit (seal): Changsha Lianyi Mechanical Equipment Co., Ltd.
The inspection and test should be carried out, and the next procedure should be stopped and maintained until the products meet the regulated requirements if the test cannot meet the requirements.
Energy compatibility of multi-level surge protection devices (SPD) is required;
Review the design change, the drawing modification and the technical warrant.
On-delivery (or service completion) payment:
Crystalline basement complex rocks (including granite, granitic gneiss and gneiss) are mainly found in the Project where there are rich aggregated rocks.
2 Seal the place between Item 2 and door frame with rubber strip to ensure that the door is securely locked and there is no vibration or abnormal sound. The supplier shall make a plan and it shall be confirmed by the designer.
Wall surfacecommon plasteringcement mortar (medium sand)common (protective layer)
The ground observation and relevant data indicate that the materials of landslide mainly contain gravelly soil, with uniform and slightly-dense soil body. The gravels are mainly formed by 55% strongly-weathered shale with a particle size of 2.5 - 12.0 cm and about 6 - 10m thick.
4. The Project Manager should coordinate in handling the surrounding relationship. Adhere to civilized construction to create a good living environment for the broad mass.
The calculation method of bridge and culvert aperture and scour protection is reasonable.
1) Strictly implement the project quality plan, be responsible for the implementation of engineering drawings, standard drawings and the relevant specifications, standards, procedures, construction organization design of the construction of this Project and other technical documents of the project, and carry out specific arrangements for the construction to ensure the realization of engineering quality objectives of each professional.
Wherein: CB—ballast aggregate crushing rate, represented in percentage (%);
For Phase 2 Project, guarantee the commencement date of January 1, 2020, the completion date of Saturday, December 31, 2022, and the total duration of 36 months (including commissioning).
Spoil from the groove shall be piled on one side of the groove edge as far as possible. The distance between the mound toe and the upper edge of the groove shall not be less than 0.8m, and the mound height shall not exceed 1.5m.
Access road is of 7m in width with transverse slope at the gradient of 2.5% and filled with group C filling materials.
Three LED ceiling lamps are installed on the roof at the driver's cab, arranged in the equilateral triangle, and used for the driver's cab lighting.
For the abchor bolts in the prepared holes, the vertical tube portion shall be free from oil dirts and scales, and the threaded portion shall be coated with few oil and grease.
Our maximum interest rate is 8.29%.
Attached Drawings 3: General Layout of Track Maintenance Workshop of Lahore Cant (machinery)
4) Inspect and repair drive and driven shafts and gears of chain scraper conveyor, replace components and parts which are seriously worn.
(AW4): M4 = 266.138 t/train
① The production organization has corporate capacity, business license and tax registration;
05J909-LD16-ground 13A
(1) Construction delay due to the repurchaser's noncompliance;
d) Concession use: permission given to the products of which the use or release fails to meet the specified requirements.
The system supports addition and maintenance of expert information to ensure quick acquisition of expert suggestions in emergency event.
Intercom operation includes the driver-to-passenger intercom.
Figure 8-2-1b Standard Cross Section of Single-track Cutting
197.5m (berths 7 - 8, total length 395m)
Nine core technologies are fully mastered, including car system integration, car body, bogie, traction transformer, traction converter, traction motor, traction control, network control and braking.
According to the division of responsibilities and leaderships' instructions, the General Affairs and Human Resources Department will deliver the List of Supervised Matters (see Annex 1) to the relevant departments of the Company, and also copy to the General Manager and leaders in charge of the Company.
If any abnormalities, which endanger the safety of personnel and equipment, are found in the production process, the Accountable Manager has the right to stop executing the process.
Most mineral resources of Nasarawa have not been developed.
5 Different opinions about test report should be reported to this test agency within 15 days from the date of receiving the test report, the overdue request will not be processed.
Fire Emergency Lighting and Evacuate Indicating System GB17945-2010
During the freezing period, our company actively communicates with highway traffic police department, highway department, etc. to establish a joint mechanism, and implement the mechanism of patrol inspection at staggered hours to ensure round-the-clock inspection. Our company also strengthens contact with governments and emergency departments at all levels to ensure smooth information communication, information sharing and normal contact with all parties.
Based on the calculation result, it can be known that, under the conditions of AW4 no-load, 675 V grid voltage at traction, 675 V grid voltage at braking and 1/4 momentum loss:
F. Besides the above-mentioned requirements, the fundamental tests shall comply with the requirements of relevant specifications.
Accumulated profit (loss to be listed with "-")
In the second design liaison meeting, the Seller shall, based on the Technical Specification of the contract document, provide the Buyer with all materials required for design and service for review and confirmation. These materials shall include but be not limited to the following main items:
In accordance with the provisions of No. 10 Document related to preparation depth of investment estimate.
to form the overall ecological space pattern of one continent, two wedges, multiple corridors and multiple patches, and the large-scale ecological oasis supported by the Chaobai River and Grand Canal basins.
The power supply of three-phase five-wire TN-S system shall be adopted.
For multiple sets of documents in one set of application procedures that requires seal , seal name and quantity required for all the materials shall be specified in the main content column on the Form, if the column is not completed, the seal supervisor has the right to return.
Inform relevant person for inspection and acceptance and make strength test record.
In the scheme, one lifting eye shall be arranged on the column top of each structure, and each lifting eye will be provided with one TJJ-600 hydraulic lifter with the rated lifting capacity of 60t.
Grooving and laying of protection pipes of primary and secondary cables
Lower than 0.3%, which only refers to absorption rate on the surface of exposed aggregate
The inspection of safety and civilization (for environmental protection) is divided into daily inspections, periodic inspections, irregular inspections, special inspections and quarterly inspections. Relevant evidence of inspections shall be kept.
The mechanical strength of pantograph will not be excessively affected by corrosion effect under all load conditions.
Three-storey elevated station in the middle of the elevated road, standard side type; no sidings
The responsibilities, development, implementation, and management of traffic control measures and command systems of the system will be clearly defined and documented.
(5) Supports of the overhead contact system should be arranged on the decks and transversely erected over the intermediate web plate. Their specific positions and structures are detailed in the relevant drawings of overhead contact system discipline. Notice should be paid to pre-burying relevant members during construction of girder.
The basis of safety management of the Project mainly includes:
Assessment and related decisions concerning construction quality and contract implementation (attachments are applicable in case of a lot of contents.)
In the past 5 years, 15 ground-breaking financial institutions have been set up, with the most complete categories.
In unpacking, the equipment drawings, specifications and other data (excluding the packing list) accompanying the box shall be handed over to the data management department of the owner along with a detailed list signed by both sides.
8. Lockable manholes shall be supplied by the tank manufactures. The elastic non-toxic foaming material shall be embedded between the manhole cover and the cover frame for sealing. The air pipe shall be elbow air pipe with intermediate filtering layer. See the detailed construction method in Standard Collective Drawings 02S403-P98, 99.
The position and elevation of the framework shall be measured according to the foundation plane design drawing, the axis stakes of the civil construction site and the specified bench mark, and shall be consistent with the elevation of the building.
Direct external sponsorship and donations of any subordinate organization of CR5 are not allowed.
The installation of lighting equipment shall ensure unified lighting level. The light shall be soft, bright and even to avoid dazzling light from impairing passenger's eyesight;
The total amount to be paid (the amount shall be renewed when Ticket type, class and quantity changes).
Qualification: Obtained CNAS, covering the EN 13749, EN 12663-1 and UIC 615-4 strength test qualifications.
4- Auxiliary transformer cabinet; 5- Exhaust opening of machinery room; 6- Air inlet of cooling tower
System monitoring terminal can be used for local and remote monitoring on various working conditions of the power supply devices (including DC power supply and UPS) at each station/section and dispatching command center and the discharge of battery, and will give an alarm timely in case of any fault.
The short-period overload is allowed. The reactive power compensation capacity of overload of the device is 120% of the rated capacity of the device. The protective shutdown is engaged in 2s since the overload begins. The device can keep running at a load 1.1 time of the rated capacity for 3 minutes, and then the alarm is triggered.
The Supplier shall actively enhance the communication with the Purchaser and establish the consciousness of serving the Purchaser. If requested otherwise by the Purchaser, the Supplier shall go to all lengths to offer services.
Figure 4-4 Concrete Pouring Speed of Spaces
6. Experiment results of mechanical properties for welding joints of tie rod of reinforced bar must be in line with regulation of welding specification.
The Deputy Project Manager and Chief Engineer are responsible for coordinating the Project Manager for safety management of the Project, arranging safety measures, and implementing safety handling schemes and methods of reward and punishment.
A fire water tank shall be provided on the top of comprehensive maintenance center of depot so as to supply water for the preliminary fire fighting before the fire hydrant pump starts.
Auman BJ5313GJB-AA
2007.07-2009.09Operator in maleic anhydride workshop of auxiliary agent plant of Lanzhou Petrochemical Company
Originating from Sanglakh Mountain,72 km from west of Kabul, Kabul River flows to the east passing through Kabul and Jalalabad, after flowing north to the Pakistan at the Khyber Pass, it passes through Peshawar and merges into the Indus River at west Islamabad, and the total length of Kabul River is about 700 km.，.
• Be responsible for developing the occupational health hazards monitoring plan.
Running kilometrage (km) after new manufacture, overhaul or unwheeling repair
All departments and rooms of organ, branches, project management department:
5.10.1 Foundation Treatment, Checking Calculation, and Support Erection
Biggest principal tensile stress t1<[Ctp-2], and set the web bar only in accordance with the structure is allowable.
After the beam and the traverse shifting device are fixed, the beam is moved transversely to the installation position of the other line.
b. Select qualified machine-made ordinary shale bricks as per design requirements and wet bricks in appropriate water volume, otherwise the wall will be not clean and mortar joint will be not smooth.
Construction Supervision of Expanding and Reconstruction of Kunming Hub of the Rebuilt Railway/CREEC (Chengdu) Consulting and Supervision Co. Ltd.
Positions held: Senior Engineer, Railway Engineering and Operation Expert
Ground Fissure Treatment Project in LK0+25~LK0+61 Section
Carry out disclosures at all levels to ensure practical implementation of the plan after the plan is determined.
(1) There are no effective production measures for finished products in the process of construction.
The Project Management Team shall follow the Site Materials Management Procedure of the Project Management Team for the site management, protection and warehousing management of building materials, members, fittings and equipment.
The survey conducted at this stage is for feasibility study. The Owner is CCECC (Nigeria), and the survey and design party is China Railway Siyuan Survey and Design Group Co., Ltd (Siyuan for short).
11. The water at the culvert position is not erosive to the concrete structure.
After the accounts receivable was due, Suning Purchasing Center did not pay off the due accounts receivable, and Zhibao Company failed to pay the factoring financing principal amounting to RMB 60 million and interest amounting to RMB 2.97 million or buy back the accounts receivable according to the contract.
Graduated from civil engineering specialty of Inner Mongolia University Of Science and Technology in 2008
The shallow-buried section of the entry at DK143+950–DK144+045 and the shallow-buried section of the exit at DK149+780–DK149+810 shall be subject to surface settlement observation. The longitudinal spacing of such observation points for surface settlement shall be in accordance with the requirements of Table 4.3.1 of Technical Specification for Monitoring Measurement of Railway Tunnel.
(3) Job seekers: With the increase of investment projects in the areas along the line, the demand for labor will increase greatly, which will increase employment opportunities in the areas along the line.
a. Wipe the surface of the full length of the expansion joints and the power supply rail covers of about 30cm in length at both ends by using dry rag. Clear the dust and carbon deposit from the surface of the rail cover as much as possible;
⑤ The following anti-interference measures shall be taken for the layout of receiving lines, transmission lines and other lines of frequency shift track circuits
Diameter at breast height: 12cm; height: 700cm-800cm; crown breadth: 350cm-400cm, with pleasing tree shape;
5.1.3Prior to the construction, caulking materials shall be subject to on-site technological test to verify and improve the properties of as well as construction technologies, equipment and organization for caulking materials, of which the application effect shall pass the acceptance by the client and the supervision firm.
In June 2018, a PSEEZ team went to CACC to listen to the scheme report and reached an agreement on the scale of the project which serves as the basis for preparation of this feasibility study report.
The vibration and noise generated by urban rail transit trains during operation have seriously affected the surrounding residents and environment.
The system log documents shall be stored for at least 90 days and shall provide users with a visual query interface to query log information.
Code for Seismic Design of Buildings (GB50011-2010);
Daya Bay Petrochemical Industrial Park Management Service Center
5) When performing patrol inspection on outdoor high-voltage equipment in thunderstorm weather, staff shall not approach lightning rods and lightning arresters.
2) Vertical power factor for main beam of the train is calculated as per provisions of the Code for Design of High Speed Railway (TB10621-2014).
The staff dining hall is located on the west side of the office building to ensure that in prevailing wind direction seasons, discharge of oil fumes from the dining hall will not affect the office and other public environments, and the staff dining hall is close to the staff living quarters for convenient dining.
The preparation methods of some engineering drawings are as follows:
President (Dean): Zeng Fanhui(signature)
Since local cement can meet the requirements of engineering structure, and requirements of house building and bridge through the experiment, cement used for station yard will be procured locally.
FFS= estimated value of free flow speed (km/h);
To promote the construction of the urban Integrated underground Pipe Rack in the province during the period of the "13th Five-year Plan" in a scientific, overall and orderly way, Anhui Urban Construction Design Institute Corp. Ltd. has prepared the 13th Five-year Construction Planning of Urban Integrated underground Pipe Rack of Anhui Province under the entrustment of Anhui Provincial Department of Housing and Urban-Rural Development.
(4) The base plates of SCS elements are poured in prefabrication yard on Guishan, and the remaining concrete pouring construction is performed on outfitting wharf. The quantity of dredging in transport navigation channel is relatively small, and SCS elements after base plate pouring maintain a small deformation in transportation.
3) the throat areas at the west and east ends of Chhapargauri Station (59+578 and 60+634 respectively): 1 THDS machine room respectively,2 in total, with an area of 4.8X3㎡ (axis area);
For instance, fuel fees, maintenance expenses and insurance expenses of the airplanes and ships and so forth.
See Table 3.2-4 and Figure 4-2 for the Project passing through Xialei Nature Reserve.
The intermediate control points are Neitun Terminal Interchange, Xuanjie Village, Agricultural Sightseeing Eco-Tourism Planning Area of Xuanjie Village, Fuxin Township, Tiandeng County, Heishui River in Bangtun, National Highway G359, Guichun River in Shuolong, Detian (Daxin)-Huashan (Ningming) Highway, etc.
The gas cylinder shall be managed in line with the Temporary Regulations on Safety Management of Construction Gas Cylinder;
Jiangxi Fifth Construction Group Co., Ltd. (affixed with official seal)
The brushing shall be finished by two steps. First, the coating with the thickness of about 0.2mm shall be applied on the base surface by a flat plate; the metal serrated plate shall be used for the second scraping and brushing within 1-2 hours.
Pr - receiving sensitivity at the end of life of optical detector (dBm, taken as -25 dBm);
Meanwhile, Zhoucheng is the representative bases for the inheritance and spread of tie-dye artistry of Bai Nationality. Tie-dye skill in Zhoucheng is famous around the world.
The sizes and positions of seats, handrails and handles are designed in accordance with the body shapes of local people by taking into full account of human engineering to bring comfortable and safe riding experience to passengers.
Management of liquid and gas emission pollution from construction machineries;
It presents the landform of undulating deserts, oases, depressions, slopes, and rocky hills (see Figure 3.1-1).
The total installed capacity of electrical equipment is about 23.0MW.
Number of GPS 3D baseline vectors =205
34 i 1.97 11.16
a) The aluminum alloy or other materials will be adopted for inner wall panels, and be divided for optimization and reducing joints.
6.1.5 Testing of the Earth Resistance The Test shall be conducted by the personnel with the qualification for earth resistance testing.
(2) The repair cost of main materials, such as used rails, should be charged as 20% of the unit price of the materials.
9.5.4 The sand for super-fine sand concrete shall be river sand with the fineness modulus of 0.7-1.5, and be free of mud block.
Error of centerline and centerline offset: 10mm;
The parking brake must be able to lock the working components with pure mechanical device to let the vehicel park at slope, even without driver in the vehicle.
In which the security check system includes security check instrument, security door, hand-held metal detector, explosion-proof carpet and explosion-proof tank, etc.
(1) All reinforcements shall be manufactured according to the drawings.
Put forward the dewatering method and provide main hydrogeological parameters of the aquifer and absolute elevation of the design water level;
In addition, the CRRC ZELC will try to sign contracts with IRIS certified sub-contractors.
C25 prefabricated reinforced concrete cover plate, 100 thick
Playing mode includes real time broadcasting and prerecord video.
④ In rainy days, and when the ground is slippery, the wheel kiln shall be equipped with tire chains.
If the adjuster works well, the piston travel shall become longer the first time it is braked and basically restore to initial travel the second time it is braked (the deviation shall be not more than 10mm).
4. Work division of operators: Operators ① , ② and ③ are mainly responsible for all inspection operations. For details of work division, refer to the operation steps.
Guardrails shall be erected at edges of stairways and rest platforms.
HVAC engineering: Three air conditioning companies are formulating schemes which are anticipated to submit in 2 weeks and unified invitation to quotation can be conducted after the confirmation of the scheme.
Waterproof boards shall be made of EVA and 1.5mm in thickness; the weight of geotextiles shall be ≥300g/m2; waterproof boards and non-woven fabrics shall be provided separately.
The rearview module is used to connect the rearview cameras on both sides of the cab,.
The panel is pasted with PC film. There is a handle and two fixing bolts on the panel. There is an alarm indicator light, communication indicator light, a low frequency indicator light, four carrier frequency information (1700, 2000, 2300 and 2600) indicator lights and -1 and -2 carrier frequency type indicator lights.
Project quality: the quality of the main works has zero defect, the service life of bridge concrete is not less than 100 years and the qualified rate of one-time acceptance for unit works is 100%; the infrastructure shall reach the design speed target value, successfully opened at one time. High-level and above construction quality accidents shall be not allowed and common accidents shall be reduced.
(2) Supports shall have sufficient bearing capacity, rigidity and stability, so as to bear the dead load and lateral pressure of the newly poured concrete reliably as well as the load produced in construction.
3. Party B shall make every effort to take reasonable measures to prevent the above secrets of Party A from spreading or disclosure, in a cautious and honest manner.
Under strong erosion and chemical weathering, the strata exposed to the ground and the rocks in the valley are decomposed into coarse grained and gravelly soil.
15.5.5.2.The Tenderer shall arrange the personnel of the Tenderee to visit the factory for the productions of the following important components: motor, vehicle body, bogie, brake system, door system, VVVF inverter & control system, auxiliary power supply system, air-conditioning and its control system, train information management system, etc.
Properly implement the traffic safety measures especially under severe weather conditions such as sand storm, rain, snow and storm wind, as well as under debris flow and road collapse.
Before construction in rainy season, comprehensive inspection shall be conducted for all warehouses, power transformation and distribution rooms, equipment, machines and tools and materials sheds, dormitories in living areas (including electrical wiring). Reinforcing and leak repairing shall be conducted if necessary. Dangerous building must be handled timely.
Sudden start-up of the equipment may cause personal injury
Party B shall provide a VAT invoice approved by the national tax department with the amount equivalent to the Contract Price within 7 days from the date of delivery.
7) Molded case circuit breakers with motor protection properties shall be used for outgoing circuit of motor, and meet the requirement on time limit of protective operation of upper and lower level.
each 15 min within the following 90 min.
4.2.2 Laws, Regulations and Compliance Obligations
2. Retaining wall and anchor columns shall be casted in place with C30 concrete from bottom to top by segments. The retaining walls shall be embedded 0.7m below the platform.
Maximum value of force required to open the door manually≤133 N
When the direction selection switch is not at "0", the key switch will not reset to "OFF";
We will establish an engineering quality assurance system for which the Project Department is responsible level upon level, with quality control responsibility for each post being definite, so as to carry out whole process control on engineering quality and ensure the realization of quality objectives.
The emergency supplies such as eye washers, clean water and respirators shall be prepared at the operation site.
Progress Group will stay at the construction site around the clock and they will perform the following duties:
Prior to concrete casting and vibrating, set up the bar chair specially for the pedestrians. The operators shall not stand or work on the rebars(especially for the plate rebars).
The stabling yard of the starting station is led from the Serian Station and is located on the north side of the station. The current status of the site is green land and the planned area is 6 hectares.
After the conditions permit production, product performance assessment will be conducted depending on the assessed product structure and melting site. If the performance of the contract equipment and the product performance assessment meet the requirements, the equipment acceptance certificate shall be signed by both parties.
(1) The landforms and features of the Site, including sub-surface conditions;
The steel structures with the surfaces not subject to anti-corrosion treatment include the finished products, the semi-finished products and raw materials.
(2) Each asset is needed a separate negotiation with the customer, and the parties have been able to accept or reject the contract terms pertinent to each asset;
HRB335 ribbed steel bars is used as the main bar. If the main bar has welded joints during construction, vertical machining shall be carried out for the main bar since the ratio of minimum stress and maximum stress ρ ≤ 0.5 when the filling is less than 3m high from the slab top to the bottom of the rail.
c) When CPU detects that the input voltage returns to the specified voltage range, it releases the IGBT pulse control signal to start SIV.
All workers employed by the construction team shall be filed in the Project Management Department, and registered to record their IDs, professional certificate number, labor contract number, performance and credit.
Engineering, procurement and construction general contracting (EPC)
Pouring shall be carried out horizontally in layers, in sections in inclined segments, in full section in the transverse direction of bridge (to eliminate settlement evenly), and in a continuous way from the lower end to the higher end in the longitudinal direction of the bridge.
The on-board video surveillance system has 1 camera in each cab for monitoring the status of the train track, and 1 infrared camera for monitoring the driver's cab. Two cameras are installed in each saloon to monitor the activity of passengers in real time.
Damage of the primary ecosystem by occupation of forest land and temporary land use by the Project
2.5.1.2.3 Construction Method of Stone-Filled Subgrade
Piping of the test run flow is rinsed or blew prior to the test run.
It is strictly prohibited to use the window frame and sash as the supporting point of the scaffold to prevent from any damage causing by the bumping of the scaffolding board.
Sichuan Provincial Transport Department Highway Planning, Survey, Design and Research Institute
Underframe floor assembly AJC1019112A
The pipe laying vessel moves to the original pipe abandoning position under the guidance of a GPS. The buoy at towrope end of abandoned pipe head shall be picked up and connected with the towrope of A/R winch, which passes stinger and operating line;
When the surface temperature of the batteries or packs is up to 80±5°C, the fire inhibitors shall be sprayed automatically/manually within 0-10s
At the same time, prepare the blank solution with the same batch of water, 65% ethanol and normal hexane and conduct the following tests.
d. When the wall is longer than 5m or twice the storey height, constructional columns shall be added in the wall section with the spacing not more than 4m;
Date of filing: May 20, 2016
Standard for Daylighting Design of Buildings (GB50033-2013);
3.2.3.1 Construction Method of Asphalt Prime Coat
Width of steel box girders of Crossing Ya 13-1 Gas Field Pipe Bridge is 33.1m and track pitch is 17m. Refer to Figure 3-5-10 for arrangement of bridge inspection vehicles.
Mc = 50.8 tT = 45.6 t
Reply to the Environmental Impact Report for the Changes of the New Shijiazhuang-Jinan Railway Passenger Dedicated Line issued by the Ministry of Environmental Protection on February 11, 2014 (HS [2014] No.23);
Table D.0.2 Activity Degree of Sand Dunes and Sand Land
The purpose of water supply flow control is to supply water at a certain speed into boiler so as to supplement steam output and remain stable water level for the steam drum.
Shenzhen is a pioneer in China's green development.
Figure 9.4.1 - 1 Current Situation of AK1 + 735 Existing Arch Bridge ( I )
(1) Clean all air pipes and check whether there is sand hole before pipe installation.
Environmental and safety management personnel are responsible for formulating the accident reporting system, and all construction participants are responsible for organizing all personnel for training and strictly abide by the system.
These commodities are mainly exported to the UK, Kenya, Switzerland, Holland, South Africa, Belgium, Hong Kong, Germany, , and other countries.
The Buyer will evaluate the cost of these deviations or defects on his own to ensure that all bid documents are fairly compared.
On the aspect of personnel, technology and experience, etc, CEPRI has the capacity for carrying out the key equipment development of supervoltage series capacitor as well as the siting research of demonstration project.
1. Collective Drawings: See Collective Drawings G9-30SQF for details
When vehicles enter the urban area, the tires and outer enclosure of the vehicles shall be washed with water, so as not to pollute the urban roads.
The network of the SVT issuing system is isolated from other networks through firewalls to ensure SVT fabrication safety.
6) Inspect whether the collector head can rotate freely;
After initial support of tunnel excavation is completed and measurement data is converged, the construction of secondary lining must be carried out in a timely manner.
Standards EN 50121-3-2 2015, IEC 60068-2-30-2005, IEC 60068-2-38-2009
Before installing the casting, the gap between the two rail heads shall be 24-27 mm.
Sinotrans enjoys a good reputation and brand awareness in the industry, owns experienced and high-quality management personnel and employees, and strives to meet the objective of becoming the world's leading shipping company by enhancing the enterprise governance and management system and boosting our operation capacity and profitability continuously.
Zone control and group control shall be adopted in stores and public houses.
The Project Department shall establish a directory of construction drawings, design change, project technical negotiation documents and other documents related to the project.
Laying 4 layers of roofing felt (or bitumen felling) glued together with bitumen
2. The transhipment station set in the original Muang Kasi Station is adjusted to be in Luang Prabang Station. According to the scale of the station yard and the arrangement of the beam yard, the installation of the transhipment station base is considered comprehensively. Due to the close proximity to the source of sand and gravel, the prefabrication cost of sleepers is expected to be reduced by RMB 20.03 million Yuan.
5. Before casting the cast-in-place concrete layer of bridge deck, the beam top surface shall be roughed and washed so as to ensure good bonding between the new and old concrete.
An incentive and restrictive mechanism is strengthened, methods of performance rating and reward and punishment are established, and management personnel of the Project Department are organized regularly to check work quality, to find out problems and deficiencies.
Endpoint equipment shall detect and recover all transport and session failures.
The entry mileage of the tunnel is DK245+170 and the exit mileage is DK248+540, with a total length of 3,370m.
2.5.4.3.2. Main Construction Methods and Technical Requirements
The COC freight charge of the 45-foot calorstat for return trip is charged by collecting additional USD 3,100 per container (including fuel bills for 1 container) on the basis of the freight (including the price of container) for 40-foot common container (COC).
To prevent the pore collapse, the laying speed of the vibroflotation head should be fast as 1 ~ 2m / min.
Test condition B: keep wheels 1, 3, 5 and 7 at the same height, and elevate wheels 2, 4, 6 and 8 higher than wheels 1, 3, 5 and 7 for 60, 53, 8 and 0mm.
(3) Further supplement and improve the relevant information to ensure the integrity, authenticity and accuracy of the information.
Sound-proof fire door shall be adopted for air conditioner room and other equipment rooms.
CPECC will promptly inform the Owner of any actual or potential deviations from these requirements.
External power grid, power supply panel, signal, turnout, track, section, console, etc.
5. Administration Department and IT Team calculate network environment and development equipment for basic businesses of the company and purchase the equipment, contact construction team to restore for the company.
Other test conditions required on the construction site: according to relevant regulations of Qingdao.
1 receiving-depature track shall be added for the connection of Isiolo – Nairobi section with Nairobi South Station in the initial stage.
The sliding surface of the sliding bearing shall be cleaned and lubricated.
Stability Analysis Results for Temporary and Permanent Side Slopes at Portals of KG _ TELUT _ TUNNEL _ 2 Tunnel
See 1.2 in 0207A01254 General Technical Specification for Motor Car of ZET1603 Project.
4.Article 3.3.2 of the Contract is revised as follows:
Set-up of the stations and authorized areas: set-up of the attributes and security level of the stations and authorized areas.
The non-metal distance under the electromagnetic sleeper in X direction of the electromagnetic sleeper shall be 210mm.
E95 is now a two-way four-lane road with a subgrade width of 28.5m and a design speed of 100km/h. The route within the crossing range is straight in plane and gentle in longitudinal slope, meeting the setting conditions for interchange.
· Strength indicators of weld joints (N/mm2)
① Major and medium bridges: Form bored pile foundation by drilling and grouting with mud and pour underwater concrete on site.
As the implementation subject of the project, each member of the safety self-control system plays a major role in safety control.
Human Resource Management Procedures XD / XKYX-QZB-0519 (Seventh Edition) -2017
Where the Tenderer is to install video decoding chip behind on-board display screen, the Tenderer shall perform modular design separately to prevent mutual impact of information screen and decoding chip during repair or replacement, and shall offer quotation separately for decoding chip and display screen.
Technical Code for Steel Structure of Light-weight Buildings with Gabled Frames
Employer: Gage (Chongqing) Technologies Co., Ltd.
Pressure Vessel Manufacturing,Installation, Modification and Maintenance Manual
Moreover, the structure of skew inlet and outlet is complex, and reinforcement shall be provided there. It is inconvenient for construction and will extend the construction period.
In case of normalizing treatment, re-heating can not be carried out before the rail welding joint temperature drops below 500℃. For rail head the surface heating temperature shall not exceed 950℃ and for the rail bottom the surface heating temperature shall not exceed 820℃.
Protect the scene in case of any accident, perform rescue immediately to ensure state property and personal safety and immediately report to the superior without concealing.
(2) The construction clearance of the sectional shield tunnel is ø5200mm.
4.1.2 Make decision for major issues on safety and environmental protection, propose rectification measures, supervise and inspect the implementation of rectification measures on safety and environmental protection of the relevant departments.
The requirements of the ascetics like personnel's qualification, skill and experience at each phase;
The platforms for passenger service are connected with an over-line bridge.
5. In case of blowout, please organize operators on duty to control the wellhead according to the contingency plan; when the shift is not on duty, please organize all staff of the shift to arrive well site and follow arrangement of the floor manager to participate into the work of rescue team.
Be responsible for the internal audit planning and the plan preparation of the measurement management system, and is responsible for the implementation.
The seating structure is easy for cleaning and maintenance, and the seating surface color scheme shall be submitted to State of Sabah Railway Administration, and the surface finishing and inner panel and floor covering should be coordinated.
All formal communication between NIDCO and the DBOM Contractor will be though the PMG.
Note: hoisting sequence: hoisting in each area shall be successively conducted from bottom to top.
② Reliable grounding: when the ground body is fabricated, its resistance should be tested in dry whether so as to secure good quality of the ground body.
2.3 The control cabinet of pregnant solution delivery pump is a complete set and it shall be installed in a splicing manner.
5.4 Do not park in idling status on the plant site.
Embankment subgrade bed is not allowed to be filled with saline soil.
When the service life of train expires, the remaining useful life of structural component and safety system shall be determined.
After completion of accident handling, the competent department shall write a summary report, which will includes details of the accident, rising reasons of the accident, handling process, experience and lessons, casualty and loss of personnel, direct and indirect economic loss of the accident, list of personnel receiving rewards or punishments and then submit it to the relevant superior department and keep in the archives of the company for filing.
5. Minutes of the Closing Meeting on Halite Test Section of Friendship Tunnel on February 20, 2019
(2) Modulation within a mode will be limited by acceleration.
Start removal of the mold 5min after pouring. Remove the crucible and the slag pan as well as the lateral mold clamp, plywood and metal base slab. Cut the top of the weld head with hot cutting chisel and put it into the shovel. Clean the rail top surface, the lateral sealant and install the weld shearing machine.
the base course made up of cement, lime and fly ash not only improves the strength in early period, but also mitigates reflection crack, but requires high degree of construction control.
Rut depth, Undulations, Shoving: Measured with a ruler and straight edge placed perpendicularly across lane; rut depth measured as space between straight edge and lowest point of rut, using a small ruler with scale in cm.
Supervised and Prepared by Jiangxi Province Traffic Construction Engineering Quality Supersion Administration
A prescribed warning sign is attached to the vehicle and is permanently readable.
The Employer shall perform other obligations to be performed by it as agreed in the Special Conditions.
Refer to Section 4.2 and Section 4.3 of the Report for details of relevant technical requirements for coarse and fine aggregates.
After receiving the new information asset, the Information Asset Manager will identify the information asset according to the information asset category and the standard for determination.
The shadow price coefficient of fixed assets investment is determined to be 1.0.
The Tenderer shall ensure that the documents have been understood and implemented in the organizations of each level.
GB/T 25117.3-2010 Railway Applications - Rolling Stock - Part 3: Combined Testing of Alternating Current Motors Fed by an Indirect Converter and Their Control System.
Timely inspection will be conducted during the implementation process to ensure the effective implementation of such scheme and clarification. Any problem found out will be rectified timely and re-inspected. Relevant safety records will be kept.
Note: Anti-seismic supports and hangers shall be constructed according to the following requirements and Code for Seismic Design of Mechanical and Electrical Equipment (GB50981-2014);
Cross section size of the main structural element of logistic staff office
During production, hands and heads are not allowed to put into the mixer to avoid being hurt. While feeding materials, no person shall stand within operating radius of the pullshovel to avoid being hurt.
Main design contents: set 2.0m wide berm at the immersed embankment protection elevation and the part under the protection elevation shall be filled with permeable soil. The side slope under the protection elevation shall be provided with protection made of M10 cement mortar rubble. The total length will be 80m.
Q/SHJQS204-2012 Control Procedure on Occupational Health and Safety and Environment Management Plan
7.3.4.2 Participants in such reviews shall include representatives of functions concerned with the design and development stage(s) being reviewed.
Acting as frame and support of framework, profiled bars and pipes shall meet the requirements of relevant technical specifications.
In case of a single fault of a subcomponent system, the fault diagnosis system shall carry out a comprehensive evaluation for the fault according to the fault conditions of the whole train and the degree of impact of such fault on the train operation, and then output the train fault level and give proper emergency guidance.
4.12.1 Signboards shall be provided at the project site,.
Rong Sheng Xiangxie Lanting (DXC-008 Plot in New Passenger Station Area)
The Standard is applicable to the employees' labor protection supervision work of the operation and maintenance project of PowerChina International Group Limited.
Through QC team activities, further strengthen the awareness of all the staff members to participating in quality work and form a quality management network with top-to-bottom lines and transverse net.
The maximum design operation speed of trains on the main line is 160km/h.
Anyone taking improper measures or measures violating rules for emergencies or faults.
Smoking is prohibited in case of preparing or extraction of inflammables. Cotton yarn and cloth for drying hands immersed into boiled oil, varnish and oil cannot be thrown at will.
4.1.5.4 Control Scheme for Air Speed Field and Temperature Field
(2) Culvert layout: The culvert is of 1-2.0m aperture, and is set orthogonally.
Figure 3.4 Asphalt Modification Equipment on Construction Site
│ │ │ │ │ └─7-12 corrected CPI93 (56706.9-60400)
Bill of Quantities and Content of Standard Drawings for Outdoor Water Supply and Drainage
Figure 7.12.1-1 Diagram of Steel-edge Rubber Waterstop Overlap
The connecting frame is made of aluminum profile through welding, with surface coating.
TSZ (thermal spray zinc), aluminium spray and the treatment to steel surface shall reach level Sa3 as regulated in GB/T8923;
Matters not mentioned shall be constructed and accepted strictly according to relevant national procedures and specifications.
Φ50 type of other type of immersion vibrator shall be adopted. If necessary, Φ30 immersion vibrator shall be used in dense area full of steel bars.
The pillar pad is welded in the structure to form the rigid frame unit, and the perpendicularity and the elevation are met;
Develop scientific and reasonable implementing rules for general contracting management, effectively implement the management, coordination, cooperation and servicing of mechanical and electrical contracting and do well in the management and coordination of the unit, Supervisor, Owner and government departments.
The application of tied arch is helpful to effectively reduce the line elevation and bridge length.
Setting up of temporary drainage ditch and temporary sedimentation tank for water-related bridges (Longchanglang Major Bridge and Shuolong Guichun Major Bridge) crossing Xialei Nature Reserve and Huashan Scenic Area.
① As for business combination carried out by purchaser through one trade or transaction, the combination cost shall be the assets, occurred or assumed debts, and fair value of the issued equity securities which are paid by purchaser on the purchase day to get the sellers' control power.
Use the steel belt of the cable as the clip, and adopt the seaming method to fasten the clip. Two passes must be made to prevent the steel strip from loosening. The distance between the two clips is 15mm.
The automatic shrinking lifeline should be directly connected with the D-ring of the safety harness, and can only be used by one person at a time. Do not connect the automatic shrinking lifeline with the buffer.
Statistical result of bulky grain (40~80 mm)
0207A00212General Requirements and Technical Specification for RAMS of SA95NEL Supplier
During the construction process, due to the tight construction period, it is necessary to add a proper amount of setting enhancer.
[31] Study on Dynamic Calculation Method of Frame Prestressed Anchor Slope Support Structure [J]. Jianhua Dong, Yanpeng Zhu, Wei Ma. Engineering Mechanics. 2013(05)
Code for Indoor Environmental Pollution Control of Civil Building Engineering GB50325-2010
Construction should be organized in strict accordance with method statement during construction. Operation should be carried out as per operating procedures and standards. Construction scope should not be expanded at random.
The analysis of pre-financing indexes shows that all indexes are better than the industrial standards, indicating good pre-tax benefits.
If interface information is provided in general documents and the whole documents are attached behind IITF, IITF must at least point out the chapter and page numbers in the document that include the interface information and indicate with dot line on relevant pages.
② The appraisal contents for the monthly construction progress plan shall be reflected in the contract. If the monthly completion rate is below a certain percentage, a punishment may be imposed according to the percentage in the contract.
A total of 72.9 km of track has been laid for the mainline of the whole line, accounting for 17.2% of the design. A total of 3 km of track has been laid for station tracks, accounting for 3.1% of the design.
The technical report shall become valid after being signed by the preparing, checking, reviewing, and approving personnel.
Jun. 1989 – Mar. 1999: Manufacturing Engineer in No. 13 (Turbine Components) Workshop of Chengdu Engine (Group) Co., Ltd.
- Extended service, such as ordered shuttle service, tourism, hotel, food ordering and e-commerce
3) Impact on test period and test cost.
Bill of Quantity of Sidespan Linear Segment Support (1 No.) for 100m-span Continuous Girder
(1) EN 12663-1-2010+A1-2014 Railway Applications - Structural Requirements of Railway Vehicle Bodies - Part 1: Locomotives and Passenger Rolling Stock (and Alternative Method for Freight Wagons);
The contents of Lot ZH-3 of Handan-Jinan Railway Capacity Expansion and Reconstruction Project include: subgrade works, bridge works, track works, civil works of comprehensive sections, housing, station and yard works, and communication, signaling, electricity and electrification works. All of them have been completed on schedule and passed the completion acceptance. Details of the completion acceptance of the project are as follows:
2. The exit section of portal is subgrade, the portal mileage is CH394+457, and the tunnel-embankment boundary is at CH394+457.
Summary of Quantities of Sidewalk Guardrails at 22#~27# Piers
The areas along the line are under the governance of Dornogovi Province. Dornogovi Province is located in the southeast of Omnogovi Province, bordering China in the south. Most of which are Gobi, desert and grassland, and there are quite a few villages and towns along the little.
(4) Arrangement of construction site at the portal and excavation of access roads shall not influence the stability of side and heading slopes of the tunnel, and mass excavation shall be avoided.
(4) Adhere to quality standards, strict inspection and data-based decision.
The traffic investigation of the Project includes collecting observed traffic data of the relevant highways over the years, performing OD investigation of the relevant highways and the 24-hour observation of the traffic volume of the relevant highway cross-sections.
2. The sympathy fee shall be applied for by the department in charge，and the application shall be verified by the General Affairs and Human Resource Department and reviewed by the leader of the Department in charge.Then, after the General Manager examines and approves the application，the General Affairs and Human Resource Department and the Planning and Finance Department shall handle relevant procedures in a unified manner.
Figure 5-2-6 Lightning Protector for Home Signal
The Chairman shall set up posts reasonably to ensure that the personnel ability meets the job requirements, adopt effective ways and methods for improvement, and ensure that the knowledge, skills, quality awareness of the personnel are appropriate to the job responsibilities.
Once the Board decides to resume operations, the administrative representative shall notify the contractor to return to the offshore work site immediately.
2. The above-mentioned documents are mutually supplementary and explanatory. In case of any ambiguity or discrepancy, the document of the highest priority in the order as specified in the Contract Agreement shall prevail.
2. Calculation parameters of outdoor air: (Chongqing Municipality)
Within the survey area, the topographic relief is gentle. The surface overburden is composed of gravelly soil, completely-weathered basalt and the bed rock is composed of Tertiary (N1a) basalt.
Integrated Service Center, Science Internet Department, Safety and Quality Department and other relevant departments are responsible for determining and providing the corresponding operation sites and facilities to create a good working environment, including:
1. This Project refers to plant construction project of Chaoqun Food (Wuhan) Co., Ltd..
Before mortar application, the stone shall be watered so that the surface will absorb water properly; but no remaining water shall appear.
With the increase of traffic volume, the condition of the railway line is bound to further deteriorate, and the safe state cannot be maintained solely by maintenance. This will directly affect the transportation and production.
10.3.4 The Seller shall be liable for the implementation of the matters set forth in Article 10 "Shipment" of the Special Conditions of Contract and all the costs and expenses arising therefrom.
In addition, inspect the monitoring equipment and computer-based control system, such as the oxygen content analyzer (including probe) for heater, thermowell, vacuum gauge (including probe) and the like.
●The minimum impedance of filled sand between hydraulic cylinder and FRP sleeve is 25,000Ω /cm. The pH value and maximum chloride content are 6-8 and 200ppm respectively.
According to the site investigation, the highest water level of Lake Victoria was 1133.49m in the first 7 months of 2019.
The left and right doors can be opened and closed when the left and right doors are enabled.
Seal of Ningbo Traffic Construction Supervision Consulting Co., Ltd.
Flow: 2.5~3.6t/h, lift: 10~12m, power: 180w(220V)
Use a pneumatic grease injection gun to fill Mobilith SHC220 grease to the oil storage tank in the axle suspension bearing box until the grease reaches 1/3-2/3 volume of the tank as shown in Fig. 7.
For concrete structure in sulfate chemical attack environment, cement with low C3A content shall be adopted for the concrete, and the resistance coefficients of binder (for 56d) shall not be less than 0.8.
Project Department of Foshan West Station Comprehensive Supporting Facility Project of Fozhou – Zhaoqing Intercity Rail Transit of China Railway Urban Construction Group Co., Ltd. 2nd Engineering Co., Ltd.
The population affected by the Project will lose 0.46 mu of land per capita. Based on the local average output value of land, which is RMB 800 per mu, the average output value in 30 years is about RMB 11,000. Accordingly, the population affected by the Project can get land compensation of RMB 15,700 per capita, which is much higher than the replacement cost of affected land.
Case 3: Surface desilting of temporary cofferdam, remove the silt ≮8m beneath the riverbed;
Secondly, establish a rapid emergency information system, improve the existing discipline communication network of the Project Management Department for each discipline, configure fax machines and Internet terminals and establish communication links using public communication network.
● As for the measuring of coke cooling, coke heating and oxygen-enriching calcinated cake, hopper weighing sensor and computer system are integrated to constitute proportioning and charging control systems.
After completed box beam concrete, the concrete strength reaches 90% of the design value and the elastic modulus reaches 85% of the design value, with the age more than 5 days, then, prestressed steel strand tensioning can be carried out. 4 sets of 450t tensioning jack and the oil gauge must be inspected and calibrated before tensioning.
6. The parking brake can only be applied when the train speed is 0. When the parking brake is applied, the urgent brake will be applied at the same time
Once we win the tender and both parties sign the contract, we will make the following solemn commitment to the design cycle and construction period services:
Ensure safe and secure temporary houses on site. Temporary house construction meets the wind resistance, shockproof and lightning protection requirements.
Inspect the pressure between the contact strip and the contact wire frequently. After the contact strip is repaired, adjusted or replaced, re-determine and confirm that the contact pressure meets the relevant requirement.
The Iranianrailway dispatching center is at Tehran, which is responsible for dispatching between sections from Tehran to Qo 3 ,Qom to Esfahan. The private communication organize ispatching communication by adopting fixed users access switch ( FAS.
Debris flow: the loose residual slope deposits on the slopes are less distributed due to high mountains and steep slope. The catchment area of the slope surface is small and the debris flow of the proposed highway is small-scale and is mainly of non-viscous debris flow.
Protection grade: IP66 all-weather protective cover;
General circuit breaker and HSCB (high-speed circuit breaker)
The total personnel quota of the Project is 30, including 11 management personnel, 4 technicians and 15 operators.
The temperature of asphalt mixture is measured by inserted digital thermometer with metal probe, and the surface temperature can be measured by surface contact thermometer.
Tamp ecological bags to make bags at a level
Under the premise of meeting the requirements of the specification, the project optimizes each professional design and controls the cost of construction.
Meanwhile, the Vendor shall explain the reason why this standard can be taken as alternative standard.
3. Test specimens and samples of rock and soil shall be taken for exploration and the test requirements shall meet the regulations of 5.4.4.
The removed template shall be timely maintained and repaired, and uniformly coated with the separant.
Setting of measuring terminal: Please lead out a measuring terminal from the position which is corresponding to every line in the side wall in the vicinity of the depot;
The column is fixed by bolts with connectors.
Other solutions - clustered data channel:
p——number of vehicles passing the single lane per hour (Nr./h) (in the entrance direction: 20/h; in the exit direction: 30/h); when entrance/exit inspection devices with high degree of automation are adopted, the value shall be determined according to the condition of the specific device;
The insulation of pipeline and equipment shall be done only after a qualified anti-corrosion and hydraulic test. If the insulation work needs to be done first, the interfaces of pipelines shall be set aside, and then be insulated after a qualified hydraulic test.
Construction subcontractors, material suppliers and project team
Note: the above height direction dimensions refer to the height of the bogie above the rail surface in empty and new wheel conditions.
This User Manual applies to NCXM3D-2500 roller-type linear displacement transducer and its derivatives.
For graded broken stones, the maximum particle size shall not exceed 37.5mm (square hole sieve), the content of elongated and flaky particles shall not exceed 20%, and the crushing value shall not exceed 30%.
The construction of the next layer shall not be carried out before each compacted layer has been tested and reviewed by the Project Supervisor.
3.8 Water supply and discharge works: the water flow is smooth and the drainage pipeline is free of accumulated water;
(35) Code for Design of Steel Structures (GB50017-2003);
(3) Participating organizations: CCECC, CIECC and SDCF
The drawing force includes three parts: the soil weight on the top of the anchor beam G, the self weight of the anchor concrete, and the friction between the anchor beam and the soil. Therefore, the pulling resistance of the ground anchor is:
The implementation of the Project is bound to have an impact on the economic development of the region where the Project is located, and induce increased traffic volume in the Passage.
(3) The device system provided by the bidders shall completely meet the requirements in the bid package and be simultaneously deemed to meet the minimum requirements for system operation. Besides, the interconnection with existing systems shall be made available, and the bidders shall provide free supplements in case of any omission.
8.1.14.1 Signaling
The control box will prevent external foreign matters such as scrap iron from entering in the door opening/closing button.
In-depth safety inspection should be conducted frequently to learn about the safe production status, solve significant problems in safe production and eliminate potential safety hazards.
Fig. 1Schematic Diagram for Shape of Tensile Shear Joint Sample
2. This drawing is Standard Cross Section of Separated Subgrade. The subgrade is 11.50m wide.
6.7.1.3 The area where scaffolding shall be carried out shall be leveled and tamped manually prior to scaffolding. The foundation shall be placed with C20 concrete (1500 wide x 80 thick). Drainage ditches shall be constructed around the area.
At the start of overall design, ODI shall submit the design basis used for the overall design. During the overall design, it shall maintain and update it. And at the end of overall design, it shall submit the design basis used for basic design.
Technical Director: December 15, 2015
External coordination management includes the project coordination management procedures agreed with the Owner for the Project.
The dynamic load test equipment mainly includes: 30 X 941 type ultra-low frequency vibration pickups, 5 X amplifiers (each with 6 channels), 2 X KYOWA dynamic strain gauges, and an INV intelligent automatic signal acquisition, processing and analysis system.
Where: ——Point, OD sample enlargement coefficient of type k vehicle;
3) Operate with unified signals under command of dedicated personnel. Personnel working beneath shall go to a safe place.
Sediment: wave propagates slowly and attenuates sharply in sediment due to looseness of sediment. Therefore, sound velocity and vibration amplitude will decrease sharply where there are sediments.
a) Constant improvement of management mechanisms and processes related to international engineering products;
(10) Accomplish other related tasks as authorized by the project manager.
⑨-1 Sandstone (J/1):highly weathered (W3), auburnish yellow, highly weathered, arenaceous texture, medium thick stratified structure, argillaceous cementing, greatly developed joint fissure, rock core in broken shape of diameter 20~60mm and partially in soil shape, soft rock, broken by hands.
50 Selection, Use and Maintenance of Chemical Protective Clothing (AQ/T6107-2008)
The Company observes contracts, values credit, and deems that reputation is of the essence.
The insulation resistance of LV electrical equipment, of which, the rated AC voltage does not exceed 1,000 V, and the rated DC voltage does not exceed 1,500 V, or of circuits must not be lower than 2 M ohms (by 1,000 V megger);
Drawing No.: ABJCTSF(D) 011-
Therefore, the total ventilation volume of personnel in the tunnel is Q1=3X40X1.15=138m3/min.
The number of base concrete test blocks fabricated shall comply with the following requirements:
Direct cycle drilling method shall be adopted: while using a drill bit to drill a borehole, fill the borehole with slurry, and pump the slurry for cycling from the bottom to the surface, and discharge earth residues to the surface. Such slurry can protect the borehole walls, and is also the way for residue discharging.
(3) Basic reasons for selecting the best alternative (i.e. the sub-project).
No dumping method shall be used for construction to avoid separation of earth and rock, and filling shall be carried out in layers.
End equipment layout: Cameras are installed at the main entrances/exits of buildings, corridors, duty registration room, elevator atria, elevator cars, and on the main roads in the campus.
1The pneumatic pressure and suction caused by passing of trains shall consist of a 5m-long moving surface load of +q and a 5m-long moving surface load of-q.
It is allowable to adjust the in-vehicle air outlet, so as to ensure uniform air supply inside passenger compartment.
3.Organize test and preview for information security emergency strategies and contingency plans on a yearly basis.
Check the threaded connection and joint bearing, and replace the removed fasteners.
This is to certify that student Xing Tianqi, male, born on June 21, 1991, majoring in English (Business English) in our Sias University from September 2011 to July 2015, has completed all four-year undergraduate courses required by teaching plan with qualified results, and is hereby approved to graduate.
Negotiate with ICF to confirm the responsibilities of the general director
Subgrade and granular subbase shall be constructed manually with the help of machinery.
The management of boilers and other pressure vessels does not meet the requirements
When it is the time for three-year inspection of locomotive, the CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive will arrange and send the project team to the Employer's site for service and complete the maintenance/repair work.
Inverse proportion of low price- full score is adopted in this Project.
Prefabrication shop site I of Penglai branch company: Jutao wharf
The energy output from the shed power cannot be transmitted to the traction converter, so that the traction converter cannot start normally.
3. The mobilization of a variety of materials shall be carried out at night. The Project Department shall strictly follow the daily schedule and reasonably arrange the working procedures in daytime and at night, so that the Project can be implemented in an orderly way as per the construction schedule.
1. This drawing is the Large Arch Springing Benching Tunneling Method (Temporary Inverted Arch) Construction Procedure Plane Design Drawing, which shall be used with the cross section drawing of the procedure.
Classification of Dangerous and Harmful Factors for Machining Facilities
Areas along the Line belong to semiarid temperate zone, with the climate characteristics of "being cold in winter, hot in summer, and significant in temperature difference and differences among four seasons".
⑤ Soil or sand is piled up on the compacting surface and compacted in layers to such compaction degree that meets the provision.
7.1 Highway and railway transport vehicle shall be designed according to the technological requirements, and characterized by the reliability, applicability, maintainability and safety.
Cable laying requirements: The cable shall be let out from the distribution room of the control room by utilizing the steel casing pipe used by the through-wall outlet of existing cable tray for laying. It shall be buried after passing through the wall and the outdoor buried depth of cable shall not be less than 700mm.
4) Working load can be transferred to the bearing only if cushion materials have full strength as determined by cubic crushing test.
The modification revision of the records is represented as Rev1, Rev2, Rev3 and so on.
Operators directly contact low-temperature throttling and cooling pipelines and equipment or illegally use carbon dioxide extinguishers
The traffic lights are installed along intersections to control the traffic of intersection.
Quaternary Middle Pleistocene Series: residual slope sediment (Q2edl): silty sand, calcium and breccia;
6.4.4.5 If the qualification team members have different opinions on the qualification conclusions, they shall give clear indications and sign in the reserved opinion sheet.
The indoor fire water supply pipes are connected from the outdoor fire water supply ring network. The indoor overhead fire water supply pipes are hot-dip galvanized steel pipes, and are connected by clamps or threads.
Industry Standard of the People's Republic of China-Hydrological specification for Survey and Design of Highway Engineering (JTGC 30-2002)
The recommended routing scheme of the whole line is shown in Figure 6.5.2-2.
① Open cut foundation should be adopted for beam-type bridge when the burial depth of foundation is not greater than 6m only if geological conditions are proper.
The Employer is entitled to audit the implementation of the Bidder's project management system.
According to the functional orientation of the road and the traffic volume forecasting conditions, combined with the topography and geology conditions along the line and the technical standards of peripherally connected road net, this project is implemented to be two-lane, integrated roadbed of the whole line, the roadbed is 12.0m wide for common road sections, and it is 14.0m wide for the road sections in cities and towns.
2) The telephone helpline shall be provided with the loudspeaker, acoustic pickup, help button, camera and other devices, realizing the function of intercommunicating with the staff of control center.
We are not submitting more than one bid in this bidding process as a Bidder, either individually or as a partner in a joint venture, in accordance with ITB-4.3, except for alternative offers permitted under ITB Clause 13;
1.1 In order to well maintain the monitoring equipment, security guards shall be responsible for monitoring, maintaining and managing the monitoring system on a regular basis and taking charge of the maintenance of such equipment, to ensure that the monitoring system can effectively operate for a long term.
3. Ground connection and bridge joint is done between cable tray and support.
Other Information about Controlling Shareholders and Actual Controllers
The log information should be complete (including equipment working status information, alarm information, control information, etc.)
/8201/Calculation Report for Dynamic Performance of Vehicles
2) The relative humidity in construction environment should not exceed 85%, and when condensation occurs on the surface of components, do not perform coating;
Bid No.: 0706-16500004J001/03
Suppliers should be informed to handle nonconforming products found in the purchased products and corresponding corrective actions should be taken.
Table 2-1 shows the standards for lateral axle forces and sum of axle orientating forces under different load conditions:
After control box is hoisted to control foundation, preembedded pieces on control box shall be put in reserved hole; then, pour concrete so that installation of control box is stable.
The locking device of the turnout system is mainly composed of locking roller, locking groove, electric push rod, motor, roller shaft, locking position detector, manual hand wheel, connection shaft, etc.
1. Right side of yard site for depot at section JK0+328~JK0+428 with a length of 100m. The height of wall is 4~6m based on individual design. See front design drawing and design drawing for the structure of L-shaped retaining wall for details. Concreting for the L-shaped retaining wall body is conducted on site with C30 reinforced concrete.
Fly ash and slag are collected, conveyed and stored separately.
Luang Soung No.2 major bridge at DK357+387
K89+835 Nam Song River Major Bridge in Hintit Village
① Vertical crack under 1# arch slab, with length of 0.3m and width of 0.1mm
In this design, one depot is set for the 6th of October City Rail Transit Monorail. It has two transfer tracks connecting to the depot between the two main lines;
The structural systems of the main structures in them park are of reinforced concrete fram structure.
In a hot environment, avoid operation in high temperature period.
(4) The stonework blasting security measures, the transportation and piling of the excavated earth and stones, quality inspection, temporary roads and temporary drainage are included in relevant sub-item prices or rates, and shall not be measured.
6.5.1 The paving temperature of central plant hot recycled mixture shall be 5℃~15℃higher than the hot-mix asphalt mixture.
The DCS control system is mainly comprised of three parts: control station, data communication bus, and HMI equipment.
5. The project quality the standards and design requirements of the current construction quality acceptance standards and design requirements of the State, the Ministry of Railways and Shanghai, and the acceptance rate of one-time acceptance is up to 100%.
The height of waterproof layers of walls and columns shall not be less than 500; and the waterproof height of walls shall not less than 1800 in fire pump room being constantly wetted by water or non-corrosive liquid.
Complete the storage, regular supervision inspection and treatment system of chemicals. Clear the chemicals from the site, and store and label them in individual areas in comparison to the storage conditions of chemicals (including label of storage life).
The performance indicators of its products shall comply with relevant technical specifications and cooperate with the construction.
At the sections with complex engineering geological and hydro-geological conditions, as TSP advance geological forecast system cannot meet the construction demands,
The results of management review shall be recorded and kept.
A service area is proposed to be built near Km326+350 (both sides of the expressway).
e) Temporary support structures shall be retained if adjacent structures may be damaged or if required by the Project Supervisor.
1.4.20After the Bidder receives the fault repair alarm of the charging pile, the response time of repair service shall be within 2 hours.
Figure 5.2.16Sandstone Mixed with Mudstone at Cutting Slope at the Right Side of GK37+050
2, Relevant international and national standards and specifications shall be executed to control the product quality and properly implement quality control during the production.
For the benchmark layout, it shall make sure that at least one benchmark can be observed when observing the sedimentation of a spot.
4.3.1 According to the annual internal audit work plan, the quality management department, the security technology/ environment protection department and the measurement management department shall prepare the implementation plan for internal audit (see format 1), select the internal auditor according to Article 4.2.3, and determine the audit group leader, and submit it to the management representative (or competent manager) for approval.
4. Make written technical disclosure for technical guidance work (oral disclosure unallowed), and photocopied technical data (including shop drawings) shall not be used as technical disclosure documents without authorization.
(2) Laos-China Friendship Tunnel is Class B tunnel, fire extinguishers, fire hydrant and AFFF fire extinguishing device must be provided.
Employer: China Railway Construction Guilin Investment Co., Ltd.
2-2 Plain Fill (Q4ml): The bottom elevation is 501.5m and the thickness is about 1.1 m.
The prices stated in the Price Breakdown shall be fixed during the implementation of the Contract and shall not be varied out of any reasons.
12. For any details not specified herein, refer to relevant design drawings, reference drawings, and relevant specifications and regulations.
2. Earth filling of (0.15m) in width on top of wall
The storage and transportation system of liquid pitch supplies liquid pitch for anode production of electrolytic aluminum. Two 3000t liquid pitch tanks are set up to satisfy the demands of anode production for 60 days. Motor transport is the transportation means from port to plant.
In case of failure to immediate construction of foundation, 0.3m-thick soil layer beyond elevation of foundation bottom should be reserved and then dug out during foundation construction.
Adopt layered welding. First carry out attachment weld of T-rib and column. Then perform weld reinforcement.
Objective plans of reliability and availability of rolling stock equipment system and the control method
(2) Lift the main handle and observe the excitation current value of the traction motor indicated on the screen. The value should increase as the diesel engine speed increases.
3.3.6 Analysis of dangerous and harmful factors in electrical installation of production unit
Fig. 4.1 Flow Field of Water Area of the Project during Spring Tide Falling under Existing Conditions
5.3 Rated Measurement Voltage and Rated Measurement Output
When the steel wire sleeve of the balance weight suspended on the mast at anchor lifting area is just tensionless, the personnel give command to stop the wiring coach, stop spreading and prepare for anchor dropping.
Calibration review of any used simulating parts shall be the same as the initial calibration, and shall be performed with the same calibrating test block initially used.
At present, basic design data are not available, and it is assumed that the natural conditions of the Project meet the project requirements. Further verification will be conducted after detailed data are collected.
Submit for inspection, review and check the survey according to the requirements of the survey construction scheme.
Check whether the carbon brush of axle-end grounding device has worn abnormally; if it has, replace it.
When the curve signal occurs and remains for 300s, a curve fault will be identified by the system and the screen will display the curve signal locking information. This parameter is adjustable, can be adjusted through C08 on the screen, and is determined based on the actual curve of subway rail.
(3) When the transformers and long portal beam are transported and installed by the construction contractor, construction works such as the excavation of quicksand pit near the engineering line and putting new facilities into operation will become major hazards. Special construction schemes shall be formulated and approved or filed according to regulations.
The wire-end connection is provided with waterproof connector clip and has anti-misplug measures.
2010.12-now Nigeria Ogun 4X9Ecombinedcycle gas turbine power station project, as the operation shift leader.
Material thickness measurement and control of sintering machine; 1 point
General contracting for main building construction at the new site of CCTV
Specific design guidelines are provided to low impact of various water systems, building periphery, blocks, roads and open spaces in the area, to provide the basis for construction of various works in the next stage.
1.22 When foam and scum produced by aeration tank spill to walkway, skid resistance should be paid attention to during the works in aeration tank.
BYD Communication Signal Co., Ltd. is a wholly-owned subsidiary of BYD Co., Ltd. It was founded on July 7, 2017 and belongs to the Business Division 23. There are three R&D centers and more than ten departments, with about 1,000 employees.
Turnouts of a route after unlocking may be used by another route requiring setting.
c. Unless otherwise specified, the protection grade of the box shall not be less than IP55;
The basic wage is RMB , the post wage is RMB , and the floating wage is RMB after you become a regular employee;
Table 3 Adaptability Indicator of Mechanical Environment of Ticket Vending Machine
Among the respondents who are subject to basal investigation for now, specific layout of the medical insurance participation is shown in Table 2-10.
Pipe sections must be handled from top to bottom when they are used.
1.0.2 This Specification is applicable to testing and evaluating the bearing capacity and integrity of foundation piles in railway.
Look out the display conditions of various instruments and the state of the contact line of the electric locomotive.
When the inspection train passes No.12 turnout in the 1# turnout position of Suswa Station in the main direction, the measured maximum vertical wheel-rail force is 137.3kN.
Midterm Technical Seminar of China-Norway Cooperation Project (2017) mainly focuses on the discussion of the implementation conditions and technical points of two sub-projects: China-Norway Cooperation Baoxing River Management Framework Design and Capacity Construction and National Public Panda Management Framework Design and Capacity.
According to the Line of Calcutta Metro Project, line simulation of ICF Project in India simulates how the train is performing at full power, in energy-saving mode, with a loss of a quarter of power and a half of power, and examines whether the vehicle traction control system meet the requirements for speed in the contract document and operation capacity under fault conditions.
Chapter 5 Main Preparation Principles and Technical Standards
Lifting position of materials and equipment: The lifting position shall be reasonably designed and the lifting point correctly indicated for various packaging according to the length, height, shape, weight and center of gravity of goods.
On the precondition of allowed site conditions and complete materials, various equipment manufacturers can execute the construction operations simultaneously on several working faces to ensure the construction schedule for equipment installation.
Speed=al·exp[bl·(v/c)8] When (v/c) > m (high-grade highway)
The train has an average seating capacity of 1,200 people, with passenger seat utilization rate of 0.8 and fluctuation coefficient of passenger flow of 1.25.
If one-time survival rate to the quality standards is improved, the construction progress is quickened, thus, the construction process can be ensured.
All accessories, valves and assemblies shall be made of non-ferrous materials.
In addition, one test shall be carried out using a paper cushion beneath the seat mounted in the corner, and one test using a paper cushion placed centrally below and between two seats.
Anti-collision walls, sidewalks and railings shall be installed on both sides of the carriageway on the highway bridge.
b. the clear distance between circumferential weld and wall, floor slab or supports shall not be less than 50mm.
a)Erect and lift the rubber pad buffer device of the coupler shank with stripping tongs and cranes.
As for the internal traffic volume of traffic zone, it can be clearly seen based on the individual trip investigation experience that the traffic generation and attraction of one zone are related to the size of this zone (area of the zone).
The conditions for a train speed of 80km/h shall be taken into the Supplier's consideration.
Paddy fields and family gardens are the most common habitat types.
The testing program submitted by CSR Qingdao Sifang Co., Ltd. shall be finally approved by the Buyer.
e) Take appropriate correction and corrective actions in a timely manner;
δr——internal friction angle between the stable rock slope without weak layer and the filled soil;
The Environmental and Social Assessment Working Group went to the site for survey on May 30 and November 6, 2019, respectively, to investigate the main environmental protection objectives along the route. The survey results are shown below:
2) The reinforcement wire head shall be kept clean and free from damage after passing the inspection.
1. Name: general equipotential connection box 2. Specification and model: 300*300*150mm 3. Installation position: concealed installation with the bottom being 0.3m from the ground 4. Method: see 02D501-2.
According to office demand of subcontractor's construction on site, build the office area and basic sanitation facilities for subcontractor first, and then build the office area and ancillary facilities of Party A. Ensure that the procedure can relatively reasonably arrange the construction procedures under the condition of ensuring construction progress.
The design proposals shall be in accordance with the Green Terminal Standard (Draft), Evaluation Standard for Green Building, and Planning Guidelines for Green Airport (Draft) of Civil Aviation Administration of China (CAAC), and in combination with the local climate environment, to explore low-cost ways of implementation.
3.5.7 Emergency start test on charger.
Vertical and horizontal rigidity of bridges, settlement after foundation engineering of bridges and culverts, clear distance between bridges (culverts) and culverts, and fill thickness of culverts, etc. shall be reasonably determined in accordance with different railway types, designed running speed and track types.
Quality-based life-cycle - cost calculation method;
2) Organize the preparation of the bidding documents for the subcontracted works and the bidding for the Project.
5 Force Majeure, Contract Dispute, Complaint and Arbitration
However, the longitudinal wave which transmits in the form of a compression wave will cause changes to the shape and volume of medium pores and is affected by water saturation of pores. Meanwhile, when pores are full of water, the longitudinal wave can be transmitted in coupling manner through water and rock particles, shortening the transmission path, and the wave velocity is much higher than that in dry rock samples.
Brick wall shall be laid with solid bricks, wall thickness shall be 120mm, and laying mortar shall be M5.0 mixed mortar.
This project is to put requirements from production techniques, traffic transportation, flooding prevention and water drainage, architecture master plan and daylighting and ventilation into consideration. The design will be proceeded as per local actual conditions, saving infrastructure investment and convenience for construction.
<2-7> Breccia soil: steel gray, loose, slightly wet, containing about 30% of gravels, occasionally containing gravels and the rest is filled with silty clay.
It is a work platform customized for the repair and maintenance management of urban rail signaling equipment and is intended to solve the problems occurred in the maintenance of signaling system.
5. The intelligent power supply panel shall be able to monitor the operating parameters and working status of the system in real time, and has functions such as fault storage, fault location, alarming and fault calling.
Members of joint venture/subcontractor (if any) and scope of responsibility
The startup, shutdown and operation records of equipment (the operation and failure of the equipment) ;
Tax Accountant Agent: ShineWing (Beijing) Registered Tax Agents Co., Ltd.
c. During subsidence, pay attention to the surface changes of the grouting groove for thixotropic slurry, and plaster slurry timely.
However, for the damaged tickets, the box office machine will not be able to provide update processing.
PBTS and PZ shall undertake joint and several liabilities for these two subsidiaries.
(1) Xue Wenli (ID number: 610102196904162352, Tel: 15934837721)
The entrance/exit will be set on the west side, connecting to the access road of the railway port. The customs and comprehensive administration area for highway port will be provided on the north side of the entrance/exit while the area for commercial inspection and animal and plant inspection and quarantine will be provided on the south side.
After the determination of chimney center line, measure the formwork radius for each lift. Control formworks one by one in accordance with Table of Chimney Trimming.
Set metal or plastic casing pipes when crossing through walls and floors. The casing pipes in the floors shall be 20mm higher than the decorative ground. The casing pipes in the toilets and kitchens shall be 50mm higher than the decorative ground, and the bottom shall be flush with the bottom of the floor. The two ends of the casing pipes in the wall shall be flush with the decorative surface.
The control cabinet of generator set is placed in the console at end I. Arrangement of internal electrical appliances is shown in Figure 7-5:
Whether special study is carried out for geological disasters, underlying mineral resources assessment and seismic safety evaluation work shall be determined by the Employer according to Nigeria's national conditions, political and economic development.
When the shell side is high pressure, the connecting tube of the discharge plant should be located near the top of the center of the tube box.
shall cover all loss and damage from any cause not listed in Sub-Clause 17.3 [Employer's Risks],;
4.2 The total contract price is fixed and unchanged within the effective term of the Contract.
3.5.3 Railway Current Grounding Device
Maintenance free underground cable connection case is adopted for underground cable connection.
The static relation setting includes minimum opening calibration, maximum opening calibration, and full-stroke calibration.
The foundation surface within 50mm around the sizing block needs to be flattened to ensure good contact between the sizing block and the foundation, and the allowable deviation in levelness of the flattened parts shall be 2mm/m;
At the ambient temperature, the daily construction height of a masonry wall shall be controlled within 1.5m or the step height of scaffold.
Unless otherwise specified, the technical parameters of the equipment provided by the Tenderer shall be able to ensure the long-term reliable operation in those environmental conditions.
Organize on-site survey, be responsible for the preparation of survey and test plan, be responsible for the formulation of technical measures, disclosure and guidance of implementation.
Organize the quality inspection and acceptance for the daily check-items, and sign quality confirmation documents.
We have completed the preparation of the construction organization design (scheme) of works as per relevant stipulations of construction contract. The construction organization design (scheme) has been reviewed and approved by the technical principal of us. Please review.
GB 4208 Degrees of Protection Provided By Enclosure (IP Code) (GB 4208-2008, IEC60529: 2001, IDT)
5. Summary Sheet of Training and Examination Results (Q/DJG20-40-2013-005)
In this project, only unstable parts with high risk are partially excavated. The ratio of the rock slope after excavated is not more than 1:0.5 and the ratio of the soil slope after excavated is not more than 1:1.
Different processes shall be undertaken by different department or manager.
4.16The double-speed horizontal wiper shall be employed. The elbow of the sprayer shall be strengthened and equipped with intermittent gear, with motor power of ≥180W.
Input setting of one channel and the settings of same kinds of channels can be set according to the setting.
(4) Other tunnels have various degrees of artificial fills and slope eluvium soil, and there are great difficulties in pre-control of water and mud outburst and landslide.
The software acquires the configuration data by invoking the function module read_uint_port; when the configuration file is wrong, the underlying software loading verification fails, which results in an operational error of the application software; thus the cabinet cannot work normally.
In the case of manual clearing and trench excavation, the elevation and width shall be carefully controlled, and soil structure on trench bottom shall be free of damage.
1. The feasibility of temporary storage volume is to be described by combining the volumes of ash and slag temporary storages in the plant with the transportation time.
4. This Agreement is made in quadruplicate, with consortium members holding two original copies respectively.
15.2.3 Configuration for equipment of concrete production system
(4) Culver type and size are determined in comprehensive consideration of hydrological and geological conditions, filling height and purpose. Culverts are built in the principle of maintaining original traffic, irrigation and discharge systems to the greatest extend and in proper consideration of long-term development.
The traffic safety facility is a generic term of facilities such as guardrail, sign, marking, fence, anti-falling mesh and delineator which are set along the road and used to protect the safety of vehicles and pedestrians and allow full play to the function of the road.
Fig. 3-8Circuit Diagram of Cleaning the Oxide Film on Contact Surface
Specialization of construction equipment: Use advanced and specialized construction equipment to ensure overall engineering quality.
Mobile phone number: 13816743769
Ticketing system adopts horizontal partition method. Mass seat data and transaction data are divided by time and stored in database by partition, which greatly improves database performance and transaction efficiency.
1) Average traveling speed for upstream is 51.90 km/h (not including return travel time), and travel speed of not less than 35 km/h is satisfied.
Copies of bank loan agreements or intention agreements for loan (if any)
Hot-melt traffic paints are solid powder at normal temperature. During the construction, the paint is added into the melting pot to be melt flow, then put into the insulated melting hopper of the hand-push paint line marker and keep its temperature, thus keeping melt.
All the five stations are provided with turnouts for train switchback and convenient operation.
5. Refer to other drawings for such deck facilities as ballast retaining wall, drainage slope and access rail at abutment top.
(2) Potential major risk can be indicated easily (W2);
It shall cooperate with Coordination Department to carry out external coordination, land acquisition, demolition, environment protection, water conservation, cultural relics protection.
2) Local taxes and duties, to be collected according to the convention of the local market.
3.1.5 Minimum curve radius: 4000m.
Calculation method: count the specific delay time caused by arrival delay and departure delay events according to different delay standards.
Precipitation varies greatly in different areas. The average annual precipitation in Accra region is 2180mm.
Led from mixed traction substation I-P6-8
Table 3-1-3 Grain Output of Nepal in Recent Years Unit: 104t
Acute toxication accidents caused by persons in contact with toxic substances, such as a person eating toxic food or inhaling toxic gas, or suddenly fainting due to lack of oxygen when working in culverts and other non-ventilated places
Off-board water tank designs as light weight and integration.
② The masonry mortar for winter construction must maintain a temperature higher than zero, and the temperature difference between the mortar and the stone surface should not exceed 20 °C.
The profile of the relocation plan is mainly affected by the topography and limited by the new railway elevation and the combination design of the plane and profile alignment is comprehensively considered to make the alignment smooth and coordinate with the surrounding environment.
The voice communication system on the train provides following functions:
Rainfall tests for the single car body and car assembly (containing equipment and boxes)
8.1 Before the deadline of application for selection and employment, the employer is entitled to clarify or modify the documents for whatever reason.
Spiral reinforcement shall be YB/T5294 \U+2205 3.00mm Q235-A hard-drawn wire.
The driver operates the pantograph lifting or lowering button at driving position to issue a pantograph lifting or lowering command; the train control system detects the pantograph lifting status via position signal of pantograph; train control unit drives the indicator light of pantograph lifting button to indicate current pantograph lifting status.
General Plot Plan Design Code of Petrochemical Enterprises Factory Area
B. Thread tolerances of carbon steel and low carbon alloy steel bolts and nuts shall meet the requirements of 7H/8g in GB/T 197-2003 General Thread Tolerance and Fit.
(7)In the process of PSD opening, if the open command is lost, the PSD will remain open after the opening operation is completed. In the process of PSD opening, if a close command is received when the open command is not invalid, the PSD shall complete opening operation and then judge whether the close command is valid;
In cased masonry work should be conducted in rainy days, consistency of masonry mortar shall be reduced and mortar diluted by rainwater shall only be used after mixed with added cement.
a) Various functional departments in Project Department shall regularly analyze collected data.
2 Check whether the microhardness tester is in good condition prior to the operation, and select the indenter, load and load time according to the test requirements, methods and thickness of the measured pieces.
If some functions cannot be implemented at this stage, these functions shall be tested during site acceptance test;
6.5Documents of Reliability, Availability, Maintainability and Safety
The PBR should be excluded from further analysis since it does not score well for routes or for stations in general, with the exception of stations at Macoya and Valencia, 2 stations of relatively small importance in terms of attracted traffic.
Refer to IS0 2768-mK for general tolerance.
The qualification examination of suppliers shall be performed by the established bid evaluation committee.
04 Subproject 1 - Construction Conditions (Engineering Geological Condition)
7. HDPE pipes shall be adopted as the drainage pipes that are laid in the cushion.
When major changes occur in construction conditions, revisions and updates (for emergency plans) should be organized in a timely manner.
Personal protective measures: reduce the working hours, especially prolong the noon break for the workers.
1) Members subject to axial tension, small eccentric tension or small eccentric compression:
The guide wall shall be extended at least 10cm above the ground to prevent ground water flowing into the trench and contaminating the slurry.
(h) Drawings (including the relevant parts of addenda to the tendering documents);
The one-year change in salinity of salt soil is generally a sharp rise in spring, stable in early summer, falling in rainy season, rising in autumn, and stable in winter.
(6) Abutment and pier construction shall be arranged to avoid rainy season and flood season, so as to tide over flood season safely. After flood season, the construction of bearing platforms and pier bodies of main bridges shall be completed promptly.
____ _ ___(Name of invited supplier):
The description and model of equipment is given in Table A.1.
12.2.2.5.1 Be responsible for the environmental protection training and examination of constructors.
For example, 72-way input and 72-way switching output (12U host system provided with 9 HD acquisition boards and 1 enhanced decoder board)
But for the critical positions which are with strict technological requirements, the spare parts are required;
b.Click Download Saved Equipment Parameters. The Prompt dialog box is displayed.
Water supply stations will be set in DireDawa station for Mieso(excluded)-Dawanle section according to this feasibility study. Living water supply stations is considered to be set in stations such as Bike, Arawa, Adigala, Aysha, Dawanle stations and the frontier inspection station yard.
The payment items include all expenses related to material, labor, equipment, transportation and expense needed to complete the Project, being full payment to project completion.
Etad _ minimum _ pump = pump efficiency of the first pump group of Savay-1 Pump Station when the total design waterhead is 78.00 m:
1) For cast-in-situ reinforced concrete floor, the thickness of building surface layer shall be reserved during structural construction. For details, please refer to the Technical Specification.
1) Firstly, the collector nozzle of the hand basin shall be installed as per the following steps: the stop nuts, gaskets and rubber mats of the collector nozzle shall be removed first; the upper mat applied with oil putty shall be inserted into the outfall holes of the hand basin; the overflow gap inside the collector nozzle shall be directed at the overflow gap holes inside the outfall of the hand basin; the gasket applied with oil putty shall be installed, with gaskets and stop nuts being erected.
2. This figure applies to the sidewalk guardrails between the 0#-22# piers.
02 Southern China block train products based on door-to-station round trips from Southern China / areas around Shenzhen to Lodz, Nuremberg, Tilburg, and Moscow.
Static electricity and electric shock protection: in design, electro-Static discharge and its harm should be reduced as far as possible during utilization or maintenance to ensure safety of personnel and equipment.
CREC No. 20 Joined Up Chayuan Station to Qiujiawan Station in Chongqing.
Code for Construction Project Document Filing and Arrangement (GB/T50328-2001)
Engineering design consulting ---Constructional engineering Educational buildings
Based on the above analysis, the prestressed concrete T-girder is recommend for the superstructure of 40m standard-span bridge, using the simply-supported structure and continuous bridge slabs.
The industrial achievements have been widely used, such as technologies for synthesizing acetic acid by carbonylation of methanol, producing dimethyl ether from methanol, producing hydrogen by methanol decomposition, medium- and low-pressure methanol synthesis, producing ethylene glycol from coal and producing synthetic natural gas from coke oven gas. The Center has significant industrial status and influence based on its excellent open services and talents.
It is used to suspend the copper and copper alloy contact wire with the section of 85mm 2, 120mm2, 150 mm 2 on the copper and copper alloy stranded wire messenger wire with the section of 70mm2, 95 mm2, 120 mm 2.
Improve the business abilities and comprehensive quality of the Company's business personnel.
Both the ML-1 Line and the Havelian Branch Line of the Project cross the Haro River.
Every employee should perform their duty under either the company's written or spoken safety instructions.
4.6.2 The welders and welding operators can only engage in the welding activities within corresponding scope of qualified items through examination.
Image device of the camera: ≥1/3″CCD;
[46] The Interview with Water Resource Bereau County Q and Huo Daishan, the Originator of "Huaihe River Protection" by the Author in May 2009.
The equipotential bonding conductors between the earthing-termination systems of the following items shall be made of stainless steel:
The combination of local control and remote control is adopted for equipment control of primary crushing workshop.
3. The cost for provision of construction chromophotograph, album and video tape by the Contractor shall be included in the corresponding works the Contractor's expense and not be paid the Owner separately.
Proposed Scheme for Track Circuit Coding (Pakistan Railways Resignaling Project of Lodhran-Shahdara Bagh 7+24 Station)
For the general borrowings obtained for the acquisition, construction or production of an asset qualifying for capitalization, the amount of borrowing costs eligible for capitalization is determined by applying the capitalization rate of general borrowings, to the weighted average of the excess amount of cumulative expenditures on the asset over the amount of specific borrowings.
In recent years, the improvement of data acquisition technology of computers greatly raises the exploration efficiency and increases the covering area and exploration depth of the profile. Reliable data can be acquired in the environment of strong interference, which greatly improves the signal-to-noise ratio and accurately explores geological bodies.
The meetings shall be subject to classified management according to their scale and requirements, and the expenses of the meetings shall be controlled according to the ceiling.
(9) Control output employs the relay contact mode; the contact capacity shall match with the disconnecting/connecting parameters of the controlled switch, and guarantee the soundness of the unit and secondary loop when the controlled switch refused to act.
The existing old roads and construction access are utilized; mining has been launched.
Scoring Sheet for Inspection of Hoisting Safety (Special Inspection)
Certificate of Engineering Design Comprehensive Class A A151000179
a. When a hole tester 1.0mm smaller than the nominal diameter of the hole is used, the passing rate of each group of holes shall not be less than 85%.
7. It uses standard database to manage test data and can provide networking data interface;
2. Three universal fasteners are adopted for connection of upright tube.
4.5 Earthwork backfilling construction (+0.00m to +6.41m)
This station belongs to Ethiopian Plateau terrace landform and the terrain is flat, wide and undulating slightly, with the altitude of 2,390~2,405m and relative height difference of about 15m. The vegetation is sparse and residential areas on both sides are dense. This line, along which the traffic is heavy, is located at the reserved corridor in the central ASMERA.ROAD, with a width of about 10m. Refer to Fig. 1 for the topography and landform.
Party B shall be responsible for its trainer's cost.
Other situations shall be handled based on the on-site realities, but personnel security must be guaranteed.
Negotiate with the Ghanaian side to determine the land for temporary facilities.
Audio decoding protocol: supporting ADPCM, G711, G726
E.5 defines parameterized ASN.1 data types, which are used to construct SPDU in E.4;
Address: No. 37-2, Tangyan Road, High-tech Zone, Xi'an City, Shaanxi Province
In principle, the Tenderer shall ensure that the identification rate for counterfeit currency reaches 100%.
2.4.5 Without Overall Urban Planning Documents
The processing of monitoring data is based on the principle of conciseness and timeliness, and those that can be fed back on site should be fed back on site in time.
Right wiper motor (on the door) m76
According to passenger volumes, passenger stations are composed of super-large stations, large stations, medium stations and small stations.
The onboard terminal module is a system embedded in the new public vehicle to receive commands from the data management and control center, make the route plan according to the transport information, autonomously generate the combined route of the riding module and the driving module, and enable the new public vehicle to send passengers to their destination.
3. Tunnel: rail top (curve is inner rail top) to the ballast bottom under the rail.
Note: Some parameters are to be filled in the table above upon confirmation on site.
It is a method to use standby parts and components, devices or modules to replace faulted, damaged or decommissioned parts and components, devices or modules.
, assess site earthquake and ground fissure effects and propose treatment
2. Comparison of Registered Capital and Paid-Up Capital before and after Change;
Assemble the center sill and the center sill partition as shown in the process diagram to ensure that the left and right deviation of the lower cover plate from the center sill center is not greater than 2. Carry out mixed gas shielded welding after the assembling is completed. The specific welding parameters of the welds shall comply with the WPS requirements for corresponding welds in the table of the diagram.
The Construction Company shall select a legible stockyard approved by competent government department for purchasing.
Table 4-4-1-12 Success Rate and Break Period of Handover
The performance and state of the pantograph of the test train shall meet the requirements of the pantograph-catenary current-collection standard of each test speed grade.
It mainly produces PO42.5\PC325 cement for civil use and for reservoirs and railways
Internal Auditors are responsible for conducting on-site audits and keeping audit records according to the division of tasks.
When [Fn] key is pressed, shortcut menu window pops up on DMI. The schematic diagram of the window is shown below:
(5) Quality standard of foundation bolt: The center deviation of foundation bolt shall be equal to or less than 2.0 mm; the deviation of foundation bolt exposed length shall be 0~+20.0 mm; the deviation of foundation bolt thread length shall be 0~+20.0 mm.
1. The Accounting Firm Practicing Certificate is the evidence for the certificate holder to conduct the statutory business of CPA approved by finance authority according to law.
5)Connect the storage battery to the binding post with the specified torque.
For the main projects significant to the company, the project manager has to organize the personnel of relevant departments of the company to formally review the project closure report (including the assessment and SWTO.
When liners are not used, there are high requirements for the evenness of adjoining planes of clear parts. Such a method is generally appropriate for small plate glass. Meanwhile, the binding site of glass shall be planished. Otherwise, the glass will be broken easily due to unevenly distributed loads.
The employees accept the process and equipment change management training, participate in implementation of process and equipment change activity, execute the change management procedures and put forward improvement suggestions.
No. 2 Construction Engineering Co., Ltd. of Guizhou Construction and Engineering Group / The No. 6, 7, 8 and 9 Student Apartment Works for the New Campus of Guizhou Education University in Wudang District/ Project Manager.
The STOP button is suddenly pressed down, even for a very short period.
Liao Fulin. Some Questions about Ecology Civilization and It's Concept of Consumption [J] Journal of Fujian Normal University (Philosophy and Social Science), 2009,(01):11-16+27.
The emergency rescue personnel on site shall be provided with relevant specialized protective equipment according to the requirements and take safety protective measures. The relevant specifications about entering and leaving the accident site shall be strictly followed.
The IT Working Group collects the change information of each department and updates the corresponding forms every year.
We are intended to mainly take the following measures, to ensure that construction is smoothly carried out in order:
4. To prevent detonation failures, the following measures shall be taken:
7.1 MSZD/JL 0823-001 Monthly Export Sales Plan Draft
Fine carbon back after grinding is mixed with water in the pelletizer for pelleting, and size of the pellet shall be uniform.
- Fittings ⌀22 A400 GOST 5781-85
When a pipe enters "window" of a manhole (handhole), pipe fracture or staggered joint shall be avoided due to future settlement of soil foundation caused by non-compacted backfill of the foundation pit of the hole.
For example: The target price of this standard product is RMB 150,000, which is 20% less than the cost price of existing products.
8.9 Special Requirements on Materials and Equipment 43
The pipeline whose internal medium temperature would drop because of heat loss during operation modes switching or internal shutdown. For the pipeline, venting or pipeline cleaning is not allowed, otherwise, the next conveying will be affected;
Lifting jack shall transmit the jacking force to thrust ring equably.
Be responsible for the preparation of the construction organization design and the construction schemes for important sub-divisional works.
Basalt (R≥30Mpa), trachyte, limestone
The rock strata at the adit entrance are relatively loose. In order to prevent landslide due to natural collapse of slope or rain during construction, slope protection will be carried out at the adit entrance in time according to the terrain to reinforce and seal the overburden layer.
CREC agrees to the redesign and reconstruction of the 9 culverts. The Employer's representative will review and approve the 9 newly designed culverts.
a. When the area of the Class I lightning protection building is 30% or more of the total area of the building, the building should be identified as the Class I lightning protection building.
2. The stiffening rib of the main beam at the support of the secondary beam is of symmetrical arrangement and the thickness of gusset plate not indicated is t=12mm.
For standing tube reinforcements which are within 3m and light in weight, they could be binded on the ground or floor and entirely erected. For those more than 3m, workbench and beam frameworks should be erected, and tightly pulled by temporary supportings to avoid tilt.
The ground overlying layer is of grayish white or white silty sand, and silty clay containing iron-manganese nodules, no bedrock outcrop is observed.
. Distribution box in the drawing indicates the location of distribution box and grounding mode in material storage.
Submitted by: Hunan Industrial Equipment Installation Co., Ltd. December 2017 Ref: JZZAZ No.1
Due to the influence of the entrance and exit line, in the design of general layout, the front area of the workshop is arranged in the eastern area of the base, which includes the common building, mess hall, flat for attendant on a train, and training center. The production buildings (parking shed, train inspection shed, main inspection and repair shed, and shunting locomotive works train shed) are arranged in the western side of the base.
Engineering technical data shall be synchronized with work progress, and shall reflect work quality in time and accurately.
Design Standard for Cable Television Network Engineering (GB50200-2018)
In principle, the inside geological recording and TSP method connection shall be carried out for the entire tunnel and auxiliary adit.
During first negotiation with the business opportunities, telemarketing personnel will judge the lead validity and pay attention the required contents of valid leads.
There are sundries in the cabinet of the communication machine room of Hollholl station.
Below: auburnish red moderately weathered sandstone, fao=1000kPa, qik=140kPa;
This other Party (and its Personnel) shall not make any admission which might be prejudicial to the indemnifying Party, unless the indemnifying Party failed to take over the conduct of any negotiations, litigation or arbitration upon being requested to do so by such other Party.
6.2 Questionnaire on Customer Satisfaction (ZTT/QEOR912-02-GL)
It's reported that Pujiang Line of Shanghai Rail Transit adopts the new-generation INNOVIA APM 300 developed by Bombardier (Puzhen), which is called by experts the world most advanced unmanned APM. It ushers in a new era for domestic rail transit.
① The pre-assembly direction shall be arranged along the bridge. The pre-assembly site shall fully consider the operating position of the crawler crane.
4. Adjacent Gabion boxes shall be bonded with lead wires.
10.2.8 The concrete appearance quality of expansion joints and bases shall meet the requirements stated in Articles 5.2.13 and 5.2.14 of this Standard.
3) Mixing and sinking by shotcreting: The mixing machine shall be started to make its drill rod rotate and cut the soil down along the guide frame. Meanwhile, the mortar delivery pump shall be started to spray mortar to the soil. The multi-layer blades on the double shafts can rotate and stir both forward and backward at this time until the design depth is reached.
Construction Guide for Green Space Attached for Railway Engineering (TZJS [2013] Doc. #94);
Backfill the drainage pipes from both sides of the pipeline in a balanced manner. Backfill soil shall be the soil that meets the design requirements and tamped by layers. Density sampling shall be carried out for each compacted layer during backfilling. After passing the inspection, backfill the upper layer.
Refer to the cross-section for the specific setup method and "Detail Drawing 1 of Re-channeling" and "Detail Drawing 2 of Re-channeling" for re-channeling dimensions. For C15 concrete ditch, a rubber waterstop expansion joint will be set every 15m and the joint is filled with impervious rubber cement.
a. Structural calculations shall be supplemented for dimensional changes of structural members.
(3) The geotextile shall be lapped by double-channel needle stitched method.
For land acquisition and resettlement, Shangluo City Transportation Bureau compiled the Implementation Opinions on Land Acquisition and Resettlement of Danfeng–Ningshan Expressway Construction Project and submitted it to Shangluo Municipal People's Government for approval. The coordination office of Shanyang and Danfeng Counties will be responsible for the specific implementation.
After obtaining the construction drawings and design documents, the quality inspection department of the Project Management Department shall breakdown the project structure based on the inspection batch as the smallest unit, and clarify the key points of quality control before, during and after each sub-divisional works, as well as the construction records, on-site inspection, test items, quality acceptance inspection and other documents to be collected and improved.
After the generator stator and rotor are washed with clean water and lifted out of the washing tank, clean the residual water inside the rotor bracket and on the inner and outer surfaces of the stator with 0.5-0.6 MPa compressed air.
5. We will not carry out any complaint that lacks of facts or law basis.
The class of concrete resistance to sulphate physical attack classified per the maximum number of drying and watering cycles measured with the method of sulfate corrosion resistance, which is used to evaluate the concrete resistance to sulphate physical attack.
China-Kazakhstan border railway ports have become the main corridor for CRE trains entering and leaving China.
The inlet pipes of new fan shall be equipped with flexible joint and sluice valve, while the return line shall be equipped with flexible joint, electric valve and sluice valve.
Interference by video: 15-20 min video about harms of venereal diseases, basic knowledge for prevention, and method of correct use of condom and consultant institutions was made for the study which was played circularly.
Two 100t crawler cranes and one 50t crawler crane are arranged as main cranes for steel structure construction of stamping shop, and construction is organized in three construction routes.
Construction sequence shall be arranged in a reasonable manner to avoid idling of the labor force and rework.
The fine aggregate entering the site shall be checked and tested once every 1000m3, and the test results shall meet the requirements of Table 4.14 Specifications of Fine Aggregates and Table 4.15 Technical Requirements for Fine Aggregates.
(16) The depth of water on both ends of the SZL trench was relatively small. The large number of large ships for construction would have a strong disturbance on the new sediments on the trench slope and the surrounding excavated sand pits. Enough attention should be given to its impact on the foundation bed siltation in the design.
― Initial confirmation of cable specifications, technical conditions and quantities
Fire alarm control unit shall offer a municipal starter circuit which will not serve to any other purpose.
As of the end of 2016, the Sixth Engineering Bureau CREC had 14,202 employees and 7,862 professional technicians, including 3,608 intermediate and senior technicians, 559 Class 1 constructors and 1,080 highly skilled talents.
According to the statistics, there are 211 industrial enterprises in Tigray now, the industrial structure based on the processing of metallic and nonmetallic minerals has already been formed, and the plants involving the production of cement, engine, textile and garment, the mining of marble and the manufacturing of gypsum play an important role in regional economic development.
When threaded connection is used between tubes, the length of thread at tube end should not be less than 1/2 of the length of the tube joint.
Note: The weight of equipment or stacked materials during use and construction shall not exceed the above value; otherwise, the structural safety cannot be guaranteed.
The boarding system of the movement platform comprises a boarding ladder, an electromechanical actuator and a controller.
Only if the external sales unit has full amount of payment for goods on the account of the purchasing company, steel plates can be supplied to the external sales unit.
The information of monitoring outfield equipment shall be gathered in the field transporter and then transmitted to Lagos State Traffic Management Authority via the leased social optical fiber (completed by the Lagos State Traffic Management Authority, and access conditions are reserved for the project).
Technical disclosure process: Project Leader - Design Director - Professional Directors - Professional Designers
This is to certify that, student Xu Aiping, male, born on September 25, 1967, being fully released from work for study of Industrial and Civil Architecture at our university (college) from September 1990 to July 1993, has completed all the courses specified by the 3-year junior college teaching programme with qualified scores, and is allowed to graduate.
The project manager compiles the "implementation plan of construction project management" according to the "project management objectives and responsibilities" as a programmatic document to guide the construction of the project.
2.7.7.1.3. Organization of Integrated Commissioning
Mechanical excavation should be performed directly facing the slope surface. A special person should be assigned to command earth excavation on site. Excavation should be performed strictly by layer and by segment and excessive excavation shall be eradicated.
The tunnel spoils and excavated surplus soil (stone) shall be used as much as possible in the design to meet the requirements of the specification for subgrade filling, and longitudinal allocation shall be carried out. Centralized borrow areas are set up at the sections in short of earthwork.
Review education background, professional titles, resumes and professional qualifications of candidates according to recruitment conditions to determine candidates for the written examination.
Threaded pipe joints larger than 1/4": LOCTITE586
□ No □ Vision disability□ Hearing disability□ Speaking disability□ Extremity disability
Industrialized production: uniformity of technology, quality and cost can be controlled effectively.
Stud welders must pass the mechanical operation skill examination and obtain the qualification certificate.
Issue the dispatching command of allowing the rescue locomotive to enter the closed section for rescue.
If the safe passage is blocked after the accident, the rescue team is responsible for dredging the safe passage.
Fabrication of steel reinforcement should be carried out according to requirements of the technical specification and design drawings. And the location of embedded bar in the pier body should be accurate and firm.
3. The communication discipline shall provide the video surveillance facilities in the turnout zone, in accordance with the locations and quantities determined based on the operation requirements.
Table 8-1List of Calculated Loads of Static Strength for Monorail Bogie Frame
13) All outdoor electrical apparatuses shall be of enclosed water-proof structure with a protection level of not lower than IP65.
3.1.2 Take charge of the entire process management of progress, quality, safety and cost control of subcontracted works of the project;
Standard for Engineering Classification of Rock Masses (GB50218-2014)
Formwork is made by rectangular timber of the same dimension. Rectangular timbers with oversize sectional dimension need to be treated by using a thicknesser to ensure the dimension is consistent. The formworks, after being made, are required to be carefully checked by a specially-assigned person for the specification and dimension and stacked up based on the specification.
2.7. Vertically mounted refrigerant pipes shall be fixed with clamps; when fixing risers with clamps, the liquid duct and air duct shall be fixed separately with clamp clearance of (1 ~ 2)m.
Inspection range: circular degree of front, middle, and tail shields, assembly of front, middle, and tail shields, center ring of front shield, connecting flange and thread hole, shape/position of star-shaped beam, balk head, weld joint, manlock pressure maintaining, and paint exterior.
Cut and prepare the sample according to the provisions in GB 6462 in principle, measure the coating on the cross section under the microscope.
Construction actions and method statement shall be reviewed by construction technology and machinery management departments and safety department, approved by Chief Engineer, and shall be taken after disclosure and handling of work safety operation sheets by on-site responsible engineer.
(1) During the construction period, the Contractor shall provide necessary medical and first-aid services for personnel at the construction site.
For the above pier and abutment, the pile length shall be calculated as per friction pile and column pile respectively. The shorter one shall be taken and shall be designed as per equal length pile.
Operating ambient temperature: -40℃~125℃;
Customer service management shall include marketing, customer information management, information release and push, service guidance, goods tracking service, customer satisfaction survey, etc., to achieve integrated management on customer service information.
After the filling in the operation permit, the seal of "Blank Below" shall be affixed in the spare column to show the closure.
Clause 5.3.1.5 - RBC shall send the location report parameters and the movement authority request parameters to the on-board equipment only after receiving the session establishment message of on-board equipment.
Fig. 2.2-1 Climate Data for Harare during 1961~1990
The System is hereby formulated to ensure the effective control of administrative management of the Company to carry out administrative management in an orderly manner and improve the internal and external reputation of the Company.
Service Building has 2 floors above ground, with single floor area of 800 ㎡, and is divided as Zone D.
b)Coupler knuckle (mounting holes for pin and web)
GMP Technical Transformation Project of Tibetan Medicine Company of Traditional Tibet College in Tibet Autonomous Region
To establish information statistical system for urban regulatory plan and strengthen real-time monitoring for implementation of planning, control unit shall be coded in a unified manner.
It can print Chinese and English characters with printing speed of at least 120 characters/min
where k∆ - coefficient of density during loading, equal for the packaged explosives 1.0;
Lay and compact concrete so that the edges are flush and the centre is cambered 10 mm above the adjoining existing surfaces.
(4) Review the commencement report, the construction organization design, the technical scheme and the progress schedule submitted by the Contractor for the first time.
For the uneven location, it shall be filled and leveled manually.
12ZPL drawing of distribution box system (installed at floor 1)
3. Macadam courts are provided as per requirements and demands. The equipment has been specified in the equipment list.
The declaration for equipment and instrumentation was consistent to that of the previous year, demonstrating that the maintenance and operation of equipment and instrumentation in production were relatively stable, and no obvious negative trend was showed in this review.
The wearing plate assembly of the coupler shall be installed on the coupler according to the position on the drawings. The bolt must be coated with loctite243, and the torque must comply with the requirements of the maintenance manual.
THERE IS A CULVERT WITHIN THE CONSTRUCTION SITE, WITH A MILEAGE OF CH488+626, 1-4.0M.
Calibration of the pressure gauge is carried out according to provisions of JJG 52.
Relocation, subgrade, culvert and ancillary works within DK419+583.66 - DK421+717.515 in this bid section; construction of station and yard, station building and ancillary works at the Vientiane South Station
Note: this sample form is for reference, and the specific form is subjected to the requirements of the Owner or the place where the project is located.
The power prediction system is comprised of 1 meteorological data server, 1 set of environmental monitoring system and 1 power prediction server.
Material quality and color of cabinet: main material of cabinet is Q235-A cold rolled sheet of no less than 1.5mm thick, and the color is RAL7044 matte; and the schematic diagram of equipment cabinet is as shown in Fig. 6-1:
Certain distance shall be reserved between the enclosure and road to keep the road unblocked.
Railways Telecommunications (RT); Global System for Mobile Communications (GSM); Usage of the User to User Information Element for GSM Operation on Railways;
Hangzhou Steam Turbine Co., Ltd., Qingdao Jieneng Steam Turbine Co., Ltd.
Be responsible for the filling out and report of the demand planning of materials and spare parts and the labour protection appliance plan, and monitoring and performing statistic analysis on daily requisition;
Local people often present them as a gifts to relatives. In addition, tomatoes imported between 1912 and 1949 and onion, cabbage, and marrow squash imported after 1949 can grow well there.
According to the inspection results, there are many cracks, voids and pits on the concrete surface of side walls and top plates of culvert to varying degrees and the appearance quality is poor.
The gully is surrounded with gentle mountain slopes. Vegetation grows along the section, including lots of bamboos and shrubs and some arbors.
(4) Current design codes of the People's Republic of China and relevant data provided by the Sierra Leone side;
AC distribution equipment test: switching function test, different voltage and current tests; automatically-protected circuits for accident, over-voltage, under-voltage and default phase shall be operated accurately and send out the indicating signals.
During this period, 3.8% of the community division codes have been changed to urban.
Because the site is small, only temporary construction site will be build at site.
The concrete slag remaining on the mold must be cleaned up in time, to expose the rubber shaft.
Each vehicle end connector must be subject to insulation resistance and insulation dielectric tests and conform to the requirements set out in Table 3-10. The withstand voltage must be kept for 1min with no breakdown or flashover.
V2 - voltmeter or device used for measuring the output voltage of tested transducer.
Bonding rubber with metal is only applicable to steel-edged compound water stop.
The transport distance between 1# slime pond and Site 1, Site 2 and Site 3 is 6km, 3km and 6.5km; the distance between 2# slime pond and Site 1, Site 2 and Site 3 is 3.5km, 3.5km and 5.5km.
Inspection quantity: sampling inspection of 1% by the Construction Contractor and not less than 3 pieces, and 100% witness testing by the Supervision Firm.
6.4.1 The overseas companies should establish the fire safety inspection systems incorporating routine fire safety inspection, special fire safety inspection and fire prevention patrol, specify the responsible person, contents and frequency, etc. of the fire safety inspection, and find out and remove the potential fire hazards in time.
The winter construction leading group shall organize the operation teams and professional sub-contractors to make unified deployment and division of responsibilities for the divisional and sub-divisional works to be constructed in winter one month before the winter construction.
(7) Concrete and masonry works during rainy season shall be in strict accordance with the construction specifications. Awning shall be provided for Mixing plant, sand and stone stock bins as well as for the concrete pier construction. The weather forecast shall be mastered at any time to avoid concrete placing on rainy days.
Dimensions, shapes, masses and tolerances of seamless steel pipe
The underframe is connected with the side wall through welding with the door pillar and underframe side beam as well as the side wall plate and the underframe side beam as shown in Fig. 4;
Additional Purchase of 54 Vehicles in Chongqing Rail Transit Line 2 (DC 1500V)
Tehran-Qom-Esfahan High Speed Railway
The station is in a low mountain area with an elevation of 755-759m. The vegetation is not development, and a large number of fragments are distributed on the with some bedrock exposed.
Conductors are not distinguished by marking the live wire,neutral wire and earth wire according to specifications.
This area, represented by border fortress, is a scenic spot with concentrated cultural landscape, including two small scenic spots of Daliancheng and Friendship Pass, and 10 important scenic spots.
In order to ensure the construction safety, the chemical compatibility of drilling fluid, spacer fluid and cement slurry under high-temperature and high-pressure conditions after mixing three-phase fluid is systematically investigated in consideration of the actual possible slurry mixing situation of downhole fluid, special anti-pollution isolator was developed, and deep well pollution evaluation criteriondifferent from API10A was formed.
The diameter of drilling holes shall not be less than design diameter. The drill axis shall be within the normal plane of the route to avoid damaging the structure of rock mass of the slope.
Steam water should be discharge into nearby sewer. In case of long distance to the sewer, local protective discharge should be adopted for steam water. DN400 steel pipes should be buried at 400~500mm in soil of lower part of steam trap so as to make discharged water flow into steel pipes and then permeate into soil.
(3) The project area has great rainfall capacity; therefore, it is suggested to prepare emergency measures during construction.
10. The high-speed impact performance of glass steel meets UIC651-2002. For details, see Attachment 48i Performance Report for GFRP under High-Speed Impact;
ni- the number of the ith longitudinal reinforcement in the tensile area.
Seal of Legal Representative or Entrusted Agent:
(1) Pile foundation test cost: to be charged as 0.03% of the construction and installation cost from Chapters I to X (only for the scheme with bridges).
Effective date of verification/calibration: December 04, 2020
(5) Complete the steel pipe pile drawings for two (2) turbines subject to direct driving and eight (8) turbines subject to rock socketing by April 30, 2020;
(1) Procurement plan must be stipulated for procurement of supplies.
In the angular measurement, the direction observation method is adopted to survey the control piles and points of the main axis, and protective measures are taken in the later stage to form a closed system.
2. After all the pipes are installed, the hydraulic pressure test is required. The hydraulic pressure test pressure is 1.5 times of the design pressure.
3. Evaluation period: construction period and operation period; the operation period is 20 years. The proposed project is planned to commence in 2023 and be completed in 2025. The construction period is 3 years. The national economic evaluation period of the project is 23 years and the financial evaluation period is 53 years.
For tower foundations partially located on steep slopes, the dangerous rocks and boulders around the tower foundation shall be known according to the design requirements and the actual situation on site before excavation, so as not to cause personal injury due to rolling rocks during excavation.
The cross slope in the bottom of mid-span diaphragm is identical to the cross slopes on the girder top; the cross slope in the bottom of end diaphragm is identical to the cross slopes on both ends of each girder.
Could the consultant add the special tool "New hardware debugging software-hardware debugging software for track detection system" in 1. Special tools for Units?
In case of fire, FAS can cut off the non-fire fighting power supply in the buildings.
It shall be ensured that emergency lighting lasts for 3h, and lighting with at least 5 lux luminance shall be provided at the vehicle floor.
In order to achieve the environmental, occupational health and safety objectives of the project, the following controls shall be in place according to the documents for management systems:
(2) After the completion acceptance, the representatives of related parties will sign the acceptance report for ratification.
Height of bearing platform: 1000mm (Na Mor Station CTPM-2)
Its role is to control and guide traffic, respectively showing right road edge, roadway, hardened verge, intersection channelization marking and lane direction, in order to improve the vehicle itself keep in line and perfect traffic organization so as to achieve the purpose of safe driving.
After the electric heater operates for 1 hour under rated voltage, an ambient temperature of 18°C~20°C and no-wind condition, the highest temperature at any point on the mask surface and that on the electric heating tube shall not be over 65°C and 180°C respectively.
Assemble each small-diameter cable plug as per drawings;
T-shaped screw M20x100 HSR50/30HSKM
Other actual expenses that may be caused by the change of waybill are reimbursed.
As for the machineries of gravel changing, filling and compacting, select vibrator roller and vibrating compactor. The compacting effect, layered filling thickness, times of compaction and the optimum moisture content shall be determined according the specific construction methods and construction machinery at the site.
2.2 Excavation of foundation pit should be performed in even layers, thickness of which can be determined as per specific conditions.
(4) The station decoration shall take references from existing decoration standards, so as to meet the requirements of environment protection, fire prevention, dampproof, corrosion prevention, scrubbing resistance and convenient maintenance. The decoration effect shall permit enduring preservation.
The elongation shall not exceed 1.5 mm/ step, and ensure normal and safe operation between step and step, and between step chain and step chain, and normal engagement with the sprocket;
The corporate headquarters sets up an investigation team to carry out investigation and develop solutions. If necessary, it will invite the designer, supervisor and Employer to participate in the investigation.
(5) Selection of surveying instruments and staffing
2. Type and specifications of reinforcement and section steel used for fabrication of steel frame
All exposed welded joints can be treated with grinding or filing.
2. The temporary construction land shall be restored according to the original land function. Landscaping is carried out in wasteland and idle land to restore vegetation.
A comprehensive maintenance section is set on the left at the same side of the station. It is equipped with 4 special sidings (1 siding used as large maintenance machinery hold track and unloading track, 1 power supply maintenance train stabling track, 2 rail vehicle shed tracks.
(1) Before subgrade filling, filling test shall be carried out using small fillers, to obtain key technical parameters of construction.
Thus, before the waterproof layer is brushed, base must be cleaned, and water content test shall be carried out.
GB/T93-1987standard spring washer 14
7) Mechanical equipment shall be parked in the designated parking area, and watched by dedicated person at nights.
④ After stake handover, the technicians and surveyors of the project shall recheck the stake point, and the problems found shall be submitted to the Employer, the planning organization or the superior surveying and mapping department for settlement.
The condition of inventories shall be checked as per specified time interval, so as to discover deterioration timely.
Figure 11 - Overall Construction Procedure of Shield Section
Form joint shall be tight, and maximum gap shall not exceed 2mm, and joint shall be bonded firmly with adhesive tape to prevent mortar leakage.
The throat area shall be arranged on the ramp with the limited grade subtracting 2‰ under difficult conditions. The grade of station site shall ensure the starting of the train.
12.3.1.2 Keep the construction site clean together with drainage measures, smoking room, and greening and with no waterlogging.
Both ends of the wire rope are respectively fixed with Dr=9mm rope clamps, the number of rope clamps shall not be less than 3, the rope clamp spacing shall be kept at 100mm, and the length of the last rope clamp from the rope head shall not be less than 140 mm.
There are 804 piles of Kigongo-Busisi Bridge, all of which shall be subjected to ultrasonic integrity test of pile body, and pile test and load test shall be carried out according to technical specifications.
The ruling grade in this scheme is 15‰. Grade softening is not carried out for profile in this design. Only adjustment of the profile is conducted. The maximum grade 29.1‰ of existing line shall be remained in individual sections. Please see the following table for the long and large slope with a gradient greater than 15‰.
Unify thinking at the highest level of the Company to mobilize all resources of the Company, including human, material and financial resources, to support the project;
The main cable between the bidirectional DC/DC converter and traction converter is grounded.
Burial depth of lighting ground wire shall comply with design requirement. Anticorrosive paint shall be brushed evenly.
Project Achievement Certification Materials of Xi'an EMU Depot and Xi'an Application and Maintenance Depot for Heavy Road Maintenance Machinery
Concrete formwork and support (bracing) Cantilever slab, rain cover and balcony slab (straight) Compound template
During the operation of railway tunnels, the fire smoke spread and evacuation time in high altitude areas are obviously different from that in plain area. That is, the fire smoke descends quickly and the ability of evacuation is weakened. Potential fire accidents pose very high requirements for disaster prevention and rescue evacuation.
To strengthen the cabinet door and facilitate installation and wiring, PU foam plastic sealing ring and tubular door frame shall be provided on the perforated front and rear doors of the cabinet.
Be responsible for preparation of the list for instruments and equipment for test in the laboratory and the master calibration plan;
The regional lines cross the road, and the hardened pavement and the place entering buildings are protected by heavy type PVC pipes or welded steel pipes.
To arrange required support vessels in operation and safety conditions, not only updated navigation permits are required, but also valid certificates issued by subordinate classification society of I.A.C.S and required by international laws and regulations.
Temperature of ex-factory asphalt mixture in the dumpers should be measured as per the current test method.
7.4.1. Difference of bearing surface elevation: ±3.0mm.
System display of the host shall be color display to display host system data, and size shall be not less than 19in
For production buildings, the floor height shall be determined based on processing requirements while for general office buildings with one storey, the clear height shall be 3.3m to 3.6m and for buildings with more than one storey the floor height shall be 3.0m to 3.6m.
Various pumps and supporting motors, diesel pumps, equipment bases and anchor bolts.
Personnel for dispatching command in the control center monitor operation of trains on the whole line, operation of power supply system and platform by use of relevant centralized monitoring system equipment.
After completing the construction of each relocation works, collect and sort out the completion materials, and immediately contact the property rights agency to handle the completion handover procedures.
According to characteristics of each discipline, proper arrangement and planning should be carried out. Under the guidance of experts from the KRUPP POLYSIUS company and according to the planning and arrangement of the project department, the construction will be carried out in a coordinated and organized manner.
14.3.26 The construction of bridge deck slabs shall be inspected according to Section 12.5.
Conduct self-inspection for fabrication of all terminal blocks and plugs as per connection table (mainly including checking whether the connection is firm, whether there are burrs and whether the blown wire-size tube is directed to the observer).
If the hand brake is in braking state, release the hand brake.
3The strength grade of concrete with durability requirements shall meet the requirements in the Code for Durability Design on Concrete Structure of Railway (TB10005).
c Review the progress of HSE purposes and objectives in the month progress meeting;
2. The loudspeaker system shall meet the requirements on speech intelligibility and meet the acoustic characteristic index requirements for lecture hall.
The legal representatives or authorized agents of the Employer and the Contractor shall sign and seal with the official seal on the date above, and will implement the Contract by laws.
During installation, OPGW and all metal instruments must be grounded reliably to avoid injuries to personnel and equipment due to capacitive and inductive coupling.
Party B shall, in strict accordance with the provisions of the Contract, pay for corresponding capital to participant units in the Project and is not allowed to unreasonably withhold the amount. However, if progress or quality of Works is impacted due to such act of Party B, damages incurred shall be undertaken by Party B.
The measure is effective as no similar problems occurred as of November 10, 2016.
a. Before the running of launching gantry, calculate the distance between the most front running wheel of the launching gantry and the front end of the erected beam according to the length and curve of the beam, draw the parking mark on the beam surface, and designate a specially-assigned person to place the stopblock.
The East Coast Railway Link Project (ECRL)
0-Facilities and operating environment are bright and clean.All areas are clearly marked;
(3) Expression of interaction between the quality management system processes.
Works description: Chemical Engineering Test Center, Physical and Mechanical Engineering Test Center-Installation Works
6.3.3 According to requirements on measuring equipment and measured object, the unit shall provide and maintain necessary measurement environment conditions.
Power cable, YJV22, 22KV, 3-core, 150mm2
(2) Conduct reliable repair for the defects affecting the carrying capacity of the abutment structure.
In addition to the connection between the cabinet and the foundation section steel, connections between any two cabinets and between the cabinet and the side plate shall be connected with galvanized screws.
Type of newly-laid turnout is GLC(08)01: Lq-43.200 m;
During the audit, the internal auditors shall record the objective evidences collected for the audit in Internal Audit Checklist in detail.
Groove and tongue shall be set at the top of the protective shoulder and shoulder wall without invading the subgrade.
The foundation of hoisting equipment shall be calculated for verification, and the equipment shall not be assembled until it passed the acceptance.
In the oil storage, oil tanks shall be tightly closed and air pipes leading outdoors shall be erected, which shall be set up with the breather valves with flame arrester.
(2) Concrete shall be placed for inverted arch of parts V&I to design height.
When crashed stone soil and gravelly soil are used for filling, the maximum depth of compacted layer shall not be more than 40cm. When sandy soil and improved fine-grained soil are used for filling, the maximum depth of compacted layer shall not be more than 30cm.
(2) The Financial Department is responsible for withdrawing of safety costs, and its main responsibilities are as follows:
If the karst cave needs to be kept drained, arch culvert or plate culvert shall be adopted for crossing.
Address: Room 908, Block B, Wufu Tianxinglong Building, No. 328, Fengqqi East Road, Hangzhou City
A safe distance shall be reserved from the pit, where safety signs and guard bars shall be erected.
Graduated from Renmin University of China in 2006, major in Accounting
The central median strip of the project is mainly designed according to the lighting lamps, with a greening width of about 2 m. After drainage ditches are set on both sides of the road, begin sloping according to the actual situation.
Monitor network equipment (including dedicated equipment providing gateway service and other network services) to the extent of network port and monitor other equipment to the extent of the complete machine.
If the delayed delivery is caused by the Buyer, the Seller shall not be deemed to have delayed the delivery if it applies to the Buyer for delay in delivery, explains the reason for the delay and the delay time is confirmed by the buyer.
Iron salt and aluminum salt can react with phosphate ion (PO43) to generate insoluble precipitate, and the phosphorus in water can be removed by removing the precipitate.
On-board controller and turnout controller will transmit route setting request information and trigger the corresponding route handling function through VECOM train-ground communication equipment.
The itemized works process acceptance of each divisional will be carried out respectively as per disciplines, and special acceptance for fire-fighting, elevators, energy conservation and electromechanical equipment etc. shall be executed when they meet the requirements in a timely manner, so as to ensure that each of the construction working procedure on site can be inserted closely and meet the construction requirement.
Full-time safety officers must be appointed. Before construction, they shall carefully visit and investigate the construction site, clarify the protection scope, get familiar with protection environment, and prepare protective items.
④ The hole depth, diameter and inclination shall be randomly measured and in case of any abnormality, the drilling shall be stopped immediately and the effective measures shall be taken for treatment.
1)GB7611-87 Pulse Code Modulation Communication System Network Digital Interface Parameters
This Method is hereby formulated as per Notification of Interim Management Measures for the Construction Site Design Cooperation of Railway Construction Projects (TJS [2009] Doc. No.47) to standardize the construction site design cooperation.
The Handover Team immediately organizes the handover of the entire project after receiving the Handover Application Form of Projects for Warranty and the application data for handover.
Components and their assemblies shall be able to resist pollution.
Insulation of motor used for 500V megger measurement shall be greater than 2MΩ.
Frog and guard rail--frog point, wing rail, guard rail
(3) During the revision of procedure documents, the responsibilities shall be assigned to specific posts and matched with revised posts of the departments and offices of SEI;
3. Saka Interchange
If a PAA is not executed because Target Out-turn Cost or other commercial issues cannot be resolved, the Preferred Alliance Participants will not recover corporate overheads or profit on the work performed under the IPAA;
4. Comprehensive acceptance document on project quality (including the construction quality acceptance application report issued by the Construction Unit, project quality evaluation report issued by the Supervisor, etc.);
Buildings installed with aluminum alloy glass windows, with slightly excessive noise.
To achieve the company's operation development, ensure the realization of the overall objectives, it is necessary to identify the critical control points of the operation process, clarify the methods and requirements of performance monitoring and measurement, evaluate the performance results, and organize the implementation of performance assessment.
Collection of Comprehensive Drawings of Electrical Circuit and Gas Circuit including:
2 The external surface of right bottom frame shall be wear resistant. The paint on external surface shall be free of color fading or wear under normal use condition.
After entering the dissolving tank through the chute, the melt shall be dissolved with weak white liquor from the causticization section to generate green liquor into the causticization section.
For there is no existing flood control in Djibouti, according to the urban master plan of Djibouti and planning document for Jabanas Free Trade Zone, and in combination with the flood control standards in China, the recommended flood control standard for the planning area is standard for 100-return year flood.
10.3 Safety organization and its main responsibilities
VOBC equipment will continuously monitor the train's running direction.
Be responsible for preparation of construction technical document, technological procedure and job instruction.
33.4.7 Risk Analysis of Ecological Environment Impact
Table 10.3.3-1 Example of Site CI Management
It is recommended that the Project should be of a completely automatic vehicle base control scheme.
The ATP train-borne equipment performs real-time train speed supervision according to the train operation control command received from the ground track circuit. When the train speed exceeds the maximum permissible speed, it controls the train automatically to implement braking so as to reduce the train speed below the safety speed or stop the train, thereby ensuring the operation safety.
It is tentatively determined that 35kV railway power transmission lines will be provided in the section from station 15~station 22 (Tsogttsetsii) and power will be supplied by 35kV distribution station in Tsogttsetsii Station.
Participants: See Annex 1 for Meeting Attendance Form
As the base of intelligent building, comprehensive wiring is a semi-permanent project.
It is planned to complete 0.71 kilometers of relocated and reconstructed roads, 412,000 m3 (cross-section) of subgrade earthwork, 408,000 m3 (cross-section) of station and yard earthwork, 9,156 m3 of auxiliary subgrade mortar rubble, and 16,700 m3 (masonry) of retaining wall concrete and other support and retaining structures in 2018 1Q.
The gradient used for the station yard shall be small enough due to the following reasons.
Note 1: @ means the item is expressly required for product
Set automatic starting of Tomcat service once log on.
Organize and participate in the investigation and handling of quality emergencies or incidents.
Two 85t gantry cranes are used in the beam fabricating yard to hoist the T-beam to the beam carrier. After transporting the beam to the site, the 168t bridge beam erection machine is used. The order of erection is: first in the direction of large mileage, then in the direction small mileage.
Copies of the company's business license, tax registration certificate and organization code certificate.
Once the Letter of Acceptance which is legally binding to both the Tenderee and the bid winner is sent, the bid winner shall bear legal responsibilities if he abandons the project awarded to him.
Based on the particularity of the Project's construction environment, the treatment of special subgrade has great influence on the construction period of subgrade, pavement and bridge, so it is the key part relating to the success or failure of the Project.
Floating charging voltage, whose setting refers to switching to floating charging voltage after charging is finished.
The comrade is working on the BIM application research in the field of infrastructure construction, and has achieved preliminary results.
The change-over switch is provided inside the interlayer of the barrier wall at inner end of a closed position and shall be fixed on the upper guide rail.
Fault isolation and diagnosis measures shall be included in product design to reduce product repair time, maintenance materials and labor cost.
It is composed of design engineers from various disciplines, aiming to complete the design work of the Project.
All work pieces planed can be scribed according to design requirements. Only reference line of parts length shall first be drawn, and then sample head and sample hole lines are scribed with angle square or T square.
Temporary wires shall be well insulated and the wire section shall be adequate for wire loads.
Variable cross section pile should be adopted for foundation, with 15 φ2.2 pile foudations arranged for each pier.
and it is responsible for monitoring and inspecting the change of HSE management documents, management activities and plans and other relevant change activities.
Shuozhou-Huanghuagang Railway Development Co., Ltd. (Seal)
8.5.13 The current repair, fault repair and specified repair must be performed for the test equipment in strict accordance with the repair system, technical maintenance regulations and the requirements of the ex-factory instruction.
Figure 4.8.2 Construction Process Chart of Pipe Jacking
. Integrated wiring and management computer system;
(1) The Nominal Diameter Of The Relief Valve Shall Be Consistent With The Pipe Diameter; The Pressure Gauges Shall Be Installed Before And After The Relief Valve Node.
(1) Construction preparation:3 months from Oct. 1, 2016 to Dec. 31, 2016.
Supervisor (official seal): Zhejiang Communications Construction Group Co., Ltd.
1) Steel pipes directly buried in concrete shall only be provided with dust removal treatment on the surface without painting.
All cores of a strand shall smoothly enter the connector lug, without loose and exposed core outside the connector lug; and specification of the wiring connector shall match with the specification of wire; all connectors shall be crimped firmly without looseness; the cable insulation layer shall enter the connector lug sleeve.
5. The slope in front of 0# and 1# abutments shall extend to the abutment front by subgrade works behind the abutment. Engineering quantities have been calculated and listed.
2.2. Inspect the lubricating oil of unclamping cylinder in the machining center every six months. If the oil is insufficient, add the oil in time.
2) Support protection for cable laying of the horizontal subsystem
e) Bidding work schedule;
System partition shall be determined in accordance with the data provided by the Employer.
Prepare all construction technologies and materials in advance, and start construction as soon as the site conditions permit.
This area shall be measured by surface thickness gauge, and the sampling shall be obtained at a position far away from the reinforcement.
According to the construction division of the project, the crisscrossing horizontal control network shall be led to the upper surface of the roof steel structure in each construction area. During construction, the construction personnel shall measure and place the control lines of purlin, bottom slab, panel and gutter support in sequence according to the horizontal control network.
(19) Layout and installation diagram of underframe equipment;
Each subdivisional works and part of works are distinguished by a code formed by three grids for appraisal:
It is calculated as per the Chinese Code according to the inspection results, the flexural bearing capacity of this abutment is satisfying in the checking calculation, but the shear bearing capacity and crack width are unsatisfying.
Costs of evaluation, monitoring and rectification of major hazards and potential accidents
(2) The construction contractor shall provide management personnel to carry out on-site management on the transportation and disposal of the muck, so as to avoid rough loading and transportation and improper dumping.
2.4.6. Temporary Facility and Utility Plan
In this area, the strong structure, developed faults and structural joints, steep slopes, as well as the cutting of structural joints to the rock mass make some rock mass on steep slopes unstable and even collapse under the action of exogenous geologic agent like gravity. The collapsed rock piles up at the toes of steep slopes and constitutes the rock piles of different scales.
Water surface slope, flood elevation and three hydrological sections of the water course are measured on spot and flood gradient is 0.0021.
After being taken away from the site, all the labor protection articles that have been worn in toxic workplaces shall be stored after disinfection. They shall not be taken to the living area, to avoid pollution to the environment by toxic.
The applied pressure is released when the required lip height is achieved and free-heating is continued for a duration defined in parameter schedule;
2. For grave treatment section, both sides shall be excavated into step shape from the edge. The step is 2m wide and 2m high. Then it shall be backfilled with mountain excavation gravel in layers and compacted. The compactness shall be improved by 1% based on the subgrade compaction standard.
Fax: 029-84244878 Telephone number: 029-86195397Email:fuwuchu@xdxk.comNo.:
Wall top elevation: 166.785 (166.783)
The Contractor shall focus on controlling prices in the processes of procurement and construction.
6. The top of the pile embedded in the pile cap shall be cut 50mm high, and the pile side shall be roughened.
remove all other Goods from the Site, except as necessary for safety, and leave the Site.
According to the requirements of the structural design and technical specifications of the project, several trial mixtures are conducted to determine the optimal mix proportion.
3. Box members shall be moved to relevant layer for stacking in accordance with installation requirements and site environmental conditions.
Adopt the method of vertically layering and horizontally advancing for concrete pouring with layer thickness of 30 cm;
(6) Technical Code for Building Slope Engineering (GB50330-2013);
The paving of asphalt mixtures shall be conducted through continuous operation. The roller shall not run through the non-protected ends of the newly paved mixtures. The transverse joint shall be formed at the end of previous stroke.
For services, the supplier will be selected after the evaluation of the following relevant standards except the direct cost: the quality, the reputation, the risk, the specification, the equipment capacity, the proprietary technology, the schedule, the project cost, the payment terms, the transportation cost, the labor cost, the material cost, the safety performance, the qualification, the business scope, the terms and the conditions.
When the maximum daily treatment capacity 600 ton/day (120% load), the flue gas will be 78,308 Nm³/h, the flue gas flow rate will be 3.78m/s, and the flue gas residence time in the radiation area with a temperature above 850℃ will be 2.1s (over 2s).
The CPU 317-2 PN / DP is used as the central processor.
Inspect whether the encoding devices of gateway valve/smart valve are correct.
Safety of temporary electricity utilization and fire prevention facilities of construction site.
(1) The percent of pass of inspection lots, subdivisional works and divisional works in quality inspection shall reach 100%; acceptance rate shall reach 100%.
15.5.3EPS Technical Parameters and Requirements
See the drawing attached at the end of this Appendix for details about General Design Requirements of Office.
February 2017-December 2018
Decide the response level according to the accident state and start corresponding contingency plan.
Whole-set packing is adopted for delivery (attached documents are in the first case) of GA73 buffering roller conveyor.
5. Equipment Capacity: Lighting: 7.93kW (Socket capacity: 100w/Nr.), HVAC: 58.87kW.
a. Activities shall be carried out, when applicable, to obtain necessary capability and evaluate whether the measures taken are effective.
HSE Committee Office is responsible to organize preparation, release, modification, and control of company's HSE management system documents, establish the general list of HSE documents, and update.
Train crew apartments, office rooms, canteens, station buildings, etc
All attachments, including procurement terms and conditions, are an integral part of the Contract.
The air conditioner detects the actual temperature of the saloon and the outdoor temperature according to the return air temperature sensor and the fresh air temperature sensor of the air conditioning unit for each saloon and sends it to VCMe to be displayed on HMI.
The wireless data transmission system (WTD) can realize energy consumption information collection, vehicle working condition collection, network control system information exchange and communication with the ground server.
Lanzhou LS (China), THT (China),
Each saloon in the vehicle shall be provided with two 6kg ABC powder fire extinguishers, and the cab shall be provided with one 6kg ABC powder fire extinguisher.
(3) Relevant personnel shall call the police at the first time and ask the police to solve the crime, and corresponding witness and material evidence should be provided at the same time.
Failure to provide complete information or documentation required by the bidding documents may result in bid rejection.
5) Modifications to original HVAC scheme by Chinese scheme
{SimSun|b0|i0|c134|p2;draft center sill partition (2)}
\U+008260m ring beam in the silo bottom
9.2.3.2 Quality Management Measures
Figure Topology Structure Diagram of Three-layer BP Neural network
Suspended ceiling: mineral wool acoustic ceiling, with thickness not less than 15mm, 600X600,
The electric wire protection pipe entering the floor type power distribution box shall be arranged in order, and the pipe opening shall be 50 ~ 80mm higher than the foundation surface of the power distribution box.
Bogies are classified as motor bogies and trailer bogies. There are three types of bogies for Macedonian EMU and DMU Project: 1) motor bogie ZUC160-B0 for EMU; 2) trailer bogie ZUC160-2; 3) motor bogie ZUC160-B for DMU.
Broadcom 5709S onboard NIC with dual Gigabit Ethernet ports with TOE
It is recommended that the fitting part be not drilled to finished hole; the holes shall be slightly smaller to be drilled along with the fitting part.
When tank trucks cooperate, personnel commanding vehicles did not concentrate on works.
If it does not work, please read the distribution parameters and contact the manufacturer.
7. The water efficiency rating of plumbing fixtures is Grade 2.
The Contractor shall provide all fasteners required for the installation of equipment, including adjusting bolts, anchor bolts, nuts and casing pipes.
2. Strictly control the processing of materials, protect finished products during transportation, strengthen material acceptance, strictly check and control, improve the awareness of finished products protection during installation to protect finished works.
3. Party B shall issued an invoice in full contract price within 15 workdays before pick-up of goods, and Party A shall pay Party B 40% of the total contract price as the delivery payment after receiving such invoice.
Figure 8.7-6: Assembly drawing of controller for electrical barrier machine
The diameter of pit may be generally greater than that of plant roots or soil balls by 0.2-0.3m. See Table 2-4 for specific provisions.
Its conductivity shall be ensured, and its gaps shall be leveled by oil putty and then painted.
For the drilling in direct circulation with slurry made from virgin clay and in favorable soil, making the drilling machine idle without drilling in can be performed, simultaneously with water injection.
Activate fire-extinguishing device and equipment inside the court area to carry out preliminary fire extinguishing and self-rescue works, and assist the fire department in fire extinguishing works.
Aluminum alloys, with high-strength and low-density, are the most useful means to reduce the dead weight.
The water in water supply system is introduced from the outdoor water supply network, which also satisfy its water consumption and water pressure.
We have also to point out that so far there has been no registration system that is centralized, open to public and covers all laws, regulations and rules promulgated by central and local authorities neither in China nor in Nepal.
12.3.3 When steel truss girders are assembled by cantilever or half-cantilever, the quantity of drift pins at connections shall be determined according to the load that they will bear, but shall not be less than half of the quantity of bolt holes and high strength bolts shall be arranged in the remaining holes.
Between a control input port and a housing: no breakdown or flashover for 1 minute under DC 1050V
Lubricating points and the lubricating oil or grease used shall be indicated on the assembly drawing of components.
(1) The project department should keep all the documents related with purchase, such as supplier qualification verification, qualified supplier directory, purchase plan, contract, order, acceptance record and storage records,etc.
8.1.1 Site survey: The project site is located in the Siem Reap City, Kingdom of Cambodia. The Organizer will not organize site survey due to objective reasons. The tenderer can organize site survey after purchasing the RFP. The organizer shall provide assistance as much as possible but shall not assume any risks and responsibilities.
(Nasang Village, Nongkan Village and Guli Village) Printer: HP5200X (A3 format)
Firstly, improve major risks involved in safety, such as tire pressure monitoring and unstable parts to keep basic operation of vehicles.
Inc. hydrological manuals and various hydrological atlas of regional geological structures, earthquakes, meteorology, precipitation data, river systems, historical floods and water conservancy development, etc.
This kind of drawings shall be considered as the basis for the Contractor in equipment procurement, supply and installation after winning the bidding.
Due to the large quantity of precipitation and fast flood in rainstorm season in Nigeria, flood control measures shall be taken during construction, and the best construction time is dry season.
E. Minimum construction temperature for slurry seal coat shall be not lower than 10°C; it is strictly prohibited to conduct construction in the rain, and the mixture not formed upon paving shall be removed in case of rain.
Contract Agreement for Suining-Ziyang Civilworks Construction Contract Section TJ2 of Sichuan Suining-Ziyang-Meishan Expressway
a) D1: Leading suppliers: They are the suppliers with a large production scale, advanced management mode and strong technical strength, hold the leading role in the technology and market of the industry, and can assist the Company in expanding new markets.
Its scope of impact is related to the surrounding environment of the project site. The scope of impact is wider with open terrain, and smaller with blocking buildings in the surrounding area.
5.5.11 Earthing bars and terminals shall be welded for reinforcement meshes according to the design requirements. In addition, picture/video files shall be kept.
In line with the principle of high requirement and service reliability, effective measures about environmental protection are carried out for environmental management in order to meet national emission standard.
The stripping length shall be based on the connector lug used, and ensure that cable core can be seen from the observation hole.
For salient pole rotor winding, measurement shall be conducted for its joints between pole coils.
The storage group should make arrangement of taking-over properly according to contract (order), procurement plan or arrival notice.
The total investment of the Project is RMB 475578 million.
The retaining plank cannot be installed until the concrete of pile body reaches the designed strength.
It starts from station A6, extends along the Great North Road, existing railway, and Independence Avenue, and ends at station A14. It has a total length of 8.84km all laid overhead and provides 9 stations, including 2 transfer stations.
2 Shall remove the camera protective cover first before the mounting of fastening screw during installation.
XD/XKYX-QZB-0418Education System for Occupational Health, Safety and Environment
Will be used when driving car , parking car or when the equipment needs isolation.
Tourist area signs are divided into two categories: guide signs and tourist area symbols.
during which the bolt shall be knocked in freely after aligning the bolt holes of upper and lower or front and rear connecting plates by using pointed crowbar and nail punches .
No. 329 Announcement of the Ministry of Housing and Urban-Rural Development of the People's Republic of China
Blockage coefficient β (the ratio of the blockage length and the base plate resistance line): when the blasthole is generally parallel to the bench slope, β = 0.75; when the blasthole is perpendicular and the bench wall surface angle α is 60° ~ 70°, then β = 0.75 ~ 1.20, higher α corresponds to lower β.
For the performance evaluation of the bidders in China over the past eight years (January 2010 - present), the bidders will be scored for similar projects in China.
4.4 The outsourcing of special processes, if any, shall be implemented by the responsible department in accordance with SINOMA-TIANJIN-EM-SP87 Regulations on Management of Outsourcing and Subcontracting.
Pencil hardness shall be determined according to the provisions in GB/T 6739-1996.
All branches and the Project Department should strengthen technical foundation work, perfect the necessary technical information such as general construction layout, road traffic diagram and evacuation diagram,.
Turn the flashing knob of red marker light on the console to the flashing position, and the red marker lights at both ends will flash.
After the hole pile is driven into 3m, the system of "forced air supply to well before underground operation" shall be persisted prior to the implementation of underground operation every time. The ventilation quantity shall be no less than 25L/S. The distance between the air outlet and operating personnel shall be no more than 2m. During the ventilation, all the personnel shall wear antivirus gas masks.
CRRC Nanjing Puzhen Co., Ltd. will formulate and submit a comprehensive safety analysis report at the last design stage and update the report at the remaining stages as per the contract and submit the official report before the delivery of first train.
Peak-hour one-way passenger flow 45000~70000 persons/h
So says in "Hani Apeicongpopo": "Tapo was an able woman. She gave birth to the world.
6. The cross beam at the external corner of the floor staircase and hall of the masonry structure has a bearing length and is connected with the ring beam.
There is difference between the pictures of the same texture pattern taken by different cameras, which results in lower templating precision and higher misreporting rate of the inspection system.
(2) After the goods arriving at the vehicle manufacturing factory, the vehicle supplier shall keep the receiving records (receive on box basis, and check box external package, and appearance completeness) and confirm.
In order to prevent mortar leakage, a 40 rubber hose shall be used as waterstop outside the channel steel.
10T Juli T-BX30-1 1/2
4. The residential toilets are mostly made of non-metallic pipes such as aluminum-plastic pipes and PPRs. Considering the factors such as the replacement of pipes for secondary decoration, some equipotential bonding terminal boxes are still reserved.
Figure 4-17Profile of S293S3 Foot Switch
Definition: It is made by laying prefabricated track slabs through cement-asphalt-mortar adjustment layers on cast-in-situ reinforced concrete base with a convex platform and it adapts to the structural form of ballastless track (with unit track slabs) of zpw-2000 track circuit.
All the pipes shall be connected by T-joint, and the longitudinal drainage pipe shall be wrapped by geotechnical cloth after being connected with the T-joint.
There are three major roads from Yura to south area. See the following figures and tables for details.
8 output interfaces for composite video, 8 sets of audio output simulating RCA (left and right channels.
3. As for coordinate figure, 3010 is omitted before X, and 3738 is omitted before Y.
Drainage ditches will be arranged in the temporary production area to maintain workable drainage facilities. The temporary drainage must be subject to the treatment and disinfection in accordance with the drainage standard and the requirements of local environmental protection authorities.
1.3.6.2.3 Alternative 3- Local Alternatives
When the upper framework of the door jamb is installed, the levelness error shall not be higher than 1/1000.
1.1 The route passes forest reserves at the following chainages:
7. The Bidder agrees to provide all data or information related to its bid as you may require, and fully understands that you may not necessarily accept the bid with the lowest price or any bid received.
Automatic switch of the safety line turnout after route release
The protective fence shall be installed at 0.5m within the right-of-way, and the simple wire fences with concrete columns 1.5m high shall be adopted.
The Supervision Engineer shall determine the number of days for extension of construction period after properly negotiating with the Contractor and submitting to the Employer for approval, and shall inform the Contractor and send a copy to the Employer.
2) The liaison meeting between vehicle tenderer and the signaling system tenderer
1. Move the two vehicles that need to be coupled close to the coupler.
During the trial operation, all equipment, materials and (sub) systems shall operate continuously without failure in actual operation mode.
Work profile: work profile, construction plane layout, construction requirements and technical assurance
Book size: 880 x 1230 1/16Sheet: 0.75Number of words: 17,000
Control the software through operation system to protect and control test data and strictly control the access to program source library.
2.The system design of vehicle and core E & M equipment shall cover:
Practice: Lay a suction pad on the poured, vibrated and leveled concrete surface, and then power the vacuum device to extract the free water out of the concrete.
Wheel rotation and sliding protection are not applicable to the traveling system.
(9) The equipment, or its ground and cable layout should be reasonable, as not to generate any interference detrimental to the performance of other equipment, or cause any nuisance or discomfort to personnel.
To ensure the reliability of emergency power supply, EPS is required to meet its environmental conditions and to be technology advanced, safe, fast and reliable, simple wiring, economical and reasonable, mature production process, compact structure, convenient installation, maintenance and management. All elements and devices and materials in EPS shall have flame retardant or nonflammable characteristics.
Indoor lightings shall meet the functional requirement of different room, mainly with LED and energy conservation tube lights; rooms with decor requirements shall select lightings as required, with satisfying illuminance to relevant requirements.
The mold shall be checked before installation for whether there are debris, and such debris shall be cleaned up.
Each sealing element of the electrical connector and base is of good sealing performance.
10. General superintendent of the Fengjie-Yuanyang Expressway on the Hangzhou-Lanzhou National Key Line.
For the restoration, these temporary on-site roads or access roads shall be at least restored to the conditions before the commencement and comply with requirements for drainage.
14. Anti-collision movable guardrails are set at the median opening and the tunnel link opening. The movable guardrails are the movable guardrails with a class of Am (40m/ area).
8.8 After the above procedures, let it rest until it (the first treatment) solidifies.
350 railway speed available in Beijing-Tianjin, Zhengzhou-Xi'an, Wuhan-Guangzhou, and Shanghai-Hangzhou lines
(Uniform Social Credit Code/Organization Code: 911101156908178188)
It shares the same testing system with operational stability test specified in Paragraph 4.19.
(Total building area: 383.14m2; building area of this floor: 191.57m2; 6 dormitories)
(1) The drawings and technologies used for the project need to be kept confidential and are not allowed to be used for other construction projects.
5) Longitudinal construction joints shall be avoided and horizontal construction joints shall be reduced.
⑤ The paintcoat (coating) of the distribution cabinet shall be intact without any damage.
Reply: the communication specialty will set up related equipment in the dispatching office, work area, maintenance workshop and dormitory, etc.
Exercise basic management and organize the technicians and operators of various work types to study the technical standards.
However, it is both realistic and effective as to how to form a more convenient and efficient multi-layer transportation network by coordinating multiple modes of transportation.
(1) The messenger wire and contact wire are erected and preliminary elongation is completed, and the messenger wire resets, and cantilever bears all weight of the contact suspension, and the cantilever in longitudinal line direction has been adjusted to the standard position as per the temperature and then carry out dropper measurement.
5.2.1 Overall Ideas and Principles
The detailed design stage will begin directly after the contract is signed and comes into force or commencement.
TCU software requirements specifications for HCMT Project, overall TCU software test specifications for HCMT Project, test case, TCU software execution record for HCMT Project, exception report, and validation report of non-testable items
After completing laying grille in each floor or sub-unit, operators shall block the reserved holes, openings and ports.
The axles are hollow axles, and the axle material is EA4T. The axle strength meets EN13104 requirements, and the axle meets EN13261 requirements.
Electrification Reconstruction Project (Section Under Wuhan Railway Bureau) of Luoyang - Zhangjiajie Section of Jiaozuo - Liuzhou Railway
The State Council's department in charge of the information industry shall propose the important telecommunications service charge rates that are to be fixed by the government, seek the opinion of the State Council's department in charge of pricing and issue and implement such charge rates after approval by the State Council.
9. Soil and stone design parameters shall be based on and subject to the test data after summary and analysis ( of the samples with the same cause of formation and from the same region).
Arequipa Department is the second largest economic region of Peru and the economic center in southern Peru. Arequipa City is the second largest city in Peru.
B. The corners of the protruding base layer should be trowelled into an arc, and the arc radius should be 50mm.
Fig. 2.2.4-1Vehicle Outline, Vehicle Clearance and Equipment Clearance at Ground Straight Section
Pull out the air inlet pipe of the air pressure switch in the control box, and then clean the air inlet pipe with a high-pressure air gun, as shown in 5.1;
When the output power recovers to the allowed band appointed by the specification, the system must transfer the load back to UPS but not affect the normal work.
Existing problems: There are no detailed plans for the construction drawings to be provided. The Design Consortium shall predict the priorities while providing the construction drawings in the future, so as to make effective work arrangements.
This form may be completed or printed as required based on the above content.
Section K3 (K65+500~K69+000)
Civil engineering construction of Taizhou-Jinhua Expressway Northern Extension Project (DS4 Bid Section)
See Fig. 17 for installation schematic diagram of damper and anti-rolling bar.
The office area shall be arranged in north side of the site, 2-storey light steel prefabricated house or color steel plate prefabricated house shall be adopted, and specific contents are as follows:
Environmental condition temperature: 0,rel ty: 100% (outdoor).
2.6.5.3 Procedures of Single Unit and Whole Group Tests of Traction Substation
The water inlet is almost completely blocked (V=8m2). See Figure 3.
ask the Owner to help us to collect such documents as design codes for railway bridges and culverts of Pakistan and determine the technical codes and specifications to be applied to this line by referring to the technical standard system to be applied to line ML-1; carry out comparison between the codes of Pakistan and those of China if necessary.
1. The arrangement distance of reinforcement at the top layer and bottom layer of the top plate is the same, with 4.5m at both ends and spacing of 100mm; other reinforcement are parallel to the down track with the spacing of 100mm and the spacing of the last one is zero.
Rock is not a good heat conductor. When temperature changes, rock surface and the interior expand and shrink by uneven heating, and a long-term result of this process is breakage of the rock.
Basis of the scheme preparation is: Attachment 2 Packing and Transport Requirements, Packing and transport Requirement of FPK16026DD-0000-PU01-SPE-01
The construction of engineering piles shall not be started until the test piles meet the design requirements.
No. 24-302, Yunlin Road, Xiling District, Yichang, Hubei Province
Specific fault definitions and corresponding solutions are shown in Table 13.
When the track bed is in preliminary stable stage after ballasting and trimming by layers, the mechanics parameters shall comply with the following regulations: The bearing rigidity of track bed shall not be less than 70kN/mm and the transverse resistance shall not be less than 7.5 kN/sleeper.
The detailed design plan is scheduled to be completed at the end of May 2019. The construction drawing design involving the construction part to be started in advance should be completed ahead of schedule to adapt to the construction progress.
A-level pavement petroleum asphalt is used for surface layer and base course.
9. The Agreement shall be made in 2 originals and 20 copies, with 1 original and 10 copies held by each party hereto respectively.
WB3——self - gravity of wall heel ( kN );
Well-equipped combustibles and explosives warehouse and corresponding usage and management system;
4 The inspection results shall be recorded on the Inspection Records for Purchase Parts.
Connect the pump coupling to the pump shaft, lift the impeller components, fasten the impeller components on the pump shaft with nuts and washers, and then cover with the impeller chimney, fasten and lift the pump shaft with bolts, adjust the bearing position, seal the bearings with axial water-lubricating static water seal and finally adjust bearings' verticality, and install the pump shaft in place.
The bolt (fender piles) shall be generally set with a distance to the side piles so that the side piles can be timely restored after loss.
C. Participating in quality, environment, especially occupational health and safety affairs;
Liability statement on environmental protection shall be signed to clarify the goals of environmental protection.
25kV, 60Hz/12.5 kV, 60Hz/12kV 25HZ
In order to make full use of railway transport capacity and to improve railway passenger revenue, the following measures are taken: improving the seat occupancy rate at originating terminal through short-distance tickets reallocation for departure station, ensuring the long-distance tickets are sold to long-distance passengers by setting up restricted tickets sale station, adjusting the difference of supply and demand by adopting tickets sharing and improving the seat occupancy rate at terminal by adopting seat multi-use.
Article 12 Environmental protection work shall be incorporated in the production and operation activities to implement the whole-process, all-weather and all-personnel environmental protection management, and the environmental protection content shall be included in the work arrangement, inspection, summary and evaluation.
Left wiper motor (on the door) m75
3. Put all trained and qualified employees into trail run;
This testing vehicle supports connection with various kinds of testing modules. The customer can decide the configuration freely as he/she needs.
The main construction contents of this stage include: construction and decoration of temporary office on site, temporary road laying, construction water and power supply and network communication access, etc.
This Project is a PPP Project. In order to promote the project construction, according to the bidding document and relevant national provisions, the owner and general contractor sign following agreements:
Platform: effective length of platform shall be 120m; that of island platform shall not be less than 8m, and that of side platform shall not be less than 3.5m; height of platform shall be 1.04m (to rail top surface); distance from center line of track to edge of platform shall be 1.5m.
4. The height of the added cap should be at least 1m; otherwise, it will be treated by thickening the pile cap. The width for the flange edge of added cap is controlled by the rigid angle of 30 ~ 35 degrees, and the plane dimension is rounded in decimeter.
1. Due to adjustment of the center of gravity of the bridges, GK20+476, GK28+142, Qom River Bridges No. 1 and No. 2, the coordinates of the pile foundations of Qom bridge No. 1, the pile foundation positions of pier No. 2 of Qom bridge No. 2, and piers No. 1, No. 3 and No. 4 of Qom Bridge No. 2 in Version A have been adjusted. See the attached drawings and table for details.
The TBM cutter head is embedded. Therefore, it is difficult to rotate the cutter head.
After paving of surface course, dry cement powder should be scattered on road surface and swept into block gaps.
Make sure that the arrangement of cable does not pose a threat of damaging the cable.
Single-axle monorail uses rubber spring, which provides poor vibration isolation, further distance to the vehicle center, and large vehicle swinging.
Learn the linkage process of DCS operating system and emergency braking system;
SZK/CX 090702-2014 (H) Determination and Review Procedure for Product Requirements
There were 1903 ships that had berthed at the port throughout the year of 2015, 9.5% up from that in 2014.
Data of the first ten pieces of pipes shall be recorded in the incoming inspection report, and the rest of pipes shall be expressed with range values. Each unqualified pipe shall be recorded.
Design and calculation reports for field operations.
It is applicable to the identification and confirmation of special process in the production process.
Traffic Development Speed = GDP Growth Rate XElastic Coefficient;
Area of office, production and maintenance building:39.6*7.2*2F m2
3) Before hoisting, the inside of the air duct must be cleaned. The stub-end shall be seal and capped after hoisting; clean iron scum after opening holes, the inside of the air duct must be kept clean during construction to strictly prevent construction wastes from falling into the air duct.
According to the requirement of Wang Tongjun, deputy general manager of China Railway Corporation, the operation and maintenance scheme for Boten-Vientiane Railway should be improved and re-submitted to our company for review.
Sign the Contract of Work Safety for Engineering Technical Services with contractors, EPC contractor and subcontractors when signing economic contracts for engineering technical services with them, to make clear respective management responsibilities for work safety and safety measures to be taken by laws and to appoint the full-time management personnel for work safety to conduct safety inspection and coordination.
6.3 ProjectRisk Identification and Control Table of Product Realization Process (to be kept by Quality Management Department for 5 years)
Corrosion, (45 steel sheet, 100°C, 3h)
3.15.9 In the "fund source", it shall be indicated that the research fund is obtained from superior unit or self-raised.
2) The installation of the external locking device shall conform to the construction installation requirements. The locking rod and locking iron shall be free of burrs and fin, and the primer or coating shall be uniform, without paint leakage or skip plating.
Wheel slide protection test (AW0 load) (type test)
After confirming the information by the Emergency Leading Team of the Company, relevant functional department of the Company shall report it to Changqing Headquarter and their respective functional departments of Chuangqing Company and feed back the emergency development by means of follow-up reports, thus providing further conditions and information.
It can be seen that this is an important reason why Chinese staffs cannot be promoted to management positions.
There are two existing slab culverts in the upstream, one of 1-7.0*6.0m at the large mileage end and one of 1-5.0*3.5m at the small mileage end.
2.5.2.4 Construction Method and Process of Three-phase AC Switch Device
Tunnel works: two tunnels in this bid lot.
2.1 The construction procedures of asphalt concrete treatment base are: subgrade base clearance → survey and setting-out → construction of prime coat → test section → asphalt concrete mixing → asphalt concrete transportation → asphalt concrete paving → rolling → curing and traffic control → joint treatment.
The vehicles shall be able to run safely on elevated and ground lines.
According to the calculation result, under gravity only, the maximum deflection of the cradle arm is 103 mm; with gravity + 400 kg loads, the total deflection at the front end of the cradle arm is 171 mm.
2Longitudinal single-hole heavy load: Maximum eccentricity of pier body : 2.835 (2.938) m Maximum compressive stress of concrete: 4.48 (17.70) MPa
Equal tee dn63PN=0.8MPa
Qualification certificates and work licenses of special operating personnel.
Repeated grounding is performed where necessary, with the grounding resistance of not greater than 10Ω.
If no applicable standard is mentioned, the goods shall meet with the latest version of standard issued by relevant authorities of the People's Republic of China.
Article 46 When the General Meeting of Shareholders is held, the Company will employ a lawyer to provide legal opinions on the following issues:
According to CQ [2012] No. 16 document, the Group calculates and withdraws work safety fee as per 1.5% for the highway construction business revenue, and calculates and withdraws work safety fee as per 2.00% for the railway construction business revenue.
The value is low, there is a wide variety and the market supply is adequate.
The cement stabilized detritus base layer and the base shall be designed according to the mix composition of the sample to be used in the laboratory before construction, and the test results shall be submitted for approval.
(5) The farmland along the route is scarce, so comprehensive measures will be taken in the design to reduce land occupation, and the protection and reuse of cultivated (humus) soil shall be well done.
⑵. All entrances, exits, holes, hoisting areas, overhead wires and other dangerous operation areas shall be provided with safety measures such as enclosure or isolation, safety signs and red light at night for alarm.
The steel frame is processed in the processing room outside the portal as per the design. The connecting plates are welded at both ends of each segment and connected with bolts.
(Secondary beam shall be installed after the installation of deaerator of ▽18.000m layer)
5. Click "Mode Change" menu on station CTC train operation terminal, select "center control" on the pull-down menu at the "operation mode change" menu popped out and click on "OK". Confirmation dialog box can pop out on central control display terminal.
Since the pipes have different grades and specifications, the rated values of internal hydraulic test obtained by one factory or workshop shall be not less than the pressure rating indicated in the drawings, i.e. the internal test pressure has been specified in appropriate standards and codes.
If the temperature of a spring is 5℃ higher than the local average annual temperature, the spring could be considered as a hot spring.
Class 3 standard of Environmental Quality Standards for Noise (GB3096-2008).
When the slag power is used as admixture, the composite technology of slag power and fly ash should be adopted.
10.14. Work room, machine room, distribution cabinet, kitchen, and each compartment are respectively provided with 1 smoke alarm probe.
In April 2006, the Djibouti government implemented interconnection with Ethiopian power grid. "Electricity Procurement Contract" was signed between the two countries. Now, the electric power transmission line is constructed and has been put into service.
The safety engineer of the Project Department shall regularly check the implementation results of fire control. Such results shall be sampled at any time and be kept in good conditions;
The traditional Chinese medicine for "epidemics", and masks should be distributed to all staff, and all offices shall be disinfected every day. The outing of employees shall be strictly controlled while the entry of foreign staff shall be strictly controlled as well, so as to block the infectious sources of "epidemics" and ensure the health of staff.
Zone 4 (6\U+00D7B+D)
d. Emergency and preventive measures shall be communicated to the potentially affected areas as soon as possible, so as to facilitate the affected entities and personnel to take measures;
Table 1-4 Details of Power-off Insulation Tray (Left: Positive, Right: Negative)
The hydraulic brake system which employs microcomputer electro-hydraulic brake control is composed of electronic control unit, hydraulic unit, foundation brake rigging, accumulator, sanding device and electromagnetic rail brake rigging.
The photovoltaic power station shall plan the personnel evacuation drawings in case of emergency and issue it to all the personnel:
Table B.3 Monitoring Seismic Station Threshold Alarm Information (AD003) (continued)
According to the nature of soil source and design requirements, improved soil shall be improved by chemical improvement method and constructed by field mixing method.
After completion of tests on low-voltage supply system, positive cooperation shall be given to the tests in other disciplines.
15.2.8A set of AC UPS equipment (including storage batteries) and AC switching distribution cabinet shall be installed for the dedicated communication system in the communication equipment room of the signal building.
⑤ After the patients are medically stable, investigate and record poisoning events.
On the Zestaphoni side of Dzirula station, from 2330+211.67km, the track has a curve radius less than 400m.
Semi-finished and finished products of reinforcement will be delivered to the site by platform trailer.
Solvency is to inspect the financial status and solvency of each year in the project calculation period through the calculation of "calculation sheet of loan repay capital with interest", "Cash flow statement of financial plan" and "Balance sheet", and calculate the asset-liability ratio, liquidity ratio, quick ratio and repayment period of construction investment loan.
Obtained the Post Certificate of Railway Supervising Engineer in 2016.
1 Specification, type and quality of equipment2 Installation of on-line insulating inspection system3 Installation of on-line cable temperature measurement system4 Installation of monitoring system for environmental safety
Connection of structures for bridge at Km0+992.5: June 1, 2020 to June 30, 2020.
IEC 60068 is a series of standards, and now only No. 178-185 are selected for submission.
12.4.5 Communication between Parties of the Project
Highways are adopted as accesses to substations.
5.3 Annex 3: Estimated Workload for Design Subcontracting - Project Cost (FC-ER010101C.03-2020)
Quality inspection shall be conducted to the steel structure before installation and proper treatment measures shall be developed after analysis and research in case of any defect and distortion, followed by modification or repair, in order to have it meet the design requirements.
The materials and equipment used in the Project for anti-freezing include: 3 spreading trucks, 1 loader, 3 transport vehicles, 200t industrial salt and 300t snow-melting agents.
The management office, service area, rest area, maintenance area, monitoring system, communication system, toll collection system and safety facilities are built at one time.
(2) Subgrade works: m+6 ~ m+13, a total of 8 months;
(3) The part within 1.0m below the surface course underside of subgrade bed in ballastless section (upper bottom course structure of subgrade bed) is filled with coarse-grained soil containing soluble salt less than 0.3%; the content of soluble salt in the coarse-grained soil filling material 1.0 m below the surface course underside of subgrade bed shall not be more than 1.5%, and the content of fine grains shall not be more than 5%.
Figure 4.37-20RF Disturbance of the MTR EMU to the Outside in 30 MHz–230MHz (Traction Condition)
Standard of travel allowances in Finland: 15 dollars (about RMB 91.4 Yuan)/person/day X 4 days;
If any quality accident is found, it shall be reported to the Supervisor and the Owner in time, and shall be handled in strict accordance with the scheme approved by the Designer, the Supervisor or the Owner.
Nigeria L0T15High Voltage Side Circuit Breaker Purchase Contract
Different voltage is input to the ventilator through the transformer to make the ventilator output different air volumes.
According to the Assessment Method for Solar Energy Resource (QX/T89-2008), the site area of the photovoltaic power station belongs to the solar energy resources rich area, and solar energy resources in photovoltaic power stations area have certain utilization value.
We will complete the main line of Lot 2 by the end of the year as promised.
Note: This form is made incopies, and filled out by the Subcontractor, with the Contractor and the Contractor's Project Department each holding one copy, and the Subcontractor holdingcopy (copies).
1. The process design team is not capable of effectively implementing process design and improving (risk control indicators).
The general material storage contains material storage and material yard.
For embankment-cutting transition section, road-bridge transition section, road-tunnel transition section, embankment-transverse structure (interchange frame structure, box culvert, etc.) transition section and short subgrade transition section, etc., the embankment connected with it shall be constructed at the same time.
3. During the signing of procurement contract and transportation disclosure, the environmental protection requirements on material, earthwork and garbage transportation shall be clarified.
After the trowelling machine finishes its work, subsequent jobs such as edge cleaning, joint makeup, paste removal, and repair of missing edges and corners should be done.
1. Excavate the retaining wall foundation pit according to the settlement joints and expansion joints in the design drawings, and at the same time, carry out water interception and drainage, diversion and pumping for the foundation pit.
The center pile and axis of the culvert should be set out on the surface-cleared subgrade with a total station. The center pile and axis should be protected at proper positions and construction setting out of the culvert should be carried out accordingly.
(5) Allocate toll collectors in areas under jurisdiction;
The copping concrete of both portals is damaged with reinforcement exposed; the concrete of 1# and 2# cover plates see local pitted surface and exposed reinforcement; the jointing mortar of the culvert body sees local falling; the culvert and the water outlet see deposit; 8# cover plate is displaced and loose.
Top surface shall be finished after the completion of concrete pouring.
For vertical crack, the first and the last grouting points shall be placed in the bottom and top respectively or around such place; for horizontal crack, grouting point shall be placed on both ends or around such place.
B. Pull the wires at the coil with manpower and take back all the wires in the meantime;
If the sealed samples modify or change the provisions of the Contract, the Contracting Parties shall confirm it in the form of a written agreement.
It shall be able to keep the door normally opened and automatically recovered to the state of normally closed by setting parameters. In addition, it shall be able to set at least 4 different door entry modes respectively: card entry, password entry, card+password entry and no-pass mode.
Setting-out of the center line and position line: First, use theodolite and steel tape to measure the control vector high point of the axis and edge line (or arc line) of the column and beam of each building.
The material management leading group shall be responsible for the management and coordination of material planning and supply assurance for the whole section.
② The two cutting edges of the drill must be symmetrical to maintain a smooth cutting and reduce the vibration.
The input taxes of VAT received during the construction period will not be included in the project assets.
Organize the project construction tendering according to laws, codes and management provisions of the country where the Project is located on engineering construction tenderring.
(1) Under the leadership of the Project Manager and with the support of the Construction Manager, organize field HSE management works;
The distance between front wheelset centerline and the first axle centerline is 1475 mm, and the distance between front and rear wheelset centerlines is 7050 mm.
The quality records and data of all materials shall be sorted and kept. The completeness of proofs, certificates and test documents is a guarantee for traceability and integrity.
SS should be able to control media gateway or media resource server to send IVR (Interactive Voice Response) to complete various services such as secondary dialing.
when b=300/250, As=318;Ag=8@200(2).
As for nonconforming products which are qualified after reprocessing or assembly, the inspectors shall issue "Rework Notification" to production unit, and the production unit shall organize rework as soon as possible; after rework, the products shall be re-inspected one by one; the qualified ones will be put into use, but regarded as reworks during statistics;
There is a division of works but also a connection among them; they complete their own task in their own job; but they also coordinate with and restrict each other, in order to make the entire system work under the optimal status.
Utilities planned to be reserved (heating and cooling equipment in the terminal)
To bear certain pressure during temporary connection for such works as nitrogen replacement and adding oil in compressor
Breakpoints occur on the LOOP bus, two controllers communicate with each other as for information through the CAN bus, and the system functions are not affected.
Inspect and repair J-1 relay valve B2, replace necessary parts and carry out performance test
3) Coordinate and supervise the safety and environmental protection activities carried out by relevant project personnel.
(2) The isolation fence should be erected using Ø48*3.5mm steel pipes, which should be 2m high, the vertical bars should be 2m from each other and dense screen for protection should be hung at all places.
Parking Lot Investment Co. Ltd. of Shandong Hi-Speed Foreign Economic Cooperation Group
The Contractor shall submit a program of environmental protection and water and soil conservation measures for the construction period of the Contract to the Supervisor for approval while submitting overall construction layout design documents. The contents of the program include:
6.2 Appraisal of Resettlement Areas and Reconstruction and Ways of House and Land Resettlement
The steel, PTFE plate, and internal rubber of bearing should be guaranteed to have a corresponding life span, with the functions be ensured.
On July 11, 12, 13, and 16 of 2014, CRH380A-0251 EMU receives the 180km/h–385km/h operating test on the Shanghai–Kunming High-Speed Railway, and the test section is located between K742 (Nanchang West) and K855 down line.
Bill of Quantities of Na Teuy No.2 Tunnel at DK17+957.5
The roof solar collector shall be flat plate collector.
If the RBC has not received any message from NRBC during the configuration time in the handover process, RBC considers that the communication with the NRBC has timed out.
5.1 Before construction, protect finished and semi-finished productions of the previous process to avoid secondary pollution.
Amount of compensation = daily average operation revenue of each train in thirty (30) days before the train fails x non-operational days of the train.
Besides, corresponding lamps are set in areas with insufficient light, such as toilet, door area and gangway, to meet the illuminance requirements.
Technical Specification for Single-Vehicle Waterproof Testing Device
Platforms and drainage ditches are set between stages, and the width of platform is 2m.
Procurement of pipe materials, fittings, flange, valves, support materials, instruments, anti-corrosion materials and other materials required for new pipeline and supports for steam, nitrogen and plant air of Unit 2300;
Main transformer: add main transformer #2 and incoming line bays on the three sides of the transformer.
Yang Shangkun, Li Peng, Yang Dezhi, and Yu Qiuli watching the 67-type railway pontoon bridge model
Automatic fire alarm system, fire accident display panel (storey display)
04G415-1 Prestressed Concrete Line-bent Roof Truss (with Steel Strand as Prestressed Tendon, in a Span of 18 m ~ 30 m)
The composition of main commodities exported from China to Nepal and the composition of main commodities imported from Nepal to China are described in the figure below.
Pump mechanical seal fault or flange sealing washer damage ,
Flame-retardant copper core plastic cord ZR-BVR2.5mm
Meanwhile, the cofferdam is connected with the platform via a trestle with a width of 8m. The construction process flow for the pile foundation is as follows: construction of steel quay platform→pile testing→installation of steel pile casing→hole-forming by rotary drilling→hole cleaning→placement of reinforcement cage→underwater concrete placement.
Use a gas welder to unsolder the high pressure switch and the low pressure switch.
4.1.3 The Design Department must complete the design according to the standards and codes and quality assurance requirements stipulated in the Design Specifications or Technical Specifications and form the complete set of design documents that have the traceability to express the stipulated design requirements in the corresponding drawings and design documents
In 2017, the main task is theLTE-Hi scale construction, with 12 million sub-stations to be completed;
32~54%; Relative humidity: 14~83％
3. Report the Pre-feasibility Study to relevant national departments
Mud valve and well, well diameter: 1000mm, drainage pipe: DN200, well depth:2.5m
3. The galvanized flat steel should be vertically placed; for the connection between the horizontal grounding electrode and the connecting band, the connecting band may be bent horizontally (bending to the thickness direction) firstly, then the connection mode I may be used for welding; attention should be paid that upon horizontal bending, the bending radius should be higher than 2 times of the thickness.
11.1.4 Expired and invalid invoices which were canceled or stopped by tax authorities shall not used.
3) basin feature and features of rainfall and terrain are the main considerations.
(4) Tower/container/storage tank: clean and inspect the internal sundries and sludge; control the restoration quality of the demolished parts (trays, receiving tanks, supports, hangers, etc.); do a good job in opening of manholes and in heating and tightening quality control.
Fine sand (Q4al+pl): mainly grey yellow, mid-dense, slightly wet, with breccias, rubbles and block stones, widely distributed on the wall site area, and with a layer thickness of more than 5.00m.
24kV bus tie switch: time-limit over-current quick break protection and zero sequence current protection.
Goaf area distribution as well as mining conditions and methods, roof lithology and management; understand the design, implementation status and prospective mining plan for the mining area which is being exploited; preliminarily determine the goaf area and the influence scope;
5.2.2 HR department shall, in accordance with the Annual Recruitment Plan and actual management demands, break down or adjust the annual plan monthly, and develop Monthly Recruitment Plan as a basis for specific implementation of recruiting works.
(1) Side formwork: shall not be removed unless the concrete strength can ensure that the surface and edge of side formwork will not be damaged due to removal of formwork.
2. See the drawing of "MWSF 07-05" for the dimensions of portal end wall structure, in addition to these specified in this drawing. See the drawing of "ES (2015) 0090-18" for the dimensions of lining structure at opening section. See the drawing of "YMSF 23-14" for the connection of ditches and cable troughs inside and outside the tunnel.
In the EW15-EW14 section, overhead laying is adopted for the track instead of ground laying.
Combining with previous engineering experience in Turkmenistan, the followings should be done for procurement schedule control in order to avoid holding up work for lack of material during engineering implementation:
Construction scheme selection, route scheme selection and demolition works and land use condition of recommended scheme shall be complemented and analyzed.
The connector of pipelines and of pipeline and valves and compensators shall be constructed with thermal insulation structure on site.
3. The mix ratio of concrete shall be further determined through tests before the commencement, and it shall be strictly controlled in the construction, so that all technical indicators required in the design can be achieved.
It is allowed to leave scale, rust and old coating firmly adhered on the surface.
IP grade IP68 (under interlock condition)
It is required to install a general equipotential connection panel in transformer room, which should be.
4. Review and handle the change design issues according to the change design procedures and division of work.
Station, yard and local telecommunication line: different capacity of HYAT53 local cable and GYTA53 cable shall be laid according to user demand.
(3) For grading and other precautions that are not specified in the above atlas, refer to " Code for Construction and Acceptance of Water and Sewerage Pipeline Works" (GB 50268-2008).
Equipment: Tanzania Railways Limited provides a railcar with a carriage.
The monthly construction capacity is 9.6 kilometers (calculated according to 24 working days), and it takes 4.2 months to complete the earthwork.
(3) During the production of asphalt mixture, attentions should be paid to conduct the visual inspection about the uniformity of mixture, and the abnormal phenomenon should be analyzed in time.
Factory prefabrication, shop (site) fabrication, on-site casting
Operation period: the period when infrastructures are put the operation for forecasting analysis.
Maximum gradient of main line section shall be 30‰; minimum gradient shall be generally 3‰; longitudinal gradient of underground station shall be generally 2‰.
The verification requirements for the equipment and materials procured by the subcontractor shall be specified, to ensure that the provisions of Project Department are met.
The construction of pipeline system shall be completed in accordance with the engineering research provided by PEP, and any deviation shall be analyzed by the (contractor's) construction engineering research department, and shall be modified in strict accordance with relevant applicable laws, standards and specifications.
General equipotential bonding terminal box (MEB) is provided in the low-voltage distribution room, is in concealed installation (0.5m over the ground). 40X4 flat steel is adopted as the outgoing line of the general equipotential bonding terminal box.
Culvert (D3K16+067), interchange
(2) The formwork surfaces are clean, the joints are flat and seamless, and the formwork support is set up correctly and connected firmly.
1. ±0.000 in the drawing is equal to the internal ground elevation in the existing workshop.
The coating process was tested to demonstrate the ability to preprocess the surface with sandblasting and electric auxiliary tools, and the ability to apply the selected metal coating layer and paint layer.
Key Points of Carbon Dioxide Gas-Welded Semi-Automatic Welding
12.4.4 Project Budget (Fund) Control
(3) The design description has same validity with the drawings, and in case of any contradiction between them, the Employer and the Contractor shall put forward in a timely manner, and interpretation or drawing change offered by the Designer shall prevail.
2.2 As a comprehensive management department for quality management communication, the Quality and Safety Department shall receive, convey and process quality information for higher and industrial authorities.
This management method is prepared to improve the terminal security management and usage, standardize the effective terminal management of the company, prevent the information security incidents at the terminal, and promote the security, stability and high-efficiency of day-to-day official business and production in the company.
Owner: Nujiang Power Supply Bureau of Yunnan Power Grid Co., Ltd.
g. Hydrophilic expansion waterstop shall be provided longitudinally every 30 m for the transverse construction joints of ditch and cable trough, and kept away from the outlet of longitudinal drains, Φ100 transverse blind drains without openings and other positions.
The lower formwork of the large opening shall be provided with vent holes and supplemented with concrete and vibration.
The support and hanger components with relatively uniform specification and dimension shall be welded, and then the factory hot-dip galvanizing anti-corrosion treatment shall be carried out.
Provide predictive maintenance alarm based on past operation status and fault data.
Postal Code: __________
Other conditions (general information of the project of the accident; does the accident site influence the railway business line or the busy downtown area, express ways, national highways and other important facilities)
(3) The technical data and technical conditions in the design drawings and design documents completed according to the applicable laws and the standards and regulations agreed in this Contract shall be the basis for Engineering Materials procurement quality, Construction quality and Completion Tests quality.
6.3 Road roller compaction employs mist spray method; the wheels on roller shall be provided with adjustable scrappers, in order to keep the bituminous concrete from sticking onto the wheels.
SN 36350-2 Environmentally Compatible products-Hazardous substances, list of prohibited substances, list of substances to be avoided
a voucher for export rebates applied by units with export capability from the exchange office;
Check whether the certification mark meets the requirements.
(Parameters of the modes of time, measuring mode, measuring trigger mode, paper saving mode are standardized according to figures) (Check enabling prohibition in instrument property and data adjustment parameters and parameters are standardized according to figures)
GB/T 50081 Standard for Test Method of Mechanical Property on Ordinary Fresh Concrete
As the capping beam is constructed at high altitude, safety nets must be properly prepared: the supports shall be strictly designed and tested to ensure sufficient strength and rigidity to prevent slumping and downwarping.
1. Party A is not a group customer determined by Party B according to the Guidance on Risk management of Granting Credit to Group Customer of Commercial Bank (hereinafter referred to as Guidance).
Interim Measures for the Supervision and Management of Construction Quality of CNPC Greatwall Drilling Company
The project department will establish an environmental management system that is adapted to the safety and health management system: the environmental conservation management committee and the environmental conservation office, which is consisted of the main leaders of the project department , its relevant departments and heads of the work area.
List of Main Existing Mechanical Equipment Table 2-2-5
Operators must wear insulating glovers and insulating boots and stand on an insulating boards to conduct operations on the main circuit of high-voltage electric apparatuses.
In the calculation of energy efficiency, a correction coefficient shall be set for lightweight aggregate fine stone concrete in roof structure.
Provide the designated subcontractors and independent subcontractors with the construction machinery, ladders, tower cranes and other equipment which are installed at the construction site and properly allocate the use time;
Center Mileage D1aK12+250.000
3. Construction Clearance of Horseshoe-shaped Tunnel at Straight Sections
Both Parties agree that the design fee of the Contract is approximately RMB (in words) seven million seven hundred and sixty-seven thousand three hundred and twenty Yuan only (¥7,767,320).
Fine sand: grayish yellow, slightly dense ~ medium dense, slightly moist, mainly composed of quartz and feldspar, mixed with a small amount of silty clay, locally distributed, with a layer thickness of less than 2m in general, Class I soft soil, σ0=200kPa.
If the rod or part is rust and is without anticorrosive paint, deduct 4-6 points.
1) Angle steel, round steel or steel tube, rather than deformed steel, with the cross section not less than 48mm2, could be used as grounding bodies. The spacing between the two pieces in one grounding body shall not be less than 2.5m, and the burying depth shall not be less than 2m. The ground-resistance shall conform to provisions.
The tunnel passes through epimetamorphic rock stratum which is mainly of slates and sandstones mixed with limestones. The rocks are of uneven hardness. Greatly affected by the regional structure, the rock mass ranges from relatively complete to broken.
In the actual payment process to China Railway No. 2 Group Co., Ltd. the actual exchange rate used by the Company is not consistent with the exchange rate agreed in the Contract, and there are potential exchange losses.
4) The schedule shall indicate the mobilization and demobilization time of the Contractor's main construction equipment and indicate the schedule requirements of the main equipment and materials on site.
Performing recycling, warehousing and disposal of the surplus materials, undertaking contract closing and filing, and organizing the preparation of the procurement completion reports
C. If the jointing part with the structure cannot be rolled, the tamping board or tamping hammer is used for supplementary compaction.
3)The vehicle contractor will inform the Employer's representative to apply for the takeover certificate after the project is completed and 14 days before the takeover preparations are made.
- Large purple and white acrylic panel text logo
Open paper bank acceptance bill Open electronic banking acceptance billOpenletter of guarantee
2) Fire extinguishers are arranged at the stations with difficult conditions for fire water supply from the water feed stations (points) as per the specifications, which should be arranged in the vicinity of the new buildings.
3.5.5 Earthwork Backfilling and Pavement Recovery
8.1.4 Control of externally provided process, product and service
Convert the known annual average daily traffic (AAADT) to directional design hourly volume (DDHV).
It is required to perform the interface coordination between different equipment due to the very tight property of pink line so as to ensure the equipment quality and design cycle.
According to the above comprehensive comparison, Boten station is recommended as the tracking-laying base site for this line.
The dispatch telephones for traffic control and power supply control of the temporary dispatch station (or dispatch substation) are put into service.
Input power supply: AC220V±10%, 50Hz±3Hz;
1) Construction detail design shall be designed according to the approved detailed design documents, and shall not be replaced by specifications or standard atlas. No major design contents shall be left for on-site design by the construction technical team.
Ihejilu-Songgenshan Section of New Ihejilu-Jungadab Railway
2. Refer to the drawing for the practice_x000D_
Construction personnel in front of the track layer shall leave the track and stand at safety place.
Modification of Static Investment in the Verified Version Compared with the Revised VersionTable 28-3
Table 3-10: Statistics and Analysis of Locomotive Crew Routing for Lagos-Ibadan Railway
4.1.1 After the construction organizational design of unit works is approved, the project discipline-specific managers shall organize project discipline-specific engineers and subcontractors, and even the foremen (depending on the situation) for technical disclosure.
Mortar mixture and water are added to mortar agitator according to suitable water cement ratio.
Each terminal can be connected with two core wires at most.
4.10 Generally, the records prepared by the Quality Inspection Engineer shall include the following items:
It is easy to cause falling accident if operators operate carelessly during aloft operation in patrolling inspection and maintenance or violate regulations (such as failing to tie life rope) during aloft operation or due to negligence or other causes.
(5) Security control functions such as user identity authentication, access authorization, log records are provided.
 Public address system equipment and dedicated telephone system equipment;
(2) The reentrant and convex corners must be lapped and pasted in a staggered way.
No. 30, Group 6, Kaijingba Village, Xinqiao Township, Rongxian County, Sichuan Province
S.J.A. C2 (2017) 0001705
(1) Conscientiously implement the technical specifications, rules and procedures promulgated by the superior, carry out the project quality assurance measures and be responsible for the quality of the project in charge.
The Chief Design Engineer will always be responsible for the building of the project team by fostering team spirit, evaluating its operation performance, and exert and mobilize the enthusiasm for work and sense of responsibility of each team member to the greatest extent..
The treatment capacity of GWTP in 2030 will reach 136,700 m3/d.
In each stage of the planning and implementation of the design and development projects, mutual support and cooperation between relevant departments inside and outside the Group shall be considered.
When trains are coupled, communication is available among the four cabs.
Table 8-5-2 Meteorological Conditions for OCS
Draw the elevation control points in the General Construction Layout Plan, and the competent leader shall be invited to take measures to protect the control point;
Collect, systemize and check as-built documents according to progress and hand over these documents to document information department;
It is aimed to make the employees of the Abuja Project have the following capacities through the specified and systematic training of Shenzhen Metro:
3. Muck containing grooves and muck retaining ridges shall be constructed at suitable sections below the material yard, preventing mucks from entering the river valley and endangering the construction of lower working face.
The investment estimate does not include the cost of land acquisition and relocation, external power supply, and the purchase cost of railway rolling stocks. The required rolling stocks are rented from the railway operation department and the rental cost are temporarily not included in the total estimated cost.
(10) Technical Specification for Concrete Structures with Cold-rolled Ribbed Steel Wires (JGJ95-2011)
The contract signing date was December 2012, and the filing date was January 2013.
Single-box Container Spreader (Movable Guide Plate) 14
Check and make sure the tightening torque of M4 screw is 2.1 Nm and that of M6 screw is 7.4 Nm. Make locking mark on the properly tightened fastener with marking pen.
Project manager, the first person responsible for construction safety, should sign working safety responsibility agreement with principals of every department and working team; every working team with its responsible working class and group leaders.
(2) Overall plan of land utilization, special planning of land reclamation and other related plans;
The masonry and concrete retaining wall works and protective works for spoil ground shall be based on the drawings or the instructions of the Supervisor and shall be measured in m3 as per the quantities that are actually completed and accepted and the mortar strength grade and concrete strength grade. The gravel-sand cushions or crushed-stone cushions shall be measured in m3 as per the completed quantities.
The exposed main pipes shall be installed after structure acceptance, and the impurities at installation position along the pipe shall be cleaned up.
Our GPS/BD receiver is mounted by bolt fastening, and its equipment diagram is shown as below:
Figure 1.2.2Photo of existing GK45+930~GK46+500 section
The ground along the line is covered by quaternary artificial soil filling layer (Q4ml) with plain clayey fill, plain crushed stone fill and eluvium (Qel) clayey soil; the underlying bedrock is mainly the tertiary-quaternary (T,Q) igneous rock, and the lithologic character is mainly the basalt and tuff, the differential weathering is apparent and in alternated occurrence with the clay layer partially.
Party A shall obey the construction arrangements of Party B's construction personnel, but have the right to refuse the illegal command of Party B.
DQ500Z Direct drive top drive electronic control system -1
Guideway spacing X foundation spacing = 10.5mX14m; max. wheel load: 320kN/wheel; steel guideway model: QU100.
Factory No.: ** date of manufacture: MM/DD/YYYY
Grease reservoir is used for storing JH type graphite grease.
Lining shall be provided for tunnel, and composite lining shall be preferred;
User screen of Passenger Information System (PIS);
The door types of the bid include: class A steel fireproof door, class A stainless steel fireproof door, class A fireproof airtight door, ordinary steel door, fireproof antitheft door, composite super fireproof rolling shutter, ordinary antitheft rolling shutter, industrial door.
① In case of any steam pipeline leakage, evacuate persons with no duties nearby to avoid them from scalds caused by steam;
9HL The indicator light flashes, which shows FPGA operates properly
Position transducer of inlet guide vane, 4 - 20 mA;
Meet the environmental protection and energy conservation requirements, have good service life, facilitate the future maintenance and management of buildings and reach the purpose of reducing building maintenance and management expenses and building operation expenses.
4.2.3.5 Protective action for abnormal braking
Modify "AC Current Output Value" to be 100% in the touch screen of inverter and record three-phase DC current component displayed in power quality analyzer.
Clear width: 0.75+0.5+2X3.5+0.75+0.75=9.75m; clear height: 5.0m.
3) The stand-by fund for the Project shall be considered as 10%.
After the train brake handle is moved to the brake position and the train pipe pressure drops to 100KPa, move the train pipe handle to the neutral position to inspect leakage.
The gravel yards are unevenly distributed. It is investigated and found that 2 gravel sites are selected in the bid section, with the planned volume of 400 thousand cubic meters.
From the view of application effect, the established microwave detectors cannot provide flow volume data by directions and some geomagnetic detectors are damaged in construction.
The emergency refers to: environment pollution, social injury, riot, traffic accidents, serious traffic jam, track-related accidents, public complaints, and other issues due to inadequate environment protection precaution measures.
(2) If there is any suspicion about the quality of the water for mixing and curing concrete, mortar strength test shall be carried out.
Handover of Track-Laying Work for Tiyuzhongxin–Zhiwuyuan Section
In addition, this device also possesses characteristics, such as small in size, low in noise, convenient to use, simple to install, and easy to maintenance.
B.5 The test shall be implemented in accordance with the following procedures:
This bridge is located at D1aK13+692, crossing an about 2~5m wide ditch.
If it is hard to estimate the recoverable amount of the single construction in progress, the recoverable amount will be determined by the asset portfolio to which the construction in progress belongs.
Plug of HV Switchgear=91-X146.01B (for wiring of central slot by the electrical installation team)
The emergency plan should be filed after being reviewed or demonstrated (Comprehensive Emergency Plan for Work Safety Accidents of XJ Group Corporation).
It is the gradation of the aggregate obtained from the reclaimed asphalt pavement in which the asphalt is removed by extraction or burning.
1) Mechanism workflow analysis: Carrying out research on problem solving mechanism management and determining the workflow of the mechanism.
1) After the completion of the OCS works, the requirements for cold-running inspection have been met.
The sealing strips (SR-1150-RC \ 5 * 25) shall be installed prior to assembling the bottom cover A and shall be self-pierced according to the mounting hole of bottom cover, then be fastened by using M6 * 16 \ stainless steel big flat washer hex triple combination bolts, with torque of 6.5Nm;
Table 3 Comparison between Indoor and Numerical Test Parameters of Group G3 Steel Fiber Sprayed Concrete
Part of anti-sliding force of soil mass= 811.313(kN)
The Completion Date shall be postponed accordingly in case of any construction delay therefrom;
Principle of facilities (telecommunication lines beyond the railway) relocation and electromagnetic interference and protection
2.1.4.1 It monitors the information necessary for the telecommunication and signaling maintenance of system equipment.
Establish blowing group consisting of one group leader, two assistants, two persons for replacing target plates and several persons responsible for operation and monitoring.
Only Skardu and Gilgit among the towns, by which the Road under the Project passes, have meteorological records. The meteorological records of Skardu could basically reflect the basic climatical characteristics along the road.
See Attachment 8: EMC Specifications for electromagnetic compatibility requirements.
Progress Schedule of Supplier's Documents
Open power distribution and distribution switch shall be provided with rainproof measures. The exposed live part must be provided with insulation and protection measures and shall be hung with warning sign saying Electric Shock Hazard".
In case of inadequate bearing capacity of culvert foundation, replacement and filling with 1:2 sandstones of a certain depth may be used under the base. The depth of replacement and filling may be determined as per the principle that design stress of underlying stratum is less than the allowable bearing capacity of soil.
Bahrain pursues a foreign policy of neutrality or non-alignment, with good relations with the United Kingdoms and the United States.
5) Code for Design of Electric Distribution of General-purpose Utilization Equipment GB50055-2011;
a) Technical agreement (including special points of international projects: the host country standards and general international standards, etc.);
The post-cast strip formworks of the cast-in-situ beam and slab shall be separately erected and are not allowed to be connected with the beam and slab formwork erecting frame.
Visit some local representative buildings and similar buildings.
on March 9, 2017, personnel from three parties, the Project Headquarters, the Consultant Team and Zamyn-Uud Project Department of China Railway 21st Bureau Group Co., Ltd., conducted joint reviews on the in-depth design drawings of above structures and concluded the following minutes:
02-01: Modify the routing of magnetic rail brake device
The Company controls key projects such as the Laos-China Railway in the background using the item management function of driver's cab of the intelligent platform.
Arrangement Plan of Prestressed Steel Strands of B=12.25M L=25M T Beam
Safety Analysis, Disaster Prediction and Control of Large Geotechnical Engineering
General Contract for Procurement and Construction of Xin 'ansuo-Jijie Section (Xin 'ansuo-Jijie Expressway) of Mengzi Ring Expressway in Yunnan Province
(1) The ditch bottom elevations of sections of South Solution Ditch of Heap Leach Pad are calculated based on the foundation pit leveled bottom elevation of Heap Leach Pad. The Construction Unit shall carry out foundation pit bottom leveling of Heap Leach Pad site in strict accordance with the Drawing of Foundation Pit Bottom Leveling of Heap Leach Pad provided by the general drawing specialty of our Company before constructing the Solution Ditch.
In order to improve the recovery times, the formwork should be painted with the protective agent after processing,.
In this design, main living buildings are provided in separation from subsidiary ones, and facilities and organizations of social functions are not considered.
Different from surface works, tunnel works is located in underground rocks, and there are many unpredictable factors of geological conditions. Therefore, it is inevitable that engineering change will occur due to the change of geological conditions of the surrounding rocks during the construction period, i.e. it is necessary to timely perform reasonable change according to on-site construction conditions, following the principle of "dynamic design and process control".
2V-0.6/7 air compressor 0.6M /min
Table 3-12 Summary of Application and Assessment of Sansuo 2
4.7.3 Take charge of supervising and inspecting the safety of operation by equipment related party in the production zone.
In addition, the control system shall receive the important information.
When being laid, bricklaying must be aligned with the setting line, that is, "the upper brick edge shall be of certain distance away from the alignment, the lower brick edge shall be flat with the well-laid brick while both the left andright shall be accurate".
The transferred control line checked and confirmed errorless shall be further checked by the Supervisor, and will be used as the basis for plane setting-out as qualified.
3. Principle of setting drainage pipes: water on the deck is collected into drainage pipes at piers and abutments through open drainage ditches, drainage pipes and longitudinal drainage pipes, and then discharged to highway subgrade through floor vertical drainage pipes. This drawing is only a schematic diagram of centralized drainage. Each fixed parts, tee joint and elbow can be measured based on the actual situation.
10. This drawing is applied on condition that the pile foundation checkup meets the requirements. Otherwise, the pile foundation reinforcement is detailed in the design drawings of specific work spots.
2. Concrete strength grade of beams, slabs and columns is C30.
1. Quickly understand and grasp the basic situation of the accident, and promptly report it to the relevant competent department and the competent department of the superior organization according to the regulations.
Structural Design for Anti-glare Shield of Bridge Medial Strip
It is therefore recommended that the ballast materials should be selected in accordance with the actual local conditions. In order to meet the operation requirements, it is intended to employ elastic sleepers in place of ordinary sleepers in the Proposal.
4. Refer to TB2012-1-(1,2/11) for flashing on the top of the outbound pipeline, see TB2012-1-(1/9)for roof high- and low-span flashing practices.
 Monitoring terminal of the general dispatching console: Except for images shot in the ticket control room and guard station, it can view real-time pictures and saved images shot by other cameras in stations along the whole line. It can control all integrated dome cameras in stations along the whole line.
a. Corrective actions for the nonconforming items discovered in the internal and external audits shall be developed in accordance with Internal Audit Procedure;
An account is established for in-process products and is in charge by specially-assigned persons.Materials are counted and checked regularly to make the account consistent with the materials. The list of in-process products is handed over to the workshop accountant at the end of month. Based on the list, the in-process products are valued.
The survey of the culvert foundation by segment shall be subject to a tolerance of 1cm and the survey of the elevation of drainage surface a tolerance of 2 cm.
3.2 Inspect display function of odometer +115=73-P101
PZ is the possibility index of karst zone, and the possibility of karst zone development can be divided into three situations:
Relative parameters of the protection zone: (approximate value) see Parameter Table.
The drive device transmits the torque to axle gear box via clutch. The high-speed self-propelled running, low-speed operating and long-distance train formation can be formed by control the engagement or disengagement of different clutches. See separate edition of Operation Instruction of Drive Device for details.
14.2 Function: (1) To charge the battery of train-tail main engine and to charge four batteries simultaneously. (2) To display the state of charge.
The lime stone dust with slab-shaped or diamond-shaped grain coal is not allowed.
Remove the exhaust pipe by braze welding. Warning: Care should be taken to avoid being injured by the flame ejected from the system which still has some remaining refrigerant!
When installing the beam and column, at least not less than 3, when the overall leveling is completed to meet the requirements, the next unit shall be installed.
The General Management Department/Functional Department/Business Division (Company/Product Line) shall organize to execute according to the approved training plan.
It is typical temperate continental climate along the line, with an annual average temperature of about 10 ℃.
After the completion of each foundation support mold, the construction team shall submit an application in writing to the Engineer for the foundation casting, which shall be inspected by the Engineer and with his signature and consent the construction team can carry out the foundation casting.
1. Description: OPPLE 140037726 MDP017036/L-LEDPanel- 4000K-Comfortable (1.000)
9.2. During PP stage of new products, the technical representative must follow the effect of full-box determined packaging on packaging site so as to make improvement immediately;
C. Chuck installation: Transport chucks to the pole position dispersedly, check the chuck burying position and the pit depth, and level and tamp the pit bottom.
In order to prevent the delayed supply of materials and equipment from causing work stoppage and affecting the construction schedule, our company specially formulates the following emergency measures for the supply of materials and equipment:
2.4.2 Implement the rectification measures according to the rectification time proposed by supervision team and give timely feedback.
Plastering on outer walls shall be performed in layers with single layer thickness controlled in 6 ~ 8mm, and it is forbidden to complete plastering by one-step operations.
The PFTF index can be figured out by means of indicators such as frequency ratio of two ends and signal receiving frequency. The PFTF index will be about 1.0 when there are less frequency changes at two ends and the signal receiving frequency is stable, and this indicates that the grout is dense enough.
Basic requirement: the bid document provided by the Bidder such as list of main equipment, main system drawings and main equipment layouts shall meet the preliminary design requirement of the design institute.
b)All the data reading ports are of USB2.0, the data cables are USB2.0 cables commonly used by computers, and no switching devices or black boxes should be connected in series on the data cables.
Backfill materials shall be filled in layers, and the compaction thickness of each layer shall not exceed 150mm, and the degree of compaction shall reach 95%.
Wuhan Rail Transit Line 7 South Extension Project (Zifang Line)
Be responsible for technical quality management of the Work in all respects, acting as the person directly in charge of quality issue.
The water in sites shall be drained into drainage system of the station and yard to avoid destroying farmlands and highways.
All waste water in living quarters will pass through septic tank and then be discharged into the main drainage ditch planned by the Owner.
3.7.1 Living area of the Construction Contractor shall be provided with enclosed management by specially assigned personnel. Sign of the Contractor shall be put on at the door.
(1)Adding of manganese plate (i.e., manganese plate) is one of the normal use and maintenance methods of the coupler, which meets the needs of operation and use in Camrail;
DIN 5510-2 Annex CFE D
(1)Cantilever bracket of Φ350 equal-diameter mast
PCI Pie Chart of Left Half BreadthPCI Pie Chart of Right Half Breadth
After wining the bid, our company will send the following construction groups: Subgrade Engineering Division 5 and Bridge Engineering Division 4.
New Changsha Railway Station and Associated Works of New Wuhan-Guangzhou Passenger Dedicated Line
3 If Party B cannot complete the commissioning before the deadline specified hereunder, Party A shall be entitled to terminate the contract, and Party B shall pay the penalty which is 1% of the total contract amount to Party A.
Organize process quality inspection and acceptance, obey the Owner and Supervisor's work instructions, accept supervision, inspection and direction, and take the responsibility for management of the quality management system documents and quality records;
However, the requirements for HPC in different countries are different.
If the gradient of the natural cross slope or longitudinal slope on the ground is more than 1:5 or the gradient of longitudinal slope is more than 12%, the original ground shall be excavated into steps, and the step width shall meet the needs of paving and compacting equipment operation, and shall not be less than 2m.
0.5~5kV, pointer voltmeter, accuracy ±5%
17.1 Party B shall strictly follow the operating procedures, management standards and working standards relating to production management formulated by Party A.
Products shall not leave the factory until they are inspected as qualified by the production quality inspection department and provided with certificate of conformity.
3. N2 steel bars shall be disconnected at expansion joints.
(1) The PC 1A bid section (2#~9#) is mainly situated in the place between the capital Dushanbe and Obigarm.
"Pulling": Attention shall be paid to the pulling method and skill when the PE sheath is pulled off.
Establish and maintain the Training Management System and relevant management procedure, standardize various processes such as training demands, training plans, training teachers, training materials, training facilities, training implementation and training effectiveness evaluation, and ensure that the position requirements are met:
If the time for clarification is less than 15 days from the deadline for submission of the bid specified in clause 4.2.1 of this chapter, and the clarification may affect the preparation of the response documents, the deadline for submission of the bid will be extended accordingly.
9. The Contractor shall commence the works as directed by the Supervisor. The construction period is 30 months.
According to the actual meteorological conditions, operate the system for no less than 24h continuously, and comprehensively inspect, adjust and check each index of the system. if all the indexes meet the design requirements, the system is considered qualified.
The method favorable to influence line, determine the UDL loading length and KEL loading position of pier bearing under the most disadvantageous conditions and consider the discount of load on each lane (the calculating program shall count in automatically).
So the rail gage of this line that is designed to be 1520mm is recommended in the current study.
4/8/16-Channel alarm input, valid for low level, green wiring terminal interface
3) One yellow light with "2" - requiring the train to run at the specified speed carefully, indicating that the trackside signal that the train is approaching shows one yellow light and predicting that the next trackside signal will open the route via the lateral position of the switch (see Figure 6);
Strictly abide by the Technical Code for Safety of Temporary Electrification on Construction Site (JGJ46-88) and special construction organization design for power utilization.
The active component of the hepatitis B vaccine is an antigen of the hepatitis B virus.
2. Impact: vibration environment is mainly appearing in impacts caused to the normal living and production activity of residents, institutes and enterprises close to the route.
Adjust the gap between the door pulley yoke and the door leaf with special gaskets to reach relevant requirements, tighten up the coupling bolt of the pulley yoke and the door leaf, and return the eccentric wheel back to the position where the distance to the slide rail is less than 0.
(3) Alarm valves, gate valves, retaining valves, electromagnetic valves, signal valves, water flow indicators, pressure relief orifice plates, throttle pipes, reducing valves, pressure switches, flexible joints, drainage pipes, vent valves and pressure relief valves installed in different positions of pipe network shall meet design requirements.
For specifics, refer to Article 9.3.1.3 of Development and Management of Suppliers (PM-PD-01-A).
Article 28 The performance of the workshops/departments in investigation/inspection on hidden perils of production safety accidents shall serve as the essential basis to evaluate the safety performance of the chief leaders of the workshops/departments at the end of each year.
4) Under the following circumstances or in the following sections, the number of spot-checking points for systematic test shall be added according to engineering quality evaluation requirements:
The muffler on the ground and in the smoke exhaust system of elevated station shall work continuously and effectively for 1h at 250℃, when discharging smoke.
——Find two points with distance of 10cm at the bottom of crank throw by drawing a steel wire at the center of crosshead guide, and use inside micrometer to measure that if distances from the two points to the steel wire are equal, and the difference shall not be more than 0.1/1000mm. See Figure 6.1-5.
Overhead catenary system will support the ceiling, overhead structure or arch of adjacent wall structure by direct insulating attachment.
14.2.6.4. Test items shall include but not be limited to the following table of test and acceptance items of train performance indexes.
In addition to the consideration of the transfer with other lines in the network, the station shall also be designed to ensure proper transfer with other means of public transport.
Apply a flange (which is made based on the size of flange on flowmeter) on upstream process pipe orifice for welding and full welding externally and internally, pay attention to deformation, which is from point to surface, during welding, and weld the downstream flexible orifice protective bar.
As shown in Figs. 14-18 and Table 3, the maximum stress on the bogie frame under the extraordinary main load case, i.e. 126.4MPa, is imposed under the vertical extraordinary load case at the corner of lower cover plate at the air spring seat.
(2) Cement shall be delivered according to the construction planning so as to guarantee the stability of quality of cement and avoid lowering grade due to overlong storage time of cement which may affect the strength of cement concrete.
(12) Record of train weight, axle weight and wheel weight.
5. The temperature rise shall be tested under the following worst conditions:
Special Emergency Plan for Leakage of Hazardous Chemicals
7. The base of this culvert is on the SchistW[4] layer. 25cm thick crushed stone bed course shall be laid and compacted in layers under the C30 concrete bed course of box body in a way that the design requirement is satisfied.
2. Certificate of conformity and re-inspection report of concrete raw material
e. When spraying on the matrix materials, there must be no defects such as hollow bulge and warped edges; the thickness should be no less than 1.0mm.
(3) When assembling the welded junctions of the pipe, try to align them with the inner wall, and ensure that the alignment tolerance after welding does not exceed 10% of the wall thickness.
Appendix 3 shows 2 kinds of fuse boxes with different overall dimensions.
2. Survey and design: the project conforms to the requirements of railway water supply and sewerage construction, and it is agreed to commence acceptance ().
Layout Plan of Sewage Treatment Plant of Depot and Car Park
Shenzhen Urban Transport Planning Center Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as the "Center") was established in 1996. It has always been the most important advisory body for traffic decision-making of Shenzhen Municipal Committee and Shenzhen Municipal Government, and is an important technical supporting organization for comprehensive traffic management and rail traffic construction in Shenzhen.
c) Decorative parts (outer accessories; wall and roof sheathing or equipment, etc.) should be sprayed with intermediate paint before being applied with finish paint. The paint of an average thickness ≥30μm (defective parts should be modified by putty).
Voltage during regenerative braking: DC850V
4) Outdoor wall-mounted lamps should have drain holes, and waterproofing means must be provided between their insulating stands and wall.
Diagnostic function of train bus and vehicle bus.
According to the temperature variation over the years, the winter construction can be divided into two stages, i.e., generally low-temperature stage and particularly low-temperature stage.
b) The air switch of the unit with the ATS cabinet is always in the closed state, this switch is switched to the power supply of the unit by the ATS after the unit operates normally.
② The excavated earthwork shall be used as much as possible. The applicable soil shall be transported to the filling sections as the subgrade filler, and the non-applicable soil shall be transported to the spoil ground for disposal.
② There are movable and overhanging operating platforms. When the platform is more than 2m high, protective barrier shall be set up around. Load on the platform shall be controlled strictly and the weight of operators and materials shall be indicated. If platform operation is controlled with a winch, safety performance of hoisting machineries and equipment shall be inspected frequently.
2. In case of a construction postponement caused by Party A, the construction period under the agreement shall be postponed accordingly, and Party A shall bear the corresponding economic loss caused thereby by Party B.
Axial fan, air volume 200-3610 m3/h, air pressure 250-300 Pa
Bill of Quantities of Main Works in EW16 ~ NS15 Section
Mieso (excluded)-Nagad (the front-port station of Djibouti) and Djibouti port area relevant works.
Automatic control: ID cards will be verified by reading the information from ID cards and photo verification. Gate locks will be controlled automatically by reading ID cards.
During the contract execution process, the documents related to the Owner shall be written in English and Russian, other documents shall be written in Chinese.
Meanwhile for some freight trains passing through high-speed railway lines, its speed shall reach 160km/h.
Note: The quantity of goods shall be subject to the commercial part of the Contract; the Owner has the right to adjust the quantity, model and specification of goods; when the quantity of goods in the Contract is reduced, the price of goods shall be deducted accordingly and the remaining unit prices shall remain unchanged; if the quantity, model and specification of goods in the Contract change, a Supplementary Agreement shall be signed in accordance with this Contract.
The annual report on comprehensive risk management shall include the following main contents:
The inland water transport in Cambodia is predominated by Mekong River and Tonle Sap Lake, with main river harbors located in Phnom Penh, Kampong Cham and Kampong Chhnang.
Filled (Summarized) by (Seal):Prepared on: (MM/DD/YY)
5) Relevant comments of China Railway Eryuan Engineering Group Co., Ltd. and Pakistan Railways/PIU on Upgrading Pakistan Railways' Existing Mainline (ML-1) and Establishment of Havelian Dry Port from August 2016 to December 2016.
3. The tunnel-embankment boundary chainage of north portal is at CH380+769. The works before this chainage shall be constructed according to this drawing and that after according to the subgrade design drawing.
1. According to the requirement of gauge, two-layer bricking foundation will be provided between tracks by positioning and thr foundation will be made by manual work with cement mortars.
During vibration, concrete vibrator impacts reinforcements and makes them displaced.
2. The site layout shall be reasonable, without disturbing residents; the site shall be clean and tidy, the logistics shall be in proper order, the signs shall be conspicuous, and the sign boards shall be standardized, meeting the construction standards for safe and civilized construction sites in China's railway industry.
Financial Leasing Company further optimized its business structure and focused on financial leasing business, with more prominent main businesses. Its asset-liability ratio decreased by about 15% year on year, the financial leverage decreased significantly, and the asset structure improved. It continued to promote the transformation of its business mode and maintained steady development.
The Safety Management Department performs investigation of the event and deal with the aftermath of the event and so forth. The Dispatch Office participates in the investigation and treatment of the hoisting and lifting accident.
The requirements for preventive actions are specified in the Management Procedure for Corrective and Preventive Actions.
The annular rubber sealing ring is composed of embedded steel plate ring, rubber ring, steel compression ring and bolts.
Highlight 3: China-West Dialogue (Let the World Know the Change and Innovation of China)
8-φ22 During installation, drill as per the specific conditions of installation here
5) The vacuum envelope of the vacuum circuit breaker needs no maintenance.
The Employer decides that the Contractor shall perform EPC/T contracting for the Project.
Stack and store the materials by category. Especially, the chemicals shall be reserved in the major subarea.
The static probe hole can be measured with a tape measure by setting intermediate stake or a total station can be used for measuring and setting out.
Relevant air-conditioning design manuals should be followed according to the environment and the activities of personnel.
After the pipeline installation is completed, the pressure drop value of single-vehicle pressure holding test for 10 min shall not exceed 10 kPa, and the drop value shall be: ( ).
Forecast is generally classified into last-period forecast, medium-term forecast and long-range forecast.
Piece rate wage is implemented to stimulate the enthusiasm and initiative of construction personnel.
The rolls shall be flat and straight and shall not be twisted with overlapping width of 120mm, and shall be properly cut.
Cupped foundation: The Z type standard joint is used to treat the H-shaped steel, and standard joints are used to treat other profile steel; bolt foundation or embedded parts foundation: Replace connecting plates according to the design drawing.
The walls that are not marked on the Chart are of 200 in thickness.
3. New North Ring Railway Project of Ningbo Railway Hub
3.1.6All the equipment foundations or bases may be constructed only after the equipment arrives and the dimensions are checked and proved correct; the dimensions of foundations shall be subject to the drawings of air conditioning discipline.
Existing in polyurethane, adhesives, coatings and paints
Participate in the inspection and acceptance of imported materials at seaports and airports.
Address: 4-4#, 137 North Section of Huaxi Avenue, Guiyang
Our Project Department attaches great importance to the documents and instructions issued by the Owner, and timely organizes construction technology personnel to learn and understand, as well as resolutely and throughly implements the instructions and notices in specific work.
Axial force (max): 257.9 Bending moment: 71.4
When cable pass through floor slabs, it should wrapped with casing pipe, and the casing pipe should be blocked tightly with fireproof materials after completing the laying.
The project is provided with a total of 20 units of 21m³/m mobile diesel air compressor, and 35 units of 21m³/m electric air compressor. Total installed load of compressor stations is 1,750kW.
1. The parties agree to amend Article 12 (J) of the Leasing Conditions, and the revised terms are as follows:
Ethiopia is located in the tropics. However, owing to its high altitude, most areas are of mild climates with average annual temperature ranging between 10°C and 27°C. The average annual temperature is 16°C, 20.6°C and 23.3°C in the capital, Mieso and Dire Dawa respectively. Generally, the temperature is high from March to May and low from November to January.
6.5 Administrative Measures on Signing Engineering Statement of for New Product SourcingGLW0015188.7
According to the cross and vertical section design of the line, the insufficient shoulder width will be widened to 0.8m and the gradient of cross slope for subgrade surface will be adjusted to 4%. When the abandoned soil and ballast are disposed, the protection for the slope surface of embankment shall be strengthened to drain away the water on its both sides and dredge the channel between the drainage culverts.
Laying CAT-5 non-shield large paired cable in pipe and trench
7. Require the technicians to entrust the requirements for flaw detection ratio and positions of weld inspection according to the design and specification regulations, and require the quality inspectors to perform the supervision and inspection.
General Specification for Installation and Acceptance of Chemical Machinery (HG/T 20203-2017)
Any variation of work quantity given in the Bill of Quantities will neither mitigate or effect the validity of the contract terms or exempt the Contractor from his responsibilities for executing construction and repairing defects as required.
⑤ The completion summary shall be included in the project completion file, and shall be handed over together with the project file.
The Owner or EPC Contractor shall be informed two months before the delivery, and the Owner or EPC Contractor will decide whether to send engineers to the factory for pre-acceptance or not.
Production technology and process involved in the products to be expanded:
5.1.1 After accident occurred, the units shall immediately report it to the Safety Quality Department, which then shall immediately report to the Deputy General Manager in Charge of the Group Company.
Dealer discount proportion (partial or full discount.
9.Code for Pavement Design of Urban Road (CJJ 169-2012)
Fix the pressing plate on the mounting position of the fire extinguisher in the machinery room with M4X20 countersunk bolts, and fix with ties.
Long striped, flat particles shall not exceed 20%.
The supervision equipment and materials prepared for the Project will enter the project site through the national highway logistics system via the land route according to relevant national regulations and the requirements of the Owner.
The fans shall be monitored by designated personnel to turn on or off the fans and adjust the air volume for the purpose of saving electricity.
Modify the condensate gathering tank from carbon steel to stainless steel without changing the pressure grade.
Recommendation: indoor P10 full color display
Due to the delay in nominating supervisor candidates for the Second Board of Supervisors by Laotian shareholders, the meeting should be attended by 5 supervisors and was attended by actually 4 supervisors, which was in accordance with the effective quorums of the meeting.
(1) Mortar loss shall be avoided during concrete conveying; sand ratio in mix ratio shall be increased properly when necessary;
In fact, discussions with your colleagues within TPE are limited to the necessary scope for handling daily businesses.
And these indicator lights will be on only when the diesel engine shuts down.
15) Pipeline pressure test: water pressure test should be carried out after water pipe installation, and the test pressure is 0.8MPa; fire pipe is 1.0MPa; 10 minutes pressure drop is less than 0.05MPa.
2. 1.5 thick polymer cement composite waterproof paint
Control box of 21-1-21-3KTK air-conditioners (floor 2)
The engineering site is located in a seismic zone in southwest Yunnan, which consists of the southwest Yunnan and parts of Myanmar, Laos, Thailand and Vietnam and has moderate-to-strong earthquake activities featuring high frequency and high intensity.
Level 3 (complaint from resident, or unsatisfactory result monitored by external supervision organization)
It is clearly defined in the DGCS that: for the upstream slope: when height of the levee slope is higher than 6m, the external platform shall be designed with a platform for each 3 - 5m vertical height, and width of each platform shall not be less than 1m.
Leveling layer at connections and corners of parts higher than roof, such as ventilation pipes shall be made into gentle semicircle with insulation layer.
Final tensioning shall not be conducted until the strength and elasticity modulus of girder body concrete reach the design values and the concrete age is no less than 14 days.
TB/T 1508-1991 Technical Specification of Electrical Panels and Cabinets for Locomotive
Environmental management plans and implementation measures shall be formulated to prevent noise pollution, water pollution and air pollution.
Compiling the Investment Schedule for Engineering Project Safety Production Cost (see Appendix 11 for details).
After the dimensions are determined, the cables and wires shall also meet the requirements of current carrying capacity and voltage drop.
Left barrel: the starting and ending chainages are ZK63+585 ~ ZK64+460, with the total length of the boundary section 875m. The starting point through the ending point of the tunnel is located on a straight line, with the longitudinal gradient of 1.30% for the incoming section and -0.80% for the outgoing section. The maximum buried depth of the tunnel is about 193.08m.
The casing pipe connection should be adopted for concealed pipes and the casing pipe length shall be 1.5~3 times the connecting pipe diameter. The butt joint of the connecting pipe shall be located at the center of the casing pipe and the welding joint shall be firm and tight.
Douala, AKW, KASSAP Building, P.O. Box: 5963 - Tel.: (237)233.43.73.26/233.43.70.05/3343.73.25/26 -Fax: (237) 33.43.76.35
m)Be aware of the difference between the mechanical connection and the electrical connection, and select proper fasteners based on requirements;
(11) For pavement on culvert top which shows crazing and local pot holes of different extent, it is recommended to rehabilitate it with pavement works.
Strengthen energy management, classification measurement and centralized management. Metering devices shall be installed in workshop. Electricity, compressed air and water shall be measured separately.
Ran Xiaoming, Zhang Dan, Peng Jun, Fang Zehnbo, Li Weibin, Liu Zhi, Shi Xue, Zeng Bo, Chen Huiqiang, Sun Yu, Zhang NIng
The average value is calculated based on the C and Φ values calculated by the above-mentioned three methods. With reference to test data, their median value is taken to determine the applied C and Φ values of rock. The calculation results are shown in Table 6.2.4.2.
When track-laying starts, the reconstruction of electric power, communication and signaling works shall be carried out concurrently and completed not later than 1 month after the completion of track laying of the whole line.
The airline class taken by the Institute's staff (regardless of titles and levels) during business trips shall comply with following standards:
4. Two ZPW-2000K track circuit sections
Raise safety production fund timely; make payment as needed; supervise reasonable use of such fund.
In order to reduce control logic, and network information quantity required for the air-electric composite calculation. The air-electric composite braking is carried out in one unit of one motor car and trail car.
A good human-machine interface shall be provided for the display for the convenience of operation;
There are 56 airports, including 1 international airport, 3 regional airports and 52 small airports.
Circular of Zhuzhou People's Government Office on Printing and Issuing Implementation Scheme for Zhuzhou City to Create a National Environment Protection Model City
Span: 1-24m+11-32m+1-24m simply-supported T-girder and the bridge is 421.80m long in total.
Equipment configuration of L1 area: steel bar support system, steel mesh storage system, steel arch installer, fast support system for anchor drilling rig, steel segment installer, emergency shotcrete system, and related operating platform.
Ensure the safety of construction machinery (tools) and equipment, and prevent personal, power grid and equipment accidents.
c. Adjust the location of leveling valve support according to leveling valve location dimension provided in drawing ADP1001772G020, and then fasten the support for the best.
Power lighting distribution system shall apply TN-S grounding type.
Stirrup (φ6mm round bar, Q235)
4.6.1 The quality inspection of as-received turnout rails and fittings shall be in accordance with the following provisions:
Pipes and fittings shall be homogenous throughout and free from visible cracks, holes, foreign inclusions, blisters, dents or other damaging defects.
The pipe interface is rubber ring interface with rubber seal ring interface closed. The bell mouth and socket working face of pipes shall be cleaned.
When construction is stopped for a certain time beyond specification and the next construction procedure is not started after qualification of the concealed works, the concealed works shall be re-inspected and re-accepted. When construction is stopped more than 6 months, construction recovery procedure shall be required.
Test other functions of the communication power subsystem: Inspect whether the network management design had other configuration function, source management function and so on.
"(Inspection)" means that the quality inspector shall check and monitor the operation process;
11.3.3 The blocking-off and drainage facilities for connection sections of horizontal adits, parallel drifts, inclined shafts, and vertical shafts with tunnels shall meet the design requirements.
Consider the occasion where the arrived equipment can't be installed. Set up a temporary equipment storage yard of about 1,0000 square meters.
Legal representative / Director or authorized agent (signature or seal):
Title of positionSupervision Engineer for Emergency Services (candidate)
documented information shall be fully protected against disclosure, misuse, improper use, defect or incompleteness.
C.1.1 C4, residual C4 (liquefied gas)
(3) The air conditioning unit is equipped with four operating conditions: manual, automatic, ventilation and stop. Under the automatic operating condition, the air conditioning unit operates fully automatically at the preset temperature, and can be controlled by the TCMS touch screen via the train bus network. The unit is started in sequence by time to reduce the peak value of starting current of each unit of the train.
11. Installation of small-scale section signal apparatuses, transformer box and cable box.
This price is the price per linear meter (ml) of reinforced concrete drainage ditch constructed under the road according to the construction log verified and approved by both parties.
When the start switch of the front and rear engines is switch to position 1 or 2
The description of the overall system architecture of the core business system includes but is not limited to the description of the core business system itself and peripheral associated systems;
Before the primary concrete pouring, the opening of the conduit shall be 30 - 50cm away from the hole bottom. The primarily poured concrete shall cover the conduit with length over 1m. In the process of pouring, the length of the conduit embedded by the concrete shall be 2 - 6m.
New: The Contractor will pay a daily penalty of RMB 10,000 to the Employer since the day that the Supervisor issues the order of commencement.
2. Quality Objectives: Ensure that all works reach the design acceptance standard, the qualified rate of sub-divisional works is 100%, the handover acceptance of the project is qualified, and the completion acceptance is excellent.
The width of the masonry joint on the surface of dry rubble shall not be more than 25mm.
Contact of Party A: Chen Yong (Engineering) Tel: 025-51817221
5.2.4 Aggregate with alkali-carbonate reactivity or those with alkali-silicate reactivity and of a mortar bar expansion ratio (fast measuring method) not lower than 0.2% shall not be used.
During construction in pluvial period, slump shall be under strict control to ensure the strength of concrete.
Please send the reply to the above-mentioned clarification questions and the required original certificates of relevant supporting documents to Room 907, General Technology Building, No. 90 of Middle of West Third Ring Road, Fengtai District, Beijing City prior to 12:00 am on December 6, 2016. (Contact person: Huang Peng Tel: 13810529977)
Set the measurement control network based on coordinate and bench mark provided by the Owner. The control points shall be permanent coordinate pile and horizontal datum mark pile. Protective measure shall be taken to prevent any damage.
⑧ vertical crack, L=0.2m, crack width δ=0.1mm
Open the clamps fixing the connector on the carbody side, and cut the cable tie and tape (see Figure 5 for details).
The minimum and maximum amount of cementing material in concrete shall be limited.
3.The system is required to automatically broadcast stops: Automatic broadcasting includes departure, arrival and outbound forecasting, turning warning, automatic broadcasting of service expressions for the old, and other voice and word information;
GB/T2423 Environmental Testing for Electric and Eectronic Products--Part 2: Test Methods consists of several parts according to Test Methods.
Deal with tax planning belonging to territorial management in line with relevant provisions of the Group.
The project is involved with resident disturbance by construction noise during construction and environmental protection during operation during specific implementation, and the Owner shall actively coordinate with local government and peripheral residents and other interested parties to solve the problems.
Article 10 Party B clarifies that the construction period mentioned in this contract is an absolute construction period, which is ensured by Party B the realization of the construction period after full consideration of government regulations on construction, the contract and Party A's construction requirements, as well as verification of the construction site and construction environment.
The content of document version control was added and released according to review.
Standard for Constructional Quality Acceptance of Railway Tunnel Engineering TB10417-2003
(3) Review the expenses incurred to the repair and warranty service concerning construction quality;
37 manholes, 28 catch-basin, 56 single grate partial trench rainwater inlets and 4 splayed water outlets.
Q=830Nm3/h，H=8m，37kW，3 sets in total , 2 in service and 1 for standby.
The management workstation can query the device status and all fault information for a single device.
8.9 During the survey of this Project, Party B shall take care of its daily life and work independently.
If the use with overload is required, the load shall be calculated, followed by reinforcement treatment on the scaffold before its use.
If the track circuit is more than 300m long, the compensation capacitor shall be set according to the adjustment compensation file.
UE: rated voltage of the system, 24V in both systems of the project;
And status and alarm information is displayed on the train operation terminal and center workstation.
4. The turnings of each pipe are connected by bent pipe or tee joint.
Deposit Bank: Bailong Road Sub-branch, Shanghai Pudong Development Bank
3. Except that the connecting section of the tunnel opening and the main tunnel and the structure section through which the transverse passage and parallel adit passes employ molded lining, other sections employ shotcrete-anchor lining. See the longitudinal profiles of barrels of the service galleries for details.
Two-way transverse slope with high in the middle and low on both sides will generate slight inconvenience for unidirectional traffic of vehicles and drivers in changing lanes.
After materials enter the site, the supplier and warehouse shall verify the name, specification, model, and quantity of the arrived goods item by item, and timely hand over the materials carefully.
5. The cornice of abutment should be △=150*50.022\U+2030=7.5cm, so as to adapt to the longitudinal slope of the line.
Subtask 3 - Calculation of the coordinates of unknown points (project-oriented and task-driven teaching, students as teaching subject, 6 hours)
Training equipment for operator:1 bulldozer, 1 loader, 1 pipelayer, 1 excavator,
EPC Contractor shall set up a special organization. Project manager is the first person in charge of project post construction verification and handover.
Rated current: 4000A (need to be determined after calculation)
The Receiving Party shall keep confidential all confidential information and any material that contains, summarizes, analyzes, or analyzes confidential information or otherwise relates to the confidential information, and shall take all reasonable and necessary measures to keep confidential information in secret.
The insurance period shall start from the date of commencement of the work until the date of issuance of the Taking-Over Certificate / commercial operation.
System protection measures and protection schemes have been described in details in system technical scheme. Before PA system leaves from factory, we will carry out strict tests with respect to safety indexes (e.g. insulation resistance, withstand voltage, etc.) of PA system according to the relevant national standards.
The main scope of works includes subgrade, pavement, bridge and culvert, and traffic safety facilities, etc.
Physical and mechanical properties of foundation rock and soil shall be ascertained to provide parameters of foundation bearing stratum, bearing capacity and frictional resistance.
Unfavorable geologic conditions develop, mainly including collapses, rock piles, landslides, mudslides and dangerous rocks.
Left side and right side of the building are arranged symmetrically, with four main entrances/exits and four secondary exits in total.
23temperature measuring sections are taken from both ends and the middle of the passenger compartment. 4measuring points and 12measuring points are distributed in the middle of each section.
This spare part is not a sealing part and cannot be broken down into other components and sub-components.
The activity space is set at each floor, and buildings are connected by the corridor, contributing to the old people going out and the convenient use in rainy days.
Prepare sufficient rain-proof tarpaulins and cover all the entrances/exits leading to underground with the tarpaulins before the rainstorm, to prevent the rainwater from flowing into them.
2.Mongolia Ulaanbaatar Railway Station Project was awarded a High Grade Project Prize o
Drilling: Use electric hammer or water drill to drill holes at the calibrated position. If the reinforcement is encountered, the drilling position can be appropriately adjusted, and the reinforcement can be reasonably avoided. The hole depth must meet the design requirements.
Non-performance of responsibility and fleeing contractual liability are inexistent. The brake cylinder used on the train is a mature and original one. Products of minimum cost are not used.
The tender for Lump-sum Construction Contract for Construction Lot of Electrification Reconstruction of Yining-Horgos Section of Jinghe-Yining-Horgos Railway (project name) submitted by you on May 20, 2014 (the date of tender submission) has been accepted by us. You are the Successful Tenderer selected by us.
The former Muslim mosaic buildings are mainly of the local style decorated by terra-cotta and are deeply influenced by specific times and regions.
Frequency range0.01 Hz~2.7 GHz
1. The subgrade filling and excavation are completed, the pre-embedded track-crossing pipeline of the E&M discipline are completed according to the requirements of the E&M discipline, and are jointly signed and accepted by the Supervisors and the Construction Contractors for Civil works and E&M Works;
Main work: The design scope is 2 stations and 2 sections, all of which are underground lines;
Therefore, non-wheel-rail systems such as monorail, maglev and rubber-wheel lead rail are eliminated from the list of systems for this project.
Corresponding measures shall be taken before defect elimination to prevent escalation.
(7) When the entrance is located at the soft or loose stratum or accumulative formation, following measures can be used to reinforce and stabilize the stratum based on geological and groundwater conditions:
The Safety Operation Specification is hereby formulated to avoid safety accidents during the operation of grinding machines.
Most surface soil belongs to group C and D, while completely weathered basalt belongs to Group A and B.
This position is where the assisting locomotive (double heading locomotive) works under the control of the pressure of brake hose, main air hose and balance hose between locomotives when the leading locomotive is in braking operation. The brake action of the assisting locomotive shall be synchronized with that of the leading locomotive.
The personnel in charge of project materials should inspect or verify the incoming materials and sign the certificate for confirmation.
Thus, the students can have the professional knowledge, skills and quality for train organization work of high-speed railway.
2. The Company places great importance on the development of new products and the application of new technologies.
Longitudinal impacts of temperature change and concrete shrinkage to the structure should be considered when deformation joint intervals are large;
a. Switch action power supply shall be AC 380 V;
The DC power system for plant use adopts intelligent monitoring and management unit to send related information to the control signal panel.
The normal code sequence of track circuits is: L5-L4-L3-L2-L-LU-U-HU.
+111=27-H01 green light is off
An Automated Fare Collection (AFC) System shall manage fare media sales and shall control the passenger flows through fare payment and control devices of the HSR network.
Conductor Height and Stagger Value Measurement Device of OCS Operation Car
Be responsible for organization of daily meetings, management of reception and other activities related to the Project.
5) A hook shall be made at the end of the longitudinal load-bearing reinforcement of constructional column and the correct reinforcement position shall be guaranteed.
A basic platform of 200.0 X 8.0 X 0.30 (m) is provided for the station, and the slope of the platform surface in the track direction is 0.
Set 1 infrared repeating station each for train inspection and repair point and technical condition handing-over post at Zuunbayan South and Tsogttsetsii train inspection and repair point.
Buildings and structures code as given in Table T42.
Installation of aluminum alloy plate: the panel must be inspected before installation, and the installation sequence shall be considered in advance.
5. Unless otherwise approved, all splicing joints shall be full-strength full-penetration continuous butt welds.
Attachment 4: Layout for Beam Yard on Cai Rang Side
1. When talking with others, when speaking of yourself, you shall not point at your nose tip with a finger, and you should press your palm on your chest.
For joints between the roof and the external wall as well as insulation joints around the roof opening, Class A insulation material not less than 500mm wide shall be adopted to set a horizontal fire barrier.
There are two distinct seasons in the year. The wet season is from May to October, and the dry season is from November to April.
a layer of 50mm-thick concrete slab with reinforcing mesh can be poured on the ground (filling scope).
3) Average travel speed for round trip between station HAVALiMANI and station YENiKAPI is 41.42 km/h (including return time), which satisfies travel speed of not less than 35 km/h.
The inner bellows cloth in contact with passengers meets the requirements of R1 while the outer one meets the fire protection requirements of R7 in EN 45545-2, and the sealing strip shall meet R22 standard.
(2) As this project is an expansion based on the current visitor reception center, the closer the distance between the expanded visitor center and the current visitor center is, the better it is for the two to form an organic whole.
(1) Steel rail: the main line employs 25m long 50kg/m steel rails.
Section 2 Application of Remote Sensing Techniques in Bridge and Tunnel Survey
3.1.5 Horizontal hole protection (short side larger than 150 cm)
* Guide the staff of the Employer to temporarily store permanent equipment and materials on site, and take custody of, register the use of and supplement spare parts.
Get ready for major quality inspection organized by local government, the Employer and company home office and rectify problems once encountered during inspection;
It is set that the minimum price in a region shall be limited to not less than RMB 20/ton, which is the benchmark price in the same region, and the credit sales price shall not be less than "cash price + price increase range". The "price increase range" shall be determined by the Price and Credit Committee of the Region.
Written examination for professional competence may be carried out in this process.
Fully implement the team quota management in the team, and reflect the allocation principle of "more pay for more work" on the premise that quality and safety are guaranteed.
The "China Enterprise News Alliance" construction curtain wall refers to the exterior wall enclosure of a building that does not bear weight and is usually composed of panels (glass, metal, stone, ceramic, etc.) and back support structures (aluminum beams and columns, steel structures, glass ribs, etc.).
The Seller shall timely notify the Buyer prior to the installation of the Buyer-supplied equipment as per the determined overall contract implementation plan.
Including mounting bracket, foundation, upright post, lightning protection grounding, etc.
15.@Set up offices and toilets.
During the construction, specific measures shall be improved under the guidance of the traffic management department according to the construction process and the actual site conditions, so as to reduce traffic congestion and ensure smooth traffic.
"Automatic" position: When the change-over switch is at the "automatic" position, DCU is allowed to receive "door opening command" and "door closing command" from PSC.
Modifications to the safety design arising from the operation of the project shall be strictly controlled in accordance with the corresponding procedures;
Relevant Regulations of GB50205-2001 on General Items
Concrete Structure Integral Representation of the Construction Plan and Construction Drawings Detailing the Rules (Raft Foundation)
Table 3-22 Freight Exchange of Beyond Thika and Beyond Nairobi in This Section Unit: 10,000 tons
Project Management Department, relic protection leading group of project division
The fire damper through the wall or the floor slab is shown below.
5.4.5 Maximum dry density test shall be performed for graded crushed stone before delivery.
4.8 There shall be label on u-tube, indicating the date of production, serial number and manufacturer's logo, etc. The text on the label shall be of proper size and legible (the requirements in the drawing, if any, shall be applied to the greatest extend).
In the design phase, the vehicle supplier is led to coordinate with the ground PIS system supplier and complete the following work (but not limited to):
It is required to inspect whether the high pressure oil pump, oil pipe and connectors are in good condition and it is well connected and is free of risk for high pressure fuel injection.
\pxt6.6; River with a width of 20m ~ 30m and depth of 2m ~ 3m.
Buildings that can be set up jointly should be combined as much as possible in order to save the land.
The site supervisor or other appointed person has the right to determine whether and when to evacuate from the building. The emergency coordinator or other appointed person of KABATA Refinery/the Supervisor determines the route and the final destination for evacuating with the help of security personnel and other current department.
This volume of traffic has been estimated using the results of the traffic counts done at various times.
Technological Procedure for Overhaul on BVAC.N99 (01) Vacuum Circuit Breaker
6. During construction, holes shall be reserved according to process, track, electricity, water supply and drainage, and other disciplines. Construction can be performed only after signing confirmation of process and track. Holes should not be made afterwards.
The applied primer shall be dried fully; after that it may be slightly polished and repaired for reinforcement;
5). All the on-site construction personnel shall wear uniform work clothes distributed by the Company, and wear the safety helmets with company logo and the pass distributed by the Employer.
Fig. 3 Side View of Beam-body Model of Framework Slab Track Structure
(2) There are wear, scaling and aggregate exposure of the pavement near 0# abutment, with S=5X4.5m2; there are gravels stacked on the surface within 0.6~1.7m inside guardrails at both ends, with thickness of 5-15cm.
2. Pasted with hard wood leveled board with thickness of 16 (the back of wood floor applied with a layer of XY401 adhesive and pasted with cement floor)
1. The concrete strength grade of ground beam is C30, and the thickness for concrete protective layer is 25mm.
Complete records shall be made for all compliance procedures and reviews involved in the system.
Contact rating of control output: 5A/250V AC;5A/110V DC
(1) Mechanical equipment: cutting machine, electric welding machine, electric drill, etc.
(2) Set up safety patrol teams along the line to check the line clearing and the sealing of bridge evacuation passages and earthwork protection fences in the section under the jurisdiction, so as to ensure the full-closed management during the testing.
\W0.770069;\Q0;\T1; 1. The data in the parentheses is for the cable trough with a segment length of 0.5m.
Carry out other data exchange and control service as per the demands of users.
Test area, tool room, toilets and enclosed refuse station are set up on the east side of Gate 1#.
SF has already answered questions from CG in Questionnaire 16 for bogie. Formal reply will be sent to CG as soon as possible.
Meanwhile, fault contents are generated in the fault record, the symbol of the tripping switch of the controlled station flashes, with audio alarm given. At this moment, the failure will be affirmed and processed by the operator.
In the process of contracting, inspection and assessment will be carried out in strict accordance with the standards,.
Passenger transport is accompanied by luggage transport because passengers will certainly carry luggages during traveling. The weight and volume of luggages free of charge are as follows: child (including a child free of charge): 10kg, diplomatic personnel: 35 kg, other passengers: 20kg.
4.6.3. The glasses of side-hung door and window should be installed after the assembly on the wall and installation and fixation of the frame and sash grillage, which means that the clearance between the frame and sash should be adjusted firstly, and then the glasses should be installed into the frame and the position should be adjusted, and the sealing strip and the sealant should be filled finally.
The net height at the upper and lower corridors of stair platforms shall not be less than 2.0m; the net height of bench shall not be less than 2.20m (special attention shall be paid during construction).
Double power switch box for turnout in section (IP65)
Contract No.: XHZ(2011) No.018
(2) The company-level work safety accidents reported to SINOPEC are classified into the four types according to the casualty and direct economic losses, namely ultra serious accident, major accident, large accident and common accident (Class A and Class B):
The senior management shall organize to make management objectives and indexes of the company according to management policies for quality, environment and occupational health and safety.
Scope, quantity, depth and spacing for arrangements of survey points shall be determined based on basic types of structures, construction area and geological complexity of site; deepened prospecting hole shall be provided for each geomorphic unit or important structure so as to investigate stratigraphic structure on a controlled basis.
The switch brand provided by the Tenderer shall have operation performance of AFC system for at least three or more lines in China's rail transit industry, and the switch brand manufacturer shall pass the quality management system certification. The Tenderer shall provide the certification contract documents, as well as the operation certification documents and quality certification issued by the user.
Pile construction in the east + excavation, military railway girder erection, pavement recovery, with construction period of 2 + 0.5 months
2. The drawing is applicable to filling height from rail bottom to culvert top 5.0m≤H≤8.0m.
3. Laboratory and instrument examination: Blood routine, urine routine, ECG, serum ALT, lung function, lung diffusion function, chest X-ray scan.
Vehicle equipment meets the requirements in Rail Transit Electronic Equipment of Rolling Stock (GB 25119-2010-T).
Note: The Organization applying for water supply shall also provide the layout of water supply pipes and conformity certificate of the water meter when this Form is submitted.
4.3.3.6 In the process confirmed, it is proposed to change the main production equipment or specified operators.
Since the operation of the national railway's first dedicated migrant-worker train on February 16, the railway sector has operated 300 dedicated migrant-worker trains (with 1250 dedicated carriages), carrying more than 332000 passengers by March 15.
(6) As commissioned by the company, providing the quotations of Chengdu-Europe+extended lines;
The attendees must express their own opinions and sign their comments on the meeting minutes. Any dissenting opinion must be recorded in the meeting minutes.
Do not use the corrosive water as construction water.
3.4.16.8.11 The control panel (table,box, cabinet) shall be equipped with ventilation devices to ensure that, during operation, the internal temperature does not exceed the allowable temperature limit.
Bulk cement is adopted for the Project. During construction, cement should be weighed together with trolley for feeding and a special person should be assigned to take the reading of platform scale, with allowable error being ±1%.
Installed steel mesh and anchor rod can be applied with jet grouting only after being examined and accepted by the quality inspector and the Supervisor in addition to the record of concealed work.
Identification inspection: inspect the product identification as required by the drawing through visual observation.
The fecal sewage and bathing wastewater combining drainage pipe system is adopted indoors.
Distance between the lower edge of upper bracket and the upper starting point of carbonized part
Summary of Main Materials Used for Reinforced Concrete Septic Tanks No. 12 and No.13
The traffic management personnel shall prepare the traffic management plan and implement the plan upon the approval of the Owner and the Engineer after submission. The management personnel shall manage the traffic during the construction.
Building 11 Cement mortar floor (with thickness of 20.
2) Concrete is mixed by a mixing station and automatically counted and loaded. Concrete is transported by tankers and pumped into the mold.
The reinforcement arranged for the rail weighbridge foundation shall be bound firmly.
The distance between receiving-departure track and the main track is 5 meter. The turnout continuous beams are constructed at one time and there is no beam for the rest receiving-departure tracks.
The column spacing should be 6,000 mm or 9,000 mm.
The right side of the station is designed with 1 catch siding with an effective length of 50m.
Independent foundation concrete (ready-mixed concrete C30)
Code for design on evacuation engineering for disaster prevention and rescue of railway tunnel (TB 10020-2017)
Be responsible for the identification and evaluation of the company's environmental aspects and the determination of important environmental aspects; collect, organize, publish and update the company's "list of environmental aspects" and "list of important environmental aspects"; supervise and direct the identification and evaluation of environmental aspects of the branch company (Project Management Department).
The subgrade width of section K223+000~K225+200 (starting point of the project) and section K232+280~K336+265.650 (end point of the project) is 6~8 m; section K225+200~K232+280 passes through urban areas, with its subgrade width of 12~15 m.
It shall use the microwave oven self-equipped fasteners for installation, and the installed and fixed microwave oven and mounting rack shall not shake.
Add truncation gate valve and drainage line on 1100# to 1400# steam condensate main pipes of main devices in line (1) (2) (3)
According to the construction layout plan submitted for approval in the earlier stage, the temporary enclosures shall be subject to surveying and positioning and the local management department shall confirm after setting-out. The parts that are inconsistent with the drawing shall be adjusted in time.
be identified by bidder self in accordance with geological excavation materials and scouting;
(a)The consumption of cementitious material should not exceed 580 kg/m3;
(1) 05-17 is the terminal number of the common return wire of the drive circuit on the side of the relay combination and it is of I24 V negative power supply. The fault of the drive circuit must be analyzed and judged based on the negative power supply of the 05-17 terminal.
The test sequence is described in the test standard of the table below.
Framework A: 19N3\U+009932
Contract Agreement (Scanning Copy 1) for General Contracting Project for Construction and Equipment Procurement of Shagouwei 110kv Main Substation and Fangmaqiao 110kv Main Substation of Kunming Rail Transit Line 3
Finished Works Protection………………………………………………………………9
The variety and quality of filler shall meet the design requirement, and the inspection of filler shall comply with Article 4.10.7.1 of this Standard.
11 - 15V Power supply circuit board; 12 - Signal circuit board; 13 - Control circuit board; 14 - Rectifier circuit board; 15 - Power circuit board
After the pre-assembly, the steel members shall be subject to correction, straightening and leveling by mechanical or high-temperature heating, to eliminate the defects such as bending, warping and irregularity.
Install the upper air return duct onto the back wall of cab (near cab entry door) with M6X20 hexagon bolt, large washer 6 and spring washer 6, and apply Essex sealant for treatment.
5.25. The pipeline from the outside into the room shall be implemented with waterproofing treatment.
After each discipline has verified the preliminary engineering design scheme (including every question), the detail engineering is prepared.
The outer corridor underframe bearing structure with single cab shall be adopted. The cab profile shall be combined with HXN5B type locomotive design, and the front end auxiliary chamber profile shall be designed combined with foreign GE, EMD and other locomotive designs;
12.4.3.1 Be separated from the management of the construction site as per requirements with complete facilities.
4 line high-speed RJ45 interface, 4 line 6PIN Phoenix connector; use CAT5e/6 cable, output distance up to 100M; support hot plug in and out,
If any symptoms of rockburst are found during construction, support with bolts, wire meshes and shotcrete.
Power consumption: total power consumption of the heat pump unit in designed conditions per unit time; the unit is kW.
The position of the action point is located at 1/3 of the calculated height above the section.
If the bumper is CD~8, 9, bolts shall be buried according to requirements of page 36.
1. After the construction of the roofing works is completed, remove the tower crane, use the truck crane as the main vertical transport means, share the temporary facilities on site with Na Teuy, and provide two toilets on site.
Place the company's LOGO in the Exchange and provide the trading personnel with certain conditions for stationed trading.
(6) During foundation pit excavation in the through cut, it is required to make sure the drainage system is available and drain water from the side ditch in advance, without compressing the water cross-section of the drainage ditch. Meanwhile, the construction contractor must restore as per the original standards.
In the process of construction, if the plan is not checked the project is not carried out as planned, or relevant measures are not taken actively to adjust the plan in time, 2 points will be deducted each time.
The contractor shall be responsible for preparing and updating the list of contract drawings and the list of contract documentation, indicating the title, number, revision number and the current approval status of the Employer, if applicable.
Article 8 The head of each department of each of the Organizations shall be the first person responsible for the environmental protection work of the department.
Whether the enterprise signs the agreement related to innovation and ownership with all staffs, and whether the confirmation of agreement stated above is included in the list of quit and retirement procedures.
At the time of braking, air pressure P enters brake cylinder and pushes piston assembly 4 downward. It conquers the acting force of piston release spring 2 to let the slide bushing assembly 5 and clearance adjuster 3 move forward. It pushes brake head 1 forward to make brake shoe contact with wheel tread, so that braking force will be generated.
A connecting plate is set at 500mm on the floor of the lightning protection downlead around the building to test the grounding resistance and reserve the external manual earthing electrode condition. When the steel bar is led out to the scattered water at 1.0m below the floor and the grounding resistance cannot meet the design requirements, the manual earthing body should be replenished.
Vertical transport is conducted by 1 set of 32t gantry crane.
Standards and requirements need to be followed for the construction quality: design quality standard: the score of comprehensive assessment on the design work is 90 and above; construction quality standard: the score of quality assessment on delivery and acceptance of the bid section works is 90 and above, and 90 scores and above for the quality assessment on completion and acceptance of the bid section works and the construction quality grade for excellent.
The tightening torque of bolt M36X150 shall be 1400~1500 N·m. When assembling, operators should supervise the execution on site.
The subsystems, as described in B4.1.4 Technical Specifications of APM Communication System: Appendix 4-Communication System for Power Supply and UPS System, all have their own clock system and data output format, which brings a big problem for centralized maintenance and management of the whole network.
Note: after fire alarm is cleared, personnel shall reset on the host panel or disconnect the power of fire alarm controller host to restart the controller.
It can be known from Table 9.3.1~9.3.19 and Fig. 9.3.1~9.3.23 that the stress and load of each test points on 2# beam section when 2# beam is loaded horizontally at straight-line status are approximately linearly related. And the maximum stress of the guide plate and stability plate is 25.04MPa, at the mid-span position.
WALINI tunnel is changed from high-slope subgrade to tunnel;
LM2D1.1.1.3P Welding at the base
4 Where the pile sinking by vibration is adopted, it shall be controlled mainly based on the elevation as specified by the design or verified through the trial piling and checked based on the penetration.
After the assembly of the construction form traveller, it is required to check the safety and stability of the form traveller, eliminate the non-elastic deformation between the components of the main truss of the form traveller, and observe the elastic deformation of the form traveller. The observations can provide reliable basis for adjusting the subsequent cantilever box girder form traveller construction formwork.
The transportation network in Texas is intensive. Its road and air transport are well developed, making it fast and convenient. Total length of its road line is 0.48 million km, rating the first around the US. Major traffic corridors cover Highway 35, 30, 45, 20 and 10.
Besides, part of the gullies may have debris flow in rainy season and some parts may have relatively small scale debris flow. However, they will not cause great damages to the Project as long as diversion and drainage measures of sluice culverts are taken.
3) The foot hand eye of the exterior wall shall be blocked and filled with C20 fine stone concrete, keeping the record of covert.
(3) to re-plan the traffic signal control system at the crossings in the urban area, and to provide green wave zone to control the traffic of main roads.
When tensioning or withdrawing anchor, no people are allowed to stand behind the oil jack, and a wooden protective board shall be set behind the tensioning operation area to prevent the prestressing tendons from breaking or the anchors and splints from ejecting and injuring people.
c) Take charge of publicizing and training of special plan and organize its implementation.
(5) Analyzes and summarizes the problems in the waste classification publicity, proposes modification suggestions, solves user's pain points and improves operation mode;
The development of traffic volume forecast with a medium growth rate of traffic volume shall be used to evaluate the fee incomes of the Project. With a medium growth rate, the forecast results of trend traffic volume of each section in characteristics years are summarized as follow:
1) Scope and main quantities of installation work
(4) Setting-out of Excavated Section inside Tunnel and Steel Support Positioning
5.1 Organize selection, evaluation and re-evaluation of suppliers and set up files for suppliers.
6.3.2.1 According to the applied review contents, the review applicant prepares the review data, and submit such data with Report of Second Level Review Application of xx Department to the second level design review organizing personnel of the department.
If there is water in the hole, put the clay into the hole directly and use the shatter cone through repeated percussion in small stroke to produce slurry.
Table 2 Calculation Results of MU Traction at Different Grade
The X86 clock server is provided in the central machine room and at the station, so as to deploy the clock synchronization application.
It is proposed according to the preliminary design to arrange the beam prefabrication yard of B.Na Tong, Muang Xai, Luang Prabang, Muang Kasi, Vang Viang, and B.Phon Xay in the reserved area for cargo yard to reduce work loads of removal works and earth and stone works.
Date of expiry: Jan. 16, 2019
3) The transverse stiffness of the pier and abutment is controlled according to the principle of "Horizontal angle between adjacent pier axes caused by the transverse displacement difference of pier top shall not exceed 1‰", and the transverse stiffness shall be checked accordingly.
(5) Relative humidity in the saloon and in the driver's cab (under AW0 and AW2 loads);
Project divisions shall set up construction teams in accordance with tender commitments, contract agreement and actual situations of the lot, strengthen the organization and leadership, strengthen the process control, establish and improve the construction team management system and implement the management responsibility.
Inspection quantity: The contractor shall carry out sampling inspection on 3 cross-sections for every 50 meters of ditches and the Supervisor shall carry out parallel inspection on 1 cross-section.
① If there is a special alternative button BA on the alternative shunting route, it shall be handled normally: route entrance button → alternative route button → route exit button.
This plant can store 3 different aggregates at the same time; 50 loaders are used for material feeding; 4 cement bins and corresponding spiral conveyors are provided.
The wiring method of the 132kV side of the main substation should meet the requirements of the power system and in theory, wiring method that can meets the requirements of the power supply system and that can save the investment should be adopted; 33kV side.
6.4.1 Employee safety in relation to product quality realization
6.13.5 The measures against rain and dust, and safety protection measures for luminaire products shall be taken according to GB 7000.1.
The copiers include special, high-speed multi-page copiers (A3 and A4 paper with sorting and zoom-out functions), and their standard is equivalent to the Xerox Document Center 4000-digital copier, providing connectivity, consumables, and maintenance.
6. Height of bearing pad stone includes space reserved between bottom surface of the bearing and pad stone top. Specific construction method is shown in the installation drawing of bearing.
4) The weaved hose tail shall be treated with a flamer and be bound into horn mouth shape with cable tie.
Restrictions on partial freight cars or quantities: unable to evaluate each prohibited dangerous goods one by one beforehand, and some unlicensed trucks secretly transport the dangerous goods;
(5) When the materials for high filling embankment come from different source or their performance is quite different, filling by layer or vertical width shall not be allowed.
230kV, foundation construction of 234 foundations (4235m3; erection of 234 towers (2426.255t); stringing of 75.121km
high performance in lubricating property - its coefficient of friction is the lowest in solid materials.
(3) After the regulator is loaded and assembled, the values of A and L must be adjusted to meet the requirements. For details, see Article 3.2.1.9.
The design coal type is lignite, and the proximate analysis and calorific value are shown in 3.9.3.1.
Implementation Measures for Production Risk Classification Management and Control
The ex-factory documents, which shall be properly packed to prevent from humidity.
However, single column type structure is not beneficial to seismic resistence. According to Clause 5.6.7 of Specification of Seismic Design for Highway Engineering: Single column type structure should not be adopted in areas where designed basic seismic peak acceleration of is larger than or equal to 0.1g. Double-column pier or multi-column pier should be connected in transverse direction to ensure the tensility of pier.
① Base course treatment: remove the dust on the base course, clean it with a chisel and a wire brush , pick out the mortar peel and ash layer.
See the following table for specific installation locations and quantity of equipment:
According to the construction drawings and the geological situation, the ERSS of this Project includes two forms: diaphragm wall and secant pile.
Nanchang Honggutan Wanda Hotel Light Current Engineering (audio and video system, security monitoring system, intercom system wiring, comprehensive wiring system, etc.)
Collection No.: POWERCHINA-0107-18424
The wheels are designed in accordance with UIC 510-5 and EN 13979-1, as shown in Fig. 9-4-4.
1)The governing laws, regulations, rules, standards, and relevant provisions specified in the above emergency plan change significantly;
Technical Specifications of Material for QSG12 Diesel Engine
Chinese Standard Operating System of Windows Server is adopted on the database server, and the standard software of ORACLE database is run.
AC-TCU-ARC-0050 - AC-TCU-ARC-0086
For the pile at the tower location calibrated by resurvey, a clear and stable mark must be set. For the construction boundary between the two Construction Contractors, it must resurvey to the corner and exceed more than two foundations. The pit cannot be excavated unit it is confirmed to be correct by contacting with the other party.
Rainwater pipe UPVC DN150 (including valve, pipe fitting, disinfection, flushing, etc.)
Silty clay: Brownish grey, hard plastic, planting soil found at the depth of 0-0.3m, containing some plant roots; core in earth columns; recovery percentage: 100%.
② Specification for Operation Display of Centralized Traffic Control (TJ/DW 207-2018).
(5) The networks were located in places where the ground foundation was stable so that they can be preserved in a long time;
Not less than 65% of the longitudinal reinforcement area outside of the column stretching into the beam
The distance should be determined according to specific calculation problem, grid division density and monotonicity of parameter change as described in the implementation process of coupled methods in details.
d. The protection measures shall be taken timely for the excavated or filled slope of soil subgrade against the washout and the effects on drainage systems in rainy season, and against the pollution to adjacent farmlands and waters.
The use of this certificate shall conform to the regulations. This certificate can provide a good guarantee for your transaction records and protect you from any claim arising from errors or delays in payment.
4.8.2 Summary procedure of the Commissioning Team:
(3) Road on construction site shall be watered by the designated people regularly with a watering cart and a system shall be established to prevent road dust.
At the same time, the system will pop up the monitor image according to the trigger signal.
In the event of any single-point open circuit of the equipment in the system, the fire alarm control panel (FACP) and the photograph workstation send out audible and visual alarming signals. The equipment continues to monitor the external lines, without affecting the communication of the loop bus.
11.9 Carbon fiber paster is electroconductive and the flying carbon fiber will cause short circuit to electric machinery, so switches of machines should be wrapped with plastic clothes for insulation.
- Disconnect the connector IP15 of AUDIO control unit and connector IP06 of instrument cluster control unit.
Blocking of the feeding pipe or discharge pipe: once the feeding pipe is blocked, the feeding valve of the autoclave as well as the discharge valve is closed immediately. The opening of the oxygen main valve is slowly reduced and the exhaust valve is opened to decrease the pressure to 0.4-0.5MPa and keep the temperature at 120°C. After that, the discharge pipe is removed for flushing with high-pressure water.
Refer to Page 7 [N08] of S/W 11J515
Insulation and Withstand Voltage Test Outline of SFE62 EMU
Both at the inner side of the topside row of arch ring arc-shaped kerbstone and on the top of the bottom row of arch ring bankets, back excavation, filling and punning are performed to prevent the flowing water from washing the embankment slope. The sizes of trench excavation and filled earth are calculated on the basis of (20*20cm).
At the same time, users are allowed to define light source attributes for any object, which means that users can conveniently define various lighting sources, ambient light sources and self-luminous objects on the interior and exterior trims of vehicles.
Applicable strata: It is applicable to strata with completely weathered granite in weak tectonic belt, which are mixed with loose sand, soil and clay in soft ~ liquid plastic state after disturbance of a great number of water inflow volume.
Process Monitoring and Identification Measures(TEC—QB—ZL—09)
By coordinating with roads and aviation, the Project forms a perfect comprehensive transportation system and can better leverage the role of transportation in regional economic development.
In installation of mechanic equipment and pipe and valve fittings for the pump station, how much manpower will you input and how many days will the work take?
Pulse: Cab sends an order to connect main breaker, input.
Three 2-car Units Multiple Working Sketch under Normal Conditions
Boiling: adjust the water level of the boiling box properly to ensure that the test specimen is immersed into the water during the whole boiling process, without adding the test water midway and meanwhile ensure that it can be boiled within 30min±5min.
The Safety and Quality Department shall inspect the semi-finished products of the assembly process and the finished products of the general assembly process, and dispose the nonconforming products according to the Nonconforming Product Control Procedure.
The startup button of the fire hydrant shall be only used as a switch sending out the alarm signal, and shall not directly start the pump.
The surface of the area is with developed gullies and rainwater discharged along with the surface runoff, and the vegetation is sparse, which is mainly composed of spiked shrubs.
Capacity of diesel tank about 3000 L
Subsidiaries shall carry out acceptance according to the validation criteria stipulated in the procurement documents.
8. Organize and implement emergency rescue plans for work safety accidents that may happen in the Company.
The upper structure of this bridge shall be prefabricated on site. After the construction of the substructure was completed, the upper structure shall be erected and the deck slab shall be cast.
Capacitance (CX): 3pF~40000pF 3kV 10pF~0.3uF Minimum resolution: 0.01pF
The spacing of longitudinal joint of the capstone shall be consistent with that of the settlement joint of the panel, and the reinforcement to be embedded can be determined according to the size of the later reinforced concrete parapet.
After correction of the weight and threshold of each neuron in the network, the network again obtains outputs through the feedforward transfer mode, and then based on comparison between the actual output value and the expected value, generates a new round of correction of weights and thresholds according to the error.
1.8.1 All components and devices of equipment must be designed, manufactured and installed as per the metric units specified by the International Organization for Standardization.
If the water consumption of the train washing plant is large, the water used for washing trains will be collected and recycled after being processed to fully save energy.
(d) The tensile strength and bonding strength of concrete repair materials shall be at least 1.2 times the corresponding strength of the concrete being repaired;
YDK12+342.00 Left 11.00
Clay is dense, viscous and sometimes oily, with sand impurities, loose inclusions of nodules and carbonates, and particles of iron-containing manganese compounds in the lower part.
It is mainly responsible for the processing and manufacturing of embedded parts of metal structure and small metal structural parts. The workshop is equipped with a raw material storage yard, a finished product storage area, a processing and manufacturing workshop, a steel platform, lathes, bench drills, cutters, grinding machines, electric welding machines, gas cutting equipment, etc.
Calculation Table of Estimated Maintenance Expenses During the Service Life of Products
When the air leakage is less than 130m3/h, the orifice plate constant C equals 0.603 and the orifice diamater equals 0.0316m.
Places where exudation of water and "spongy soil" occur should be excavated and places where aggregate concentrates should be treated by spreading it to unrolled layers. Fine aggregate should be added in time and cracked places should be rolled again or excavated.
This Manual shall be interpreted by the Administrative Personnel Department of the Group and come into effect from the date of issuance.
Steel product: HRB335 reinforcement which is not treated by high-pressure quenching is adopted as main reinforcement for ballast tub and capping. HPB235 reinforcement is adopted for others.
6.7.3 Employees shall be trained on fieldwork in extremely cold weather to adapt to severe weather conditions, including but not limited to:
The maximum lateral horizontal force is 106.9kN.
3. Indoor water supply pipes and hot water pipes shall be generally PP-R steady-state pipes; and indoor domestic drainage pipes shall be all PVC-U pipes and be connected by adhesive.
Water-saving rate=Actual water consumption/Normed water consumption
2. Party B shall complete the audit work and issue the Auditor's Report in the agreed time.
Segment workshop: 2 labor teams with more than 200 persons.
The wheel diameter shall be automatically calibrated after the average wheel diameter is input into the MPU by the train staff.
The difference shall be generally less than 2% compared with test data of the manufactory or values measured before.; The compensating winding shall be decided on its own.
9.1.5 Drainage system shall be timely constructed before filling the embankment at the soft soil section, in order to prevent the ponding from soaking the subgrade.
Yangcheng - Houma Expressway starts at Runcheng Interchange on Jinyang Expressway, passing through Songyu, Huanglongyi, Shangzhuang, Qinshui, Yicheng East, Yicheng and Quwo, and ends at Zhao Kang Junction on the Dayun Line.
composite tare and tare deviation are great!
Contaminants such as scale cinder, rust, oil stain, oil and grease or stain will be removed and if necessary, physical or chemical method or both methods can be used to remove contaminants.
Single - phase five-hole flush-type socket (Exibl) 220 v, 16A
(1) After the project is completed, an engineering maintenance team with no less than 10 people shall be set up, with the Chief Engineer of the project as the team leader and the Supervising Engineer as the executive deputy team leader, to be responsible for the maintenance of the project during the quality warranty period.
Special operations personnel should be licensed in accordance with the relevant national provisions;
Gravel sand (Q4al+pl): mixed color, poorly-graded, with fine roundness, mainly distributed in river beds and bank slopes, with thin layer.
Fig. 6.120 Von Mises Stress Contour of Reverse Service Braking (Part of Empty Spring Seat)
Passenger transport is an important sustainment for human survival, while the modern passenger transport system is an important symbol of social progress.
HDPE produced in this project is a bimodal HDPE product using ExxonMobil Corporation's proprietary catalyst and production process, with a planned production capacity of 550kt/year.
The welding rod drying room must be equipped with dehumidifier, thermometer and moisture meter.
The New Mohan/Boten-Vientiane Section in Central Corridor of Trans-Asian Railway (New Boten-Vientiane Railway) is located in the Lao People's Democratic Republic.
For cases with positive deviation and negative deviation, specific deviation condition and digital differences must be described detailedly in remarks.
China's machinery and textile, porcelain and clothing as well as daily necessities are exported from here, while foreign commodities such as scarves, shawls, cigarettes and drugs are heading east from here.
The pile head is chiseled by the air compressor, assisted with manpower, where the upper part is handled by the air compressor, and the lower part reserves 10~20cm for manual removal.
Because of the long across of the floor slab, there is an important problem which is the vertical vibration of the floor-the vertical vibrating frequency shall be controlled above 6.5 hertz. Meanwhile, we require that the floor slab be maturely experienced for use to be highly comfortable.
The platform width of double-track straight sections shall be 1600m and that of single-track sections shall be 800mm.
(2) Pipes of various materials and specifications should be checked as per specifications regulations in their diameters, wall thickness and bending which should meet regulations in materials standards.
For other risk events involved in project implementation, each unit shall identify the risks and make measures (including contingency plan) in the process of project planning and implementation.
Releasing brake holding (when one of the following conditions is met, brake holding is released):
The Specification specifies requirements for surface coating systems of the whole vehicle and parts of Berlin DB shunting locomotive for Germany.
Check whether the whole axis is smooth after the purline under ring gutter of the roof is installed; and purline plate can be tightened finally if design requirements are satisfied with.
If the actual supply quantity deviates greatly from the bidding quantity due to construction drawing and design changes, the Bidder shall accept it and shall not use it as the basis for price adjustment and claim.
System interface displays DCU alarm.
Standard of travel allowances in Sweden: 15 dollars (about RMB 91.4 Yuan)/person/day X 4 days;
Observe and implement the Safety Management Rules for Pressure Vessels and Safety and Technical Operation Specifications for Air Compressor Operators.
The clamp nuts for fixing bolts of the running rail are all of cap type.
This railway mainly passes the desert landscape and the stratum along the line mainly consists of quaternary-system loose accumulation layer and some parts belong to tertiary-system weak diagenes rock types. The geological conditions are relatively simple.
XD / XKYX-QZB-0203 (Fourth Edition) -2012 Quality Objectives Control Procedures
Considering comprehensively from the overall urban planning, the analysis of current road and the cost, the west side channel, i.e. End Point 1, is recommended to be adopted to access the Epe-Ikorodu Road in this design.
Most of these technologies, especially the earthwork, bridges, tracks, communications and signaling technologies were applied to the construction of HSRs in the future.
The economic internal rate of return (EIRR) of the Project is 11.50% and the economic net present value (ENPV) is more than zero.
Detailed instructions for assembly and erection of poles and towers shall be prepared first, specifying the sequence of hoisting, preparations for hoisting, and transportation and manual handling of prefabricated reinforced concrete parts of baseplate and anchor. Then surveying, positioning and resurveying of baseplate and anchor positions shall be carried out.
In addition, as the typical value, the data of maintenance of 1 day, 3 days, and 7 days shall be given.
f. Power plant, including the dedicated motor, shall be fit for 380V power supply, 3-phase, 50Hz, insulation grade F and the protection level of IP67 or above.
Reply: In the preliminary design phase, we aim to determine the design scheme basically in accordance with the Preparation Method of Design Documents for Basic Construction Project for Highway Engineering issued by the Ministry of Transport of Ministry of Communications (JGLF [2007] No. 358).
This article specifies the shortest curing time for heat and humidity preservation of concrete based on durability of concrete structures.
Acting as the fully authorized representative of the Construction Sub-division for the contact work with the Employer, Construction Subcontractor and department concerned in the construction site, and consulting the manager of the Construction Sub-division in advance or report to the manager afterwards for important issues.
(11) Design Specifications of Highways Environmental Protection (JTG B04-2010)
The main choice is the Peshawar City Station and Nasirpur Station, with the scheme description as follows.
In order to reduce the settlement of earth backing on both sides of the box culvert to improve the smoothness of the connection between the culvert top and both sides of the road, excavate the steps at the soil foundation on both sides of the box culvert, and the step has the width of 60cm, and is backfilled with sand and gravel and compacted by layers, with the compaction thickness of 30cm.
a: The test is applicable to the I/O port with a cable within 3 m, or within 10 m with a length exceeding 30 m.
Re-check whether the reserved holes and pre-buried parts conform to the requirements.
5.5.1 Technical disclosure shall be performed on site by experts when necessary for new technical projects according to demands.
The position and space of prestressed pipes should be reserved when installing reinforcement. The cross reinforcement should be used to fix the prestressed pipes in order to prevent the prestressed pipes from being offset in concreting.
Description (1) After the processing is started or adjusted, the first piece of inspection shall be carried out, and the measured value is required to be recorded for the first article inspection;
The professional supervisor or foreman should undertake the seasonal inspection. The various bilge wells, combined wells, water pump should be washed, the water pump contacts, the insulation strength of housing for ground and the sensitivity of liquid level should be checked.
Landscape Planting Design-Zone A2 Setting-out Diagram 1:500
The user can adjust the parameters of all forces, acceleration at all stages and the time of opening and closing through the PTU software.
4.2.3 The spacing of exploratory points should comply with the requirements of Table 4.2.3.
This method is suitable for flue gas desulfurization in smelters with zinc smelting. Raw materials of the absorbent can be obtained locally. SO2 subject to acidolysis and zinc sulfate solution can be fully used without byproducts, thus realizing the recycling of sulfur and zinc resources.
In case of increased costs and (or) the responsibility for delay of construction of the Contractor due to failure or delay of issuing instructions or wrong instructions by the Engineer under the Contract, the Engineer and the Employer shall bear the corresponding responsibilities.
June 12 (Monday): visiting DGN.
(3) Intelligent unit of the frame circuit breaker can receive the engaging and disengaging instructions sent by the monitoring system and activate the circuit breaker.
Inform the user that he/she can use the left control handle to control the machine to travel to the left and right.
4.1.1 The contractor shall conform to the availability and reliability assurance required in the tendering documents.
The steel bars entering the construction site shall be derusted in time if there is any rust before closing the formwork, and shall be replaced if the rust is serious.
Air Cooler AE-2026Monetary unit: RMB Yuan
2) Pipes shall be numbered before trial assembly. Then, they shall be assembled and subject to pressure test. Their air tightness shall be checked.
Rates of changes in traction and braking control commands of TCU will be restricted to prevent vehicle impulse, to ensure stable operating and to improve passenger comfort.
3.5.11 Requirements for cable mark, connector model and equipment coding, etc.
(2) The Contractor provides and installs all equipment and main materials (including auxiliary materials) of this Lot under the site conditions of the Project, and the installation must meet the appropriate norms and standards.
The base rocks are mainly slightly-weathered (W2) and belong to Class V secondly hard rock and Group A filling materials.
1. Masonry shall meet quality standard and design requirement;
After derusting, the steel surface shall be coated within the required time limit after passing the inspection. The surface treatment of steel structure shall conform to the provisions of Rust Grades and Preparation Grades of Steel Surfaces before Application of Paints and Related Products.
The management of the areas with densely distributed rebars, embedded pipes and reserved holes will be strengthened ensure the concrete compactness of these areas.
Road relocation shall be carried out in accordance with the local traffic planning and the parameters no less than those for the existing line, as well as the relevant local specifications and regulations of Indonesia.
8.6.2.3.6 Make external coordination
The concrete to be used in the Project shall be ready-mixed concrete.
9. Use stainless steel plate of 1 in thickness as skirting line. Conduct wire drawing on the surface of stainless steel (320 mesh).
Note: the relationship between the accident unit and SEI: construction contractor, road transportation carrier, waterway transportation contractor, franchised dealer, holding JV and unit out of the system.
Name or Tenderer: China Railway No.8 Engineering Group Bridge Engineering Co., Ltd.
However, the Chinese enterprises has accumulated a large number of railway skilled workers in the large-scale development of Chinese railways.
• Risk has been reduced to the lowest possible level.
The inference process of centrifugal force is as follows: sinθ=h/=F/G=F/mg,
3.6 The shoulder on both sides of the embankment is of dry mortar rubber shoulder whose top width is 0.6m. The top of the protection shoulder is finished with M10 cement mortar and the width is 0.08m.
Since 1932, the gross domestic product (GDP) of Colombia has maintained a sustained and stable growth.
This project is located in the Ayat vehicle section and set within the area which is located at the north of the east-west trunk road of Ayat and in the land parcel at the west of Ayat campsite of China Railway Group Limited.
7.1 Sanitary wares and water nozzles employ the water-saving water supply devices, and shall be in accordance with the regulations of Water-saving Domestic Water Appliances (CJ/T164-2014); the water saving performance indicators of water appliances must meet the requirements of Technical Specification for Water Saving Apparatus (DB11/343-2006).
Company HSE comprehensive inspection, project routine supervision result
Introduce new technology and new management method, solve security problems which are unable to be solved by the company and provide assistance to guidance of development of internal information security.
The Tender improves the line conditions, reduces the difficulty of bridge construction and causes small impact on road traffic, which can greatly reduce the construction difficulty and shorten the construction period.
3. The tunnel length is 1.48km shorter than the option of crossing under B3 highway.
During the installation, the Tenderer shall submit monthly reports to the Tenderee, and such reports shall contain project progress, faults occured, adverse factors, potential delay, and suggested remedies.
33kV switchgear cabinet shall be of AC metal-clad movable enclosed type, while the capacitor cabinet of GR type.
2) The air is used for air pressure test. The pressure for trial test shall be the minimum value among values of 50% of the test pressure value according to the gas test pressure. The test can be carried out further after the acceptance of trial test.
220/380V shall be used as voltage for LV power distribution. Live conductor system shall be of three-phase four-wire system.
E-Mail: zhouchunhua0123@yahoo.cn
The markings in the drawing are made of white thermoplastic marking coatings (including reflective glass beads, marking primer and other ingredients) and are 2 mm thick; except that the marking for parking zone is 45cm wide and the edge line is 20cm wide, other markings are 15cm wide;
The variable lease payment which is not included in the measurement of lease receipts is included in the current profits and losses when it actually occurs.
The bearing structure is the main load-transferring component, it can bear the joint force combining the vertical wind load of PSD and extrusion of passengers and safely transfer the wind load, crowd load, impulsive load, earthquake force, etc. to the civil structure of platform.
Stop increasing the pressure when the pressure reaches the test pressure.
Whether welding joint is applied or not and the welding type shall be determined based on such specific conditions as stress condition, diameter, seismic grade and structural part of the steel bar.
______ (the Winner) shall hold the Sales Confirmation to sign the Contract for State-Owned Construction Land Use Right Assignment with Jiashan County Land Resources Bureau before June 9th, 2017 at No. 126, Jiashan Avenue, Luoxing Street (the Land Window of Jiashan Processing and Certification Center.
In the accounting period in which staffs have rendered services, the Company shall recognize the payable salaries to staffs as liabilities.
Hanging baskets shall be provided on both sides of the pier and installed before girder erection, positions for holes are reserved at the fencing in the concrete casting of capping, and installation is to be conducted after girder erection.
8.4.18.4. Under the operating environment of Luoyang and under the condition of ensuring the air dust content indicator in the vehicle, the cleaning cycle of the air filter screen shall not be less than 1 month and the replacement cycle shall not be less than 3 months.
All records, quality evaluation and other materials shall be signed by the Engineer and the Employer's Engineer.
The tunnel mainly passes the cobble layer and the half-diagenetic sandstone layer.
To facilitate the clearance check, the Tenderer shall provide the complete outline dimension diagram of vehicle (when the air spring is active and inactive) including the margin left for extreme motion.
16.1 Measures and Methods to Meet Design Requirements
It is a virtual organization which is established depending on project initiation and dissolved upon completeness of the project.
·The high-performance anti-slide control unit of pneumatic brake is subject to slide test according to the train deceleration and speed difference and realizes the all-axle slide control for the train, so as to meet the the safe operation requirements of the train.
Conduct regular fire training and drilling on employees.
Prepare the overhaul engineering technology andorganizational measures plan
"Employer" means the person named as employer in the Contract Data and the legal successors in title to this person.
Arrange the exploration test according to the type of debris flow prevention and control project to comply the project design requirements.
The steel framework will be fabricated by spot welding of the main reinforcement and the detail banding will be performed.
The ditch bottom elevation is estimated from upstream side to downstream side at 0.3%.
The Corporation reserves the right to reject any Tender when the requirements of either the General or Particular Instructions to Tenderers are not complied with.
Use the positioning machine tool for assembly of U-shape rib, which is designed with the merits of high precision, efficient and zero damage, and the assembly precision and the assembly clearance between the U-shape rib and the deck slab can be controlled.
June 2014 to June 2016
Under the action of basic combination, the maximum positive bending moment of main girder is 3,184.4 kN·m, the maximum negative bending moment is -4,038.8 kNm, and the maximum shear force of main girder is 819.4 kN; after checking calculation, the strength of main girder meets the requirements of the specifications.
If the embedded parts are not matched, report to the Supervisor and the design institute in written form in time. After the design is changed by the design institute or the formal reply is received from the Supervisor, prepare a drawing for the embedded parts and reserved holes, assign a special person to take charge of the technical guidance and inspection, and conduct technical disclosure.
The human resource management of the company is governed by the Deputy General Manager in Charge of Human Resources, and the human resources are controlled by the Human Resources Department.
4. The members adjacent to the water tank shall be made of impermeable concrete with a impermeability grade not less than P6. The restrained expansion rate for curing for 14 days in water shall not be less than 0.02%.
It is also known as an intermediate body, in which there is a 1.85L in the volume chamber cavity and 0.6L local decompression cavity.
Fabrication of cushion block: The cushion block for beam/lab reinforcement cover is prefabricated with cement mortar, in the specification of 50X50X cover thickness. The cushion blocks for beam reinforcement are laid in a cross manner every 800 respectively at the bottom and both sides of the beam. The cushion blocks for lab reinforcement are laid and bound firmly at the lower corner of the main reinforcement every lm2.
12.2.9 This clause also provides provisions on checking computation of the anti-slip and anti-overturning stability of cantilevered retaining walls and counterfort retaining walls.
Vents should be reserved in the middle of the top plate, and the left and right side walls should be fixed by the embedded reinforcement. The vaults are connected by junction steel plates and 140mm H-shaped steel connection. The embedded reinforcement and junction steel plates are filled with epoxy resin.
1. When excavating the pit near the building, the corresponding safety measures shall be done according to the excavation depth.
The Project Management Party shall bear the responsibility for breach of contract and compensate the loss incurred thereof by the Client.
Structural components should be hoisted in place after calibration, and fixated immediately. The components should be installed according to the form and spatial positioning system on the current day, instead of the next day.
Operating mechanism support, groove steel, #12.6X410
The general guiding principle of cableway site selection is "protecting scenery and facilitating tourism". The cableway site selection of Mount Songshan Scenic Area should be guided by the master plan of the scenic area, focusing on the protection of relevant cultural heritage.
The system test shall carry out necessary cross-line ticket circulation test and equipment system pressure test.
The Supplier shall provide braking characteristic curves under different line voltages and different loads in the bidding documents.
The Plan shall address health and safety hazards associated with construction activities (e.g., excavations, tunnelling etc.), use of heavy equipment, transport of materials and other hazards associated with various construction activities, including both risk to site personnel and to the community.
The hazardous goods are crosswise stacked, randomly placed and exposed to the sun, for which no leakage collection device is provided.
In order to control boiler feed water and steam quality, following sampling points (cooler) and instruments are installed: boiler water, saturated steam, superheated steam and boiler feed water.
The test medium shall be water of 5°C~40°C.
8. World Economy Statistics Yearbook – Haiti (1988)
18) Refrigerating capacity and power consumption tests: The refrigerating capacity of units shall be no less than 95% of their nominal refrigerating capacity. The measured refrigerating power consumption of units shall be no more than 105% of their nominal power consumption.
The production quantity and structure of side plates meet the drawing requirements.
The results of project planning shall be documented and those requiring approval of the Employer or the Supervisor shall be submitted to the Employer or the Supervisor for examination and approval.
One wall connecting tube shall be arranged every 4.5m along the height direction of the building, and one every 4.5m along the length direction of the building.
Reliable grounding bus bars and connection terminals are set in the box body, the connection terminals are connected with grounding conductors in the box body by fastening bolts which can avoid falling off.
The cement of different types or sources shall be stored in the separated environment.
The welding of reinforcement shall use flash butt welding mainly and splice welding secondarily. The vertical main reinforcement shall use electroslag pressure submerged arc welding, and the horizontal reinforcement shall use flash butt welding and one-side lap welding.
The technical disclosure shall be defined in terms of design, specification, quality and operation process, and construction shall be carried out strictly in accordance with the requirement and standard of the technical disclosure.
The works is expected to be started in March 2013 and will last for 3 months.
The QHSE policies and strategic objectives of the Company, including commitment on continuous improvement;
The feeding capacities of flux and iron alloy feeding systems for converter and refining in Phase 1 and Phase 2 shall be constructed to meet the overall capacity needs of the three phases.
1.10 Total Budget Estimate and Fund Raising
6.2.1.4 Installation drawings and installation operation instructions
• Ergonomics/human factors: repetitive actions and tasks, manual operation, fatigue, workstation design/operation, shift work
The method statement will adhere to the principle of "early tunneling, short drilling footage, weak blasting, strong supporting, frequent measuring, early closing and in-time lining" in general.
Committed response time of after-sales services (outside the province) (hours)
Each coating shall be applied uniformly and completely over the entire surface.
Regularly perform cleaning, garbage removal, and arrange dedicated personnel to clean the toilets.
Paper materials of all the works have been organized into delivery documents with divided volumes.
3.The major functional items have been proved to be in conformity with the provisions of relevant professional quality acceptance specification by the inspection;
When the temperature difference is small, the compressor runs at low frequency to maintain the saloon temperature and ensure comfort.
2) Stainless steel: Special tools such as stainless steel wire brush or polishing disc shall be used for brushing or polishing till metal luster is seen, and then organic solvents (such as absolute ethyl alcohol or acetone, rosin, and gasoline) shall be used to remove the foreign matters.
any products or materials that have uncertain inspection and test status.
3. Foundation type: concrete of independent foundation
Line filter shall be installed inside the box with proper cooling method.
Functional departments and workshops should sign the fire control liability agreement with outside construction units working in the factory to clearly specify fire control measures and responsibilities and such units can perform works only after the approval of the Security Department.
7.1 Appendix A: Notice of the Selected Supplier
4mm thick polyester membrane SBS modified asphalt root-resistance waterproof roll
7. Lawsuit and arbitration: I and each party of the consortium are not given lawsuit or arbitration incurred by the crime related to contract fraud or serious unlawful act in the period from March 2017 to February 2020 (within 3 years from the date of submitting the prequalification document).
4.1 Proposal (method and timetable)
1 draw-out track is set on the small-millage end of the station, with an effective length of 850m, and 1 draw-out track is set on the large-millage end of the station, with an effective length of 450m.
The maintaining computer can be connected to the microcomputer brake control unit, such that commissioning, testing, and reading of internal information of the memory can be conducted with special software.
When the ON-type solenoid valve is excited, the input port communicates with the output port; at the same time the exhaust port is closed, and the solenoid valve is in the air supply state. When the ON-type solenoid valve is demagnetized, the input port is closed, the output port communicates with the exhaust port, and the solenoid valve is in the exhaust state.
S-shaped rivulet, with a 2-3m high embankment. Both the banks are woodland, mainly arbors and shrubs with dense vegetation. Water is 0.5-1.5m deep during investigation.
2. Component specification: as wide as the wall; refer to the design drawing for height
HMI and video monitoring system are used as the display for the train management system. For details, see Chapter 12 and 13.
The locomotive is equipped with sanding device to increase friction between wheel and rail under special circumstances.
The lathe is the special equipment used for measuring, cutting and profiling of wheel flange, tread and brake disc of disassembled wheel sets, with gearbox and motor suspension body, of various electric locomotives, diesel locomotives, passenger cars, freight cars, EMUs and metro trains with a gauge of 1435mm.
①Provide copies of physical property test results of the supplied compounds.
Put forward the emergency response countermeasures and suggestions for actions taken to mitigate the accident consequence to the emergency commander-in-chief
When the temporary bridge was no longer used, the abandoned earth was transported to other projects
11.11.8 Quality Assurance Measures for Supervision Service during Construction Preparation
The Contractor will provide relevant expense vouchers, invoices or bills whenever the local environmental protection department and the Project Supervisor think it necessary.
Chloride mortar has strong hygroscopicity, so thermal insulation performance will decrease and there will be crystallization of salt.
2. The number and location of street lamps shall be determined according to the instructions.
The greenhouses are located on the north side of the buildings, and the buildings are all single-story.
Carry out tracking verification for implementation of corrective and preventive measures.
The ancillary facilities including toll stations shall be built according to the local architectural style, and greened and beatified.
Railway Vehicle Braking Pressure Intelligent Detector
Figure 3 Shape and Depth of Quenched Layer at Transition
Table 4.5.1-1 Project Service Content and Standard Specification
Based on the above analysis, a transfer elevator shall be added for the basement, and the current conditions shall be analyzed accordingly.
Generally conduct the overall support displacement under the condition of traffic ensurance, so it is important to guarantee the smooth traffic and safety work: on one hand, it is to guarantee that the bridge structure is complete and free of damage during the construction; on the other hand, it is to guarantee the absolute safety for people and equipments during the construction.
Chinese and German standards are different in electric power quality and incoming voltage class.
5.2.11 The allowable deviations and inspection quantity of overall dimensions of bases shall comply with those specified in Table 5.2.11.
Vehicle supplier should provide train traction characteristics, service and emergency brake characteristics, and also the indicators of acceleration/deceleration change rate.
≥96% (98%) of the standard density in Lab
Each of the two acoustic tubes is a group in the test. Through the coupling effect of water, the ultrasonic pulse signal is emitted from the transducer in one acoustic tube, and the transducer in the other acoustic tube receives the signal. The ultrasonic apparatus measures the relevant parameters and collects such parameters for storage.
In principle, the width of subgrade and pavement of the intersected road shall be consistent with that of the existing road.
New construction of drifts with or without vents, and replacement of poor functioning existing vented drifts with box/portal culverts;
The work benchmark point shall be located near the tide staff to check the variation of the tide staff zero point frequently. The signs for work benchmark point can be chiseled on the rock, fixed jetty, concrete surface and cliff, and then marked with paint.
5. The power warning signs shall be in accordance with the relevant domestic regulations.
Therefore, the Project provides a new direction for Dammam to develop inland in the northwest.
Refer to article 3c in Page 53 of S/W 11J517 for mop sink.
Tensile testing (the hardness sampling inspection is only conducted for nuts and bolts/studs with length ≤180 mm and diameter ≤18 mm.)
(1). Unified Standard for Reliability Design of Building Structures (GB50068-2001)
Bill of Quantities of Subgrade Protection Works (Anchored Frame Beam)
2. All button operations are completed in the emergency station control mode.
Name of Manufacturer: GuangMing Railroad Holdings CO., LTD.
The measuring pipelines and pipe valves of the instruments shall be preferentially connected by mean of pressure gasket type butt welding.
Determine the design and development, process preparation and manufacturing process for different types of products and determine the process document to be created and resources to be configured, to make the product realization process in a controlled state.
18.4 Electric Energy Management Function Realized by ISCS
Steel wire tensioning: The automatic force sensor and force control instrument used for tensioning shall be calibrated correspondingly by nationally recognized metrological verification organization. The calibration period shall not be longer than three months, the precision of the tensioning force shall not be lower than Grade 1.0, and the precision of the force control instrument shall not be lower than Grade 1.0.
3. In principle, one contact bar should be arranged in cinquefoil type every 2~3 junction points between top and bottom mat reinforcements of top slab, between internal and external mat reinforcements of web, between top and bottom mat reinforcements of base slab, and seizing and spot welding should be performed at the junction points; Ø8 in the material list is the contact bar.
1.2.1 For MONORS1 Project, the work of providing interface with Signalling System and Telecommunications systems relevant to Contract MONORS1 shall be with:
Ten staffs shall be arranged by us during construction, responsible for cleaning the rubbishes scattered on the road timely;
① Charges: According to the Provincial Supplementary Provisions, the total rate of charges is 39%, including 20% of the pension insurance premium, 2% of the unemployment insurance premium, 10% of the medical insurance premium, 6% of the housing accumulation fund and 1% of the industrial injury insurance premium.
e. After the pile casing is buried, the elevation of the upper opening of the pile casing shall be measured one by one to control the pile depth correctly. If the pile casing is easy to sink due to loose fill, the wire shall be used to fix the pile casing and the drilling machine base.
(2) When the group calls are made, it should be able to save the group number and the user number of joining the communication.
2. Students will be able to master the measuring method for the closed leveling line.
(2) Operation period (OP), as it refers to the total hours of the actual operation during test, is tolerable for statistical errors and involves the repair time of system that is hard to define.
Excitation parameters: rated excitation voltage and rated excitation current
1.1.1.1.3. Construction of Glass Curtain Wall
Master degree of Architecture, Engineering, University of Tokyo
Measurement management systems—Requirements for measurement processes and measuring equipment
The total air pressure sensor sends the total wind pressure to EBCU, and then sends to TCMS by networks.
The annual leave taken by the leaders of the Company shall be approved by the Administration Department and submitted to the General Manager for approval; the annual leave taken by the principal and deputy positions of each department shall be approved by the General Manager after comments are made by the leaders in charge of the Company; the annual leave taken by other employees shall be submitted to the leaders in charge of the Company for review and approval after comments are made by the department where they belong and the General Department.
2 The part being over rolled in rolling compaction shall be replaced.
4.5.6 Concrete casting: one-time casting finishes; contact the concrete supplier in advance to determine the casting date and the total casting quantity; carry out casting layer by layer (each layer is about 1000 mm in height) and section by section; use concrete transfer pump for pumping; make the concrete enter the frameworks in a symmetrical way.
The mineral powder for production of asphalt concrete must be stored in the mixing machine powder tank to keep dry and in flow state.
2 Prior to concrete casting for inverted arch and floor, uncompacted muck, sundries and ponding on subgrade base shall be completely removed.
Table 5 shows the maximum plastic strain of surrounding rock after tunneling for the total length of 60 m.
CCCC is requested to reply on the comments proposed in the design review within one week upon receipt of the design review contact sheet, and submit the modified design drawings to the design review group for approval in accordance with the requirements of the comments.
Gao Liang has also published 2 monographs and been responsible for or participated in compilation of 11 books.
4.8 The flowchart of product inspection and test is shown in Fig. 1;
Interim Technical Requirements forL70 Grain Hopper Wagon
Bay window has a different design height from that of straight line window, and leveling is only performed for the window lintel installed.
This section applies to the windows of EMU saloons with the operating speed of not less than 300km/h.
Laying cables between cabinets: arrange cables and optical fiber jumpers between equipment according to types, lay them in categories, tie them with tie cables and mark them properly.
The normal operation condition includes: the maximum passenger load, the normal air consumption volume of air whistle (whistle once for every two stations for 2 s), air suspension (assuming AW3 load, with 80% of passengers loading and unloading at each stop station) and other air-consuming elements consume normal air volume.
(7) Special conditions of Technical Specifications (including the related parts in Addenda to bidding documents);
The treatment methods for the fill foundation include removal of turf and planting soil and excavation of steps.
6.3.1 Network Safety Law (implemented as of June 1, 2016) is studied with the view to upgrade the consciousness of importance in the network and information safety and enhance the management of information technologies and safety.
97-type 25HZ phase-sensitive track circuit added with ZPW-2000 series coding is adopted.
The power supply conditions of the low-pressure carbon dioxide inerting system in the bottle storage room requires two-channel 380V (60kW three-phase four-wire system) and two-channel 220V (5kW) AC power supply onsite.
8.5 Special Tools and Special Test Equipment
Be responsible for record filing management; Be responsible for the internal and external interfaces of documents/ information management;
Remove the repair electrical parts, inverter, shaft temperature alarm, KP-2A control box, LV electrical equipment
Average gross weight of freight car: 78.998t; average length of freight car: 13.914m
(1) Mieso ~ Dewele section
Figure 7.1.2 Temporary Ponding due to Atmospheric Rainfall in the Depression on the Left Side of GK122+250
(2) Term for the Employer to pay the progress payment: within 7 days after the Employer issues the certificate for progress payment.
3.2.6.1For change of factors in welding procedure qualification, reassessment shall be determined in accordance with the requirements in the welding procedure qualification factors table.
- Coordinated distribution based urban planning and topographic and geological conditions along the route.
Bidder: China Railway Construction Electrification Bureau Group Co., Ltd. (Office Seal)
Before repair of anti-corrosion coating, parts in need of repair shall be polished and derusted, with the rust removal grade reaching Sa1.5.
The calculation based on Para. 5.2.4 of Code for Design of Building Foundation(GB50007-2002)
Table 2-2-1 Category and Flow Direction of Receiving and Delivering Goods in Short Term and Long Term
In the depot, since the running speed of train is low and the axle weight is small, the 50kg/m rail may meet the operation requirement. Therefore, the 50kg/m rail shall be applied to the track in depot of the Line.
The data interface shall be provided with a photoelectric isolating circuit or surge protection circuit;
3. Specification: cooling capacity: 53KW; external residual pressure: 270Pa; water resistance: 40KPa; overall dimension: 850x1300x580 (h); noise: ≯61dB; weight of the unit: 140kg
a) The sleeve mandrel shall be free of bends or slips;
Specific construction sites will be determined after the completion of design schemes by the General Contractor of the Project.
Domestic monorail and Malaysian monorail conform to the EN 12663 PIV requirements of tensile and compressive load.
(2) Place base plate and base: After site leveling, set out on the ground to identify scaffold position.
The retraction amount is calculated based on the difference of tensile stress of the prestressing tendon before and after the second tensioning and anchoring.
Lightning protection grounding flat steel embedded in all foundations and auxiliary buildings.
Every design or drawing shall be submitted together with the relevant attached approval forms for approval; the forms shall contain: a. drawing No. and the latest revision number; b. name of drawings; c. date of submission for approval; d. revision number; e. brief introduction of the last revision.
-----Simple bending calculation------
Benches shall be subdivided according to the nominal number of seats, and the seats thus defined shall be indicated.
The dimension (length x width x height) of floor-type material receiving platform can be adjusted based on the project requirements, while the form is kept unchanged.
The track transportation adopts the track gauge of 1435mm, the rail of P43 steel rails, and H200b type steel and self-fabricated steel sleepers.
Technical Code for Contact Rail Power Supply System of Urban Rail Transit
Handover Certificate, Quality Acceptance, Construction Scheme Review, Personnel Appointment and Seal Usage Notice for Living Quarters B in Internal Gathering System for Gas Field Surface Engineering in Xuanhan/Kaixian Block of CDB High-sulfur Gas Field
This Article defines the purpose for preparation of the Standard.
The OHS Leadership Group of the Project Department is responsible for communicating, coordinating and dealing the OHS issues that cannot be solved by one or more departments.
9.3.10.3 Quality Assurance Measures for Equipment and Instruments
Since the replaceability and repairability of concrete structures for important works and in highly corrosive environment, the concept of entire life cycle is introduced, and detailed monitoring plan in application process is given during design stage.
Concrete aggregate exposed, S=1.68㎡ as shown in Figure 3-7
The total casting duration of each girder shall not exceed 3.5 hours.
Resistor unit is installed with guide wheel to lead resistor unit from the bottom of the braking resistor into the frame.
When mixing paints or thinners, you shall keep the room well ventilated. No smoking or sparkle is allowed during operation to keep the gas from burning;
Fabricated steel frame shall be recommended for the house type of the Project. Because the main space indoors requires a similar area, it is designed as the same standardized house type.
This procedure is applicable to all the materials which are procured by and under the management of CCPP Haveli Bahadur Shah, Pakistan and required to be warehoused (except materials procured as per the framework contract and not required to be stored in the warehouse).
The UPS supplier shall randomly configure a set of network management systems (the network management software is provided by the UPS manufacturer) for networking and unified management of weak current centralized UPS and intelligent power distribution cabinets of the whole line. The UPS network management system shall network the station, depot/parking lot and control center by the Ethernet channels provided by the transmission system.
Check whether the braking resistance blower is started and whether the wind direction is correct. Check the wind pressure transducer and its circuit.
Under the leadership of the Project Management Department, carefully organize and coordinate the construction and production.
Each construction operator should increase personal hygiene awareness and develop good personal hygiene habits. Do not spit everywhere; do not defecate everywhere; do not dump garbage, leftovers; do not litter cigarette butts and sundries. Pay attention to the hygiene of diet and drinking water to prevent diseases from entering from the mouth.
3) Strong rockburst (ejections; depth: more than 150 cm):
Site selection, sampling and evaluation of subgrade fillings, rubbles, sand-gravel aggregates, ballasts and other building materials along the line were conducted.
Layout of reinforcement for anchor sealing at girder end of 160 expansion joint
The ticket sales terminal supports HK Dollar, Renminbi, credit card or Octopus Card for payment. Passengers are not allowed to complete one transaction by multiple ways of payment.
According to the actual site situation, the septic-tank pipeline shall go out along the outlet of the septic-tank and then connect to the outlet well, after the installation of the pipeline; the sand shall be used to fill it back.
Flat roof access door is as shown in Fig. 2-1 and flat roof movable roof plate is as shown in Fig. 2-2.
Senior Engineer, National Grade-I Registered Structure Engineer
(1) Carry out initial adjustment before the camera is installed, adjust the aperture and focal length of the camera according to the view distance of the on-site camera, and confirm that the camera can work properly.
The subgrade shall be rolled in layers with a heavy-duty vibratory roller. The maximum loose pavement thickness of a layer shall be not greater than 30 cm for soil embankment, not greater than 40 cm for soil-rock mixture embankment, and not greater than 50 cm for rockfill embankment.
Cables from the DK cabinet to the traffic lights should be laid in steel pipes Ø1" fixed on the wall and further in metal hose Ø32 mm along cables.
9.13.2.4 Management System for Issuing Report Audit
--Deletes requirements for weld joint surface and surface coating of cubicle (see 5.2.4 and 5.2.5 of standard of version 2010);
According to requirements of the test program, the counter pressure, dynamic balance and run-out, wheelset protection, wheelset resistance, and wheelset geometrical dimension tests were done for the wheelset according to standard "Railway Applications-Wheelsets and Bogies- Wheelsets - Product Requirements"(EN13260).
In the calliper static stress test, no destuction is allowed.
6. During construction, the thickness of the clear protection layer of reinforced bars of the outermost layer shall not be less than 35mm.
The entry device of heating system and entry device of household heating meter system
The station is located on the north side of the Greater Amman Municipality and lies in a east-west strike along Omar Mater Street.
Locomotive depot can be divided into freight district, passenger traffic district and mixed passenger and freight district based on different natures of work.
(3) Brake and release of the train cannot be performed normally due to the Machine.
As the main body of on-site management, our company regards the standardization of on-site management as the core of the standardization management.
Elevation of Deep-cut Cutting on the Right of K83+467~K83+580
1. Railway communication network shall be able to meet requirements of management system for operation and maintenance of the Main line, and provide safe, stable, reliable, flexible and convenient means of communication for each business system, and satisfy demands for comprehensive businesses such as voice, data and image, as well as development.
Paying attention to water, electricity, gas, fire and other safety to prevent accident disasters and losses.
Multi-hole clay bricks (240 thick)will be used both the exterior and interior walls above P0.000, and the mortar grade shall be in accordance with the specification of structural design.
When the altitude of the cement enterprise location is higher than 1000m, the altitude shall be corrected (the altitude of the project site is less than 1000m), and the altitude correction coefficient is calculated as:
Use a straight screwdriver to remove 2 decorative covers on the magazine bag, then use a cross screwdriver to remove the cross recessed half round head screws (M4X16), and remove the magazine bag.
11.4.6 The record of single-item commissioning of track circuit shall be filled in Table A.0.7.
1. Connect the lower end of the tower leg main material to the main board of the base with a bolt, and use this bolt as the fulcrum for rotating and lifting the tower leg main material.
An accident causes direct economic losses of RMB 50 thousand to RMB 300 thousand.
Guide and supervise the application of new technologies and new processes.
The fresh air handling unit shall have a temperature sensor set in the air supply duct to measure the air supply temperature; while air-conditioner unit shall have a temperature and humidity sensor set in the air return duct to measure the temperature and humidity of the return air; and monitor fresh air temperature detection;
After 12-24h of concrete pouring, it should be covered with straw bags timely for watering and curing. The curing time should be not less than 14d.
Retention period of relevant records involved with warehouse logistics, including company code sheet and finished product check form, shall be 5 years;
2 output interfaces such as SDI/DVI/VGA
12. In the calculation sheet "Strength Calculation of Curtain Wall Connector", the additional bending moment M is wrong; the above issues are proposed in the calculation sheet at the first review and have not been corrected!
(6) Hang safety warning signs at locations where sliding may occur.
The Project is located in Pikine in the northwest of Dakar, the capital of the Republic of Senegal, with a distance of about 10km to the city.
1. Subbase course treatment: clear the sundries on the floor cushion, and brush away the mortar bonded on the cushion which should be cleaned after brushing.
(9)Welding Package or Welding Procedure Specification List and related documents
6.12.6 Treatment for influence of power lines of non electrified railways to the railway construction
Widening method 2: For slope less than 1:1.5, widening by means of the retaining wall can be used. For the retaining wall lower than 5m, the structure is made of slurry stone weight retaining wall.
Carry out construction in strict accordance with design documents, construction specifications, technical operating procedures and relevant quality acceptance assessment standards, and timely report the construction situation to the Project Department, Supervisor, and Tenderee.
The LV power distribution cabinet is connected to the distribution box by cables, which are laid along the cable tray. The main cables and branch cables are distributed and connected in the manner of TAP-OFF UNIT and PLUG-IN UNIT.
The unqualified products shall be reworked; the ones not applicable to reworking will be stored as the waste material for other uses.
Ecological environment includes ecological environment of nature reservation zone , surface vegetation environment, geological disasters caused by engineering activities, etc.
(7) Flammable and explosive dangerous goods store for storage of lubricating oil and flammable materials.
The stability index of the vehicle's vertical and lateral operation should be in accordance with the following:
The sources of weekly and monthly planned data are planned progress data generated by virtual construction.
5. The dimensions in the chart are measured in cm, and the scale is 1:100.
Both the preparation tank and the maturation pond are equipped with mixers to promote the dissolution and maturation of flocculant.
Schematic diagram of control mode is shown as Fig. 5-4:
SUBIN Medium Bridge AZK14+200
5.6. Bidders shall not collude in cheating, obstruct or exclude other bidders by improper means, disrupt the bidding market and undermine the principle of fair competition.
To timely grasp the progress of the accident emergency rescue, and report the conditions to the superior unit.
The shunting route shall also be handled by pressing the beginning, (change) and the terminal button.
Reinforcement shall be fabricated in the processing yard in a centralized manner and transported to the site by flat cars. It shall be lifted vertically by crane and bound on site by manpower.
Steel fibers in steel fiber shotcrete should be made of ordinary carbon steel, with a square or circular section with an equivalent diameter of 0.3 ~ 0.5 ㎜, and a length of 20 ~ 25 ㎜
18.2.10 The types, specifications, and quality of raw materials used for settlement joints shall meet the design requirements.
Has the appropriate fire fighting equipment been provided in the hot work area?
It includes the quality control on operation conditions and effects of decorative procedures.
In 1989, the hall was repaired on the basis of old system, and the Panlong timber returned to its original site.
The project was completed and put into operation in March 2011 with sound operation effect.
First-aid team shall evacuate all unnecessary personnel from fire disaster site.
① Hydraulic test shall be carried out before backfilling, the pipe sections for pressure test shall not adopt the gate valves as blind or be connected to the fire hydrant.
3. Borteyman Affordable Housing Project
According to the design drawings and the cover excavation construction technology, the earthwork shall be excavated up to the top of SMART tunnel roof this time; according to the requirement for construction period of tunneling in Section C, the whole excavation can be adopted for this section.
Inspection quantity: 3% but not less than 5 prestressed tendons by the Contractor.
Project Manager or regional or professional company managers: Decide the adequacy of the emergency response measures of the Project Management Department, go to the site for assistance in treatment of major accidents, and report to the Safety Management Department of the Company.
θ——inclination of the stable rock slope (°);
Outer diameter of connecting reinforcement shall be not less than 16mm.
The completion acceptance shall meet the qualification standard of the current national construction acceptance standard in order to ensure that the Project will be awarded the Hubei Province High-Quality Project Award and strive for the national excellent project award.
Backfill will be carried out in time when the installation and joints of the circular culvert meet the requirements, and the strength of masonry mortar or concrete reaches the design value.
Concrete sleepers are adopted with 1760 tracks paved every kilometer
It is suggested to lead power by relevant Nepali institution to incoming terminals of high-voltage switches for the newly-built 10kV substation and distribution substation as well as station substation along the whole line. The design boundary of 10kV power supply shall be at the incoming terminals of high-voltage switches for the newly-built 10kV substation and distribution substation as well as station substation.
This section introduces the different categories of railway communication, wired railway communication, and railway communication of new China.
Safety inspection system: include daily inspection and monthly routine inspection.
BCWP, ACWP and BCWP shall be represented by three different curves respectively, while curve method is used to analysis cost and schedule variance.
Roof Plan, Elevation B-A, List of Interior Decoration Works
Longitudinal section of the line is mainly dominated by rivers, overpasses and terrains.
In case of premature dilution and insufficient recovery on approaches, we can analyze them and find out corresponding reasons through such ore drawing charts, and also estimate ore recovery rate and dilution rate, and average grade of ore drawn, as well as other indicators.
a) Knowledge necessary for operation of quality management system; b) Knowledge necessary for the process; c) Knowledge necessary for ensuring the conformity of products and services; d) Knowledge necessary for customer satisfaction; e) Knowledge necessary for employees' occupational skills; f) More knowledge necessary for evaluation in case of system change.
The Procedure applies to the safety inspection and hazard rectification of Project Department.
Table 3-11 Main quality index of dimethyl silicon monomer
The new Boten-Vientiane Railway starts from the Laos-China border in the north, runs southwards to pass through Louang Namtha, Oudomxai, Luang Prabang, and Vientiane provinces in the northern Laos, and finally ends at the capital of the Lao People's Democratic Republic-Vientiane.
Power supply: One circuit of 10kV power supply is introduced by the grid with box-type substation set.
Shaoxing Shangyu Dashun Ventilation Equipment Co., Ltd. (H004960)
The brown line passes through the national trunk Drigh Rd Railway Station and is close to Jinnah International Airport, thus the reasonable connection of rail transit with the airport and railway station will attract more passenger flow and prevent new traffic jam points.
C40 concrete (m, spread foundation on the ground shall be excluded)
4. Quality objective realization plan: including quality objective, quality assurance system, organization and its personnel division of labor and responsibilities, main construction technical measures and construction technology, measurement, inspection and test system, quality self-inspection system of Construction Contractor, and special technical assurance measures (including construction assurance measures in winter and rain period, etc.).
To supervise and urge the implementation of the project construction safety production funds plan, and ensure that the safety production cost is put into place in time.
Establish the commissioning organization structure, define the responsibilities and division of work, and work out the list of operator on duty and contact list.
Strengthen the standardized management of the construction site and the construction organization, command and coordination, and earnestly implement the written technical disclosure among the Project Management Department, construction teams and shifts. Dynamic management of the whole construction process will be implemented, regular and irregular on-site analysis meetings will be conducted, and construction progress and construction quality will be strictly controlled.
⑵ All kinds of traffic signs and label plates must be installed completely.
3.1.8. The Tenderer shall provide a detailed scheme for lightweight system equipment.
The IP grade of case is IP4X , and the IP grade of compartment is IP2X.
2.2.2 Ensure the effectiveness of the versions of laws and regulations on occupational health, safety and environmental protection on the management platform.
4) Rotate the handles of the straightener at the same time, and adjust the mast clearance with the change of the lead screw length.
Table 2-5-2-2 Proportion of Sourcing and Distribution of Goods in Port Dar es Salaam
The Chairman, if considering that any content of the proposal is ambiguous, unspecific, or related materials are insufficient, may ask the proposer to modify or supplement his proposal through the Office of Board of Directors.
The earth volume on each section is calculated based on the subgrade filling thickness and width. The earth is paved by bulldozer and leveled by grader.
The green area in conservation management area and service area shall exceed 30% of the total area and the vegetation coverage within the green space shall be over 85%.
4.1 Authorized person for quality is the first person in charge of recall and person in charge of the enterprise (general manager) is the second person in charge.
Drain openings shall be set on retaining wall with spacing of 2m and in plum blossom shape.
Necessary signals can be added as required during fault investigations.
· Unexpected disturbance risks on the project construction caused by various events and reasons in the national political aspects , including.
The materials will only be purchased with approvals.
6.4.1 Management of Electronic Documents on Collaborative Network Sharing Platform
1) COD-2000 large range, mark Absorbency 1 around 0.08, mark Absorbency 2 around 0.71.
3.1 Science and technology: refers to solving theoretical problems scientifically and establishing theories to link facts with phenomena; and solving practical problems technologically. The task of technology is to apply scientific achievements to practical problems.
Design verification is an to important part to ensure that the design output meets the design input and is an inspection of design product as well as by checking and providing objective evidence to prove whether the design output meets the design input requirements.
1) Single-selded lap joint shall be adopted for the joints of main reinforcement of reinforcement cage. Number of joints on each cross-section shall not exceed 50%. Connections of reinforced stirrup and main reinforcement shall all be welded.
Route selection should avoid populous areas as possible, like villages, schools, hospitals and other sensitive spots.
b) The measures developed shall be implemented to individuals, and the content each person shall complete shall be clearly defined;
All major activities in the key route network diagram and Gantt chart of major works shall be consistent with the items in the bill of quantities.
4) Concrete construction joint is treated as specified as follow:
After product assembly, perform according to the "Test" procedures in "Test and Fault Analysis".
Steel pipe: with product certification; hot dip galvanized on the inner and outer surfaces; with intact coating; inner weld seams shall be flat, smooth and round, and the steel pipe is not flattened;
8.5.2 The wiring trough shall adopt steel trough, the interior and corner of which shall be added with flame resistant rubber pad.
Individual ward calling system shall be set at every patient-care area.
After the foundation construction, the backfill shall be compacted layer by layer and the protection of the subgrade slope shall be carried out or restored.
The material used in the operation shall be stockpiled smoothly and stably, can not be placed on the edge or around the hole opening, and can not affect passage and loading and unloading. The material unloaded, surplus material and waste shall be cleaned and timely removed, and can not be placed arbitrarily or discarded downwards, when delivered, the articles shall not be thrown;
(i.e., no green light for the accident with uncertain causes; no green light for the accident with employees learning no lessons from such accident; no green light for the accident with no responsible person punished; no green light for the accident with no preventive measures taken).
Check the maximum bearing capacity of gearbox assembly and its components under the maximum slipping torque.
(2): ZL column DG hanging TF attached
Φ = Φ1 + Φ2 + Φ3 + Φ4 + Φ5
pound bill rough weight cannot be null or equal to or less than 0!
Galvanized square-head bolt with cap M16X350
The high pressure dry air for test that can automatically compensate for consumption is delivered to the pressure reducing valve for pressure reduction after being filtered in the filter. The flow regulator can automatically regulate air flow for test so as to obtain dry blowing air for test.
The glued insulated joints of the right and left two rails shall be laid against each other, and the distance from the insulated end slab of gap between insulated joints to the rail support stand shall be no less than 100mm.
Meanwhile, vehicle supplier will provide a list of frequency and sensitivity levels applicable to train electrical systems (including DC power applicable). Signal system supplier should take measures to avoid interference in circuit-related part accordingly;
In coarse concrete aggregate, the particles with a thickness less than 0.4 times the average particle size of the corresponding particle size grade to which the particles belong are called splintery particles.
(5) Check, supervise, and correct the quality, safety, process, and technological problems existing in the construction.
Technicians, maintenance personnel and drivers shall observe the status information and fault feedback of each switch device from HMI "traction" interface.
For current transformer, the error of each secondary winding shall be measured one by one.
1) Before the welding of reinforcements, remove the rust spots, oil stains and sundries on the surface of the reinforcements that are in contact with welding parts of the reinforcements or the steel plates and electrode. When the ends of the reinforcements are bent or twisted, the reinforcement shall be straightened or cut off.
The part of foundation of open cut tunnel at DK218+117~+122, that is located in silty clay, shall be replaced and filled with C20 concrete.
2. Operation Branch, Wenzhou Mass Transit Railway Investment Group Co., Ltd., Wenzhou 325000, Zhejiang, China
To establish a vehicle-to-catenary and ground-to-catenary based comprehensive checking and monitoring system for catenary's safe operation, a recourse sharing based security monitoring and information network platform must be built.
②Tools shall include grafter, iron float, large level ruler, wooden clapper, wooden hammer, rubber hammer, level bar, straight plate ruler, joint pulling cutter, sharp chisel, flat chisel, etc.
7. Other beam-column connection nodes not shown in this drawing refer to construction of the same type of nodes as given in this drawing.
Technical Code for Protection against Lightning of Building Electronic Information System (GB50343-2012);
HDPE double-wall corrugated pipe dn110 S12.5
2. This drawing is used together with "Layout (Ⅰ) for Lining Reinforcement of Type Ⅲ Open-cut Tunnel in Imam Khomeini Airport".
The tyre is originally 100MM thick and shall be replaced when the maximum wear reaches 35mm.
In 109 B.C. (Yuanfeng two years of the Western Han Dynasty), Emperor Wu set Yeyu County here.
Trimethyl silicon monomer (M3): 9352t/a
The above documents have the same legal effect and shall be mutually supplementary and explanatory. In case of any ambiguity or inconsistency, the document that comes top shall prevail.
The shear crack of the landslide is located at the upside of the KKH highway. The slip of landslide body is 5 ~ 7m. The landslide body completely covers the earth-stone road, and part of it even covers the KKH highway for almost 2m. After being sheared from half slope, the landslide body basically breaks up.
There have been incidents and no reasonable and effective control measures have been formulated;
The tunnel passes through Middle and Upper Triassic (T2-3) and Upper Permian (P2) coal and carbon mudstone strata. Hazardous gas, such as gas, may be encountered during tunnel construction.
8.3 The installation height of the water supply faucet shall be such that the height of its outlet above the overflow edge of the receiving water container will not be less than 2.5 times the diameter of the water supply faucet.
There are rural roads and small roads crossing the survey section, and the traffic conditions are good.
3. Automatic/manual control of the activation, conversion and shutdown of the operating and standby equipment
a. Laws, regulations, standards, specifications and industrial rules and regulations, etc., especially changes that may have a greater impact on the enterprise;
Select typical subgrade, bridge and tunnel sections.
In the process of tunneling, the obvious or unobvious omen sign will appear generally before the appearance of unfavorable geology; the appearance of these signs indicates that the above-mentioned unfavorable geology draws near.
11.3.3This revision makes a supplement to the burial conditions for stabilizing the ground foundation of the slope.
In this project, the free elastic homogeneous ring model is used. It is assumed that the tunnel is buried in the soft and saturated soil layer. During deformation of the structure, the soil layer cannot provide (or provides a little) passive resistance, so the outer circumference of the segment ring is subject to vertical water-earth pressure, ground overload, and the side pressure corresponding to vertical load.
Railway Applications - Wheelsets and Bogies - Method of Specifying the Structural Requirements of Bogie Frames
The Project Management Department will set up a quality management department to monitor the operation of the quality management system. The Project Manager is the first person responsible for the quality of the project.
Figure 7.2.4-7 Layout map of monitoring measure points
Where appropriate, the organization shall identify the product by suitable means throughout product realization.
The cable metal protective earth wire must be in reliable connection with the earth copper bar. When cable passes the zero sequence current transformer, the earth wire shall be insulated to ground. When the cable earth point is below the transformer, the earth wire shall be directly grounded. When it is above the transformer, the earth wire shall be grounded through the transformer.
The regulations are applicable for security management of company local area network, wide area network, network equipment and relevant network users.
When the locomotive is in the correct mode, TCMS of the locomotive will monitor the occupied-end direction button signal in a real-time way, and will set the locomotive operating direction based on the occupied-end direction button signal.
2-1 and 2-2 artificially filled soil (Q4al): widely distributed along the line, mainly dominated by embankment fill of the existing line, with some building fill locally, with a thickness of 0.5~8.0m, slightly dense ~ medium dense, slightly wet.
5. Enhance the monitoring and measurement, revert the information related to the deformation of surrounding rock and support, evaluate the reliability of support and the stability of surrounding rock, guide the construction and adjust the support parameters timely.
The current guide plate must be installed with the smooth face facing the smooth face and electric grease must be coated on the contact face to ensure good contect.
Ancillary subgrade works shall be constructed without disturbing subgrade structure. In order to achieve this purpose, special tools are used for cutting in cable trough excavation.
(5) Strengthen the inspection and coordination of design schedule and make necessary plan adjustments;
Code for Acceptance of Construction Quality of Water Supply Drainage and Heating Works (GB50242-2002)
(1) 10% of the total construction cost of the project shall be reserved as the project construction assessment fee. When the final payment of the project construction cost is paid, the assessment fee shall be summarized and settled in one lump sum.
The underground pre-buried pipeline of fire-fighting water supply and drainage system includes the fire-fighting system pipelines, water supply and drainage system pipelines, accessories, insulation, casing piles and corresponding anti-corrosion measures from +300mm above ground to 1m outside wall.
As for the concrete design strength of engineering in this project, it of the cushion play is C10, and it of the foundation, foundation beam and floor is C30.
2. This drawing is used together with "Layout (Ⅰ) for Lining Reinforcement of Type Ⅱ Open-cut Tunnel in Imam Khomeini Airport".
The Specification defines basic requirements for control mode and parameter setting of LKJ05 train supervision system (hereinafter referred to as LKJ).
Recheck the dimensions of structural construction and confirm the decoration datum line.
According to the sectional layout of the project, the construction site shall be reasonably arranged with the entrance and exit lanes, and the vehicles should run on their corresponding lanes. The engineering vehicles shall operate strictly according to the instructions and the traffic guidance personnel's commands, and wait for other vehicles.
A copy should be kept in the fire safety department of the Company for future reference, and a copy should be kept in the file cabinet of the fire control room.
Offices and houses shall be equipped with adequate sanitary facilities (dry latrines, septic tanks, hand sinks, and showers).
Multi-layer ecological community with reasonable flow and grass allocation.
(7) Especially, the supporting system shall be checked to ensure that derrick wires, horizontal control ropes and special fixture are safe and reliable.
Design value of axial compressive strength fcd = 22.4 Mpa; Design value of axial tensile strength ftd = 1.83 Mpa; elasticity modulus Ec= 3.45 X 104 Mpa.
a) Documented system management and control process;
Main tunnel construction is carried out in entry work section by 1,163m;
5 The mobile storage media used by the fixed terminal shall be marked, registered and audited and the unaudited mobile storage media shall not be used.
The Seller shall submit the plan and report on contract execution to the Buyer for the Buyer's confirmation in each stage of contract execution according to the provisions in the User Requirement Book.
The Company gives priority to manpower, material and fund, redoubles its input to management, labor, material and equipment and implements the following measures to ensure the project completion in scheduled period and the requirements on project quality and construction period.
Fig. 6-6-2 Target Management for ESMP Plan
2. Click on the pull-down menu of "module management" at the dispatching command module on dispatching console, dispatching command template can be loaded automatically, which can be automatically loaded on editing area.
(1) Santa Cruz Hydropower Project in Argentina
Open the cover plate of the receiving and transmitting module to remove the printed board and devices in the module.
Have appropriate excavation safety protection measures been determined in accordance with relevant regulations?
Highly - moderately weathered sandstones (C) possess high bearing capacity and may be used as subgrade bearing stratum or underlying stratum.
However, workers may take a taxi for going to/coming back from an airport in the following situations:
PSAadsorptionDtower1#,test under valve closing state
quality problems identified in field inspection and acceptance, measurement of work quantities, request for the list of machinery and equipment, reply to the contractors' engineering claims and various notices.
Application of Candidate for IGOTY (International Grower of the Year) 2018
For external surface, the sand blasting and derusting class is SA 2½; if inorganic paint is applied, the thickness is 60μm while if silicon painting (heat-resisting: 400oC) is applied, the thickness is 25μm.
It is required to save water and electricity, flush after use, prevent the sewer being blocked by newspaper, take care of public properties, and maintain environmental health of public place.
Traffic design: Zhao Biao, Lu Yuzhong, Yuan Xueming, Zhang Qi, Fan Mingjie and Han Weina
Communication equipment necessary for supervision work.
3. The concrete strength of stair shall be determined based on the floor.
According to transportation organization and route characteristics, the main technical operation stations are selected to set up the locomotive depots, which are provided with servicing and repair facilities to undertake operation, parking and regular maintenance for locomotives of this route.
Since the width of the box girder of the continuous rigid frame bridge is up to 11m, the concrete is heavy and the stress of the box girder bottom slab is complicated during the construction stage.
Floor 3, Quality Supervision Bureau Building, No. 48 Six Bo'ai Road, East Street, Zhongshan City, Guangdong Province
fire-fighting shovels, fire-fighting sand pool etc. will be provided at the construction site, in order to prepare for accidents.
Suspension event due to reasons such as plan adjustment and arrival of equipment.
(3) Commanding authority: if the production line stops and restarts due to load limitation or failure, the on-duty commander of Production Scheduling Center will issue a notice to the on-duty commander of workshop to prepare for the startup and shutdown.
RMB 10,184,034.03 /Main Line Kilometer
- In accordance with No. 443 Premier Decree issued by State Council on 26th Oct, 2010.
The above time in each period is the designed value. The time of each operation stage can be adjusted in accordance with the actual conditions by onsite commission.
Protruding bulb for 25mm from the leveled surface course,removal of cloth wrapping and rope at the upper half of the bulb
6.4.5.4 The qualification team shall conduct first article qualification as per 6.4.4.4 to 6.4.4.6.
(6) Payment to the construction team shall be carried out in strict accordance with the relevant procedures for approval and filing.
□ Select the mechanical equipment and construction process conforming to the requirements.
However, for a country that wants to get rid of poverty and backwardness, the population size and existing population quality of Laos are far from enough.
6.2 Main drafter of this Regulation: Yin Baoliang.
According to Clause 17.9.2, the interface communication between the CTC system and the TDMS shall meet relevant requirements.
7Foundation concrete I is used for ordinary sections of road; foundation concrete Ⅱ is used every 100 meters and for ends.
The site is situated in the area of the accumulation fan in front of the mountain, where when the debris flows are large, they are prone to be spreading when passing by the flared area of the gully. This is potentially harmful to the construction site.
(2) A 8-car formation train under AW4 still can start on 1/27 ramp and drive to terminal station after lost 1/2 power.
The supplier shall confirm the final negotiation agreement through e-mail and set it as the basis to determine framework or general contract.
Drafting Standard for Building Structures GB/T 50105-2010
Table 3-2 Nature of Affected Enterprises and Public Institutions
The temperature and humidity shall be recorded three times every morning, noon and evening in total, and the records are true and effective.
3.4 Train failure operation and rescue capability calculation
All welders for storage tank welding shall have certificates to take their posts.
1) Pipe orifice cleaning: Remove and wipe away all sundries in the socket.
The use sequence of standards for design, manufacture, test, etc. of surface treatment of components is as follows. The supplier shall be responsible for confirming the status of the standard.
Fdistribution=Ej·Fpq (11.3.4)
2) The tension device should adopt the one with the step's chain rotating wheel.
Inquiry and maintenance of logistics information: the current materials information can be inquired. This information can also be manually maintained.
China Tiesiju Civil Engineering Group Municipal Engineering Branch
An employee for whom statutory retirement is not more than 5 years away can leave his or her post for recuperation after his or her application is approved by the employer.
Administrative Measures for Secondary Operation in China Railway 18th Bureau Group Co., Ltd.
Be responsible for the survey of (grade A, B, C, and E) design change implementation schedule and determination;
1)4 channels, 600MHz bandwidth, sampling rate not less than 10GSa/s per channel;
The equipotential is broken down into 5 parts based on above method, namely the roof box, door, doorsill, upper/lower connection, and track joint.
Mr. Zhao Jun, Vice President of TCL Group and Senior Vice President of CSOT, TCL Group, delivered a speech.
Coal-fired furnace must not be set up at the site and all fuels shall be clean fuels.
For expediting class C, expediting at factory is unnecessary but regular office expediting is necessary, with the frequency of expediting determined based on specific circumstances.
Original Record of Dimension, Appearance and Mark Inspection of Embedded Sleeve
The traction converter (CI), the brake control unit (BCU) and the terminal device adopt both the optical fiber and the shielded wire to transmit control command signals, while other equipment and the central device/ terminal device adopt the current loop mode for connection.
1. Engineering Investigation Qualification Certificate is the evidence for a construction enterprise contracting works in construction market.
CHINA RAILWAY Introduces Work Arrangements in 2020 Spring Festival
4. Installation method: custom / installed 300 above the ground
Reversible magnetic starter 50A, 380V
The good coordination and cooperation for process alternation with subcontractors of other disciplines are the key to ensure the smooth implementation and completion of the Project.
Structure of goods trade: Textiles, food, jewelry, chemical products (including medicine), leather and leatherware, medical instruments, cement, sports products, engineering tools and carpet are mainly exported from Pakistan.
Duration: 2011.5.10-2014.10.31
30m T beam main beam section: main beam height 2.0m, beam spacing of 1.90~2.40m; the inner beam prefabrication width of 1.70m, side beam prefabrication width of 2.05m, the middle wet joint width of flange board of 0.2~0.7m.
There is also a 5KM long cobbled road in the opposite of Segama River in north of the plant, which leads to main highway (the highway name is Jalan Silam).
The connection between the project scheme and the surrounding municipal road infrastructure works, as well as the connection between the project general planning and the municipal transportation should be well conducted;
5.The backup information shall be checked and tested periodically whenever possible to maintain its availability and integrity and ensure system recovery within the specified time.
2) Geological survey shall be done with the TSP in about every 100m to briefly master the distribution of unfavorable geological conditions in front of the working face.
(B) Pre-fabricated pipeline should be checked for conformity with drawings.
2). Organize in a rational manner and arrange construction in an appropriate manner. The waste water and slag produced during construction shall be treated as per the local environmental protection requirement. Random stacking and drainage are strictly forbidden. Construction in a civilized manner shall be conducted.
(3) After arrival at the Port of Poti or Port of Batumi of Georgia, our company will go through the customs clearance procedure by selecting a customs clearance agency.
Fill in the Test Beam Routine Inspection Records of Track Inspection System.
Motor field operation box AC0473EL06
The connection on the north bank of Line C does not conform to the overall urban planning and urban land use planning of Shantou City. The road grade from the starting point to Jinhuan South Road is relatively low, and the interconnection of Zhongshan Road on the north bank is difficult to arrange, resulting in a large amount of demolition.
7.4.4.5. When the crane runs or stops, a required safe distance between the ditch and foundation pit must be kept.
The witness sampling inspection system shall be strictly implemented for engineering projects. Any design documents, specification requirements or engineering materials with doubtful quality shall be sampled under the witness of the supervisor and sealed by the supervisor, to ensure the authenticity and representativeness of the test samples.
4.19.4.4 Configuration list of set:
Treatment and construction of pile foundations and subgrades (e.g. piling, backfilling, replacement filling, compaction and cushion, etc.) are not involved in the scope of bid.
The line is constructed by alternate filling and excavation. The maximum fill height at the embankment center is 6.92m and the maximum height of embankment slope is 7.49m. The maximum excavation depth at the cutting center is 5.85m and the maximum height of cutting slope is 5.62m.
 Support intelligent video, audio detection function;
In this study, locomotives are considered to be rented, locomotive maintenance costs are considered to be borne by the lessor, and the rental cost is USD 407,000 /Nr./ year.
Payment method and conditions and prevailing currency are given in article 20 of special clauses.
Numerous rivers run to the west along the slope. The gully is fully developed and is distributed in the shape of pectination. Due to valley trenching, the plateau surface is divided into the tableland with different sizes, flat top and steep edges.
The test content of threshold alarm for the monitoring unit shall include:
Surveying: engineering surveying, engineering geological drilling, sampling, standard penetration test, dynamic penetration test, laboratory tests, and engineering geophysical exploration.
According to the item description in the following Table, enter the tonnage consumption based on theoretical calculation
Histogram and grid chart showing project construction schedule
The surveying and positioning of decoration and finishing works shall be subject to the detail surveying with the control points same to the construction phase of the main works, so as to reduce the error caused by
1. Carry out construction organization and coordinate the construction procedures.
Granite: flesh pink, blackish green and grayish black, mainly containing feldspar and quartz, massive structure, relatively developed spherical weathering, granite texture or porphyritic texture, widely distributed along the line.
A pressure-regulating electromagnetic brake, through which, regenerative braking or dynamic braking can be realized.
Lateral rock and soil pressure is divided into static rock and soil pressure, active rock and soil pressure and passive rock and soil pressure.
Heap Leach Pad 2# (Incl. Solution Ditch)—7# 10/0.4kV Secondary Spray Pump Transformer and Distribution Substation
It manages a clinic which is provided with necessary first-aid equipment and medical service instruments and be responsible for the medical and health service for construction personnel, prevention and treatment of disease; the clinic shall actively cooperate with local department of health to do well monitoring and prevention works of infectious disease.
Limit deviation of track vertical horizontal center line is ±3mm;
Inrush starting current: cold and hot startup, no more than 2A.
Original Problem Record Sheet: a record sheet covering such information as all original complaint information and alternation of new contents.
Increase propylene feed to 073-R200 to lower catalyst concentration and cool the slurry in prepolymerization reactor.
The tutors from Kunming Base and Hohai University will directly go to test center to give lessons.
10. The explosion-proof fan and the indoor grounding plate shall be connected with -25X4 hot-galvanized flat steel, and the anti-static grounding measures shall be adopted for the explosion-proof fan.
The interval between the secondary keel is 500mm ~ 600mm. The secondary keel is connected with the main keel with secondary pendant.
Handler of the entrusting party: (Party A) Handler of the entrusted party: (Party B)
The procedure for preparation, approval and implementation of daily plan for passenger transport is shown in Figure 6-2-1.
After all the tests are completed, the measured original data shall be calculated and sorted out, and these data shall be used to compare with the indicators required by the design and process, to evaluate whether the system under test meets the requirements. Besides, a test report of conformity shall be issued.
The contract value of this Project is USD , the bid section is 19.997Km long.
3. The transportation organization mode of "small routing inside big routing" is adopted, that is, the double-track section is set up with small routing for multiple units and the single-track section on both ends is set up with big routing for alternate operation of multiple units;
Embedded parts for ladder and signal tower of the reinforced concrete chimney shall be fixed inside of the outer reinforcement through binding and welding with reinforcement before concrete pouring.
19.6.2.1 The CRRC ZELC will select sub-contractors depending on their abilities to meet the requirement of the sub-contract. It will establish and save an acceptable performance record of the sub-contractor;
The landscape design concept is formed based on the movable-type printing (the most outstanding technological contribution made by Hubei). It shows a sustainable ecological landscape environment to people by a landscape context of westernization trend.
1) Analyze weather forecasting on which production arrangement is based.
Remove the bottom ring bolts and dowel pins and lift bottom ring out of the turbine pit for disassembly.
1. The line is short, about 200 m shorter than that of option A;
Visually check the interiors of saloon for abnormal damage; check the installation of fire extinguisher.
(3) The kiln conditions fluctuate greatly and there is a risk of system material collapse.
The following is only limited to send back the manufacturer or at the designated maintenance point.
HJA C (2014) 1092321
The approved procedure manual shall be submitted to CAAC for archiving.
4.12.4 Use Φ 48.3*3.6 mm vertical scaffold tubes to erect standard-compliant work platform.
1. Project Name: Computer Classroom and Laboratory for China-aided Botswana Mopani Primary School Project
PTU can provide state monitoring, fault retrieval, classification, statistics and other functions.
From January 18, 2006 to January 17, 2036
6. If post cannot be driven into, concrete base can be adopted;
Respectively sleeve red insulation tube and back semi-conductive tubes on three cores of the cable at the long end.
1) Remove the obviously damaged equipment of the existing bridges and culverts and provide new equipment.
6.4.2 Source of the Capital for Pay-off and the Mode of Repayment
2. The specific plan will be proposed by the Planning and Finance Department and the Legal Department will provide support.
(1) The excavation support footage of upper bench in each circulation shall not exceed one steel frame space for D5~D6 lining section, and shall not exceed twice steel frame space for D3~D4 lining section.
Inspection method: the water supply pipe system made of copper-plastic composite pipe shall be tested under test pressure and be observed for 10min; the pressure drop shall not be more than 0.02Pa; reduce the pressure to working pressure and check; no seepage or leakage is deemed satisfactory.
(3) Pay attention to the embedment of the bearing steel to ensure the accuracy of target location. The embedment should adopt such methods as keep fixed with the pier platement to stay at the same level with the top of the plate.
For other comprehensive profits of the investee, the carrying amount of the long-term equity investment adjusted accordingly is recognized as other comprehensive profits and included into capital surplus.
In the project, the secondary master is set to obtain time service from the primary master clock, and serve time for each subsystem in the system. The operation control and central dispatching system shall be interconnected with the secondary master of the system to obtain relevant information of the secondary master.
Sichuan Services Aero-Engine Maintenance Co., Ltd.
(2) Only qualified welds by visual inspection may have non-destructive testing, which shall be performed 24 hours after welding.
Dimensions are indicated in Detail of Side Ditch./Materials are at Party A's choice.
1) Before backfilling, turf, sundries, tree roots and silt at foundation bottom shall be removed, water shall be drained, and drainage ditches or flood intercepting ditches shall be provided around to prevent ground water from flowing into the filling area or foundation pit, soaking the foundation and causing foundation soil sinking.
The air brake system consists of air compressor, JZ-7 air brake, air purification and auxiliary devices, bypass brake rigging, etc.
Arrange a layer of reinforcement mesh at both the top and bottom of bearing platform; the top of reinforcement mesh applies φ16 reinforcement with the spacing being 20cm while the reinforcement mesh at the bottom of bearing platform applies φ20 reinforcement with the spacing being 10cm.
Conduct welding in step 0200 as per the drawing AJC10010896A and WPS document.
(Seal) Site Management Department of Beijing Jingxi Gas-fired Thermal Power Plant Project of Shanghai Electric Group Co., Ltd.
Feasibility Study Project of Comprehensive Utilization of Sponge City-Urban Wetland Forest Park and Ecological Treatment of Tail Water from Qingxi Sewage Treatment Plant
4 Scale: weighing 200g, division value 0.01g.
Sludge feed pump X 2; flow rate: 75m3/h; lift: 0.2Mpa; motor power: 18.5kw.
2.In case the Seller needs the Buyer to coordinate the project, the General Contractor shall submit written application to the Buyer in advance and state the contents to be coordinated and the goals to be achieved.
2. Conform to quality (conform to acceptance specifications)
Load-bearing reinforcement of beam and column HRB400 (fy=360 KN/㎡) ordinary hot-rolled reinforcement
Without permission, it is not allowed to photograph or videorecord the production area.
Lay or adjust pipelines for construction domestic water and fire protection water on site and in living areaa. Pipelines for construction water and fire protection water shall be buried in the ground with priority. The buried depth shall be deeper than the freezing line. Thermal insulation and anti-freezing measures shall be taken for the exposed part on the ground.
b) The signal system supplier plays main part in carrying out static debugging of interface and vehicle interface with active cooperation of the vehicle supplier;
Considering that the Insurant has submitted insurance application and agreed to pay premium as agreed, the Insurer will undertake the liability of compensation in accordance with insurance type and its corresponding terms and special commitments.
Figure 4-53 Turn-around at the Fracture of the Medial Strip of an Intersection
2.2.16 Subdivisional Works: components of divisional works, further divided according to the type of work and the process.
The noise test report shall be obtained for the items under the outsourcing inspection. The items under the noise self-inspection shall be allocated. The self-inspection on construction noise shall be carried out with the sound level meter, and the inspection record shall be filled in.
4. During the contract period, Party B must abide by the Confidentiality Rules and Regulations of Party A and Party C, and perform corresponding confidentiality duties.
Lanzhou-Chongqing Railway Co., Ltd.Nanchong Construction Headquarters
2 The track which is laid as per Subitem 2), Item 5 of Article 7.3.3 of the Guide but not subject to the adjustment of rail joint gap shall meet the following requirements:
8.The environmental control system and fire alarm system are not within the scope of this Project. The General Contractor is responsible for the environmental control of the automated people mover system project, the display of the fire alarm system, etc., and for cooperating with the above system commissioning.
a. Publicize and implement the relevant laws, regulations, and management system documents of the superior; exercise democratic supervision rights on behalf of employees and safeguard the interests of employees;
1:2:4=adhesive:cement:fine sand (surface course)
3.3.3 The survey and design institute shall strengthen the scheme study and engineering design of geological prediction, monitoring measurement, primary support, waterproofing and drainage, and secondary lining works, etc. for sections in special rock and soil and unfavorable geological conditions.
The traction of this car is not available when any one of the following conditions has been met:
Figure 19Deflection Curve under 140kN Load on Cowcatcher
(Structural engineer, mechanical engineer, electrical engineer, instrumentation and control engineer, corrosion control engineer)
(5) The liability for breach of contract if the Employer violates the Contract and causes the suspension of construction: None.
CRRC Ziyang Co., Ltd will form a maintenance team for the Project by making full use of the local service resources and establish the maintenance bases and maintenance depots for the Company around the integration of implemented repair classification, operation management and skills training, to form a fast and effective management system.
The photovoltaic power station shall analyze and answer by combining with the technical weak points in current production personnel as well as the questions in equipment.
Suspended ceiling suspension system shall be coordinated with equipment system facilities, etc. If necessary, suspension support shall be added to avoid collision with equipment system facilities.
After comprehensive comparison, Designs ○2, ○5 and ○7 can be selected as backup solutions.
The insulation of iron core to the ground, insulation of high and low voltage windings to ground, and insulation between windings shall be good, and iron core shall have no multipoint grounding.
Are criteria and methods necessary for ensuring the effective operation and control of these processes determined;
List of Main Works, Materials and Equipment Quantity of the Two Stations
a -- length of top (bottom) of inverted trapezoid along the direction of route and can be taken as 3~5m;
According to the resolution of the board of shareholders of the Company on July 17, 2017, the following amendments are made to the Articles of Association of the Company, with the specific amendments as follows:
The bedrock in the tunnel site area is light gray medium to extremely-thick stratified moderately-weathered limestone featuring hard and complete rock mass, with most structural plane closed, and partially filled with mud due to corrosion.
④-1 Silty clay (Q/4al+pl/): light yellow or grayish brown, in a plastic~hard plastic state, saturated, with uneven soil texture, partially containing a little iron-manganese concretion and fine sand.
Take charge of the repair, servicing and overhaul work of locomotive components.
3. In the drawing, the height from the inner rail top to rail bottom is 51.5cm.
1). If there is a power switch or plug near the electric shock accident site, open the power switch or unplug the power plug to cut off the power source;
Be able to identify fault of headlamp height fuse F39/5A
Track circuit equipment (ZPW-2000 (including UM) series equipment)
A Project Manager Department shall be established, with the Project Manager as the team leader, and members in relevant department and the main members in Project Manger Department as participants in the leading team for flood control, to configure dedicated weather forecasters, closely observe weather changes locally and at upstream areas, and take flood control measures in time.
Remaining materials and waste materials from various construction processes;
(4) Participate in safety management, supervision, and inspection over installation and disassembly of special equipment.
Exchange rate: USD 1:RMB 6.80:SLL 7500
According to the water well investigation in the camp of CCECC, the initial water level is 30 - 40m and the stable water level is 24m.
When installing mineral wool noise barrier, it should be noted that joints shall be in cross position of longitudinal and transverse framings.
3) When the copper is connected to aluminium in the dry indoors, the copper conductor shall be tinned. The copper to aluminium adapter bar shall be used, and the copper end shall be tinned in outdoors or indoors with a relative air humidity of approximate 100%.
Steel expansion joint at water pump inlet and outlet (with limit)
The key for locking the control valve, P/N: 277850.
IM4 C28405 Dated 2017/6/16
The precision values listed in this standard are absolute differences expressed in percentage.
The access control system is provided communication interfaces and logical independent communication channels by the communication equipment room to form an independent system.
Dark color and glazed facing tile skirting board 150X600 W/S 11J312,P20,3187a
Grade6000 (C50) concrete: prestressed concrete superstructure, bridge deck pavement, and prestressed concrete cap beam of the pier;
IIDK18+030-IIDK18+173, Left Side Cutting Slope Protected by Bushes and Grasses.
4.1.4 The contractor shall be responsible for procurement, storage and management of material stock required by maintenance services.
When the tunnel is excavated in two directions and approaches breakthrough, single-end boring is adopted when the distance of the two working faces of tunnel reaches nearly 15m, which is determined according to the influence scope of explosive force is nearly 15m in general condition during tunnel blasting.
The size of door mode switch is as follows (which will be determined at the design liaison stage):
3.3.4 The bearing capacity of the seismic fortification zone, the retaining structure or component shall be checked by the basic combination of seismic action effects and load effects.
Do not touch edges or bulges with unprotected hand so as to avoid cutting..
The moisture content of the mixture shall exceed the optimum value for 0.5%-1% to offset the moisture loss in paving and rolling process.
The buildings within this area are mainly of reinforced concrete frame structure or brick-concrete structure.
Tel of the Customer Service Department: Local Telephone Number: (010)51873174, Railway System Telephone Number (021) 73174
Specification for Engineering Geological Survey in Preliminary Design Stage of Phonhong Hub Interchange
525 ordinary portland cement for single fluid grouting
Pile foundation works: engineering piles, terrace piles, cutting piles, chisel piles, and pile caps
(4) Good ventilation shall be ensured for the construction operation layer, and locked tea buckets shall be provided.
a. Comprehensive understanding of drawings;
42# Zhengdali, Linghe District, Xuzhou City, Liaoning Province
The Parties agree that, in the event of a conflict or discrepancy between the terms and conditions of the Contract and its Annexes, the intention of the Parties and the literal nature of the terms shall prevail in consideration of the integrity of the Contract.
Line Snapping Before Removal of Concrete Laitance Removal of Concrete Laitance
Parts of insulating material retaining live parts in position and external parts of insulating material providing protection against electric shock are subjected to the specified glow-wire test.
Temporarily, calculation is carried out based on the vertical pipe diameter of DN150 and with 1/3 of rain pipe as full flow, and the drainage capacity is:
The measuring range of the tunnel is a section within starting/ending chainage mentioned in the above table.
The construction site shall use colors scientifically, reasonably and skillfully, accurately use safety, fire protection, traffic and other signs, and realize standardized management to create a good construction environment.
Figure 6-49 Distribution of First Principal Stress of Concrete
At the same time, one sump is set every 75m under the longitudinal collecting ditch to collect the water of longitudinal collecting ditch and drain it out from the subgrade.
Auxiliary contact, 2 nos. (HK1-11)
When signing the contract, the Bidder shall provide the Bid Inviter with the samples of the paint colors that are consistent with the colors painted on the "equipment and materials".
Casting storage and machining hall (control line connected to 280°C fire valve)
The cutting excavation face reveals that side slopes on both sides of DK166+900 and on the left side of DK167+220 are of loose macadam layers. Slope support shall be strengthened to keep the slope stable.
Clauses 301.01-1 and 301.01-2…
1. At DK405+135 or so, there is DN700 FRP water supply pipeline crossing over the railway, 3-7m above the centerline.
2) The key considerations of alternative construction are to prevent damage to finished products and safety accidents, and to prevent influence on the construction period.
The construction of filter materials and that of impervious materials shall cooperate closely and be scheduled as a whole.
2 The façade modeling column and skew slab are not indicated in this drawing. Refer to drawings 12-17 for façade modeling column and skew slab.
6. Regulations of the State Council on Strengthening Energy Conservation Work (GF [2006] No. 28)
In concrete, such rust will not prevent the reinforcement from bonding with concrete, so no treatment is necessary in general.
Score C has been worked out for project management organization according to the evaluation factors and scores specified in Section 2.2.4 (3) of this chapter;
The construction of new medium reservoir works and 97,000 mu of farmland irrigation and urban and rural water supply works within the range around the reservoir area.
Travel time between Original and Destination of Rail Transit Line (ii from Eastern Long Distance Bus Station to Nanping Walking Street, predicated waiting time 2.5min + 15min riding time)
Forward the invitations after being received to the Foreign Affairs Department (for applying for visa), track the progress of visa application and the time for returning the passports to the audit team of the HR Shared Service Center, and negotiate the airlines and routes with the audit team.
Construction machineries should be prevented for serious oil leakage; oil sewage, maintenance sewage and mechanical petroleum sewage produced during machine operation must not be directly discharged without being treated.
Severity evaluation: When the severity ≥8, design changes shall be considered to eliminate failure modes or reduce the likelihood of failure occurrence.
Brake clippers of the motor bogie are used for auxiliary braking and have the function of maintaining braking.
Products satisfying technical indexes and indexes of harmlessness are deemed qualified.
Tools and safety equipment for personnel in high-altitude works must be complete and meet the usage requirements, and the Project Department shall urge the labor subcontracting team to distribute necessary labor protection equipment.
In the traffic permeable brick areas of courts in the central park and B10 district, because there will be large vehicles passing through the area at that time, 400-thick rubble cushions will be additionally paved in order to ensure the stability of the road surface and the bearing capacity of the area can reach the standard, and the matter will be submitted to the design institute for review!
(2) "Three supplies and one leveling" shall be performed: the access of roads, the supply of water and electricity as well as the leveling of ground shall be properly completed.
Design overview of Ambo station
The joint trial operation of system with the design load shall be carried out under the condition that the design load is reached or close to during the trial operation.
The pump shall be acceptable after 4-hour operation under the rated load without abnormality.
Safety facility is an important means to prevent traffic accidents, alleviate accident harm, ensure smooth traffic flow, quick travel, and riding comfort.
On the basis of the leading group of emergency rescue, an emergency headquarters is set up, with an emergency treatment working group, an emergency treatment technical group, an emergency treatment monitoring group, an emergency treatment material and equipment group, and an emergency treatment security group. And emergency rescue commandos, compulsory fire brigades and medical rescue teams are set up, too.
Table 8.1-1Water Consumption TableUnit: m3/h
Consult and discuss with Bombardier on the existing network system problems in Chongqing:
The lightning rod is installed on the top of the tower crane and steel scaffold higher than the building.
Transmission of helical gear is used for the lathe: helical angle of 18.5°.
Prior to connecting exterior lines to the host, the voltage of each leading-out terminal shall be measured. The voltage values of control bus and return signal bus shall be DC24.5~27.5V. Record well.
Collision prevention: Operators shall strengthen the management of metal tools and prevent sparks from falling or collision (metal tools are not allowed for operation in principle).
This is to certify that Zhang Wei, born on November 10, 1984, majoring in Civil Engineering at our university since July 2012, has completed all the courses specified by the two-year teaching program starting from junior college with qualified scores, and is hereby approved to graduate.
The reel shaft shall remain level, and the optical and electrical cable reels shall be kept in the center of the two lifting brackets. It is prohibited to lay the cables by placing the coil horizontally.
Here are two schemes for your selection: At the location of our company or Mexico.
Check the shape and position of support of hinge oil cylinders and measure the distance between ear plates (the theoretical distance is 140 ±1mm). Check clockwise from 0°, and number the first oil cylinder as #1, with rest cylinders numbered in the same manner. Test data are listed in the following table:
(4) Propose to convene an interim board meeting, postpone the board meeting and postpone voting on the matters discussed;
The train is at service state and all functional tests are completed;
The fresh air and return air dampers are equipped with electric valves so that the dampers can be adjusted as required.
To measure concrete pouring temperature, set at least one measuring point per 100m2 concrete surface and at least three measuring points per concreting layer.
Job responsiblity of Party B is _________________.
Straight road safety braking test on snow: The following test is carried out under AW0 and AW2 load cases, respectively. Verify that the safety system performance meets the requirements under the condition of straight road.
Through QC team activities, further strengthen the awareness of all the staff members to participating in quality work and form a quality management network with top-to-bottom lines and transverse net.
b) Necessary acceptance criteria shall be included or referred to;
Leveling and slope-making by 30-thick M20 cement mortar (0.3% slope, 10 thick at the thinnest place)
The end wall is of slab-and-pillar structure and is installed and welded by end plate, end column, corner column, upper end beam and so on.
China: Newly built passenger dedicated railways which are designed for operating D-series high-speed trains with the operating speed over 250 km/h (including reservation),
Working size of reinforcements shall conform to requirements on the construction drawings; and the allowable deviation of the processed reinforcements cannot exceed the requirements.
The materials division shall conduct procurement and acceptance according to the Company's materials management regulations.
When 300<D≤1000, 2\U+233212 shall be added to both sides of the opening.
Referring to other sewage treatment plants' forecasting factors of odor influence, this environmental impact assessment has selected ammonia and hydrogen sulfide as the main forecasting assessment factors.
The evaluation period of this project is taken as 30 years.
1. Operators shall wear acid-proof clothing, rubber gloves, and insulated boots.
a)If a complete hole can be formed within 2 minutes, record the test result as "Fall off" and record the actual escape time and the size of the hole;
The optical cable works shall be done at the section which is ready for such works according to progress of civil works.
Dehran-Qom, Station, Final Survey
13.4.5 The control criteria of blast vibration shall be subject to Table 13.4.5, and shall meet the following requirements:
The calculation method of slope stability shall allow for the possible damage form of the slope and it may be determined in accordance with the following methods:
Each terminal row shall be provided with the independent terminal number convenient for disassembly and assembly. The terminals shall be matched with the circuit current ampacity and wire cross section.
Accurately determine the central point of the pile based on the design pile position. Excavate the pit of pile casing based on the pile center, with a pile casing depth 20 cm lower than the undisturbed soil. Embed the pile casing into the pit. Stretch lines for locating, to make sure that the center of pile casing overlaps the pile center.
c) Heating power:≤120W (heater with PTC element);
3.5.1Thickness range of finishing paint dry film:
Measure the voltage between the positive and negative electrodes of batteries in D1 and D2 cars:
G. All employees use fixed IP to surf the Internet. The IP is bounded to MAC address. Employees have no permission to modify the address randomly;
Responsible for communication between units in process of products realization;
The length of the vehicle shall be less than 13.65 mm; the seats in saloon shall be longitudinally arranged, with the number of 8;
Obtain consistency with each standard (refer to "consistency with each standard %" to obtain index)
3.1.1.3 Strengthen management of technology, quality and HSE and process control, strictly implement construction technical standards and construction specifications to enhance the first pass yield and ensure high project quality.
China Railway should determine the specific time and personnel related to overseas training.
1) 3cm thick wood boards shall be laid on the ground to increase the stability.
The following documents shall constitute an integral part of and shall be read in conjunction with this agreement and the contract documents constituting the contract shall be mutually explanatory and supplementary.
① The full information sharing and integration: to access the effective information related to the accident as much as possible in the shortest possible time is a key factor for efficient emergency management. Therefore, a fast, efficient and comprehensive information linkage network should be established for information collection, transmission, sharing, integration and optimal application.
When you are ready to call Lizheng, it is recommended that you sit next to your computer and prepare the following information:
Bearing blocks for input shaft and output shaft of 6-speed transmission are fixed on the rear housing with screws.
Before production, it must inspect the performance of the curing equipment and whether the steam pipeline is unblocked at first.
Summary Sheet of Sensitivity Analysis Results of National Economic Evaluation
The operators are forbidden to drink alcohol 8 hours before working and during work and shall not be subject to continuous fatigued operations.
3) Earth-free fault phase selection: By using to distinguish three - phase symmetric faults, the fault phase of two - phase fault is determined by the operation of inter-phase distance relay.
Filing of amendment to the articles of association on September 12, 2019
4) Before the end of the water absorption operation, the vacuum shall be gradually weakened to prevent the water from leaving a water passage inside the concrete and affect the compactness of the concrete.
Figure 6 Installation Diagram of Soft Object Shock Test
5. Noise reduction facilities, such as mute device and noise barrier can be used if necessary.
study countermeasures and establish operation processes and solutions for possible issues.
Install the light guide plate assembly (170) and knob cap (180).
While tackling the problems by self, strive to make the technological breakthrough by uniting the design and research units as well as the well-known institutions, thus to provide the technical support for ensuring the construction period.
Cancel the Human Resources Management Office under the HR Department.
The air tightness shall be tested by the method specified in GB/T 9747.
All questions and decisions must be recorded in the signature table or in Section 13 and included in the test report.
Inspect if TBMhoisting of pea gravel tanks works normally and if the conveyer belt works well. Check abrasion of the belt's roller. Inspect the grinding plate of pea gravel injecting machine on a regular basis and if the lubrication tank incurs oil leakage. And inspect working conditions of the pea gravel's injection pump.
Key factors that affect quality, environment, safety in this project
6.17 The setting of safety warning signs and the installation and use of safety equipment of the Company and its affiliated organizations shall comply with national and industrial standards, and standards of Sinoma Int. and the Company. It is not allowed to use any processes or equipment that endanger work safety and have been explicitly eliminated or prohibited by the state.
In the software requirement, architecture, design and achievement, integration and confirmation phases, verification is required to be carried out; in confirmation phase, carry out confirmation.
However, field could not be greatly weakened. Otherwise, the armature reacts severely to make motor commutation difficult.
The information assurance system of safety construction is composed of the works and systems in the aspects of the compilation of information outline, the establishment of information network, the collection of information, the report and statistics of safety construction conditions and accidents, the analysis, processing and application of information and the management of information archives.
Establish a management system for energy measurement equipping and purchasing
1.Perform dynamic balance test after completion of crankshaft processing, and the amount of unbalance should ≤
If the Purchaser is accused of infringing any proprietary technology and/or patents and/or other intellectual property rights as a result of the use of PRT system, the Purchaser shall notify the Supplier and related matters shall be carried out in accordance with Clause 6 of this Contract.
Water consumption of Kality Depot for greening and road flushing
Bridge construction group 2: responsible for construction of Xiaogaocang No. 1 Major Bridge at K26+040, including a total of 245 pieces of 30m T-beams with 49-span (single deck);
The design of communication system implements the guideline of Security, Reliability, Economy and Practice. To achieve better resource share and interconnection, the system is networked and designed in concentrated way while put into provision and operation in different phases as per three lines Lot3, Lot1A and Lot1(totally 77.782km long ).
The cover plate is made of reinforcement of grade and C30 cement concrete.
University Name: Wuhan University of Technology President (Dean): Zhou Hongde
Party A shall provide the following materials and working conditions to Party B in time after this contract takes effect:
In the case that products need to be released due to the need of production and it is too urgent to inspect the products, it must be approved by the head of Quality Assurance Department and clear identification and records of the products must be made before the release. Hence, recalling and replacement can be done immediately if any non-compliance is identified.
Power: 0.37 kw (1/2 HP) 2800 RPM
<5-4>Clayey sand: yellowish-brown, medium dense, slightly wet,with white crystal visible locally, with 60% medium sand, 20% coarse sand, 10% fine gravel and with the rest being clay fraction and silty soil.
——Contract No., and names, specifications and quantities of the examined equipment and materials
2. To meet the requirements of construction period and solve water discharge problem during operation, a transverse gallery shall be provided at the right side along the heading direction of the line at DK185+800 according to the topographic and geological conditions.
● Supervision log shall be completed, with problems respect to quality during construction recorded timely. Meanwhile, photos shall be taken or videos shall be recorded on the construction site in which any quality problem is found.
Any silt, debris or sewage on the bottom shall be cleared completely.
The Project Management Department's warranty personnel shall prepare an implementation plan for the warranty and maintenance project and implement it after approval.
D. Pour hot melt adhesive at the designated position, push in the outer heat-shrinkable sheath and continue to uniformly shrink it with flame.
CASIC is working hard to make new progress for the development of China's commercial aerospace industry.
Kampala~Malaba meter-gauge railway in Uganda
(1) Master the composition and functions of 6502 electric interlocking circuit.
The provisions printed in bold type are compulsory ones and must be enforced strictly.
The guide line is made of flexible copper wires with solderless joints equipped at both ends.
According to the design requirements and working procedures of the circuit diagram of the locomotive, actions of relevant electrical devices automatically completes or are manually completed, to ensure that the diesel engine starts and undergoes speed regulation without load, that the locomotive could be normally switched between traction and braking conditions and between forward and backward directions, and that the locomotive is under normal operation.
The Supplier, CRRC ZELC has also been providing comprehensive aftersales services with quick response and high quality to ensure the safe and reliable operation of the battery engineering maintenance vehicles (electric track cars). CRRC ZELC is reliable for its customer service.
(4)Injuries, such as noise and radioactive radiation, that may be suffered during equipment supervision and pressure test inspection at the premises of equipment and material suppliers and manufacturers;
The system will randomly select questions from these 3 types of questions as per certain proportion to form a questionnaire and show the phone verification staff the questionnaire which will be used during telephone communication between the phone verification staff and the customer.
It is required to check whether there is damage or deformation on the appearance of the panel/cabinet, whether the paint is even and intact, and whether the cabinet door can be opened and closed flexibly and reliably, and to check the electrical components inside the cabinet for dropping, rusting, damage or crack.
IIDK2+590.0 Usuman River Super Major Bridge of National Railway
3.1.6 Effective length of arrival-departure tracks: 650 m.
The action of harsh environment on the fastening system should comply with the requirements of EN13416-6.
Considering the difference in stripping ratio in the early and late stages, the difference in transportation distance between different unloading points, and the reduction in the impact of mine car maintenance on production, it is planned to allocate 20 Nr. in the first 3 years to ensure the realization of the production schedule.
(1) All formworks shall be inspected before use. The formwork surface shall be clean and smooth, and free from cracks, delamination, dislocation, hard burrs, indentations or deep scratches.
Independently transporting aluminum oxide toFTP2 is of high reliability without interfering each other and investment can be reduced without the need to build intermediate warehouse.
The construction on site cannot be conducted until the superelevation is confirmed by the Employer.
(1). The stratum involved in the bridge Project is mainly: clay, the weathered mudstone, the sandstone and other layers.
B. The Number of Cars Driven under the Influence of Downhill Tractive Effort
The dispatching center can set and change the train running speed for any section. If the train running speed exceed the speed limit set for the corresponding section, the system will send alarm automatically to the train operator and the dispatching center, and record the alarm information automatically for tracing and inquiry.
2) Power transformer: The three-phase, oil-immersed self-cooled transformer shall be used and the condition for air cooling shall be reserved.
By December 8, 2014, the actually financed fund was RMB 4.12963 billion.
The OCU exchanges information with the interlocking logic subsystem via a secure data channel.
In the Project, four sets of saloon side doors are provided on each side of each car for boarding of passengers, with a total of 72 sets per train. Electric bi-parting pocket sliding doors are adopted for the saloon side doors.
(Years ago or % complete if under construction)
Employer(full name): Zhejiang Lanmei Tourism Development Co., Ltd
± 1200 N/㎡ (minimum or more if required as per site condition)
For the customer with actual credit sale, corresponding customer representative and the sales supervisors at all levels will have part of their commission or performance withheld temporarily.
Disconnect the PE wire from the grounding device when the resistance of repeated groundingis measured:
Standard potassium dichromate solution c(K2Cr2O7)=0.005mol/L
Use a hammer with a nominal mass of 200g to hit the concrete surface and record the hollow detection area, thus completing the detection inspection.
Code for Design of Small-Sized Power Plant (GB 50049-2011)
Staged excavation shall be performed for cutting slope to make gentle slope ratio, with side ditches on stage reserved between stages. Slope deformation arising out of bedrock weathering or hidden structure plane shall be prevented from causing new engineering geological problems.
Rolling is from the shoulders on both sides to the road center. The two sides of the pavement shall be rolled for 2-3 times more. It is strictly prohibited to turn around or sharply brake on the completed or rolling sections.
Provide the mobile phone communication of data through a single network provider and provide devices on the same network to project manager.
b) Requirements for technology and quality assurance of the supplier shall be confirmed in technical agreement or contract, and;
There is silty clay of weak swellability distributed in the bridge site area.
Ground reptiles mainly include lizard, and birds include weaverbird, sunbird and finch.
The whole line is designed with a total of 5 traction substations, 9 switchgear stations, 1 reconstructed traction power supply dispatching office and approximately 515km OCS system.
General Engineering Design and Total-Packaging Contract Terms of Guangzhou Metro Line 6 (bound separately).
Recommendations for mounting of the elastic clip: before large-scale mounting on site, it is recommended to take 10 sleepers for a trial mounting to measure the actual mounting torque that enables the elastic clip to be installed in place, and then large-scale mounting shall be carried out based on the average value of the actual mounting torque.
The Technical Specification describes the technical requirements of the grounding resistor, that is, the auxiliary testing equipment of the vehicle's grounding resistance within the scope of responsibility of India CRRC Transit Vehicles Co. Ltd. (referred to as: India CRRC Co., Ltd. ).
3. To eliminate false faults, the inverter shall be allowed to restart automatically. If the inverter needs to be restarted after a fault is confirmed, it must be reset manually.
Prize of "Selection of 100 Classical Projects for Celebration of 60th Anniversary of the Founding of New China
Prior to track laying, the ballast spreader shall be used for ballast laying. The ballasts shall be spread and compacted in one operation. The ballast laying can also be carried out by the rolling machine supplemented by other ballasting machines.
D. Foliar top-dressing: 2‰ urea is sprayed on the leaves.
Relevant personnel of the Project Department must study the compulsory provisions and accept corresponding assessment after entering the site.
·From a long-term perspective, in regional planning along both sides of the route, layout shall be designed according to noise prediction results and corresponding planning requirements to avoid bringing new environmental problems.
(Train weight + weight of passengers (AW2)) * Train running kilometers
6.6.4 Before self-compacting concrete pouring, the slab cavity shall be inspected for ponding inside.
The room at the bottom is provided with a door to the outside. The number and spacing of the emergency exit of the workshop meet the requirements in the Code for Fire Protection Design of Buildings (GB50016-2014) (2018).
Specifications of Dimensions, Shapes, Quality Tolerance for Hot Rolling Steel Plates with Thickness of 3mm or 3mm above
After each operation, wash the faces and hands with soap (or special detergent) in time, rinse the mouths with clear water, and clean the protective equipment in time and store it centrally.
There shall be six priority seats arranged in the vehicle, using a special color for distinguishing. The shall be installed with aluminum alloy signs or nameplates. "Priority seating" shall be painted in the front and back of the seatback.
③ Tighten all bolts; apply 21Nm torque on M8 bolts and make locking marks one by one as per requirements in the drawing.
According to the process and production requirements, the process freezing water (with maximum water volume of 54m³/h, 0.4MPa) at -7~-2°C for the production workshop is supplied by a newly-installed low-temperature screw water chiller with a refrigerating capacity of 286kW.
Associated safety activities consist in establishing the initial predicted safety performance.
The schematic diagram and wiring diagram of electrical circuit for the control cabinet (box) must be confirmed by the designer before production and shall not affect the final contract price.
The grounding lead-out wire is designed here in the structural steel girder, for connection to the reinforcement in the concrete foundation of awning which should be subject to reliable electrical connection with the two main reinforcements in the bridge pier.
Recently, economic growth of Djibouti is mainly attributed to the growth of foreign direct investment in port, tourism and construction industry.
3.6.7.1. The Tenderer shall offer proposals for the cooling method of traction motor, and the motor shall have good cleanliness level and good maintenance performance.
Corresponding protective measures should be taken during power cable construction to avoid damaging the insulation layer of the cable due to improper measures, leaving hidden defects and causing potential safety hazards to the operation.
23.2.3After the occurrence of force majeure, the contracting parties shall take measures to avoid and reduce the expansion of loss to the greatest extent. Where either of the contracting parties fails to take effective measures and causes expansion of loss, such party shall be liable for such loss of expansion;
However, the shortage of funds and poor transport infrastructure are still the bottlenecks restricting the economic and social development of Laos.
3 Construction of concrete pavement shall be postponed during foundation construction within the car depot and temporary pavement shall be considered.
7) Domestic sewage treatment: the fecal sewage is pretreated by the septic tank and the oil sewage in the canteen is pretreated by the small-scale oil separation tank. They are finally discharged in the nearby municipal sewage pipeline after being treated by the integrated sewage treatment equipment in combination with other domestic sewages.
6. The side and heading slopes at the opening shall be provided with skeleton slope protection with grass planted in the skeleton according to the drawing LJYC "EL (2014) 2029-12~14".
The lifting site shall be provided with warning signs and be supervised by specially-assigned person. No one except operators is allowed to enter into the site.
The accident nature and responsible person shall be defined by making detailed research on the investigation contents and analyzing the condition, cause and method of injury and relevant unsafe behaviors and states.
Warning height: adjustable in the range of 0m~1500m;
Real-time communication between passengers and OCC can be directly achieved via emergency intercom device to implement relevant emergency response measures;
The scoring of different evaluation indexes in each element shall be implemented following the scoring principle.
But the length of pipes exposed from the junction box shall be guaranteed less than 5mm.
1. Overall planning, and system and orderly construction: whether the terminal building proposal, landscape planning of the station square, and the overall architectural style of the terminal area are subject to unified planning and design,.
No electronic water processor is provided in the hot water system, and there is a risk of scaling in pipes and heat exchangers.
According to the second five-year plan (ETPⅡ), the average annual growth of GDP will reach 11%, the average annual growth of agriculture will be 8%, the average annual growth of industry will be 19.8%, the average annual growth of service sector will be 10.1% and the average annual growth of manufacturing among the industry will be 23.8% in 2020.
Complete the process design of the large machine section in site design.
1. The wet digestion process avoids the problem of blocked gas production, and effectively avoids the problem of ammonia toxicity;
1. This is the preliminary design drawing of typical track maintenance section with a floor area of 332m\U+008C2\U+008D.
The isolation and decoupling specifications, applicable to all devices for all the types of operating signals, are.
2) For valve in front of the municipal pressurized water supply and the water pump suction port, the nominal pressure is 1.0MPa;
Firewall should be constructed with scaffolds and compressed steel plate around construction site to separate production area(including roads) from other construction area in order to avoid fire spread and prevent strangers from getting in.
Breakpoint connector (SB7 composite speed sensor): 1
Other elevations marked with "structure" all refer to the elevations of structural slabs.
One round trip operation of EMU, operation and maintenance of EMU-borne equipment, emergency response to EMU faults, primary and secondary EMU overhauls, de-marshaling and rescue
During the application of these clauses, both parties shall faithfully investigate the feasibility of the reasonable actions adopted so as to minimize its impact on the delivery schedule thus ensuring that the extended schedule meets the schedule in the Contract for APM Project for Shanghai Metro Line 8.
The space inside the cable chamber shall meet the needs of installation and maintenance for the above accessories.
For each high voltage safety output, ATC provides a contact with the following characteristics:
For the weight of concrete, it can be estimated according to the volume of 25x density and the steel can be considered according to the density 78.
(5) The enterprise profits are calculated at 7% of the sum of the direct construction cost and indirect cost.
Outdoor unit of split air conditioner shall be arranged as near as practicable to corresponding indoor unit; independent control shall be available for air conditioner of each room.
The product shall be free of falling off, deformation and any loose component and can be used normally when having born a static load (weight) of 49N (5.0kg) for 60s during use and mounting;
5.2.2 Fasten M8 nuts and spring washers till they are flat, and make locking marks.
Among them, SINOPEC Sichuan Vinylon Works is the largest acetic acid production enterprise in China.
6.7.1 The Branch assuming the testing tasks shall organize the testing strictly as per the testing program, testing procedure and operation regulations.
Plain clay: lime earth = 3:7, back-filling and tamping in layers, width ≮500
Client: Chengdu Construction Engineering Corporation Group
The bearing device of the locomotive consists of cylindrical coil spring, secondary vertical damper, and laterally arranged anti-yaw damper.
5)System acceptance and hand-over stage: At least 2 teams of personnel shall be provided, in which the personnel shall be able to independently solve the problems on site.
TJ/DW011-2009 - Notice on Issuing Technical Requirements for Integration of CIR and LBJ Equipment (YJTX [2009] No. 713)
Production Progress, Schedule and Shipment of Complete Cars in April for Ethiopia
Measure the length of earthing wires of different model according to drawing, and mark the cutting position with marker.
Disconnect the wire between the voltage sensor and DC HV connection bus 2 (AJA1003989);
On April 26, 2018, Yunnan Provincial Commendation Ceremony was held to award outstanding employees in all industries who had made excellent results in the 14th Technical Skills Competition in Yunling Mountain, Yunnan.
Overall finalized large-sized form shall be free of displacement, deformation, and mortar leakage during concrete placing.
AC4760V is applied between circuit D and circuit C and between circuit E and circuit C respectively. The voltage rising time is 10s and the test voltage lasts for 1 minute;
The ash passage is composed of such two sections as the air chambers of the reversely thrusting section and the forwardly thrusting section, and due to different temperatures and expansion directions, the air chambers generate expansion differential, and in order to compensate the expansion differential between grates of the two sections, they are linked by a expansion joint.
In general, the reserved length of the terminal tail line is 150mm, and other lengths to be reserved shall be measured actually.
1. Use P400 abrasive paper to grind. The grinding shall adopt the method of rotation type from inside to outside diffusion grinding, to ensure that the surface of repair part is flat and smooth.
19.1.7 Alarm shall be sent in time and corresponding emergency actions shall be taken in case of the following conditions during construction and monitoring for slope works:
1) The movable/stationary contacts shall be installed firmly, and contact plates shall not be skew and be free of abrasion.
When the air is supplied in sections, the distribution and exhaust sections are automatically switched one by one by PLC control as the operation vehicle runs, and can also be manually controlled.
During the construction period, the safety and cleanness within the construction area should be ensured. In additional, pollutions outside the construction area (outside the walls) should be timely removed and restored to the original conditions.
We have been highly lauded by the owner and all parties involved in the construction, and received many thank-you letters from the owners. It has been awarded the honorary titles of "Advanced Company of Quality in 2017", "Best Team of Equipment Quality Guarantee in 2018", "Advanced Company of Equipment Management in 2018" by the owners and won awards;
As the eighth biggest oil exporter in the world and one of OPEC's member countries, the employed population in petroleum industry is only 4% of labor force in Nigeria, but 50% of Nigeria GDP, 85% of fiscal revenue and 99% of export revenue are from petroleum.
Engineering technology, test and safety & quality personnel, construction personnel and some management personnel in the Project Department
(15) According to Article 6.1.2 of the General Guidelines for Preventing Electrostatic Accidents, all objects belonging to electrostatic conductors must be grounded in electrostatic hazardous places.
The design principle of tunnel monitoring system in the Project shall be as follow:
Walking or operation under the objects lifted shall be strictly prohibited. When hearing the ringing of crane, actively keep clear of the crane.
2. Longitudinal Profile for Engineering Geology of High-fill Embankment in K95+340~K95+440 (Drawing CD28-2-22 pages)
The completed Project will improve the loading and unloading efficiency and reduce transportation cost.
(6) For the terminated elevation at the top of the excavated roadbed road, the settlement caused by compaction shall be considered, and the value shall be determined by the test.
Weight the evaporation pan on an analytical balance. Then dry and weight it again until its mass is constant.
According to the characteristics of the project, the project department plans to set up 14 construction teams, 1 mixing plant, 1 steel reinforcement processing and precast member plant, 1 precast beam plant and 1 stone crushing plant. The specific staffing and construction task division are described below:
The velocity of air flow within air pipe is 10~15m/s
The CASCO iLOCK computer-based interlocking software V1.0 ensures the security of the interlock through "NISAL" (Digital Integrated Security Assurance Logic) and the "Double Channel, Different Software" technologies, etc..
Attached Figure 3: Network Diagram of Construction Schedule(Package 1)
(2) Please inform the displayed ERTMS information.
The products shall be gained through sampling qualified finished products after factory inspection in the factory warehouse by personnel designate by the certification organization. The samples shall be tested by the qualified inspection organization appointed by the certification organization after the samplers and enterprise representatives jointly confirm and sign.
1. According to the review comments, type and scale of the station will be rearranged.
In addition, considering the standby management and other personnel, the dispatching center is allocated with a total of 43 persons.
Figure 5-1Braking Waveform at 60km/h
There are three domestic oil refineries in Nigeria, with a total capacity of 22.2 million tons, but the actual current production capacity is only 20-40%, which is far from meeting its domestic demand.
14.9.4Party A may, at any time, arrange its personnel to visit other projects similar and related to this project in any other place at home or abroad or attend special conferences for the purpose of this project.
If we set bridge for the line to cross the river at the confluence of the lower main stream and the tributary stream (see the option of river crossing once on the north side), it is necessary to built only one bridge and the line will be relatively short and straight.
During dismantlement, use suitable device to support the bottom of the brake control device;
After the construction of baseboard roll (including the roll in the position where the protective wall is 900mm high) has been finished, one layer of linoleum should be paved dryly on the roll of baseboard. Then, 50mm thick C20 fine aggregate concrete protective layer should be poured. 20mm thick 1:2 cement mortar protective layer should be plastered on the roll in the position where the protective wall is 900mm high.
Establish detailed file of creating excellence, in which actual conditions of the progress, safety and quality for creating excellent project are timely recorded, and necessary detailed data is provided for the objective of creating excellence determined to implement the plan of creating excellence for the purpose of timely guidance and management.
After all exploration and testing works, and payment of completion settlement fee are completed, it shall be terminated.
Air spring, vertical damper, lateral damper, and anti-yaw damper
Improve the professional quality and comprehensive management ability of middle-level management personnel
Accessories: Rack, inlet silencer (including filter), exhaust silencer, relief valve, pressure gauge, check valve, flexible joint, shock absorber, expansion bolt and lubricating oilf for commissioning
(10) Organizing or participating in the compliance assessment, and coordinating with the Audit Department in the rectification of issues related to internal control and compliance assessment;
Nominate the Assistant to the General Manager, Deputy Chief Engineer, Deputy Chief Economist, Deputy Chief Accountant and Deputy General Counsel of the Company to the Board of Directors, and formulate the aforesaid personnel's remuneration, and reward and punishment solutions;
(12) Construction clearance: JX-1, SX-2A (double-track 2B);
2. The net distance between the buried pipeline and the track centerline of the adjacent railway line shall not be less than 25m.
Minimum S curve R110-5-R110 mm
2) Equipment rooms: HV equipment room, LV equipment room, switch cabinet room and rectifier transformer room.
Organize the preparation of project safety, and environmental policies and their objectives, technical measures plan for safety construction, emergency plans; be responsible for the examination and approval of safety measures for major construction projects; implement the safety responsibility system, organize and lead project safety inspection to ensure the safe construction of the project;
5.4.5 When the process review finds that there is a need for improvement, the process owner shall organize and implement the improvement, and the implementation of the improvement shall be tracked and verified.
10 Refer to article 1 in Page 38 of S/W 11J517 for the mirror.
By now, we own over 50 strategic partners, including colleges and universities, financial institutions, associations, and leading enterprises.
Dismount the external brake hose, the main air hose and the equalizing hose, and place them at a ventilated and dry area for storage; during transportation, connect each hose.
To minimize deformations in the massif (surface sediment) caused by tunneling, monitoring should be organized.
Refer to Table 2-3-1 below for main maintenance equipment of each discipline:
The manager representative shall select an audit team leader and auditors, and approve annual internal plans and internal audit implementation plans.
The bedrock fissure water mainly occurs in bedrock fissures, and the tunnel site area mainly invovles amphibolite, with relatively developed joint fissures and slightly poor joint connectivity. The bedrock fissure water is not large in quantity, mainly supplied by atmospheric precipitation and discharged to surface water.
Diameter of the equivalent circle of the processing foundation area assumed by 1 pile.
Projects passing through sensitive areas such as cities and towns, centralized residential areas and schools are built along existing roads which will be expanded.
Equipment installation: Perform detection and test after the equipment is in place, and then install and adjust the anchoring section after the equipment passes the test.
3.1.2 Lightning Protection and Grounding Safety System
3. Demand 3: Improvement of Collection and Distribution System of Port and Promotion of Port's Economic Development
During the implementation of the Project, it is necessary to have business contacts with the Ministry of Public Works and Transportation, the Ministry of Health and Social Security, the Customs and other departments of South Sudan, such as personnel residence visas, personal safety guarantee of Chinese personnel, security of aid materials and property, and customs clearance of aid materials.
The above-mentioned documents are mutually explanatory, and in case of any ambiguity or discrepancy, it shall be subjected to the contract which is concluded earlier.
Table for Construction Unit Staff and Main Equipment Condition (Crossing Unit)
For this line, video capture point equipment will be installed at entrances and exits, emergency rescue stations, emergency exits and shelters of 11 tunnels (over 5km), and the video capture point equipment will be connected to the video node equipment of the new customer service system in the station building of this line.
Fig. 1.2.3.-62 Effect Drawing I of Typical Mixed Traction and Step-down Substation
Carry out the activities in pursuit of excellent project of procedure sample first in construction, typical demonstration and overall advancing.
2. Carefully implement the national laws, regulations and superior instructions about work safety, assist relevant departments in carrying out safety and fire prevention education for employees, and carry out mass safety and fire prevention activities.
The manufacturing of terminal lugs and threaded wedge sleeves of terminal anchor clamps for messenger wires shall adopt metal die forging technologies;
All levels shall establish and improve occupational health management archives according to requirements.
The flue gas containing acidic material from the boiler outlet is introduced into the upper part of NaHCO3 dry-deacidification reactor after passing through the economizer, and then introduced into the reaction tower through nozzle.,.
Type size, appearance and mark, crack, hardness, metallographic structure, total depth of decarburized layer, residual deformation, fatigue performance, antirust performance (120-hour neutral salt mist test)
Plating surface shall be with a pure color and without peeling, fracturing, burning, grinning, spalling, black spot or obvious pock or burr.
In addition, content of the energy conservation design concerning locomotive, rolling stock and EMU depots (sections) and inspection, repair and servicing depot of large track maintenance machinery was revised based on the actual situation of design in recent years.
The outdoor project of this project will be carried out after the completion of the steel structure project and exterior wall decoration construction of warehouse. The construction was inserted in Dec. 2019 and the outdoor environmental project construction will be completed in Jun. 2020.
The test harmonic current with frequency of about 1,700 Hz, 2,000 Hz, 2,300 Hz or 2,600 Hz did not exceed 0.3A in the three tests. And the root-mean-square value of current with the frequency exceeding specified bandwidth of 1,500 Hz~3,000 Hz did not exceed 3A.
It can be measured manually or by means of a light measuring car when there is no wheel load effect.
Master the internal audit of the quality management system, and evaluate whether the quality management system meets the requirements and the standards and whether it is effectively implemented and maintained.
The rail transit has been developed for more than one hundred years in the world, and the concept and mode of modern rail transit have undergone tremendous changes.
(e) General Administrative Clauses applicable to engineering contracts;
The hoisting position shall be measured by a plumb line and a steel ruler. The measured central vertical line of the hoisting gate and the lifting center point shall be on the same plumb line, and the verticality deviation along the whole length shall be no more than 2/1,000.
Workflow for setting-out survey: handover of control point data→setting-out tasks→drawing inspection→data calculation→programming→instrument calibration and inspection→survey on-site→setting-out points marking→disclosure on-site→results data archiving.
The segment is carried to outdoor curing pool with 10T forklift for curing. During this process, collision of segments should be avoided.
The station layout meets with the metro network planning, urban transport, construction environment and pipeline planning requirements to promote the transformation of the old urban districts and the construction of new districts.
If materials and semi-finished products of steel structures are fabricated and processed in China and transported to Azerbaijan via international shipping, we will actively cooperate with the Owner to contact with China's and Azerbaijan's maritime administrations to coordinate customs clearance.
Safety lights shall be provided at the locations easy to be observed and these lights shall display the initial positioning state of the wheel set, especially for directing the feeding and retracting of the vehicle to be machined.
According to project experience, the service life of floor cloth is generally 15 years. The user needs to modify.
The connecting pin (5) is connected with the hollow shaft drive, transferring locomotive tractive force and braking force.
(1、 Helmets: Helmets must be tested by relevant departments before use.
1 Railway engineering three-dimensional models on geographic information are named based on four levels, namely modeling unit coding, model types, levels of detail of models and the model sequence number, complying with the provisions in Figure 5.3.3.
Power supply plans for every traction substation are shown bellow:
Review running of the contractor's HSE management system within the administrative scope.
24-M16, uniform distribution, Φ1660
The red line of quasi-expressway is 60m wide, and the red line of trunk road if 40~50m wide.
②Develop a point of view of all serving for users, emphasize the comprehensive management of project quality, carry out the work surrounding users and establish the effective quality self supervision and inspection system.
In case of failure to establish a list of emergency resources or inconsistence between the recorded emergency resources and the actual ones, 3 points will be deducted.
Non-conformance: It refers to non-conformance of an item under audit to the audit criteria.
(Applicable to foundation beam, straining beam and two-pile cap)
② Bolts and sockets must be matched with each other, and the damaged bolts and sockets shall not be used.
First, the waterstop is not only used on the shear wall;
10.3 Construction Technical Requirements of Asphalt Mixture
The overall process of TBM tunneling is as shown in Fig. 7.4-1.
2.14.3.6.It shall have a good interference resistance, high reliability and redundancy.
Construction arrangement: preparation of personnel allocation plan and machinery and materials supply plan, methods, environmental protection plan, time schedule, and construction site layout, with traceable detailed video records.
During the assembly process, total station, level meter, steel ruler, level meter and other measuring equipment are mainly used for size inspection.
1. Foundation without frost heaving; if it is frost heaving foundation soil, the freezing depth is less than 1.00m; if the freezing depth is greater, the foundation shall be deepened so that the foundation is buried 0.25m below the frost line or the foundation soil above 0.25m below the frost line shall be replaced with coarse grained soil.
After application of standard constant strain loading for 720 hours as per ISO 7539-2:1989, the tensioned surface has no crackings through observation by microscope with magnification of 10 times.
In addition, the project will pass through important transportation facilities such as Metro Line 9, Line 1, Shenzhen Railway Station, Hong Kong-Shenzhen Railway, and Chunfeng Elevated Road.
8. The Contractor shall commence the work as directed by the Supervisor, with a construction period of 909 calendar days.
The study of the operation organization plan involves passenger transportation services, organization of train operation, communication signals, traction power supply, dispatching command, maintenance management, organization, and staffing.
The water consumption of underground pedestrian passageway, sectional tunnel and underground reverse track shall be 60 m3/h.
Bagamoyo Port Expansion and Special Economic Zone Construction Project, Tri-border Hydropower Station Project in Tanzania Border, Power Transmission and Transformation in Tanzania, MTWARA Water Plant Project, Dock Project in Zanzibar Island Distribution Port
DK191+446.06~DK194+322.29(see the relocation section)
Be sure to take correct and proper methods for emergency disposal according to different materials and causes, and at the same time, report to the local public security department: 119 for fire alarm, 122 for traffic accident, 120 for first aid and 110 for bandit alarm.
Inspection pit is seriously polluted by oil and the accumulated water can not be discharged, which will affect the normal use, and the railway fasteners in the inspection pit are damaged or missing.
Check the super capacitor cell: Check whether the super capacitor cell is swollen, and replace the swollen module if necessary.
Compaction operations should follow the order of light to heavy, slow to fast, and edges to the middle. During the rolling process, always maintain the linear direction of the roller.
In order to ensure that the tail gas of the waste incineration plant is discharged up to standard, the flue gas purification treatment is required.
3) Set road introduction in the west of land. The road width is 7M.
Thanks to its geographic position, Myanmar has a pleasant climate all the year around. It is a country with beautiful and attractive natural landscapes that will change as with the climatic variation.
Schematic Diagram of Ambo Station
(2) Whether it complies with applicable local and international laws and regulations;
Leveling and adjustment of the main girder: the verticality of the main girder can be controlled by a hanging hammer, and the planeness is controlled by a horizontal line drawn between two positioning axes.
6 per 1,000 items; 1 per 2,000 vehicles
c) Take corresponding measures to reduce risks according to the results of the risk assessment.
Arabic numerals are used to mark the distribution number on the cover. According to the circulation size, 1~x are used for less than 10 copies, 01~xx are used for less than 100 copies, and 001~XXX are used for less than 1000 copies.
During excavation, it is necessary to avoid the machine traveling on the pile head when the machine is adjusting its direction. The reserved soil layer of around 300mm thickness among pipes and the soil layer sticking on the piles shall be removed manually at any time.
Structure: ring type, CD type, tank type, and stripe type
17)Requirements for barrier-free functions are the same as those for elevators without machine rooms.
7. Before the setting out of bridge abutment and pier and other structures, the coordinates provided by the Designer shall be verified, and their correctness shall be deduced according to the drawing; after the setting-out, the Supervision Company shall conduct the re-measurement to confirm the coordinates, and then the construction can be started.
1.21 HSE Specification and Management Requirements for Operation Site
After these changes pass the acceptance inspection, the person in charge of the relay protection device delivers the equipment alteration report, modification causes, contents and modified drawings to the operating sub site.
Supervision Company: Zhejiang Tongqu Engineering Management Co., Ltd.
Construction procedures: preparation → material inspection → surface treatment → primer construction → touch-up → finishing coat construction → handover and acceptance.
4.3 Disposal of on-site nonconformity (discovered after delivery or start of use)
(Signature) ___________
8 On the premise that installation requirement is satisfied, the thickness of glass fiber reinforced plastics at panel installation location can be optimized and designed by the supplier and confirmed by the designer.
The riding evaluation index is graded based on Table 1.1.4.
5) Procurement, installation and connection of outdoor pipelines, pipe wells and covers, pump pits and covers, as well as earthwork excavation and backfilling of pipe trenches and wells and construction of pipeline trenches and covers;
The foundation brake rigging is a lower link structure vertical lever.
The carriageway is straight-to-circle curve road camber; the cross slope in straight section is 1.5% (two-side slope); the cross slope in sidewalk is 2% (the slope is towards at carriageway);
Delay jitter indicates the variation of delay. The forward delay jitter of FE Ethernet board is less than 30us, and the forward delay jitter of GE Ethernet board is less than 20us (typical byte 128B).
Figure 9 Secondary Structure PredictingAnalysis Diagram of Test Substance Recombinant Insulin Lispro (Lot No. LL1507001)
4. A single layer of diagonal bracing is provided for single-row steel pipe piles;
9-1-2 Mudstone (EMs): The thickness is greater than 5.6m.
Smoking is not allowed on the construction site, or cigarette butts are not allowed to be thrown from the smoking room onto the scaffolding.
The project area has rich seasonal river system. Quaternary system sediment with pebbles, gravel and sand being the major part is formed because of the transportation of current. Therefore, river channel is also a stable source of natural building materials.
Standardize the management of the assistant company employed by the Company, improve the overall management level of the assistant company, and meet the needs of the rapid development of Haixi Heavy-duty Machinery.
The electrical equipment within the scope of the adjustment test is tested according to the standard.
Know the definition of accidents/incidents of dangerous goods;
Prepare 5-year capacity training plan for railway maintainers;
Therefore, the most commonly-used noise reduction measures for Class-2 highways are considered in the Project. By installing ventilation and sound proof windows for residents with exceeding standards during the mid-operation period, the impact of traffic noise caused by project operation is reduced on sensitive point noise.
Or input and use the serial number corresponding to the code, for example, use the relevant code in the code document if inputting number 1.
f) Each relevant unit shall prepare implementation plans according to the improvement measures put forward by management review, and Quality Management Department shall verify the implementation effect.
Various factors shall be comprehensively considered when there are many routes between origin station and terminal. The best route shall be selected and dwelling station on the route shall be reasonably determined.
4.6.3.6 The original record must be stored for not less than three years after the project completion.
(5) Proofs of debtor-creditor relationship and proofs of change thereto;
(5) Check whether the safety facilities and safety monitoring devices are provided according to relevant requirements, and whether the production and living facilities for operation takeover are ready for use;
As for the development sequence, the logistics industry centered by the bonded logistics and distribution shall, following the principle of "preferential development and rapid breakthrough", form scale, service capability and advantageous type of goods (such as grain, chemical fertilizer, automobile and parts, and daily necessities) in the Starting Area as soon as possible.
Dispatching Center is located at Peshawar East Station in the works.
Flue gas flows from the top to the bottom. There is a φ3200 air inlet at the top of the boiler and a φ2800 air outlet at the side of hopper in the lower part of the boiler.
After the supplier has conducted rework or repair of the non-conforming products, thus meeting the standards of qualification according to regulations, the acceptance will be conducted.
M2 and 1, 2, and 3 interval body and 4, 5, 6 interval entirety (Figure 2)
Granite: Brown grey mixed with a few light white strips, strongly weathered (W3), coarse grain and massive structure; Primarily containing quartz, feldspar and biotite; developed joint faces with ferrugineous ones in partial; short columnar or massive cores, recovery percentage: 90%.
3.1.1.1 The contract and agreement signed and sealed by customer in advance shall be transferred in the sequence below:
2 After the startup, the screen changes into the startup screen and starts the countdown automatically from 29 seconds to 0 seconds.
Continued traction 205kN
2.2 Area, location or devices where accidents may occur
(1) Two or more effective geophysical methods shall be selected based on the difference of physical properties of investigated subject and adjacent media as mutual supplementary and proof; it is recommended that electric method and geological wave method be chosen.
7 Before commissioning of the system, the quality of the transmission aisle shall comply with the requirements of the design documents, the single machine equipment is normal, the system pipeline network has been installed, the equipment software loading is completed, and the data configuration complies with the requirements of the design documents.
(One 6-channel sensor and one 4-channel sensor)
8. The Contractor shall commence works as per the Supervisor's instructions. Construction period: 915 days.
TJS [2010] No. 241 Technical Guide for Construction of Railway Concrete Engineering
In order to further implement the policy of "safety first, precaution crucial", constantly strengthen on-site safety management, conscientiously implement production safety responsibility system, achieve production safety management objectives and ensure the smooth progress of production, the on-site leading group of safety shall carry out the assessment.
In order to prevent equipment on console from obstructing the television wall, it is recommended that the bottom of minor should be 1.2m above ground.
M/s. STOPAQ Company
Table 7; Allowable Deviations of Component Assembly Dimension (mm)
Short-span stiffeners should be anchored into the beam, and the length of the other side of the stiffener not anchored into the beam extending beyond the hole edge is not less than 1.2La.
For floor height less than or equal to 4m, a fixing accessory may be arranged at the middle of the stand pipeline.
The DCTPS is provided with a harmonic processing module.
Response time and sensitivity of train-borne equipment shall comply with the requirements of technical standards in railway industry.
3) Sort data and other materials, submit them for inspection and file them.
The SVF super-virtual switching network virtualizes the box-type switch into a frame switch board, and longitudinally virtualizes the AP into a port. In this way, the entire network is virtualized into one device for management.
Carry out on-site verification according to the set axis and existing drainage and irrigation system. Any inconsistence between culvert position/elevation and design intention should be reported to the Supervising Engineer immediately.
The TBM trailer track uses 43KG rails, with a single rail of 6 meters in length. The gauge is determined according to the size of the trailer structure and extends forward with the progress of tunneling.
16) The instruments installed on the control cabinet door should be connected by soft core cables of appropriate length and specification.
In the drawing, the box girder bottom surface cross slope i is positive with left high and right low, and box girder bottom surface longitudinal slope j is positive for down slope and negative for up slope.
Supervising and guiding the establishment of a professional full-time / part-time fire brigade of the Company, and coordinating the zone defense.
IEC61000-4-3 (RS)
Be responsible for the management of traffic safety, resident OHS of project department;
Make evaluation on the operation of quality management system and put forward improvement decisions and measures for the system.
Main technical standards of railways shall be determined in accordance with the funcation orientation, transport demand, natural conditions along the line and line capacity, etc., and based on technical and economic comparison and selection.
Safety testing for transport machines and maintaining of system, attached safety equipment of transport machines.
New Harbin-Qiqihar Passenger Dedicated Line
2. Various discipline design documents for Lahore Rapid Mass Transit System Orange Line, including main drawings, such as alignment diagram, power supply system diagram, signal layout diagram, etc.
Interior partition wall laying and layout, ceramic tile laying and layout, ceiling layout, door and window joints, waterproofing membrane layout, door and window wrapping and waterproofing, detailed practice of construction expansion joints, sanitary ware positioning, etc.
2. Residuals (oil cloth and residual oil) shall be recovered and disposed as per regulations.
Two-way 11kV power supplies connected locally are provided for power load of the existing Rawalpindi and Peshawar Cantt district stations.
The General Manager of SEI shall approve the QHSE objectives and annual comprehensive plan of SEI.
Handling of the suppliers' misconducts, however, dose not substitute for the penalty for their violation according to the contract.
(1) Examples of safe and civilized construction shall be set; within the area of responsibility for safe and civilized construction, procedure take-over, acceptance, and signing systems shall be carried out. The working face transferred from the previous procedure to the next one must be clean and tidy, and meet acceptance standards.
The project is a section of New Expressway Linking Vang Vieng to Boten, Lao-Chinese Border Project.
The construction contents include: installing football field sprinkler irrigation system, drainage system, laying planting layer, planting natural lawn, laying plastic track, and pre-buried installation of sports equipment.
The best time for melting of pipe end face is extended following increase of heating area. What is important is that flow and radiation energy decreases following increase of wall thickness.
Each discipline shall promptly hand over the working surface of the next discipline, and make written handover records.
To treat the disease of ponding on the bottom of the subgrade of a railway, waterproof and drainage boards were laid on the foundation base and comprehensive treatment was conducted. Good effects were achieved and the normal operation of the line was ensured.
When AC control system receives ventilation command from cab, the AC system on this car will only engage ventilator to operate.
4 Aluminium alloy middle keel ⊥ 32X22X1.3 or 32X23X1.2; the middle-range is equal to the width of sheet material, side keel L35X11X0.75 or L25X25X1.
Table 7-5-2-1 Social Adaptability and Acceptability of the Project
No. 0024382/AD/MINFI/DGD/SDLT1/BPDPV/SVL
Operating temperature: -10℃~+50℃, storage temperature: -20℃~+60℃
Spectrum analyzer, 9kHz~26.5GHz
Rolling stock transducers mainly include voltage transducers, current transducers, speed transducers and pressure transducers.
The government shall provide the subsidies of RMB 2,591,990,000 (discounted value of RMB 877.9 million) to pay off the loans within the 20-year operation period.
(9) Spoil ballast shall be transported to the spoil disposal area instead of being thrown casually.
Brainstorming method - All employees are organized to draw on collective wisdom and absorb all useful ideas, discuss hazards extensively and make judgments.
Including the dormitory, canteen, supplies storage room and recreation room
Train coupling speed ≤5km/h
Passenger station PAS along the line is composed of main control equipment, wireless calling station, CD tune/ cassette, noise detector, power amplifier, loudspeaker and tone controller, etc.
After the grouting operation is completed, enter the "Device Switching" page through the "Monitor Interface". After the device is being switched to the vibrating working mode, enter the "Vibrating Control" page through the "Monitor Interface" switching mode, and control the vibrating process by pressing the corresponding buttons.
Complete set of reducer cooling station (MT41) control box (provided by manufacturer)
Chief Mechanical Engineer of No. 1 Jilin-Tumen-Hunchun Project Department of Defect Control in CTG 1st Bureau
Materials are inspected by means of checking appearance quality, product label, specification and type, product quantity, and reviewing product quality certificate, etc. Inspection and verification records shall be made.
In the past 10 years, international sanctions have led to a sharp decline in the attractiveness of upstream investment in Iran's entire energy sector, hindering Iran's progress towards becoming a major natural gas production and exporting country.
Independent foundation (L*W*H 4*4*2.5m) C30 concrete
Based on the needs of the market economy and competition, and in accordance with the principles of clear responsibilities, reasonable structure, scientific setting, lean personnel, and equal power and responsibility, we make independent decisions on arranging management systems such as key market development, cost, marketing, finance, information, etc., improves decision-making level, adaptability, quality of enterprise, and economic benefits.
2. Delivery time: After the contract is signed and within 7 working days after the Buyer's notice is received, the goods shall arrive at the Shanghai Port Terminal or the domestic port designated by the Buyer.
Article 43 A board meeting can be held only when more than half of the Directors are present.
High-altitude falling, object striking, striking injury, electric shock
Current State of Section at K36+000 – K39+000
(1) The allowable installation deviation for the cast-in-situ structural formwork shall conform to relevant standards.
4.3.1 Plan and organize the collection, analysis, monitoring and evaluation of information about the context of the organization, understand and identify internal and external factors of the context of the organization.
Water consumption for one time fire suppression V=804m³.
After concrete is poured, water shall be sprinkled for curing and gunny bags shall be used for covering at least 7 days. Meanwhile, traffic shall be closed until the concrete strength on both sides of expansion joint device meets the design requirements.
2.2.4.7 Installation and construction scheme of static equipment
The chairman is recommended by Yunnan Xinhuang Investment and Development Co., Ltd. and elected by the board of directors with votes from more than half of the directors. "
According to the reservation requirement, cut a cable protective hose with the proper length and install it on the cable. Insert one end of the hose in the hose connector and tighten the hose connector.
7. The total length of movable guardrails is 171.32m. The spacing between columns can be properly adjusted according to on-site setting out.
Applicant: China Civil Engineering Construction Corporation
Calculation results verify that original design theory meets the design requirement and no severe crack is found even in operating status, so original design does not result in through cracks.
The magnetic pole is composed of two parts: an iron core and a coil. All gaps between the core and the coil are filled with insulating materials, forming an integrated structure.
Safe and necessary lighting shall be provided for each workplace and living space at the construction site.
July 28, 2011 - July 28, 2021
28 reinforcements are used for soil nails, and cement mortar should be used as injecting paste material, whose strength grade should be no less than M15. Appropriate pore-forming methods should be employed in accordance with different strata to ensure the accuracy of pore size and incident angle.
Software requirement specifications and the overall software test specifications shall meet the requirement on the internal consistency.
For plants with multiple products, intermediate products, by-products and parts, material balance sheet shall be adopted to indicate the material amount and the correlations of different parts.
The shaft lighting circuit is led down. A lamp is respectively arranged at 0.5m from the top and bottom of the shaft, a lamp is arranged every 3.0m in the middle. The illumination shall not be less than 50lx, and the lighting double-control switch shall be arranged at the entrance of the equipment room and the elevator on floor 1.
(2) Lightning protection and grounding measures shall be taken in accordance with the lightning classification as well as the specific conditions of buildings. The equipment shall make every possible use of the metal conductor of building structure, and be matched with electrical equipment and other lightning protection measures to form an integrated protection system.
Concealed fixings are used for interior equipment. For example, the display screen and the lamps are fixed on the roof sheet, and all fasteners are not exposed.
1) Detail the general situation of the plant site, transportation and external contacts;
Make use of the log files of operation system or relevant application programs to provide more detailed content.
Be responsible for the inspection, testing and spot check of raw materials on the construction site, inspection of concrete testing bricks and issuance of testing reports;
such as train inspection tracks, un-wheeling and major repair capacity, turn-back capacity of turn-back station, train arrival and departure capacity of entrance and exit depot lines, and train rescue capacity.
Equipment shall be operated and maintained by designated operator. It is not allowed to let others to operate the specifically designated machine tools unless approved by leaders;
Aluminum, the negative electrode material of aluminum-air battery, is the third most abundant element after oxygen and silicon and the most abundant metallic element in the crust. By mass, aluminum makes up 7.57% of the Earth's crust. Oxygen, the reactant on the positive electrode, makes up 21% of air by volume, and it can be used directly everywhere without special preparation.
The main bridge is a V-pier six-span continuous rigid frame bridge with span arrangement of (100+2X180+140+100+60)m, with a total length of 760m.
The Operation Dept. shall inform the Production Dept. of the customer's solution which the latter shall follow. If the issue is solved, the testing is over. If not, the provision of 5.6.1.4 shall be executed.
The pipe rigs shall match with the geological conditions and length of the forpoling rig to ensure smooth drilling.
4. The integrated maintenance section shall perform temporary repair, routine maintenance and watching. The section shall be equipped with a few small-sized maintenance machines.
(16) Safety and civilized construction investigation records and registration book.
Figure 4-3-2-14Curve Chart of Pantograph-Catenary Dynamic Contact Force (Forward-direction Single EMU at 200km/h on Up-traffic Line)
(7) When the permission light of signal device is improperly off, the prohibition light shall be enabled to be automatically turned on.
Every personnel on a station site should be of own responsibility, for example, the shift chief-operator on duty should take charge of nuclear safety management of the unit during the duty, the master-control room operators should undertake unit safety monitoring and operation responsibility, and the safety engineers should beresponsible for independent supervision and evaluation.
9.1.2.1 Ecological Impact Mitigation Measures
<9-1> CL Clay: light yellow, hard plastic; intercalated with thin layers of silt and silty-fine sand, with coarse sand and gravel content of about 5%, of 3-7mm in grain size, uneven, with medium toughness and high dry strength.
To test whether the sendback and rescue function of EMU meets requirements of the evaluation standards.
For cover plate, select 02J331GB10-1
4. Installation of the variable refrigerant volume indoor unit: the distance between the installation location and the top slab shall be 100mm; the dimensions of the supply and return air ducts shall be the same as the equipment connection pipes.
Under the strong support of China Railway Container Transport Co., Ltd, Harbin Railway Bureau increases support for China Railway Express to ensure a highly-accessible transport corridor for China Railway Express.
ATP equipment will monitor error of the train stop position. It will provide protection in case of the error of stop position at station beyond permissible error to prevent the train door and platform screen door from being opened and to give corresponding instructions.
3.7.5 The anti-seismic supports/hangers must be accompanied with the anti-seismic test report, anti-shock test report, anti-slip test report after 2 million fatigue cycles, and nut tensile test report to ensure reliable connection between each connection point.
Be able to check the working condition of boosting oil cylinder and finish the oil recharge.
To date, the general subgrade replacement filling, the soft foundation treatment of bridge, culvert and protection works foundations as well as the increase of protection works for the riverways along the Road have cumulatively resulted in an increase of over RMB 364, 000 in expenses.
The textile and color of all the building decoration materials shall be determined by the architect according to material samples and color card.
Wires #1 and #2: ↑→ or wires #3 or #4: ↑→ ↑→
Based on the research data provided by the project team, the Work Bank conducted research on road maintenance costs in 2006 and 2013.
AD16-22D/G-K AC230V Green
Wuhan-Huanggang /Shanghai-Kunming (Nanchang-Changsha Section)
Upper sandstones has better anti-weathering performance than lower mudstones, so bedrock lithology of side slope ranges from a hard-soft structure from the top to the bottom. In the mudstones and sandstones connection area, steep upper slops and mildly steep lower slopes are typically formed in the wind erosion because of differential weathering.
4.12.1 In case of long-time operation in confined space (such as the cable trench, gas duct, pipe, etc.), be sure to keep good ventilation to prevent the lack of oxygen and suffocation.
The Tenderer, if being determined as the bid winner of Line 1, shall complete the final design and submit the engineering design documents within 8 months after the contract is signed. The submitted engineering design documents shall meet the following requirements:
1 When the slow load-keeping method is used in loading, the settlement of pile top shall be read at 5min, 15min, 30min, 45min and 60min after each stage loading, and further observations at 30min interval.
Songshan ropeway route starts from next station for 1900m in the direction of northeast at first and arrives at former station.
7) Check for the quantity of road demolition and relocation and protective fence
Materials quality requirement: Satisfy the requirement on design and relevant quality standard, in which the installation project must be used with premium brand products;
Charging: For blast holes, continuous charging is adopted by using bamboo chips-bond series φ32mm diameter cartridges. For presplit holes, spaced charging is adopted by using bamboo chips-bond, detonating fuse series φ32mm cartridges;
After driving the EMU to 30km/h by operating the master controller handle, press the constant speed button and confirm that the following indicators are in good condition:
1.2.4 They shall be healthy and able to adapt to the conditions of site work.
For the shield construction in this bid section, we will use three EPB6630mm combined earth balance TBM manufactured by China Railway Construction Heavy Industry Co., Ltd.
Things not to be used should be disposed immediately. Do not let them to occupy the work space.
In recent years, the paper industry in Bangladesh is booming. Several paper production lines have been completed and put into operation, greatly reducing the pressure for domestic paper industry which largely relied on import.
Within one week after the completion of civil model creation; within one week after the completion of electromechanical model creation; and within one week after the completion of decoration model creation
Traffic operation: the average speed of the expressway at rush hour is higher than 60 km/h. The average speed of the central business district is 25 km/h. It is one of the developed cities with the highest speed, much higher than London, Tokyo and Hong Kong.
The optical disk of technical documents to be provided shall be placed a the optical disk cartridge with paper label. The label shall indicate the document No., name, date of submission, signature of submitter and other information.
Adopt hard concrete pavements for all traffic roads and material stack yards at the site, ensuring no dust flying in the air.
All drivers to adhere to site and national speed limits, reinforced by speed limit signage and sanctions for non-compliance.
4. During pouring, the layered thickness and pouring speed should be strictly controlled.
Before installation, on-site location survey shall be conducted in compliance with the design drawing for the electromagnetic sleeper, and identify specific installation position and installation mode.
Our experience in similar highway expansion and reconstruction projects;
The delivery site is the installation site within the station of Luoyang Rail Transit Line 1.
To establish communication channels between the Centralized Alarm System of Operation Control Center and ISCS
(3) Survey data at this stage, relevant documents, design drawings, and quantities of works;
MST transmission equipment at stations, 622 Mbit/s (1+1)
When the speed is V1, withdrawing of the electric braking force is started. Meanwhile, the braking system starts to increase air brake. When the speed V=1.5km/h, the electric braking force is withdrawn completely.
Level: 16bit; it can display 28.1 billion colors
9.1.2.1 Monitoring of customers' feelings may include customers investigation, customers feedback on delivered products and services, customers panel discussions, analysis in market occupancy, customers' praise and claims and feedbacks on other information.
In the rolling process, the surface of the cement-stabilized soil shall always be kept moist.
Construction organization: Plans, organizations, controls and other activities conducted for railway projects from commencement to handover after completion are collectively called construction organization.
Excavation of section in slide should meet the following provisions:
Standard instruments passed the legal verification and are only effective in the service life. Its accuracy meets the national standards. The absolute value of fundamental error shall not exceed 1/3 of that of the instruments to be calibrated.
Among them, the total fund investment before financing (1+3)
For the position of the embedded column at the corner of shear wall, the horizontal bar at its outside shall continuously pass through the corner.
After each case is sent to Lilly, the operation specialist confirms whether he/she has received the confirmation email from Lilly, otherwise he/she needs to confirm the situation with Lilly.
According to the construction period requirements and construction experience of similar projects, the overall construction period is estimated to be 48 months.
Changsha Chengyuan Trucks Supermarket Co.,Ltd.
5.5.3 Each Production Unit shall regularly clear and confirm the effective process documentation, and submit a list to the Process Department for summarizing.
The tenderer shall provide test data and test reports on products subject to various tests.
5.2.6.1 Control center CCTV is based on CCTVs of stations, yards and depots (including main substations) and trains, constituting a complete CCTV together with monitors installed at some areas of control centers.
3) Appearance and geometric dimension inspection requirements of the spherical shell plate
(7) Establish a standing book of safety driving and drivers must fill in safety driving instruction before getting on.
Type Test Report for Charging Box: S3EST000220-8663
3.3 The project management department (inspection) monitors the process from raw material arrival to curing after concrete pouring.
When the surge voltage caused by phase change, switch operation, and load on/off exceeds the threshold of output voltage, the equipment shall be automatically shut down to protect electrical equipment.
Fig. 3-1Schematic Diagram for Layout Plan of Bridge Prefabrication Plant
Check whether the ACSU CAPU indicator "P.Data" is flashing. Verify whether the voice is normally read;
Staff living area shall be intensively established on sheltered and quiet place against the sun which shall be kept a certain distance from the construction site and set a dustproof isolation strip, so as to prevent the pollution of construction on the dormitory and provide a clean environment to the staff.
Square hole key, 100mm flathead screwdriver, ratchet wire cutter, PV1300 hydraulic crimping pliers and supporting stamper, hot-air blower, torque wrench and utility knife
24. Construction machinery or equipment selected by the Bidder during preparing the bid price.
2) Be responsible for issuing the drawings, method statements and process standards in a timely manner to guide the construction and production of the project.
The Project Department shall provide safety facilities, protective articles, safety signs, etc. in accordance with national standards relating to safe and civilized construction to ensure that the accommodation, catering and other living conditions of the subcontractor's personnel meet the sanitation requirements.
Quotation for Test Trains between Chengdu and Bremerhaven
Reconnection locomotive brake cylinder pressure is controlled by (leading locomotive - average tube -) action pipe pressure, which is coordinated with leading locomotive.
Undertake the work of the Engineering Division; assist the Project Management Department to prepare management methods and detailed implementation rules related to the division; prepare the construction organization design; organize engineering technical disclosure and safety technical disclosure
A station shall be generally composed of station hall, platform, equipment management room, pedestrian passage (overpass), etc.
For the failures due to the Buyer, the Seller shall provide both parts for charge and technical consulting service and site repair service for free.
DCU shall be provided with an interface with laptop so as to debug single doors via a laptop.
Boundary mileage of tunnel and road CH480+455
Inspect all the equipment containing storage media before destroy so as to ensure that all the sensitive data or authorized software have been removed or rewritten securely.
Exit chainage of tunnel at CH337+025
3) Fine sand should be used. The particle size shall not exceed 2.5 mm. And the sand shall be screened before using.
The OCS shall satisfy the train operation requirements, and shall be safe, reliable and stable.
Article 17 Party A shall cooperate with Party C to provide Party B with education and training on political thoughts, professional ethics, professional skills, labor safety and health,labour discipline, and relevant rules and regulations.
── The requirements of 4.5, 4.6, 4.7 and 4.8 are modified and the requirements of 4.10, 4.11, 4.12 and 4.13 are added in Chapter 4;
The aluminum profile joints of external aluminum alloy door and window shall be applied with waterproof glue, which shall not affect the appearance; one side of the gap between glass and aluminum alloy shall be filled with weather resistant glue, and the other side shall adopt rubber strip, it is not allowed to use rubber strip for both sides;
3)The training plan for Tenderee`s personnel shall be formulated by the Supplier.
There shall no defects such as lack of bond, over burn and slag inclusion; a few flat spots are allowed: the area of single flat spot shall not exceed 10mm2 and the total area of flat spots shall not exceed 20mm2.
The water surface slope and the flood level elevation are measured on spot by this field investigation.
At the section with good ballast status, there is no need to carry out cleaning and just lift the track directly.
● Operation start-up of PLC/RTU (September 20)
Air leakage rate β for 100 meters: β=0.4%.
a) Before construction, the central point and benchmark of pipeline must be led to the place nearby the operation pit and marked.
In a sparsely populated plateau, the operation of a railway containing a large number of super-long tunnels (tunnel groups) brings a huge challenge to disaster prevention and rescue.
5. Surface reinforcements for connection shall be constructed in the form of xxxxxx where the elevation difference between slab surfaces shall not exceed 30mm.
Opinions about Strengthening Guidance Measures against Terrorism for Foreign Aid Project Personnel (SYF [2005] No. 393 promulgated by the Ministry of Commerce of the People's Republic of China;
Replace: replace with less harmful substances or ways;
The combined control of electric brake and pneumatic brake will not cause any loss of braking force. The switching between electric brake and pneumatic brake can be realized smoothly, and such switching is reversible.
4.23.7.1 Test Results Summary (in respect of contact force, dynamic height difference and vertical acceleration)
The primary voltage waveform of the transformer of the charger shall be measured to get the switching frequency of the charger.
Node input of beam and wall column on the -1st floor and floor live load plan (unit: kN/m2)
4. To optimize network capacity from the perspective of key nodes, feasible strategies to improve transportation capacity of key nodes and optimize public transit network are proposed, and they also serve as reference for increasing the convenience of public transportation.
In case that one party provides a reliable proof to demonstrate that the system equipment is in good condition, the another system interfacing with this system shall be modified;
Code for Design of Cables of Electric Engineering (GB50217-2007) 6.
Figure 6.2-1 Schematic Block Diagram of Process Flow for Horizontal Compression Type Transfer Station
2) The auxiliary roads and crosswise traffic structures shall be reasonably arranged in spirit of the guiding ideology of "green, environmental protection, ecological science and technology, people-oriented, serving local areas", and a green and environmentally friendly mountainous expressway will be built.
The depth to be replaced is 50cm above the origional ground (equivalent to the normal water level at the immersed section).
Except for pipeline with thermal expansion requirements, the arrangement of the equipment shall be considered to be short and straight as much as possible.
The monitoring result of the environmental monitoring center shows that it reaches the discharge standard and has no impact on quality of cement product.
There is a complete record for the test. See relevant test outlines for details.
Data Sheet for Control Box of Sludge Cake Delivery Pump
Conference Venue: Qingdao Conson Haitian Tunnel Hotel
1) Surface materials (cement, aggregates, pigments and dividing strips) shall meet requirements of drawings and relevant standards.
2.8 Guarantee Measures for Finished Product Protection and Secondary Pollution Prevention
When grid voltage fluctuates within the scope of 1000V~2000V/2000V~4000V, the main circuit can work normally, and it is easy to achieve non-contact conversion between traction and electric braking.
Figure 6.9.2.2-5 Three-Dimensional Rendering of Three-Bench Excavation Method with Core Soil Reserved
Raise and lower the designated pantograph according to the test requirements during the operation tests;
1.4 Each railway administration (company) shall be responsible for design, construction, acceptance and maintenance of corresponding 5C device and strengthen construction organization and acceptance to ensure construction safety and quality.
Each set of overhead crossing shall include two sets of suspension droppers. See relevant information in "I Integral Dropper".
(1) Purchased rebars and other raw materials must comply with quality requirement specified in relevant specification;
All winding and iron cores shall be tight and have favorable insulating properties.
The existing trees on banks of rivers, channels and lakes shall be protected. In the greening areas, trees suitable for local habitats (the priority shall be given to local tree species) shall be preferred and shall be planted according to the requirements, and strict management shall be carried out to ensure the survival rate.
21.2.3 System Components and Main Technical Parameters
Provide reliable safety assurance for the implementation of new technologies, processes, materials and equipment used in the project.
10—oil filler cap; 11—vibration damper; 12—engine oil pressure pump; 13—engine oil filter;
5) In case of groundwater, it is necessary to observe and record the water level, measure the initial water level and stable water level, and take water samples for water quality analysis.
Heavy components of evaporate and distill will be collected and delivered to qualified unit as waste liquid for processing.
ANSI & OSHA ----- Code of Occupational Health and Safety Administration, USA
Connection between girder and P14, P15, P18, P19 pier respectively
Prepare the completion acceptance material and organize the self-inspection and preliminary acceptance;
⑤ Masonry shall increase evenly in height of adjacent sections of masonry and daily masonry height shall not exceed 1.2m.
Rockfall falls down and strikes (brakes) structures, passing vehicles and pedestrians
The amount of vertical reinforcement for piers generally has little influence on the ductility of the structure, but it has a significant influence on the resistance and seismic energy consumption.
After demoulded, effective water reserved measures shall be taken to cureing the concrete.
In the painting industry, the paint with low VOC contents shall take the place of other paints, the painting process and equipment shall be improved, and the facilities for VOC collection and treatment shall be constructed.
According to the orthographic projection characteristics, the visibility of overlapped projection points shall be as follows: the front point blocks the rear one, the upper point blocks the lower one, and the left point blocks the right one.
According to the design, the single tamping energy is:3000KN*m.
8.1.2 The construction of tunnels in squeezing surrounding rocks shall be subject to dynamic construction management.
When the goods on the accident site need to be moved for the reason of rescuing, preventing the expansion of the accident and dredging the traffic, the accident department shall make the marks, draw the site diagram and make the written records and carefully save the important trace and physical evidence on the site.
The bank slope is covered with round gravelly soil and cobbly soil, with sporadic bedrock in the groove exposed.
Zhulinguan No.3 Tunnel (K2+890-K3+230)
For instruments with grounding requirements, grounding connection shall be made before testing.
② The actual dimensions of the main body of air conditioner and the sizes of reserved holes shall be reviewed to determine whether the existing reserved holes meet the transportation requirements for the main body of heat pump.
Enter the log interface through the historyin the toolbar or the "history" in the menu bar:
Remark:* -In highway industry, the beginning of cold season is the end of hot season, and the end of cold season is the beginning of hot season.
(2)Each train will be provided with 4 wheelchair areas;
Make armor angles with 1:2 cement mortar at the external corner of the indoor wall surface and column surface and the external corner of the opening. The height of armor angles shall not be less than 2m and the width of each side shall not be less than 50mm.
The distance from the forced ventilation air outlet to the working face shall be less than the effective range of air flow.
With regard to the EPC pricing approaches, Chinese laws have no explicit provisions and do not prohibit the two EPC pricing approaches proposed in the Investigation on EPC Implementation Plan for Hydropower Projects.
According to the keys of documents such as Measures for Completion Acceptance of High-speed Railways (TJS [2012] No.107) and Technical Specifications for Dynamic Acceptance of High-speed Railways (TJS [2013] No.45), the expert group agreed to the dynamic acceptance opinions after review, and customer service facilities met the preliminary acceptance conditions.
For example: actively make a commitment to attach great importance to safety, take the lead in abiding by the rules and regulations, actively receive HSE educations and trainings, take the lead in teaching courses about safety, and organize and take part in HSE system review.
Bill of Quantities for No.3 Bridge at AK1+205.5 Ramp A of Nam Ngum Lake Interchange
For the deep foundation pit support, the key is process control. Once a quality defect appears, it is difficult to correct and remedy.
Workers' living area is in the property management, with supermarkets, laundries and other facilities inside. The access of living area is subject to the access control system and the card for access.
A qualified health certificate for catering staff issued by an authorized occupational health examination institution shall be submitted to the company's medical department for review and recording.
Seal for Tender Result Filling of Construction Project Bidding Management Station of Binhai Hi-tech Industrial Development Zone, Tianjin
The education tax of the project is included in the tax and additional columns in the financial statements.
The pipe diameter of the connecting pipe shall not be less than 100mm when the design has no requirements.
c The fire resisting shutter mounted on evacuation walk should be provided with open and close device on both sides and be capable of automatic and manual mechanical controls.
(2) Improve level of mechanization, employ fewer labors and minimize area of living and welfare buildings to occupy less farmland.
Sewer is set for draining the water from the median separator drainage.
Training estimate shall be submitted jointly by Laos-China Railway Co., Ltd. And cooperating universities, vocational colleges and Railway Bureaus and summarized by Laos-China Railway Co., Ltd.
Portable toilets shall be set for the construction parts far away from the camp and the power house.
1. Asphalt: The asphalt pavement shall be of high-quality grade-A 50# petroleum asphalt for roads, modified with 4.0 SBS for lower surface course and 5.0% SBS for upper and middle surface courses. Each index must conform to the design requirements.
Within the shunting area, if the shunting area has been set before the shunting route request is sent, the shunting request shall be rejected.
Slowly press down the jack so that the channeling machine pressing die rolls the steel pipe evenly.
In addition, the living area shall be equipped with outdoor sports facilities, such as basketball court, badminton court and outdoor fitness equipment.
The surface within the project area is mainly composed of Quaternary Holocene coastal sediments, aeolian deposits, and alluvium, and the underlayer composed of Tertiary Pleistocene sandstone.
Compilation of budget: It supports objective assignment from upper level to lower level and report of budgeted data for approval from lower level to upper level; it also supports flexible budget and rolling budget as well as multi-version budget control.
The process section is mainly composed of furnace front/ furnace rear tension leveler, air cushion furnace, position control unit, stretch bender, tension roller, etc.;
The existing road leading to Jakai is a two-way two-lane road with a road width of 7.8-8.2m;
(5) The aluminum plate system on the surface course of the metal roof shall be designed as an open system. It is suggested to improve and modify the buckle strip design for the glue joint.
As for grouting section and pressure, the depth of Section 1 is 1.5m, that of Section 2 is 2.0m, that of Section 3 is 3m, and that of Section 4 and below is 5m.
If any director is unable to attend the meeting in person for some special reasons, he/she shall review the meeting materials in advance, form a clear opinion, and issue a written authorization to entrust other directors to attend the meeting on his/her behalf.
Related Certificates of Proposed Site Engineer of the Project
When any Gate End Display in a Gate fails, the failure shall not jeopardise the display of the other Gates.
The Demander is entitled to supervise and manage the process of material development, to avoid any schedule variance.
Layout plan of ▽2.100 landing beam
Strictly control design changes and improve the approval procedures for design changes.
Civil Works of New Second Track of Yangpingguan - Ankang Railway
CRRC ZELC will review completeness of the overhaul manual according to the inspection sheet. Besides, the supplier shall submit other documents according to Table 17.
Tear off the insulating tape at the end of earthing wire and completely remove. Clench the end of earthing wire with one hand, and sheathe the wire connector on the earthing wire along its twisting orientation with other hand. Fabricate the other end of earthing wire after inserted in position (the earthing wire shall be seen from observation hole if completely inserted).
c. Define restricted zone, such as zone of fuel pump, explosive magazine, bowlder quarry, bituminous concrete mixing plant and crushing plant.
Based on the principle of professional management and step-by-step responsibility, a perfect information operation maintenance system shall be established, and the technical support of system application and hardware shall be settled in a form of three lines:
3. The thickness of concrete cover for bottom rebars shall be 110mm, and it shall be 70mm for the rest. The position of rebar is measured based on center and the length is measured based on outer dimensions;
The ground wire and the rack shall be well connected, and the grounding resistance shall meet the design requirements.
Supply all the concrete required for K12+946.78-K21+100 section and the entrance section of 2# Tunnel.
[1] Calculation of Small Basin Rainstorm Peak Flood Flow; Science Press; 1978
600*600*1.0MM aluminum alloy pinch plate
Earth fill height at top of slab for the frame (top of crest slab ~ rail base): 4.29m
Based on the safety requirements, the main requirements for the construction work environment are as follows:
3. The existing open channels should be maintained properly and cover slabs shall be erected at the sidewalk, to guarantee the safety of maintenance personnel.
The magnetic suspension can be evenly dispersed to the whole tested surface by hand or automatic equipment.
Guarantor Chengdu Construction Engineering Group Corporation shall sign the Contract of Guaranty on Maximum Line of Credit (GGBZ No. ZH1700000022470-9) with Party B;
③ If the depth of the liquefied soil is not large, the pipeline can be buried in the stable soil below the liquefaction layer;
After the vehicle comes to a standstill, the brake system should automatically exert the braking force that can ensure that the vehicle will not skid on the line with the maximum slope under the condition of crush load.
The project is 1#residential building, the total building area of 1# residential building is 16268.02m2, the building height is 40.80m, the fire resistance level is 2, and the architectural structure is shear wall structure.
1. Put the tops in the pants and fasten the wrist buckle of long-sleeved tops tight;
The RTR-1000 rock mechanics testing system of GCTS Testing Systems was applied for the experiment. The original hydraulic pressure head of the system was replaced with the bearing-type acoustic wave transducer to apply axial compressive force to the rock samples and the maximum axial loading capacity could be up to 430 MPa.
1. Experiment on maintenance and troubleshooting of axle counter;
According to the calculation above, the maximum pull-up force in the concrete pouring process is 750.7 kN. Two carrying pole beams and 2 φ 32 mm finish-rolled threaded bars are provided for anchoring, as shown in Figure 4.3-1.
Ordinary times: (h); Weekends: (h); Statutory holidays : (h);
After the setting-out work is completed, carry out self-inspection on the bulk sample and sample rod (or blanking diagram), and report to special inspectors for inspection after no errors are found.
Table 4.4-13 Statistics of Excessive Noise at Sensitive Points along the Route in the Mid-term Operation of the Project
The manufactured cables shall have neat appearance with no damage, and be qualified in the insulation resistance test.
8) The supply/installation of aluminum plastic composite pipe (PAP) shall refer to the relevant provisions in Shanghai Recommended Standard DBJ/CT503-99.
Only after the concealed works are re-inspected and the acceptance sheet is signed off by the Supervisor can the next working procedure be started.
The Employer commits to pay the Contractor the Contract price as per conditions, time and manner agreed in the Contract.
This course mainly describes the ultrasonic nondestructive rail flaw detection technology. Through the study of this course, students will master the technology of detecting rail flaw detection with the ultrasonic flaw detector and analyzing the rail flaw situation.
Step I: The crawler crane lifts the lower chord of the truss make it excess the column top 50cm.
Silty clay: Brownish grey, planting soil at the depth of 0-0.3m, containing some plant roots; hard plastic at 0.3-1.8m, containing some iron-manganese concretions, core in earth columns or chunks, recovery percentage: 100%.
Frame beam concrete is vibrated by insert vibrator.
Commissioning of computer interlocking system, ≤50 sets of switches
4) Strengthen the cooperation and coordination among the Owner, the Engineer and the Designer.
When EMU straightly passes through testing points of turnouts, the measured maximum vertical wheel-rail force is 85.8kN; When EMU laterally passes through testing points of turnouts, the measured maximum vertical wheel-rail force is 78.1kN.
To receive the second edition of line data, receive the data submission from station yard, road and subgrade disciplines, the architecture discipline and the M&E system discipline will submit data to each other, and complete the second edition of building scheme and disclose the data to the structure discipline.
This section adopts overflow pavement which is 26cm thick with the plate size of 4mX4.5m and C40 concrete rebound strength by measuring.
Measures taken by CCECC on construction progress
Mist spraying devices should be installed at both sides of main roads with horizontal spacing of sprayer not more than 5 m.
② Aggregate shall be discharged on bedding course of the section within the same stockyard from far to near at the distance calculated by Clause 7.3.4 of the Technical Specification for Construction of Highway Pavement Base Course (JTJ 034-2000.
After line snapping, trial arrangement of face bricks shall be carried out with uniform horizontal and vertical joints as required. Unless specified in the drawings, no incomplete bricks shall be used.
According to the requirements of Standards, the company shall establish the documented occupational health and environment management system, combined with its characteristics, and implement, maintain and continuously improve the effectiveness of the system.
Determine nchange system (s) for substructures based on Cl+1
12.2.2 Checking Calculation on Crack Width of Pier under Serviceability Limit State
Interphone shall be provided to command the ground and high-place operation through remote control. If potential safety hazard is found or the operating personnel violate the regulations for safety operation, immediately notice the personnel working at heights until the potential safety hazard is removed.
See the Terms & Abbreviations of TCU Software for HCMT Project for terms and abbreviations.
Combine with the sensor of AQF61.1 for the measurement of enthalpy and absolute humidity
The boiling water heater should be kept clean. It should be cleaned and disinfected regularly, and managed by special personnel.
1.10.4.10 Construction Process and Method of Water Supply and Drainage and Fire Fighting Installation
2800mmX2400mm (width X depth) (1000kg)
Long-term water supply: it is planned to use Dalanping Water Plant (short-term capacity 50,000 m3/d, long-term capacity: 400,000m3/d) as the water supply source, and the water supply mains will be laid along No.4 Dalanping Road, with a planned diameter of DN800; such water supply can meet the water consumption requirement of Dalanping Area and Sandun Island Operation Area by 2025.
Installation of, reserving for and pre-embedding of pipes for water and electricity wells and flue gas outlets, etc. according to the formwork drawing.
It is hereby to send the review comments of our department on the launching system and the bridge accessory structure and landscape work design drawing. Please make reply as soon as possible. Thank you!
│ │ │ EMU Left Track DCZK.zzz
In case of sudden gushing water and emergency drainage, all four water pumps equipped with drainage equipment are started.
Submit the final preliminary design documents to Party A for filing after the self-inspection and the external review of the preliminary design documents.
The depth of the conduit running into the hole must be strictly measured so as to know the distance from the pipe bottom opening to the hole bottom.
The piston shall be used for exhausting the surplus heat from sectional tunnel.
These interdependencies or interactions are hereafter referred to as interfaces and include any aspect of equipment which requires to be taken into account by, or is of concern to, more than one discipline, organization and/or authority.
The stress of the main truss pin roll of form traveler meets the requirements, and the shear strength meets the requirements of 2 times of the safety factor.
(4) The investor enters any voluntary or compulsory insolvency proceeding (unless the proceeding are withdrawn within 90 days after the commencement) or the investor is declared bankrupt by the court or other government agencies; or
15m cast-in-situ box girder + 60m steel box girder + 15m cast-in-situ box girder bridge (alternative scheme)
Streaming mode: Video (2Mbps)
[4] The short-term 5 million tons and long-term 10 million tons are only conservative estimate. The long-term value of a narrow-gauge single-track railway may reach 20 million tons.
It adopts megger to measure the insulation resistance to ground (case) of main circuit >10MΩ and the insulation resistance to ground (case) of control circuit >5MΩ.
In case of failure to establish a emergency management system, 5 points will be deducted; if such system is incomplete or imperfect, 1-2 points will be deducted;
The error for the reserved diameter and depth of the anchor bolt hole is 0~+20mm. The location deviation for the center and diagonal line of the reserved anchor bolt hole shall not be over 10mm.
In particular, after the Xi'an-Shangluo Section of Shanghai-Xi'an Expressway was completed and opened to traffic in August 2012, its concurrency history with the Fuzhou-Yinchuan Expressway was ended and some traffic volume was indirectly attracted to the Shangzhou-Shanyujie Expressway, leading to another growth of traffic volume after five years of the opening of Shangzhou-Shanyujie Expressway.
The groundwater is relatively developed and is mainly replenished by atmospheric precipitation. The groundwater erosion environment of DK0+000~DK0+635 is of H1 grade.
The layout plan of the monitoring points is shown in the following figure.
First measure 200ml and 500ml mud respectively by using measuring cup tapped at both sides, then fill in the hopper 700ml mud after big sand is filtered out by the filter screen and finally mud flows out of the hopper. The time spent in filling up 500ml measuring cup is viscosity of mud measured.
The new 450MHz wireless train dispatching system is composed of dispatching switchboard, monitoring switchboard, station radio set, locomotive radio set, weak field strengthening equipment of optical fiber repeater, antenna, leaky coaxial cable, portable radio set, etc.
Secretary Zhou introduced that our school would implement the one-stop solution of "teachers+training+teaching scheme+culture", to realize the integrated output of the vocational education, high-speed railway technology and culture of China, address the problems of the shortage of local railway talents in Thailand and meet the urgent demands of Thailand for economic and social development.
The plan layout shall be applicable for demands of construction production, with a proper scale, obvious partitions and smooth sequence for easy construction;
Work on the permanent land requisition and temporary land use for construction of the railway within the bid section; Assist the local land department to be responsible for land measurement, policy promotion and treatment, and timely grasp the distribution situation of compensation funds and the treatment of relevant special problems.
4.4 The Engineering Technology Department participates in the identification of first sample article; the suppliers' evaluation and selection; the quality class evaluation of qualified suppliers; the on-site review of suppliers; gives the help to the suppliers if necessary.
Local lighting (with desk) is provided for console, with the illuminance of 500~1000Lx.
Responsible for the construction of fire works in the Muang Xai Construction Management Zone
(1) The following main hazard sources and factors shall be considered for the traction substation works:
B/L N° FEWA058937 IM4 :C 32207, 2017/7/6
Three receiving-departure tracks (including 1 main line) are set at the left side of the main line for the passenger train yard, with the effective length of 680m. One 450mX12mX1.25m basic platform and one 450mX12mX1.25m intermediate platform are set, with the yard site of the station building of 110mX60m.
Train VCU time is not synchronized, leading to confusion of data time downloaded by HMS.
(1) Urban-rail module laminated busbar: It is used in urban railway locomotive project. It is of compact structure and is highly integrated.
Skilled labor force will be used, and quota management and flexible staffing system will be adopted.
Unit: flow velocity (cm/s), flow direction (°)
Tendering inviter: AVIC-INTL Project Engineering Company
It is not only related to traffic safety, but also opposite scenery of sight from passing vehicles.
3. The highway boundary stone is erected every 100m on the right side in the direction as the stake No. increases (on the right side of right carriageway); The hectometer stake is white for its column body and red for its number.
Self-service enquiry through WeChat or Support_E
Loosen the M20 big nut of the nut pair on the mechanism. Adjust the lead screw to make the sealing gap meet 44-45mm. The finger-protective adhesive of upper part is light-proof. Tighten M20 big nut after adjustment.
Table 5-7 Allowable Deviation of Reinforcement Installation and Reinforcement Protection Thickness
The acoustic barriers and baffles on the bridges are designed as supporting parts. The baffle shape and the bridge body shape are designed to be harmonious and unified along the entire line. The baffles are heightened to replace railings. At baffle tops, steel plates are embedded to be column foundation of acoustic barriers or serve as condition for reserving column foundation of acoustic barriers.
11. In the lower part of the vertical wall B, a discharge hole of 100 mm X 150 mm (length X height) shall be set at the place corresponding to the position of the discharge hole on the protective.
2) Low slow-growing trees with small transpiration should be planted in the vacant lot 4 m from the outer edge of the exterior wall foundation of the building.
2. Testing Procedure and Plan of each Equipment in Cabinet
On April 22, 2020, the construction of the decoration works of the second-row villas (Section A) will be started.
2. Paving of polyester non-woven cloth for one time (200g / m2)
(For the items subject to approval according to laws, business activities shall not be carried out before approval is granted by relevant departments)
(2) The quality standards of the construction: the quality score of the bid section project in the acceptance check is 90 points or higher; the quality score for the completion acceptance is 90 points or higher.
External power lines are distributed in many areas, making it difficult to coordinate the construction, which is the main restriction factor for the Project to be opened to traffic.
(1)According to the report of geological survey, geological conditions are appropriate, with (without) a little amount of underground water. When the buried depth of bearing stratum of foundation is smaller than or equal to 6m, open-cut spread foundation or open-cut full-fill foundation should be preferred. When the underground water is abundant and the buried depth of the bearing stratum of foundation is larger than 6m, it is appropriate to adopt bored pile foundation.
The Sri Lanka Railway Freight Tracking System (hereinafter referred to as the Tracking System) is designed to meet the requirements of tracking the progress of parcels and luggage transported on Sri Lanka Railway and the whole process.
12 The Project use lamps of class I, and PE lines are connected to all lamps along with the lighting circuit.
(2) Where it is expected that the incurred cost of service cannot be compensated, the incurred cost of service will be included in current profit or loss and it will not be recognized.
Table 2‑2 Functions of Interface between Air Conditioning Control Subsystem and Intelligent Low Voltage
- Make a brief introduction to the specified personnel about the block hoisting, transporting and setting procedure in the construction scheme
When intake pipe diameter and compressor suction pipe orificedo not match, reducer should be used to connect.
The functional orientation of the general materials storage of Line1 should satisfy the operation needs of each system of Line1 and the factory/un-wheeling repair needs of rolling stock of Line1.
(Total number of documents issued in current month - the number of documents having not being recycled)*100%
The Project Management Department shall establish a management leading group for the construction team, with the Project Manager as the team leader, the deputy production manager as the standing deputy team leader, other deputy managers and chief engineer as the deputy team leaders, and the heads of Engineering Management Department, the General Management Department, the Planning and Finance Department of the Project Management Department as the team members.
Construction Organization Design for
2. Hooks are adopted for connection in Figures 8, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15 and 16. Refer to Figure 5 in Sheet 42 in this Collective Drawings for the specific construction.
It is planned to sell 360,000t sulfur in 2019 and the planned volume is as follows:
5.2.2 The dispatcher shall make the reasonable dispatch according to the order of importance.
1. To reduce the risk of cracking for V leg during the construction period, it is proposed to set a temporary prestress on the top plate and the baseplate of V leg, which can be seen in the attachment. By calculation, provided that the prestress is not removed, stress check calculation of all the main bridge members in the construction stage and operation stage meets the standard requirements. Therefore, the temporary prestress can be kept.
According to the latest development plan of the Government of Rwanda, the Project is one of the key projects in the following few years. The construction of this Project is in line with the development plan of the Government of Rwanda.
In form removal (not demolding), beam concrete strength shall not be lower than 25MPa, and it shall be ensured that the formwork is removed in case that the component edges and corners are complete, and the gusset plate root, partition root and haunch of beam plate do not crack.
EP braking system is an electric-pneumatic direct braking system with microcomputer control and bogie controlled mode. It has functions of load adjustment, braking management, anti-skid control, failure diagnosis, etc.
(5) Temperature: the overall temperature rise is 30 °, the overalltemperature drop is 50 °.
1. Slayed type shall be employed for the wing wall. The open skewness of the wing wall on the plane is about 1:6. The rate of slope for the slope section of the wing wall shall be designed respectively as per 1:1.5 and 1:1.75 side slope of subgrade.
8. Establish a sound and strong logistic support system to relieve the worries of all the construction personnel and execute project construction comfortably.
No bedrock outcrop is observed at this point, where is covered by silty clay from Quaternary alluvial-proluvial and lacustrine deposits.
The damp and heat is required to comply with 11.1.3. The appearance and function inspections of the damp and heat test are required to comply with the provisions of items 1 and 2 of this table.
The main soft soil layers within the design scope are peat soil ( ② - 1 ) and silt - mucky soil ( ② - 2 ), belonging to Quaternary swamp facies strata and the maximum thickness of soft soil is 17.8 m.
(2) The performance is stable; the buffer works though there is a few breakage;
Maximum eccentricity of pier body : 0.9700 (2.3581) m Maximum compressive stress of concrete: 2.660 (15.3400) MPa
The Consortium will formally submit the work plan for review by the Employer 45 days after the contract enters into force.
ODI shall establish HSE management system (if HSE system certification has been obtained , should a copy of the certificate be provided in the tender documents). The implementation of the project shall in accordance with the requirements of the system.
Repair of ground drainage facilities (jointing, crack pouring and plastering)
The power source of each outgoing circuit is led out from copper busbar, and wired with copper OT terminal studs.
Electric single-beam bridge crane, span: 13.5m, lifting weight: 10t, lifting height: 20m
3. An expansion joint should be arranged every 10~20m. Expansion joints shall be filled with asphalt hemp, and shall be 20cm deep into the retaining wall and 2cm wide.
Illumination: Central illumination is ≥100Lx, which is measured at 500mm away from reference axis of the light source surface after 10min when the light is on;
The single-strand core wire may be subject to crimp connection with perforation and jackscrew, or bent into a clockwise small circle bolt and then crimped with a gasket.
TrackDoctor2016SSCopyright(C)2016
Two sets of pumps shared by indoor and outdoor fire hydrant are equipped at the water pump house (Q=50L/s, H=70m), one for operation and one for standby.
The economic internal rate of return (EIRR) of the project is calculated based on foresaid low traffic volume index.
The exchanger is a pipe-type exchanger with vertical structure. The performance and type of the exchanger are shown in the following table:
Minimum color illumination: ≤ 0.03Lux (F=1.2).
Hygienic requirements (Ensure that workers use designated sanitation facilities provided by the Employer rather than open areas).
This document describes the functional test of providing clock signal by communication transmission subsystem to SCADA system, including requirements and preparation before testing and the submission of test procedures and results.
During the construction, clean up the sundries on the surface of the base layer, wash off the oil stains, apply the scratch coat 1 day before, moisten the base layer with no accumulated water.
For battery of which the housing is broken, replace the housing for repair, appropriately safekeep them before repair, do not abandon then at random, report and approve battery scrapping, and transfer them to the Administrative Department and look for a specialized company for handing upon approval.
Use 3‰ longitudinal slope to make water flow into temporary sump, then pump water out and transport water by water truck to reservoir for storage and utilization.
17 Rule of Precautionary Label for Chemicals in Workplace (AQ 3047-2013)
1.2.1.2 The overhaul work is mainly carried out inside the cooling tower, with narrow working space and high safety risks when entering the confined space;
For position responsibilities of internal auditors, refer to "the Regulations on Administration of company's Internal Auditors" HUALU 2043
Yes, the enclosure protection level should be no lower than IP55
(1) Don't distribute priming oil in the weather where the air temperature is lower than 10℃ or strong wind or the raining is approaching.
The entrance has a thin cover of 1.4m thickness, with sharp heading slope and inferior stability. Collapse may occur during construction if treatment or support is not applied in time, and small collapse occurs frequently on the side wall. Groundwater is most bedrock fissure water deeply buried, with small water inflow and yield.
and prevent attackers from using system security flaws to eavesdrop, impersonate, scam, and have other behaviors that may harm valid users.
Employ electric energy quality analyzer to carry out continuous sampling for voltage frequency of input power of power supply panel for 10 minutes; analyze voltage effective value obtained through sampling; record range of voltage fluctuation during test process and compare with input power source voltage range with determined standard value.
The working face of construction in rainy seasons is better not to be too large and the construction shall be performed by sections, areas and stages. Important or special earth filling works is better to be completed before the rainy seasons.
d) Quality Records shall be timely filled in by the personnel taking part in the quality activity, and the complete contents, correct data as well as legible words are required.
(2) The lubricating grease shall be applied to the surface of the section steel pre-buried in the foundation, to facilitate installation and alignment of switchgears.
See specialized method statement for bent frame for herringbone column and ring beam of cooling tower for details.
China Huashi Enterprises Company Limited/ CW1-3 of Mongolia Western Highway Project/ Quality Engineer/ Construction Management
For the adjustment computation of the electro-optical distance measurement trigonometric leveling, the horizontal distance and height difference shall be calculated firstly and the round-trip difference for observations shall be checked during the calculation; the tolerance of such round-trip difference shall be controlled as ±40√D mm (D refers to the horizontal distance of the side for distance measurement, in km) and those exceeding the limit shall be subject to re-measurement.
a. The maximum temperature resistance of the anode plate is not lower than 70 °C, and the maximum sulfuric acid resistance is not less than 200 g/L.
The video monitoring equipment in main substations is purchased and installed by main substations. HD video monitoring cameras are used in the line. Switches are installed in the cabinets of main substation. Switch procurement and installation are in the charge of main substations. Communication interfaces of the main line and interfaces of main substations are arranged at switch port.
Table 7-3-1 Formation of Different Types of Freight Trains in this Project
4.3.4 The dispatcher of the material distribution center under the Material Support Department shall hold the reviewed marker and pick materials from the keeper of the Material Support Department.
Main project Features: participating in expediting and acceptance of CRH380 motor train unit
In terms of the concrete strength grade, the design strength of both Japan projects above is 30MPa.
Economic characteristics of the areas the route passes and their relationship with the construction project;
Excavated rocks shall be processed and broken in accordance with the requirements of unscreened broken stones for base course.
10.2.10 Checklist for main structures and other structures;
Construction wastes will be stored by categories, and recycled as far as possible. Those irrecoverable will be disposed in accordance with the environmental protection requirement.
Take charge of the safety maintenance, inspection and management of special equipment such as boilers, pressure vessels and pressure pipelines, organize, prepare and modify the operating procedures and management systems for gas field equipment, and organize the implementation of those procedures and systems.
3.2.3.11 The sealing protection level of electrical equipment shall not be less than IP54, and the higher standard of design protection (if any special requirements) shall prevail.
4.1.2.6 Check whether the bogie unit brake is working properly and whether the brake shoe is in good condition.
Fails to find a new business place after the resettlement and is temperately unemployed and living off savings.
Cross Section of Inspection pit (at lamp installation hole)
Lighting columns to be erected in a straight line shall be arranged uniformly and the center deviation shall not be greater than 50mm. The ground elevation difference shall not exceed 20mm. In platforms with overhead contact system, lighting columns shall be arranged in the same centerline as the stand columns of the system. When the lamps are installed on the stand columns of the system, the net distance between the outer edge of the lamp and the 27.5KV electrified body shall not be less than 2m.
23 "Wide LCD screen /P232/1920*1080/16:9/1000:1
IIDK147+700.000~983.000, Length: 283m; Left Side Cutting Slope Protected by Bushes or Grasses
4.3 The audit team leader is responsible for preparing the audit implementation plan and internal audit report, organizing the preparation work, controlling the audit process and verifying the corrective measures and effects.
The initial set time of concrete shall be determined according to different part, work quantities of concrete placing, atmospheric temperature, and transportation distance; rationally determining the initial set time will effectively ensure that cold construction slot will not emerge in concrete placing due to traffic jam, block of delivery pump or other unpredictable factors.
Ensuring the fulfillment of laws and regulations related to certification and requirements of relevant product standards;
Video over integrated video monitoring system is carried through data network.
DPG ——Distance from the potential electrode to edge of the tested separate ground electrode;
The contents include: product certification, quality certificates, quantity, specification and model, product identification, product packaging and appearance quality.
●Anti-collision devices for common-rail cranes;
The deputy general manager shall preside over the matters discussed and decided at the general manager's office meeting, and shall report the same to the general manager after the meeting.
As for the banquets with accompany of the Company's leaders and participation of the industrial competent department, business department etc., the expenditure for each table shall not exceed RMB 800 (including the cost of cigarettes and wine).
Furthermore, many outstanding young people join Libeiya every year, keeping our team youthful.
2. The D on page 53 is a clerical error, and we will change it to D'.
The smallest formation of the train is 1 vehicle with the formation mode of -M1*M2- (where, M1 refers to the motor car with cab and pantograph).
6.3.1.5.It shall have empty and loaded car adjustment function.
The whole bogie frame is analyzed and discreted with 10-node units (SOLID92). Constraint equations are applied respectively to establish the connection relationship between the mass centers of the motor, the gearbox and the power collector equipment and their mounting positions, etc.
Hold the head of the pneumatic applicator and hold the handle with right hand to align with the section of profile to be applied with silicone sealant.
The test case specifies every operation step and expected result. The testers implement the test case as per the operation steps of the test case.
1.5.5.2 Availability of Water Sources, Power Supply and Fuels Along Line
Cross recessed countersunk head tapping screws (GB/T 846)
(2). Layout of Indoor Construction Site and Temporary Water and Power Pipelines
The total annual investment in Guangzhou was more than RMB 20 billion, and the total annual investment in Shenzhen, Zhengzhou, Qingdao, Chongqing, Nanjing, Kunming, Xiamen, Shanghai, Changsha and Xi'an was more than RMB 15 billion respectively.
6. Incidents or cases that may damage the image and credit of Party A.
Inspect lights, meters, window wipers, horns, and sand sprayers;
(2) Detail drawing of connecting plate and welding drawing of fixator base.
6. Application targets of infrastructure management information system:
System name: Outdoor Rainwater - Outdoor Rain Pipe Network in the South of Factory Area
Bill of Quantities of DaLong No. 2 Tunnel at DK204+684
To the left of K84+000Yuguo Quarry5 km away from the main line
The vehicle body structure shall be designed taking into consideration anti-collision features, to ensure the safety of the driver's cab and the passenger area.
The immersed section of embankment shall be filled with permeable soil. Terrace on top of the side slope protection shall be arranged according to flow velocity, rate of flow and washing conditions, with the width expected to be no less than 2.0m; gradient of slope under the top of the side slope protection should be eased by one grade, and dry (grouted) rubble, buttress and antiscour slope toe wall can be built to reinforce the protection.
Conduct daily self-inspection (EB test and door test) and report test results to ATS system;
The inner pipe bottom at the starting point of the steel pipe is located at the bottom of haunch and the whole steel pipe should pass through the structure wall body
(10) To initially analyze and evaluate possible foundation types, excavation of underground works and support schemes and control schemes for underground water.
The laboratory will carry out the inspection of raw material performance indicators according to the quantity of mobilized materials according to the relevant specifications, and shall not use it if it is unqualified.
The commander shall stand at a safe position where the operator can see the commanding signal clearly.
The construction of graded sandy gravel subbase course shall be subject to central mixing of central station, with the duration of aging being 2 ~ 3 days.
Structural Drawing of (NS12~NS11) No. B7 Portal Piers
Conduct the "Ankang Cup"supervision and inspection all year round by combining with other safety supervisions and inspections
Xi Jihong, the Chief Engineer, made the report. The attendees agreed in principle to submit the proposal.
Calculating relative humidity outside the air conditioning room in winter%
The deepening design shall strictly follow the national professional construction and acceptance specifications and design specifications.
Overrun with stagger value of grade 2 and above shall be duly confirmed or treated. OCS geometric parameter test with a speed of 60km/h can be performed.
4. A maintenance center is set in the complex building of parking yard and a maintenance area is set for two stations.
In accordance with the bearing dimension and operation mechanism, and the characteristics that the rolling element of the bearing rotates 1 revolution when the wheel rotates 2 revolutions, the vibration and noise of the faulty bearing should be thoroughly and accurately located in case of any defects due to the faults of any part in the bearing. The orientation area of the acoustic sensor is about 6.5m.
Before the commencement of the project, the "on-site work plan" shall be prepared according to the measurement "technical requirements". The technical description and quality control instructions shall be given for the relevant links in the whole process of the project.
250 g 18 swg ON LINE welding flux
Main circuit: AC415V, 50HZ and 3P;
Tensile region y1=h-y2=0.1895m
After the pile cap is constructed, the arch support will be constructed, and after that, the support will be erected to install the arch ribs of the side span and that on the top of arch support. At the same time, the support will be erected at the mid-span to sequentially construct the arch ribs for the steel boxes of each section.
2.1 Optimize Wheel-Rail Relationship and Ensure Good Dynamic Performance
Installation of column stirrup: the stirrup s, made of box iron, should be distanced in 600mm, and the perpendicularity of both sides should be checked by a plumb bob.
In order to prevent the vibration-induced noise, the flexible joints are used to connect the fan coils to the inlet and outlet air ducts.
Compression Type Terminal Lugs and Ferrules with Copper or Aluminum for Power Cables Conductors
11) It shall have enough expansion slots, not less than 4.
The surface of water stopper should be smooth and the shape and dimension should be regular, to ensure that water stoppers have a good water insulation performance and can be smoothly discharged from the tremie.
Carry out tour inspection to the construction process and strengthen on-the-spot supervision to the concealing process of concealed works and the key parts that are difficult to inspect after the completion of next process.
(3) The Consultant may terminate the Contract if the Client fails to pay the consultation service fee as agreed in the Contract and still fails to do pay the same within 28 days after being urged by the Consultant;
4.2.5For operation conditions that may affect vehicle and core electromechanical equipment: the Client shall inform the contractor of any change on equipment and infrastructure immediately.
The grate shall be designed to facilitate the waste turnover and the uniformity arrangement of the wastes on the bed of the hearth.
Existing tunnel defects, involving ballast beds and linings, inlets and drainage outlets, as well as defect remedy history.
Since the container-type quantitative material feeders are adopted, the continuous production can be ensured when works are changing shifts.
2) The integrated grounding terminals for the communication and signaling equipment in bridge deck, subgrade sections shall be reserved on the cable trench walls, and shall be clearly marked.
Comprehensive Department and Coordination Department urge participants to report contract workers' information for visa application and complete relevant procedures as soon as possible.
3. Development trend of scientific and technological innovation for work safety of non-coal mines
Take the 1mm thicker flange of ASEBY.MPF as an example for specific methods for program modification:
After power-on according to different areas, inspect whether the leakage switch of control socket is normal, and use the socket tester to check whether the phase line and zero line of the socket are connected correctly. If not, make records and make adjustment one by one after power-off.
Using frequency control technology can also reduce current impacts during motor startup, eliminate the impact stress of large starting current on motors, transmission systems and the main machine, so as to extend the service life of equipment, and reduce the daily maintenance cost.
Project Name: Tsinghua . Chinese Entrepreneur He'nan Science and Education Base
Chemical fiber; filament; chemical fiber textile materials; strips and the like
The position of connection boxes of embedded protective tubes shall be correct and connection boxes of embedded protective tubes shall be fixed firmly.
According to the conditions when the incident occurs, such as weather, geographical environment and personnel density, determine the method for evacuating people and designate relevant departments to organize people for safe evacuation;
The alignment of girder body is controlled with the computer and special software in pouring of continuous girder cantilever. Take such measures as providing counterweight, arranging solid consolidation in the girder body, providing temporary prestressed tendon and pouring micro-expansive concrete during closure to ensure construction quality of continuous the girder.
b) Be responsible for the internal interfaces in the vehicles and ensure the integrity of the supplied vehicles.
5. Garbage and gas, liquid, solid wastes from construction camp.
Formwork and support with load to bear shall be removed if concrete strength can bear dead weight. Generally, removal can be conducted when beam and slab with span no greater than 4m reach 50% of design concrete grade and beam and slab with span greater than 4m reach 75% of design concrete grade.
The Project is located in Jinnah Photovoltaic Industrial Park, Bahawalpur, Punjab, Pakistan. It covers an area of 4500 acres and has a total scale of 900MW. Upon completion, it will become the largest single photovoltaic power generation project in the world, providing nearly 1.3 billion degrees of clean electricity every year.
Terminals shall have fasteners connecting external conductors, such as spring clamps and fastening bolts. Fasteners shall have self-locking structure and loss prevention function. The requirements on contact pressure and current flowing capacity of conductors at rated current and short-circuit current shall be met.
The recommended allowable basic bearing capacity of fao is 220kPa, and the recommended standard value of friction resistance for soil on the pile side of qik is 80kPa.
Operational Process of PPP Project in China and Key Achievements
Joint bolt should select the common bolt and shall comply with the requirements in existing standards Hexagon Head Bolts (GB/T 5782), Hexagon Nuts, Style 1 (GB/T 6170) and Plain Washers-Grade A (GB/T 97.1).
Fig. 1.2-3 Quality Assurance Organization Chart of the Project
The camp of the construction groups shall be arranged close to the construction site as much as possible.
Bench cut method is one of the most common methods for single track railway tunnel at present.
The face tile itself has hidden damage, and it was not strictly selected in advance.
2) After a standard ASD is fully opened, the passage formed shall be 2400mm wide and the travel distance of each leaf of ASD shall be 1.2m.
⑥ Be responsible for or participate in the implementation of the experimental research projects, and provide experimental research reports in time.
Build the temporary facilities such as reinforcement house according to the requirements of construction plan, and set the fire extinguishing equipment as required.
When the reserved oil tank is in full flow, open the DN50 valve to oil spilling opening on upper side plate and close DN50 valve to reserved oil tank to enable sealing oil to flow into piston oil groove from the oil spilling opening on upper side plate along inner wall of side plate;
(1) Wooden stools, metal supports or scaffolds can be used for indoor plastering operations, but they can only be used after being erected stably and confirmed as qualified after checking. The span of scaffold board must not be more than 2m, the materials stacked on scaffold board must not be too concentrated, and the number of construction workers in the same span must not exceed 2.
Table 6-2 Main Technical Indicators of Comprehensive Pantograph and Catenary Monitor Device
Tunnel-embankment boundary chainage CH368+709
Formwork stripping: They are stripped 24h after concrete pouring (determined according to weather conditions).
The welding position of the frame shall be free of crack or fracture;
f. The relative density of compacted materials shall not be less than 95%.
The Neijiang-Suining Expressway in Sichuan Province is located in the middle of Sichuan Basin. It is a part of the expressway section from Bazhong to Kunming (the 5th planned vertical transport section) in the expressway network planning in the Pan-Pearl River Delta region. It is an important highway connecting northeast Sichuan and southern Sichuan.
Take 50ml of the product and add 2ml test solution of alkaline potassium mercuric iodide into it. Keep it still for 15 minutes. If it colors, the color should not be deeper than that (≤0.00003％) of the control solution prepared by mixing 1.5ml ammonia chloride solution with48ml non-ammonia water and 2ml test solution of alkaline potassium mercuric iodide.
C25 concrete cantilever (buttress) retaining wall
During construction of light steel keel partition walls, various working sections shall ensure that installed items shall not be damaged and electric pipes and devices installed in walls will not be touched, dislocated or damaged.
Fax: 027-51155303 051-55303
This Letter of Authorization is effective from September 1, 2014 to August 31, 2015.
Synthetic brake pads with high friction coefficient are adopted to increase braking force, shorten braking distance and extend the service life of brake pads.
Fig. 3 Overview of Goldwind's Financial Organizational Structure
Balanced line hanging method is advisable, which is to set cable wind rope outside the beam column of outermost axis to avoid the hauling power from busbar installation affecting framework.
The rolling shall not be conducted unless the optimum water content or above has been achieved. If the surface is dry, it should be appropriately watered after stabilization.
Kakul, located in the mountainous area which is 5km away from Abbottabad in the north, is distant from the route position by 9km to the minimum, with altitude of 1300m.
among which 2 are excellent. The excellent rate is 100%. And major divisional works are evaluated as excellent.
Connect QF6 and change the input sequence of three-phase AC power supply. Then the contactor KMS shall be disconnected and the indicator H3 is off.
4) The reinforcing meshes or formworks by welding shall be stable and secure, and will not be loose and deformed when concrete is installed and poured.
For the water quality, refer to Hygienic Standard for Drinking Water (GB5749-2006).
a. Select the correct choke transformer and check the frequency of those with adapter; check whether the appearance of the product is complete;
Measuring meter will be set at the main distribution box to measure public area power consumptions of air conditioners, water pumps, ventilators, elevator and lighting systems respectively for internal audit and it shall be managed by the Owner.
c) Be responsible for implementation of technical transformation (maintenance) projects, non-productive technical transformation (maintenance) projects, small infrastructure projects and retail buying projects of fixed assets of the Group Company;
The hydraulic hammer falls on the pile cap and the pile continues to sink into the earth. When the pile does not sink any more (record the reading of hammer), observe whether the centerlines of the pile and hammer are in a straight line.
- coefficient of steel bars in a bundle, 1.0 is taken for a single steel bar, 0.85 is taken for two in one bundle and 0.7 for three in one bundle;
3 Check the installation status, fixing status and corrosion status of cable troughs on the rail top and on the rail side.
Inject grout pipe again along horizontal joint
Electric machineries and tools should be used for the site, and usage of diesel and petrol machines should be reduced.
Setting time, stability and standard consistency GB1346-2001 Testing Method for Water Consumption, Setting Time and Stability of Cement at Standard Consistency
Project Engineering Department shall dispatch and arrange production groups and personnel for accessory production for MKD-ELOCO Project according to manufacturing process for MKD-ELOCO Project; and shall organize transfer and delivery.
4. The price of the Contract is FCFA one billion four hundred and forty-eight million six hundred and eleven thousand four hundred and seventeen (1,448,611,417) excluding value added tax, and is FCFA one billion seven hundred and nine million three hundred and sixty-one thousand four hundred and seventy-two (1,709,361,472) (including tax).
We will provide training for following equipment and sub-systems for Ticketing System:
Document No. PIG059-81-009 DocumentName Operation Instructions to Mounting of Wall Panels_
Working performance:1. formulate project safety precautions and implement safe responsibility system.
a. The power cabinet shall be resistant to dust, water drop, salt-spray corrosion, moist, mildew, insects and rodents. In addition, it is able to sustain the temperature of a designated location and the vibration of support structure.
19.9.2 The identification shall be performed based on the quality inspection plan or clearly stated regulations.
The implementation of the Project will improve the main skeleton connecting the TAH Network in Nigeria, enhance the network structure of the TAH Network and CEDEAO Highway Network,.
2. Model and specification: WSAP_x000D_
9. Before construction of the bridge, the bridge site must be investigated ti check whether there are underground pipelines, optical cables and cables, and they shall not be damaged during construction.
5.3.2 The excavation of foundation pit for water tower shall meet the following requirements:
Based on the flue gas control mode above, three relatively safe firefighting routes are available:
(2) Equipment and pipelines above the ceiling have been properly placed;
Complete inspection for data space, log and program running state of system, and disk space and running state of server, as well as periodic backup of database and program files.
(4) Materials or services under procurement: Preliminary Market Development Consultation Services Regarding Electric Power EPC Project in Laos
Beige red epoxy primer (RAL3012)
Through economic analysis, the FIRR of the incremental investment of the Project is 14.54%, and the payback period of the incremental investment is 7.89 years, which has good economic benefits.
Party B shall guarantee that one third of Chinese personnels have international experience.
16.6.4 Coordination with the Designer
The route in this zone is on both sides of the river. Landform there has great undulation. The valley is narrow but some places are wide. Most places take a V-shape form. The river terrace is plain. Some places are on the mountain slope which has a gradient. The mountain is steep.
4) Operators shall conduct visual inspection before each shift.
The fire main is laid overhead along the tunnel wall and is 1.8m away from the ground; the connecting pipe of fire hydrant is made of hot-dip galvanized steel tubes with a diameter of DN150; the fire pipe is laid underground in the area beyond the tunnel portal and a fire hydrant is installed in the area 55m away from the tunnel portal.
1. Injection molding materialcolorshall refer to thesample plate to produce, and obvious differences are not allowed. 2.Product surface shall be free from whitening, injury, dragging marks, and other badphenomenon; 2.3. Surface sink, stress marks shall refer to the sample. 4. Productproduct side wall deformation is small≤0.2MM
(1) Within 28 days after the signing of the Contract, Party A shall pay 20% of the design costs to Party B as the advance payment;
4 Test records of all the quality control indexes and summary documents of quality inspections.
Uplink Frequency (885MHz-889MHz) Frequency of Existing Signal
The subway train of this project is of 750V three-track current collection. Basically, 5-carriage marshalling is applied to a train, as per =Tc-M-M-M-Tc= configuration. Fastest running speed of a train is 80km/h and traction system features bogie-control mode.
The Client shall inform the Consultant in writing of the name and scope of authority of the Client's Representative within 7 days after the signing of the Contract by both parties.
The sellers shall provide the list and quantities of wear parts and attached accessories in warranty period to meet normal operation requirements for the equipment, and special tools and test instruments shall be covered in attached accessories.
Filling oil TELLUS SI00
3.1.3 When FRP/PVC pipes and metal pipes are laid together, they shall be laid under or at the sides of the metal pipes, and shall not be installed near the heat source with temperature greater than 80ºC (in addition to the one with protective measures)
Based on the following interchange route drawing, the route of start and finish point for each interchange ramp plan route is restrained or controlled by other ramps or surface features.
Article 18 The legal representatives of the Company shall be determined by the Company's shareholder, who shall be acted by the Executive Director of the Company.
For gas welding, the distance between the oxygen cylinder and acetylene cylinder should be more than 5 m. The acetylene cylinder should be placed uprightly. In addition, tempering devices should be installed.
The touch screen is set on the automatic ticket vending machine and passengers is able to get tips on fare by simply touching of their destination station.
Website of Enterprise Credit Information Publicity System:http://xygs.gsaic.gov.cn under the supervision of State Administration for Industry and Commerce of the People's Republic of China
There will be a large number of discipline construction teams working at the same time in the later period of the Project, which is likely to lead to a chaotic situation of mutual interference and restriction.
Design principles of animal passage – the size and type of passage shall be determined according to the contours of animals and their population size based on the field investigation and the data collection from local environmental protection department.
Train fault is displayed; displayed fault location, car No. and car pantograph state are correct.
3.4 Smart Air Conditioner Project (Annual Output: 600,000)
Qualified employees: accounting for about 85% of all employees;
8. In January 2016, won the title of "Advanced Collective" of Harbin-Jiamusi Railway in 2015;
The management of all levels, technical and administrative personnel, and operating workers of the Company must conscientiously implement the provisions of the quality management system documents to ensure the continuity and effectiveness of the quality management system.
3.3.1.1 Remove the bearing covers and top tiles.
6) After cable laying is completed, sundries shall be removed in time.
During the progress of pouring underwater concrete, a special person should be appointed to measure the concrete height and pipe embedment depth and complete the underwater concrete pouring record.
The result of the assess tool is lower than the safety standard of the Utilities classification.
To facilitate rotational use, the formwork shall be of a tool type. During formwork erection, the cup formwork shall be securely fixed.
The gravel cushion layer under the stone masonry shall be carried out simultaneously with the stone masonry, and cushioning is carried out as laying of stones.
h) Class V surrounding rock in 724 ~ 752.6m tunnel outlet section
Voltage range: 0-10 V(4 1/2-digit display);
It is proposed to set up the mixing station and the prefabrication yard in the same place.
1. Respectively simulate the braking self-inspection and output information of other 5 trains according to the above-mentioned sequences.
Test medium: NaCl (sodium chloride ), pH value:6.5~7.2, liquid concentration:(50±5)g/L, test temperature: 35±2℃; lasting atomizing time: 24h.
According to detection results of OCS operation car TY64014 on November 13, 2017, there is no over-limit of hard spot and contact wire height difference within a span of main line of Dawanle~NAGAD single track section (K666+944~K744+844) of Addis Ababa-Djibouti Railway.
(3) For the main connection, the distance from the centerline of couplers fixing putlog (or ledger), cross brace, transverse support and the like to the main connection shall not be greater than 150mm.
According to the meeting results of the CPC Committee of Subordinate Office of Yunnan Water Conservancy Bureau on December 26, 1997, it is hereby agreed to change the original name into: the "CPC Committee of Yunnan Water Resource and Hydropower Engineering Co., Ltd.".
4.12 Construction of reinforced concrete cast-in-situ staircase.
The layout principle of the bearing is as follows: one intermediate pier of continuous beam is provided with a pot fixed bearing, one intermediate pier is equipped with a pot one-way movable bearing, and the piers on both ends are one-way and two-way pot bearings.
The speed of the escalator is designed as per 0.5m/s, the step width is 1,000mm, the horizontal movement distance of guiding section at the entrance and exit for going up or down is 1,200mm, and the number of horizontal steps is not less than 3.
10.2.2 In case of a cross-regional sales of products of C series (including 6CD, 6CL, 6CA and 8CL), the region manager will be assessed for 10000 yuan per set.
Open the cooling water inlet valve of the cooler of the closed cooling water pumpA (B) of #3 unit.
Influence of material for fixtures, joints and decorations on fire.
The organization chart is shown in Figure 5.1.1-1.
Research expenditure incurred is included into current profits and losses; development expenditure is capitalized upon meeting conditions for the recognition of intangible assets.
A new receiving-departure track is provided at the station and rehabilitation is performed for the existing receiving-departure track.
When the concrete pouring is completed, after concrete shrinkage, the team should cover it and sprinkle water on the concrete surface for curing.
For domestic corridors, the rapid container train corridors connecting Chengdu with 14 coastal and border cities (i.e., Shanghai, Shenzhen, Guangzhou, Nanning, Kunming, Wuhan, Rizhao, Tianjin, Luzhou, Xiamen, Ningbo, Qingdao, Qinzhou and Panzhihua) have been put into operation.
d)Prepare a Risk Treatment Plan to determine appropriate management actions, responsibilities and the priority of security control actions;
The records for the verification of design and development as well as for the measures adopted after verification shall be established and saved.
Chapter 7 Scope of Main Works for Various Technical Equipment
Figure 1-3 Investigation of Affected Communities and Residents by External Monitoring Personnel
Construction Organization Design of Downstream Public Traffic Bridges and Access Roads
Plan of Lightning Protection and Grounding for Roofs of 30#, 31# and 34#
It can be seen from the calculation of energy consumption in last chapter that energy consumption in the Project is dominated by gas, with water as energy-consumed medium.
(2) The height difference between finger plates, and between finger plate and beam surface is over limit due to error in the embedment of finger plate base and the surface finishing of beam surface concrete.
During the project production, manufacture, assembly and hoisting, the detailed protective measures shall be prepared for the finished products and semi-finished products to prevent from deformation and damage of surface paint. Therefore, the following protective measures for finished works shall be taken.
It is considered that under the condition of applying scheduled preventive maintenance system for rolling stocks of the overall Nigeria Rail Mass Transit Project; status-based repair is applied for partial qualified system and parts (such as braking and control system) and online repair is applied for low-grade maintenance program to improve the utilization rate of rolling stock and decrease maintenance cost.
Most of the iron ores crop out of the ground surface and strip mining can be performed to part of them. Mining recovery is 85%.
The Concept Master Plan for LFTZ has been completed, and the development of LFTZ is proposed to be undertaken in the following phases:
Data calculation method: During the assessment period, the dust emission concentration of the chimney in the tapping process will be detected and the average value of the emission concentration will be taken as the assessment value.
Fender pile is set for OCS tower in adjacent road.
Only that individuals and organizations at all levels undertake own responsibility cantruly realize safety!
And flame-retardant or fire-resistant control cables and wires are adopted, which require reliable quality.
After the life tests, the operating force test shall be applied to the switches of drainage fittings. The test result shall be within ±20% and meet the requirements of sealing performance.
Normally, the diameter shall not exceed 3‰ of the pile body with the maximum less than 50mm.
① Cleaning the surface of the lower course: manually cooperate with a blower driven by an air compressor to thoroughly blow and clean the surface to make it a tightly clean surface free of dust and adhesive materials, to prepare for applying the prime coat.
Live load is the characteristic value of construction load and the load generated when vibrating the concrete.
B represents: power-operated derusting (till ST3); two layers of epoxy iron red primer (the dry film thickness of each painting is 40 micron).
The left diagram shows the minimum equilibrating force required by tunnel face under the conditions, without taking tunnel face bolts into account. It can be seen that tunnel face support force has a linear decrement relation with cohesive force. Tunnel face support force decreases, as cohesive force increases.
The rail head shall be ground, and the grinding length at both sides shall not be less than 700mm, especially the rail web and the outer contour of the welding head, and the quality shall be that metallic luster appears.
The following work points will be selected for the test of turnout dynamic performance.
To Laos - China Power Investment Company Limited,:
PLC control system is placed in the sintering and circular cooling master control room and will complete the operation and control works in the room.
Execution results of positional operation, transposition operation, single lock, single unlock, single blocking, single unblocking, switch split, etc. are correct.
4. Participate in planning work for danger source identification, risk assessment and risk control of the Project Department;
1. Social Security Number (SSN): Chinese citizen's SSN is the ID number, while the foreign citizen's SSN is the passport number or the Resident Permit Number.
The construction of the line will effectively improve the transportation conditions here, and provide a rapid and convenient high-capacity channel for goods collection and distribution here.
9.5 Work Safety Organization Setup and Staffing
(2) After signal clearing, if there is no train in the approach section, disconnect the stick circuit formed via 1-2 coil and energize JYJ circuit via 3-4 coil.
The formwork can be removed when the concrete strength can ensure the surface and the edges are not be damaged due to the removal of the formwork (generally, when the strength of concrete reaches 1.2MPa).
Curves in spigot and socket joint pipe may be formed by opening the joint.
The Construction Manager, the Technical Quality Manager for construction and discipline engineers shall be responsible for inspection, review, acceptance and compilation of the technical documents for completion submitted by construction sub-contractors in accordance with the requirements of the Regulations on Management of Technical Documents for Project Completion (P-CM061001C).
The lower part of the foundation pit shall be backfilled with original soil and tamped to the depth 150mm below the subgrade surface, and then concrete shall be poured to make the surface flush with the subgrade surface.
When the freight transport price is raised to RMB 0.40/tkm and RMB 0.80/tkm, the financial situation is improved.
Stockpiles of excavated soil should be braced by straw sacks or fences.
10.4.7.5.3 Construction Method
(C) IN CASES WHERE BOTH CONDITIONS (A) AND (B) APPLY, THE LAP LENGTH SHOULD BE INCREASED BY A FACTOR OF 2.0.
In order to ensure the project quality, ifnecessary, the contractor shall increase the inspection frequency.
Hazard sources shall be identified with reference to the List of Common Hazard Sources of the Company, in combination with the actual conditions in the construction management process of the Project.
Max-Dx, Max-Dy: The maximum displacement between floors in directions X and Y
2) Be responsible for investigating and evaluating suppliers, and carry out supervision, inspection, control and management on them.
The welding rod quality certificate includes the chemical composition and mechanical properties of the deposited metal.
(3) Workers of other disciplines must not damage or move switches and sockets during construction.
Railway Applications-Acoustics-Measurement of Noise Emitted by Railbound Vehicles
(5) Base and subbase construction team: 1 shift for the subbase construction, responsible for the construction of subbase in the whole county; 2 shifts for the base construction, respectively responsible for the construction of upper base and lower base in the whole county.
When one power module fails, the other power module can ensure that the normal operation of the two carrier waves on the base station isn't affected.
2. The subgrade in the section is formed by filling and cutting, with stable substrate.
Front axle assembly-left (3000D-010C)
Construction of Power Supply Project for Laos-China Railway (Package 1) Construction Organization Design
The friction plate must be subject to shot blasting (oil and paint are forbidden) and quenching and tempering.
As for the steel pipe of ASTM standard, the sectional form of groove can be seen in ASTM E213 Drawing 2(B), depth of artificial defect is 5% of wall thickness but it shall be no more 1mm.
Silty sand and fine sand (Q4al+pl): grayish yellow and steel gray, distributed on the bank slope and riverbed.
On the basis of ensuring safety, all personnel shall work hard to improve the operating efficiency and the maintenance skill. New technologies, new materials, new processes and new equipment shall be used to keep improving the technical status of the contact line system.
Coordinate of each pile foundation in the horizontal-vertical direction of bridge is: -1.7, 1.7,-1.7, 1.7,-1.7, 1.7
By making full use of the advantages of Port of Ningbo-Zhoushan in terms of supply guarantee and resources, and by means of fixed-point, quantitative and priced transport and diversified business operations, we will better resist fluctuations in the transport market and fully exploit the cost space of transport prices, thus achieving the goal of "stabilized transport routes and stabilized supply of goods for customers".
B. Spherical compensator should be sealed properly and torque should meet the requirements in design documents.
Strake is a wheel part which directly rolls on the track.
It is applicable to the management of customers' or external suppliers' property in the process of Company product realization.
Support the united front of non-party personage and members to participate in activities related to the united front, and play an active role;
In order to ensure physical quality of project and to control water loss and soil erosion, Beijing OASIS Environment Protection Technology Co., Ltd. is authorized to monitor waterloss and soil erosion and environmental protection.
2.5 Boiler Safety Technical Supervision Administration Regulation (TSG G0001-2012)
Routine tests should be carried out according to the approved supplier's test program.
Hardware configuration principles (including mainframe, memory, network equipment, terminal equipment and other external equipment, etc.)
9.2.5 During design liaison, the equipment manufacturing factories within the supply scope of the Tenderer will be visited as required, with the cost included in the tender sum.
The Tenderee has the right to decide whether additional important boards are required or not.
The total length of the cast-in-place parts of guideway beam of 1 # structural section is 79960mm with 12 beam joints.
Sign surface shall be protected by soft cushioning material to avoid scratch and other damage during handling.
The water seal height of floor drain shall be not less than 50 mm, and the surface of floor drain shall be 10 mm lower than the design surface.
The underlying bedrock is of purplish grey thin-layer siltstone containing gravels mixed with mudstone.
Remarks: ambient temperature ( ); temperature of water for test purpose ( ).
No passengers shall be carried during the no-load trial operation. The Buyer shall organize and manage various operation drills and equipment tests. The Seller shall ensure the normal operation of the system.
The automatic repairing function can repair the registry modified by the virus, ensure the safety of the user system and carry out centralized management;
There are computers and accessories suitable for conducting business activities;
Lower layer of 60-thick medium-grain dense-grade asphalt concrete (AC-20)
c. During the construction of graded crushed stone course, the following provisions shall be followed:
(5) The low-voltage power supply for construction is connected as a three-phase five-wire system. The grounding wire of the power supply is led into the construction area through the cable. All conductive metal shells of power consumers must be reliably connected to the grounding grid.
1. Name; 2. Material; 3. Specification; 4. Wiring form; 5. Laying part or wiring system
0.05 (K0~K53+100), 0.10 (K53+100~End)
Be suitable for Grade Ⅴ ~ Ⅵ surrounding rock in the tunnel, breaking section of surrounding rock at all levels and underground water development section.
The volume of water tank and model of fire pump will be determined after calculation. Water tanks are set at main fire control points.
8. For unspecified matters, both parties may sign a supplementary agreement through negotiation according to the need.
Check whether the cable is well protected during wire arrangement and connecting; wire arrangement radian meets process requirement; the opening of mesh grid is tied and tie is correctly cut as per requirement;
2.4 Fraud: it refers to any act or omission, including misrepresentation (i.e., misguiding in spite of knowing the facts or by disregarding the facts), or attempting to mislead a party to obtain financial or other benefits or avoid obligations.
4.1.3 HRB400 and HPB300 reinforcement is adoptable for ordinary reinforced concrete, reinforcement in shotcrete and rock bolt support structure, and non-prestressed reinforcement in prestressed concrete structure. Prestressed strands, wires and finish rolling deformed bars should be adopted as prestressed reinforcement of the prestressed concrete structure.
Table 5-4-2 Designed Carrying Capacity and Transport Capacity
GB/T 24338.4-2009 Railway Applications – Electromagnetic Compatibility – Part 3-2: Rolling Stock - Apparatus
Supervise and improve the project management office, implement an intra-agency financial management system, and conduct financial audit as per agreed schedule;
Application limit of carbon brush: 30 mm
④ Crack along masonry joint, L=6m, width δ=1mm
Holes reserved after the original pipelines are removed shall be backfilled with pure soil. The foundation shall be reinforced.
Digital Vernier caliper 0-150MM 91511
Crushed stone, within 31.5 (high performance concrete)
Figure 6-10 Resettlement Community of Shuilijiayuan Community
The pipe adopts tapping sleeve method at the connector and the inner wall of the nozzle shall be polished into a round type to prevent the conductor wire from being damaged when threading through the pipe.
This Standard is applicable to the whole process of before sales, in sales and after sales service for products.
4.3.1 After submission of bid documents, if modification or revocation of bid documents is required, the Bidder shall sign, seal and apply to the Employer in writing before the specified bid deadline, and modify and revoke only after the Employer's written permission.
(8)Special agreement on loss incurred during approval and waiting for subsidies
-Use HV electrical testing rod to check whether the sockets for D1 car left and right, M car and D2 car shed supply have no high voltage;
Name: Yang Yingchun Title: Deputy Project Manager.
According to the geological investigation, groundwater at the site is highly corrosive to concrete and steel products.
6. The exposed iron pieces must be derusted coated with anti-rust paint, and two layers of topcoat, and require regular maintenance.
1. The Sales Manager contacts with vehicles for loading in the Plant.
Energy-saving calculation of water supply and drainage system before and after the ECA is in the following table:
--Delete selection of button "Compressor 1" and click enter key.
The costs incurred therefore shall be born by the Contractor.
The passenger volume is composed of two parts: (1) the cross-border passenger traffic volume between China and the five ASEAN countries (those between Laos and China, between China and Thailand or Cambodia or Malaysia or Singapore passing through Laos); (2) the local passenger volume from lineside residents, inter-city traveler exchanges.
Project management is a dynamic process, and the communication and coordination are essential;
The shop repair is to check and repair the vehicle thoroughly to make the parts meet the requirements of the shop repair regulations, so as to restore the basic performance of the vehicle.
5) Wall screeding: Use the same cement mortar as the plastering layer for screeding and determine the number of screeding strips (5cm wide typically) according to the length and height of the room. Screeding can be performed with either cross strips or vertical strips.
According to EN1992-1-1:2004, Clause 3.1.7, in the case of ultimate bearing capacity, the interface stress distribution is shown in Figure 4-6.
Response Table of CSR Sifang for 10.4 Electric Heater (Part)
Special Seal for Contract of Schneider Electric (China) Co., Ltd. (Seal)
DCT 110-F, equipped with DPS 05 pre-separator, with self-cleaning function
Turn on combustion-supporting blowers and open air regulating valves in each section and manual air butterfly valves in front of burners in each section with opening ≤ 30%. After purging the furnace with air for 10 minutes, close the manual butterfly valve (air purge is used for blowing away the gas in the furnace that might leak), then turn off the combustion-supporting blower.
Prepare for itemized construction, make technical and safety clarification timely, and guarantee the quality and safety so as to guarantee the progress.
10. The bearing capacity of foundation pits should be for 120 KPa, and the maximum underground water level should be 1.0 m above the pit bottom slab.
When the main elements that belong to the moving part of turnout are detected, they shall be converted from one end of physical position to the other end in action.
For the viaduct, the indicator can be placed at the guard rails on both sides of the bridge. The indicator in the tunnel can be installed on the tunnel wall.
Bridge section of the whole line: the steel column foundation on the bridge is widened with the pier top cap and anchor bolts are reserved.
Table 5-2Percentage of Traffic Consumption to Total Household Income
The upper bound theorem can be described as that the limit load is the lowest among all the loads corresponding with the kinetically allowable plastic deformation displacement velocity field.
In the Shanghai Project, the engineering vehicle is designed to have two steering systems for combined use on the highway and railway.
3. Proposals on the Comprehensive Development of Lands along the Line
Too much dust on the evaporation front filter will reduce the indoor ventilation quantity from side and decrease cooling capacity, so it is suggested to carry out regular cleaning.
Gravel soil deposit appears at the inlet (V=5.0m³); the joint between culvert body and wing wall suffers cracking (L=1.7X2m).
174 sets of locomotives (220 set-units) including HXD1、HXD1B、HXD1C series were maintained in 2012, increasing by 119 sets over the same period of last year. Currently the company has an annual maintenance capacity of 300 set-units.
17.6 The quality standards of the works shall meet the requirements of the contract, the design documents and the requirements of the current state, industry standards and requirements.
Table 3-2 Table of Water Consumption and Sewage Quantity in Jiangche Station
Assemble the first segment of column with upper and lower part of shoe beam. Perform welding after adjustment.
The key points of first-aid are quick action, and rescue with suitable method.
(3) The intensive mixing of cement stabilized macadam should be conform to the following regulations:
Strengthen the safety education on thoughts as well as laws and regulations.
The applicants entering the second-round negotiation must provide the documents of selection and employment affixed with authorized signature and seal.
8.1.14.2 Telecommunication
Information of the main management personnel and technical personnel of the Supplier shall be submitted to the Purchaser for verification. For the personnel of special work types for which work permit is required by the nation, qualification certificates list shall be submitted to the Purchaser and the information such as person's name, serial numbers of the qualification certificates, test items, expiration date of the qualifications and issuing units shall be indicated on the list.
Article 8.3.1 of the Hygienic Standards for the Design of Industrial Enterprises
If the second analysis stills fails, it determines that chemical composition of the alloy manufactured in the smelting furnace is unqualified.
Meeting Minute Related to Pakistan Onboard Signal Control Mode 2013.07.31
Shift the main controller from "emergency" position to "P1" position to perform traction slowly (at a speed lower than 2 kg/h) and stop the vehicle after the coupler is disconnected.
The poisoned person have such symptoms within 30 min~3h in the incubation period: cyanoderma of oral lips, nails and the whole skin; dyspnea complicated by dizziness, headache, nausea, emesis, rapid heartbeat; tachypnea; in some cases, coma, loss of consciousness, convulsion and death from respiratory failure.
Firefighting pond is provided with overflow pipes and drainage facilities to indirectly drain water to the rainwater ditch at the site.
3.3.1 18 years old and above (those transferring from other posts shall be below 45 years old with senior middle school education degree and above); hard-working and responsible; physically health with no such diseases or physiological defects as to hinder undertaking of special operations.
Table 1 Inspection of Non-metal Sealing Elements (Nitrile Rubber and Polytetrafluoroethylene)
The technical director of the project shall organize repetition survey with a precision meeting the related requirements. If the error exceeds the allowable scope, report to the Employer and Engineer timely.
6) Tolerance: The railing height tolerance is ±20mm; the railing line is ±20mm in the plane; the tolerance to the straight shaft shall be the one on the railing top ±20mm.
SNNP is located in the southwest of Ethiopia, bordering South Sudan in the west and Kenya in the south and being the site of the Awasa Industrial Park.
Vehicle traction and braking release shall be prohibited when the vehicle safety circuit has not been established.
If tension length is shorter than 750m, termination device for automatic compensation of tension should be set one end of anchor section, and uncompensated termination device should be set at the other end.
The connection of piping and equipment shall be of sanitary type clamp connection or sanitary type flange connection.
(2) Careful planning, detailed deployment
Integral grounding shall be applied to communication devices. The integral grounding resistance shall be not greater than 1Ω in a year. Resistance of protection grounding of separately-grounded outdoor grounding body and lightning protection grounding shall be not greater than 10Ω in a year.
Therefore, the two shafts of the trailing bogie drive the track dynamic stabilizer to run at a high speed with the maximum traction of 73.3kN.
The cleanliness of components was inspected as a key area with reference to the Briefing of the Bushing Division on the Internal Process Control in May 2014, and it was found that unclean porcelain pieces were described in the briefing.
*CPU: ≥ 2 CPUs, main frequency ≥2.2GHz, physical core ≥24 cores; network: two Intel Gigabit network cards
We shall organize each discipline to submit the Operation and Maintenance Manual prepared and collated to the Employer one week before handowver of the Project.
The pure tuff is used as the overlay material of pavement in a creative way, thus the local abundant natural materials are utilized by adjusting measures to local conditions. The shortage problem of 2.4 million m3 filling materials for the about 50 km long flooded area has been solved and the material expense of about RMB 480 million has been saved.
9. The position of roof VRF outdoor unit is adjusted.
Adjust the length of pan stop rod to keep the guide bar bracket under the contact strip level at 1.5m.
The construction scope of new OCS is from Boten (included) to South Vientiane (included), DK0+000 - D1K413+600, including relevant auxiliary works in Vientiane area. The construction length of the main track is 414.332km.
The existing station buildings shall be maintained and reconstructed, with the reconstruction area of 150m2 per station and 4500m2 in total.
CR5, in accordance with the compliance policy documents, revised the employee manual, formulated the compliance manual, determined the code of conduct for employees, promoted the publicizing and implementation of the compliance policy and the cultivation of the compliance culture, and created the corporate culture concepts of "compliance by all employees" and "compliance resulting in values".
Design Manager reports to Project Manager and reports to the divisions and project departments by levels.
The layout shall be reasonable and pleasing to the eye, and the levelness and straightness shall be consistent.
There are many application-oriented delivery scenarios, such as performance analysis of the architecture, clash detection, cost analysis, architectural performance and construction organization, etc.
Establish the regulations on use of "Three Treasures" (i.e., safety helmet, safety belt and safety net) and "Four Holes" (i.e., staircase, elevator well, reserved hole and hatchway).
4.2.4 Before the commencement, the contractor shall be familiar with the approved construction design documents, understand the design intent, clarify the design standards, mainly check the profile, construction kilometerage and work quantity of the route and shall record the check.
2 The installation position and spacing of the special-shaped arching shall meet the design requirements.
In cutting sections where the shoulder width is more than 0.3m, subgrade shall not be widened. For earth cutting sections with a shoulder width less than 0.3m, widening with group A soil shall be done. In stone cutting sections where widening is difficult, ballast retaining walls may be set.
The treatment of medical wastes shall comply with Regulations on Management of Medical Waste promulgated by the state Council and shall be delivered to the local contract hospital for uniformed treatment.
(2) Inquiry for equipment and key materials shall not be made unless the purchase requisition is reviewed by the Employer.
The characters printed on indication tubing shall be clear without any wiping, wear or ambiguity. Unidentified character is not allowed.
Install the wheel set bearing, with adjustable heating temperature and capable of automatic control
(2) In case of any significant or major design change implemented before approval, the upper limit of investment shall be reduced according to the reduction in the change costs, and the upper limit of investment shall not be increased according to the increase in the change costs;
The highway hub is located near the old airport (the intersection of Boulevard Jean-Jacques Dessalines and Route de Delmas).
3. The grounding resistance of the transmitting room and the ancillary building should be required less than 1 ohm. If the actual measurement does not meet the requirements, an artificial grounding body must be added until the requirements are met.
4.1.3.13.4 Ethernet Ring Functions and Performance Requirements
All service braking shall be equipped with wheel skidding protection functions. Wheel skidding protection equipment shall not reduce the braking performance under normal or failure conditions.
Traditional industries of Enugu State include wood carving, metal building, ceramics, handicraft manufacturing, textiles, dyes and so on.
Preparation: Notice the nameplates of materials and install electrical cabinet with an odd-number nameplate on D1 car and install that with an-even number nameplate on D2 car.
⑶ Provide sufficient labor protection for the construction personnel, improve construction conditions, living conditions and entertainment conditions, and create a good living and working environment for all the personnel to ensure they can devote themselves to the construction wholeheartedly.
Hangzhou Wushan Sub-branch of Construction Bank of China 33001616227053001542
b) Commit to continuous improvement, pollution prevention and risk reduction;
13.3.4 Practical operation includes, but is not limited to, software installation and regression, hardware installation and removal, system data configuration, commissioning, fault handling, etc.
In November 2018, upon receipt of the notice from the State Railway Administration to carry out the study of "Two Lines" Planning Scheme in Nepal, we quickly set up a general project team to collect data through site surveys and conduct in-depth studies on economy and traffic volume, integration schemes, line alignment and technical standards, laying a solid foundation for the preparation of the report.
1. One of the R2 lamps, which has a width of 100mm and is installed on the 50mm wide decoration beam, over the two sofas in the lobby cannot be installed, can we just cancel this lamp? See Attachment A for details.
ACC system must distribute and process the transaction data of "one-ticket-for-all" and "smart card" simultaneously. All system functions must meet the data processing requirements of "one ticket pass" and "smart card".
After the cut-over, the property right unit shall be contacted again for testing, and the construction personnel, machinery and equipment shall demobilize until they are confirmed to be correct and signed by the representative of the property right unit.
10. List of Unlawful Acts and Quality and Sefety Responsibility Accidents in Latest Three Years
(2) Where the beam stirrup hooks overlap, they shall be staggered along the direction of the beam.
Vientiane Capital to Vangvieng District Section of Vientiane Capital to Boten (Lao-China Border) Expressway
(1) Construction procedures: paying off and positioning → removing ground obstacles → marking the leveling range → earth excavation → resurveying the elevation → site leveling → rolling compaction → acceptance.
Silty clay: Brownish grey, hard plastic, containing some iron-manganese concretions; core in chunks and earth column; recovery percentage: 100%.
The rack plates should be high quality cold rolled galvanized steel sheets with a thickness of 3mm, and the cabinet surface should be provided with plastics spraying treatment.
Relevant permits shall be handled for exploitation, and review level by level and exploitation with certificate shall be implemented. In addition, the responsibility related to control of water loss and soil erosion shall be defined and exploitation or excavation at random shall be prohibited.
For details, please refer to Schedule 6-6: Plan Layout of Temporary Power Supply.
Aggregate crushing value in article 8.7.1 7) of the description for subgrade and pavement shall be no more than 28%. And depth of penetration of prime coat shall be no less than 5mm and thickness of lower seal coat shall be no less than 6mm. Please verify and revise.
The purchaser will address the supplier for delivery according to the approved procurement order and procurement contract.
5.To ensure normal operation of operation control center, auxiliary M&E equipment room serving for normal operation and necessary administration and maintenance management rooms serving for train operation management shall be set.
Granite: Greyish white mixed with white dots, weakly weathered (W2), massive and coarse grain structure; Primarily containing quartz, feldspar and biotite; core in columns, recovery percentage: above 95%.
Establish the elevation and plane control network in the construction area properly protect the survey benchmark and control network, and carry out the construction positioning, detail setting out and settlement observation of the project on this basis.
The first stage of training, consisting of 4 sub-stages and lasting for 4 months, is carried out in China.
Each box culvert shall be provided with a deformation joint (together with foundation) at least in the middle of the box body and at a distance of 4 ~ 6m from left to right (all of which are positive) respectively, and shall meet the structural length requirements of ladder-shaped inclined reinforcement area, and waterproof measures shall be taken according to the treatment methods shown in the figure.
2. The interest of the bid bond submitted through check for transfer or bank cable transfer is calculated based on the demand corporate deposit interest rate quoted by the opening bank of the special account on the day of refund and will be returned to the original account along with the bid bond.
In the pre-feasibility study report, the capacity of a short-circuit generator is 2150 MVA (test capacity) and the number is one.
During the application of the water monitor after the project completion, your company actively cooperated with us to regularly maintain products and ensure the normal operation of the equipment.
4 Workers will select to use γ ray or x ray transillumination according to the appearance of workpiece and the requirements of standards, based on the principles of quality grade reaching by tested workpieces, applicable film types and exposure time as short as possible.
1. It shall be not less than 90% of the rated capacity for ten hours in one to five years;
Carbody structure strength and fatigue service life will meet the requirements of EN12663.
6) When it is hot, in order to postpone solidification of concrete, concrete retarder can be used with approval of the Supervising Engineer.
There are various welding displacement devices and tools, gas shielded welding machines, welding robots, CNC planer-type milling machines, shot blasting equipment, three-coordinate detector, three-dimensional scriber, hydraulic calibration machine and other equipment in the bogie frame workshop.
The GNPower Dinginin Power Station 2X660MW (1+1) Net Coal Fired Power Project
(5) The safety devices of the metal oxide arrester shall be intact.
According to the actual situation of the site, adjust measures to local conditions, try to use the original facilities, reduce all kinds of temporary projects.
The channel aperture and spacing of the packing support structure shall meet the design requirements, and the hole must not be blocked;
(5) Establishing the information reporting system and using Monthly Report on Supervising Consultation, Quarterly Report on Supervising Consultation, Annual Report on Supervising Consultation and other special reports to report the supervising consultation work to KCIC as scheduled.
<5-4> Weakly weathered basalt: brownish gray, steel gray, cryptocrystalline texture, pore structure, with rock core in short columns, columns, with a segment length of 5cm-20cm, with developed joints and fissures filled with calcite stripe; the rocks are relatively soft, with rock core collecting rate of 90％.
5. Waterproof covers shall be provided for switch equipment within the stations of this project, and the requirements for setting video-based gap monitoring shall also be met.
Indices for Investment Estimate of Urban Rail Transit Projects (2008) (hereinafter referred to as "Metro Rating");
Inspection method: the Construction Contractor and the Supervision Firm shall check all the quality proof documents and measure the outline dimensions.
⑥ In the process of concrete pouring of beam body, special personnel shall be assigned to guard formworks, steel bars and attached vibrators, tighten bolts and supports in time if they are loose, take blocking measures in case of any concrete leakage, and adjust any displaced steel bars and embedded parts to ensure their correct positions.
Detailed Rules for the Evaluation and Management of Material Suppliers of CNPC Greatwall Drilling Company
Volume test shall be performed based on the existing data or prepared data of the customer.
Place the whole coiled material (do not open it) at the beginning for laying and adhering; roll the coiled material for about 1m along the chalk line already made on the base course; one person stands in front of the coiled material and pulls up the 1m coiled material by while the other person stands at the bottom surface of the coiled material with the liquefied gas flame gun in hand and slowly turns on the switch of the gun and lights up the fire.
PSC shall be of shockproof, dustproof, damp-proof and anti-EMI requirement, satisfy the requirement of Guangzhou-Zhuhai Intercity MRT Project and have a degree of protection of IP31 at least.
There are 10 stations along the whole line, including Xinxiangfang North, Acheng North, Maoershan West, Shangzhi South, Yimianpo North, Weihe West, Yabuli West, Hengdaohezi East, Hailin North and Mudanjiang, etc. The main line bridge is 103.730 km, the tunnel is 68.505 km, and the bridge-tunnel ratio is 58.61%.
7.2.2.3.1. Price level
Taking a fossil power plant of 100X104kW as an example, energy distribution is as follows:
1.5.1.2 Learn about the width of the operating machine, so that the operator keeps a distance from the machine when operating near a fence or boundary obstacle.
According to the requirements of CREC and the needs of the work, the headquarters of China Railway Wuhan Electrification Engineering Group Co., Ltd. has set up 18 functional departments and 4 business centers.
The areas where the line is located are close to the Great Rift Valley where geological structure activities frequently happen. The regional tectonics belongs to east Africa platform area, with fundamental rock series as the ancient area containing metamorphic rocks of various types of geosyncline ~ belt of folded strata of the Archean and lower Proterozoic.
According to our company's previous construction experience, in actual TBM tunneling, comprehensive factors such as material transportation distance, reasonable process interval time, equipment failure treatment, etc. should be considered. The expected tunneling indexes are calculated respectively according to the following sections:
3. Pay attention to the dryness/wetness of the concrete at all times, and timely transmit the comments on the concrete quality by the vibration table personnel to the mixing station.
During rolling, the support staff should be present, and the rolling should be carried out as per the times of static compaction and vibrational rolling obtained from the test section.
1.4.3.1 Carry out visual inspection for elastic parts, which shall meet technical requirements, otherwise replace them.
The configurations of Abuja rail transit power lighting load capacity and transformers of each station are as follows according to the summary and estimate by the design scale and standard of each power supply point:
The project plan will be revised and finalized after surveys and discussions with engineers and all relevant authorities.
Railway Applications - Electric Equipment for Rolling Stock - Part 2: Electrotechnical Components - General Rules
The existing line is utilized as the operating route of EMU depot, causing a larger disturbance to the common speed train. Further cooperation and communication with the Employer shall be required to identify whether the capacity of the existing line section from Tehran Station to Tapesefid Station meets the requirement;
(12) Before the construction in gas pipe areas, it is supposed to properly handle the procedures as per the requirements of fire operation in advance and provide firefighting facilities; otherwise, it is not allowed to perform construction;
Address: Meeting Room of ERC
such as acceptance procedures, work e-mails, letter format, document filing requirements, event response time limit and channel, meeting time, etc.
Stress relaxation less than 2.5% after 1000h.
The indicators for SC, QHSE-10 quality, safety, environment and health objectives implemented on January 5, 2016.
To prevent bumping at bridge-head, a certain lenth of transitional section shall be provided on the subgrade of both ends of the bridge abutment back and culvert platform back. The length of the transitional section for slab culvert shall not be less than 3 times of the height of filling soil. That for light bridge abutment shall not be less than twice of the height of filling soil. This section is vertically in inverse trapezium and shall be filled by steps.
Responsible for coordinating the mobilization, construction and immobilization of professional teams.
7.1 Approval Sheet for Leaves of Employees of the Purchasing Company
Any staff working at his/her post without safety production education or passing the safety production examination shall be warned, ordered to correct and necessarily punished by his/her employer.
1. 25T and 501 truck cranes are used as major vertical transportation means during decoration of station buildings. Tower cranes are torn down after roof materials of station buildings are hoisted.
BLV95 mm2 aluminum-core plastic wires are used for the exclusive power distribution boxes of emergency department building reinforcing rebar room.
1.Article 6 of the Contract Agreement is revised as follows:
Leading wire length: l=27±2 mm
According to the resident travelling intention investigation on September 20, 2007, 1~3 times/man-day accounts for 86.27%, the biggest part of resident travelling and the average resident travelling time is about 2.07 times/man-day. See Table 4.3-4 for the statistics in this regard.
Malik Saad Shaheed Road, N5 and Saddar Road
Hunan CSR Wabtec Railway Transportation Technology Co., Ltd.
The Employer shall not request the Designer to conduct any design violating relevant national standards.
The workers during shaft digging period are mainly project management personnel, front-line personnel for digging and laying of shaft, workers in lifting system, front-line maintenance assistants, personnel for water prevention and control of shaft, and ground civil construction personnel. The total number of personnel includes 132 from Chinese side and 134 from Kazakhstan side by on-site recruitment.
In the report 452 "Application Technical Manual of SUPERPAVE Mixture Design Method on Old Asphalt Pavement Recycling (2001)", for the low temperature performance requirements of mixed asphalt and mix proportion difference of recycled asphalt, the selection guide for new asphalt on recycled mixture is proposed (Table B-1).
1.GK28+089.84 shall be subject to the final approved bridge mileage.
The skeleton shall be installed in strict accordance with technical requirements. the fire prevention and rust protection are supposed to meet design requirements.
Schematic Design of Waterproof Section of Double-Track Tunnel Lining Deformation Joints
The generator set or storage battery independent from normal power source should be adopted as the standby (emergency) power source, and the special feeding circuit independent from normal power source in the supply network may also be adopted if available.
2) Laying in the middle of road-whole section -no left at lane and small intersections
(2) In the Summary Report on Borehole Verification for Cement-used Limestone in Existing Mine in Pyingyaung Village, Tsazi Town, Mandalay Province, Myanmar provided by the Owner, the exploration line and the ore body strike are obliquely crossed, which results in that the ore body width in the section view is greater than the actual value.
If the system fails to run without any failure in three successive months caused by the Tenderer, the three-month trial operation shall be resumed after the failure recovery.
3dB Beam width [°]: 110 ± 10
Line 7 (orange line): it is 6.3km in total length, with 10 stations and 4 transfer stations, with an average station spacing of 700m.
(2). If accidents occur on the construction site, the wounded have difficulty in breathing shall be timely treated by artificial respiration and then sent to the hospital for rescue.
7. Protect components of the equipment compartment from being impacted.
Lithium battery scheme is the current new energy form promoted nation wide due to its advantages of simple operation, small operation risk, high safety reliability, simple maintenance at later stage and no pollution to environment.
1. Vehicle load class: Highway-Class I;
Return the traction handle and direction handle to the neutral position, open the main circuit breaker and lower the pantograph.
4.3.1 Hazardous materials shall be controlled.
In 2017, the coal production of the TT Mine has reached to 20Mt, of which the output of the state-owned coalfield is 11Mt. Except for a small amount of local sales, the coal is transported to Gashuun Suhait Port by the mining road.
2.4.2 The Project versus Regional Economic Development
The symmetric and neat design with square and round contrast makes the scheme of strong visual impact.
It can detect short circuit, open circuit, low resistance fault, flashover, leakage and other high resistance faults of various cables.
The slopes to be excavated in the survey section are in the weathered bedrock layer. Slope protection shall be strengthened in construction.
The analysis results may be used to FTA for qualitative analysis.
Figure 27 Evaluate the Node on the Highlighted Section in the Finite Element Model - Whole Abrasion Wheel
(6) The bearing capacity of well covers in lawns shall not be less than 2KN/M2, and the bearing capacity of rainwater grate in roads shall not be less than 100KN/M2.
(5) Due to the high hydration heat of mass concrete, in order to prevent the high hydration heat inside concrete from affecting the quality of concrete, a water cooling system is installed in the base board to assist in cooling.
After the tunnel portal is formed by excavation, advanced grouting rock bolts shall be constructed. Φ32mm deformed steel bars shall be used for advanced grouting rock bolts, with a length of 12m and a spacing of 0.2-0.3m.
7 This bridge uses stainless steel railings. Refer to NCTQC 13for details.
Waste water produced by washing grease dirt and paint also enters oil separator and is discharged to sewage pipelines.
Currently, transit vehicles mainly pass through four bridges across the Dnieper River in Kiev.
The guide wire cross arm hoisting: Use the ground wire top frame to hoist the guide wire cross arm. First, a set of the lifting pulley block is installed respectively on the ground wire top frame. According to the strength of the ground wire top frame, it is to determine if the reinforcement of ground wire top frame is needed or not. Generally the derrick is used for reinforcement.
When conducting the procedures for the stocking of spare parts from outside purchase or cooperation, stock room keepers shall carefully validate the Certificate of the spare parts; and validate the signature of the inspectors on the Notice for Inspection on Incoming Goods when conducting procedures for stocking of accessory materials outsourced.
When the measured value is above 50mΩ, repeated measurements shall be carried out for verification.
Silencers for the residences will be installed on the exhaust port of the generator.
The original records formed during the test shall be submitted to the documenter for filing after the test report is signed.
However, it has higher requirements on transport organization and locomotive deployment than single-locomotive traction.
Primary voltage -------------------10 KV
As the impact load also exists in the rolling mill of bar workshop, it will cause certain harmonic pollution and changes of voltage fluctuation, and thus causing the problem of quality of power supply.
Vertical distance from upper (lower) lug hole at lower part of guide channel to the plane with a rotation angle of 7°30′
(2) All hardware connections, axle pins, cotter pins and bolts are tightened according to the requirement in product specification.
Click "Print Display". The "Print Information" dialog box pops up. The detailed data of this line can be displayed. And the data of this line can be printed through clicking "Print This Line". Click "Print All" to print all data. Click "Cancel" to exit the "Print Information" dialog box, as shown in figure below.
There are system expansion slots, which can be used for stack work of multiple exchanger units, and relayed to improve quantity of network connection nodes.
Emergency Plan for Foreign Aid Projects (SYF [2010] No. 83.) promulgated by the Ministry of Commerce of the People's Republic of China;
Advantages: it is applicable when the operation times of the containers are low in future, which is also the objective we pursue. The handling machinery is flexible, i.e. it can not only operate in the railway handing area but also in the container stockyard, especially when the quantity of work is large and the time is intensive. Under such condition, the machines can be operated at same time, which can fully utilize their flexibility; the operation with containers straddled can be realized.
(There is no text on this page, which is the signing page of the Articles of Association of CCCC Second Highway Engineering Co., Ltd.)
On basis of the design drawings and the layout route, the Contractor and the Engineer shall together conduct on-site investigation and organize technical meetings to modify, supplement and improve the construction plan according to the site conditions.
Three sockets are installed in the bedroom (one 15A socket is set at a height of 2.4m for future use for air conditioning installation); a waterproof socket (13A) is provided at the location of the washing machine, and the socket is set at other appropriate locations.
Electrification: study the distribution of traction substations and maintenance gang for catenary, types of overhead contact line and selection of equipment.
Core Services Sub-system shall generate, as a minimum, the following operational reports:
Chengdu-Lodz(westbound, via Mataszewicze)
84. K1572+471.2:
2) The inner-wall difference of SHB level pipes is 1mm or the outer-wall difference is 2mm.
For the reinforcement binding of the slab, the short-direction reinforcement shall be below. Attention shall be paid to the position of negative ribs on the slab. The upper and lower ribs shall be fixed with horse stools to prevent them from being stepped down. At the intersection of the slab, secondary beam and main beam, the slab reinforcement shall be centered between the upper and secondary beam reinforcement and the main beam reinforcement shall be below.
2. The dimensions shall be determined in accordance with the applied fan samples.
(3) In rolling, the temperature of asphalt mixture shall be the temperature determined in tests and be in accordance with requirements in Table 5.2.2 ofTechnical Specifications for Construction of Highway Asphalt Pavements (JTG F40-2004), and the temperature of asphalt mixture in rolling shall be determined in trial rolling based on conditions including type of mixture, roller, ambient temperature, thickness and etc.
Since the Quaternary soil layer at the bridge site is thick, it is recommended to adopt pile foundation and the length and diameter of piles shall be determined via calculation.
(2) Check web plate and cover plate of each beam member of the underframe. Cracks in the base metal and weld seam are not allowed, and welding repair is required in case of occurrence.
(4) In combination with the actual project, actively carry out scientific and technological research, further optimize the construction technical scheme, actively apply the "Four New" achievements, strengthen external technical consultation, solve major technical problems, and speed up the construction progress on the premise of ensuring safety and quality.
As for stacking of earth and loose materials, sprinkle water to solidify them and cover them to prevent dust polluting air.
Moreover, the Danakil mining area of potassic minerals is located in the junction of Asia and Africa and has a good supply advantage. With its unique geographical position, the mining area has relatively good market development potential.
Establish civilized construction responsibility system, divide areas and specify personnel responsible for management; carry out the system of working with license and keep the site clean and neat.
Inner tank: diameter 80m, height 34.8m, material 4GrX7Ni9, outer tank: inner diameter 82m, and height 52.786m, which is pre-stressed reinforced concrete structure and the lining of the outer tank is structural steel.
Is the reduction coefficient of coupling beam stiffness calculated with SAUSAGE-CHK?
including 8 first prizes, one second prize and two third prizes,.
2 vials (about 5L for each), 1 vial (about 700ml)
Inlet flow: 6600m3/h, operation vacuum: -40~-60kPa
There are no non-adjusting significant events after the balance sheet date for the Company to disclose as of the report date.
During the construction of Jinzhong DC Line Project, your company actively cooperated with and responded to the construction work arrangement of us. Since the commencement of construction, your company has demonstrated your excellent organization and management abilities in safe and civilized construction, quality control, process innovation, etc.
The Inspection Contract shall be signed by the business receptionist, the contract assessor and the Client (representative).
Construction activities will be strictly prohibited between 10 PM and 6 AM near residential areas.
8) Establish the completion data acquisition management system, be responsible for management and implementation of the completion data acquisition, and supervise, check, guide and review the data acquisition by the contractors (subcontractors).
Other than the eastern, central and western channels of the Trans-Asian Railway, 3 China-Vietnam railway channels from Guangxi in China to Vietnam and 2 China-Myanmar railway channels respectively from Jinhong and Daluo in Yunnan to Rangoon and from Ruili (in Yunnan), Lashio and Mandalay to Naypyidaw are also planned for the areas. All these channels will jointly constitute the railway channels serving mutual exchanges between China and ASEAN countries.
According to the Monrovia geologic map jointly surveyed by the Liberia Geological Survey and the United States Geological Survey from 1971 to 1972, the stratum of the project area is mostly covered by rivers and delta shoal sludge (humus in some locations).
Rated output power: not less than 200VA
Party B shall strictly observe state laws and regulations on environmental protection and strive to handle related issues in construction pursuant to related standards and requirements of ISO14001EMS.
In order to guarantee the quality of the materials and equipments, raw materials, semi products and finished products used in the Project and prevent use of unqualified products, marking of materials shall be carried out with proper methods. All the markings shall be included in the machine account and recorded for traceability.
2) The equipment shall have sufficient stiffness, strength, stability and shock resistance, to meet the needs under normal production conditions;
Outgoing EMU runs on the line at peak hours at the frequency of 7 and 11 pairs per hour in recent and long terms respectively. 12 and 19 urban EMUs with 9 train formations are respectively configured in recent and long terms.
(2) The Project Management Department shall organize monthly inspections; weekly inspections shall be carried out for different sections; routine inspections shall be carried out by construction teams; employees shall supervise and inspect each other.
2. Consider the interests of residents whose lands are requisitioned and houses are demolished, reasonably determine the compensation price, and timely pay the compensation payments;
The Safety Environment and Production Department, the Equipment Process Department, the Process Department and the Operation and Lean Management Department shall organize relevant safety and technical employees to plan and carry out special (on a single item basis) or quantitative inspection according to equipment, facilities, process equipment and facilities, onsite production environment and safe operation status of the Company.
In the original design scheme of construction drawings, main beams of Segments 1-11# and 1-12# of the Side Spans 18#-19# should be poured in cast-in-cantilever method, so single cantilever pouring have to be done after construction of GL1-1 steel-concrete segment.
The types of waterproof materials will be confirmed by Party A, and the materials qualities will be sampled and tested for qualification under witness.
-------content displayed on the screen-------end
It is required to contact pipeline unit before construction to review completion data of metro line and sewage pipeline, determine specific position relation between the existing pipeline and planned structures, and optimize the design of diaphragm wall and bored pile;
In summary, from the perspectives of line functional orientation, average station spacing, line conditions, traction energy consumption, and rubber wheel vehicle characteristics, a target speed of 80km/h is recommended for 6th of October City Rail Transit Monorail in this time, and a higher travel speed can be achieved combining with greater inter-station distance and good conditions of the line.
(this status is uploaded to ISCS only in case of cut-off command issued by IBP and non-fire control power supply cut-off)
Solid Waste solution - waste incineration power generation technology of mechanical grate furnace
Classification limit of calcium magnesium lime, magnesium oxide content (%)
3.3.1 Be responsible for identifying and managing risks and opportunities in the process of quality management system operation and product realization of the department;
Fig. 2.3. 3-2 Section Sketch of Track Bed in Hard Rock Subgrade Section of Newly-built Main Line
4. Object strike accident during formwork dismantling
Left front sliding window assembly (built-in sliding door within 4mm)
1. Description: mop basin _x000D_
Bill of Quantities for Bridge at AK1+146.7 Ramp A of Boua Interchange
Section 3 Electromechanical Reservation and Embedment Solution
Renovation and Expansion Project of Km21-Namgnum Bridge Section of No. 13 National Highway in Laos
Do not leak the matters that needed to remain confidential in the opinion of concerned parties of the supervision project.
Then the door will enter the corresponding procedure according to the new command.
Supplement to test and inspection specifications and technical standards;
Earthwork in the spacing between pile heads shall be excavated by a small excavator commanded by specially assigned personnel, with cooperation of 2 workers. It is strictly prohibited to touch the engineering piles during excavation, and no displacement of the engineering piles shall occur due to earth squeezing caused by the moving excavator.
The Project Department formulates HSE education and training plans in combination of the practice, and organize to carry out HSE operating skill trainings by disciplines and trades of work.
Grade 8.8 M16X65 bolt, 72 sets
Obtain local materials to reduce energy consumption and environmental impact caused by material transportation.
Alarm and automatic speed reducing will be provided when inspected train speed reaches 125km/h;
The rate of holding certificates for special workers reached 100 %.
2. Budget Quota for Highway Engineering released in JGF [2007] No. 33 Doc. by the Ministry of Transport.
(3) Installation of column stirrups: the number of stirrups of each column shall be calculated according to the spacing required in the drawing. First, cover the stirrups on the reinforcement protruding from the lower layer, bind the positioning reinforcement, and erect the column reinforcement.
There were many storage batteries or other sundries stored indoors, fire extinguishers in use and out of work were mixed together and inspection records were not complete.
The axle design complies with requirements in EN 13103 and EN 13104 standards.
Yield strength: 235MPa; hot galvanized coiled material with two-sided galvanized coating of 275g/m2
With the sustainable growth of sales volume of new energy passenger cars, the demand for ternary power lithium battery may welcome an explosive growth possibly, that is to say the Company is expected to have a sustainable and fast growth.
Nanjing Lanshen Pump Co., Ltd.
Return of goods: The Buyer shall refuse to accept the goods nonconformity with the contract in quality and return to the Vendor.
During the whole transportation, the pads made of soft materials shall be used for protection at the bundle or fasten positions prevent the coating from being damaged.
Strictly control joint time between the base plate and guide wall concrete, to prevent cold joint from appearing.
(2) Living area is set with activity room, dormitory, medical room, canteen, bathroom and toilet.
Data download: Ethernet interface is adopted for download, and the Ethernet interface rate is 100Mbps.
This product has been tested, complying with the Multi-purpose Passenger Car of ZN6490W2K5A ZN6490WBK5A Type (Q/ZN 1052-2018). It is hereby certified that this product is allowed to be delivered out of the factory.
The project is located in the middle section of "121" Avenue, Kunming City, Yunnan Province, covering a floor area of 7,000 m2. The span between roof trusses is 50m and the roofing is made of Hoogoven high-strength aluminum plates. The project has elegant modeling, breaking through the traditional design concept and enhancing the difficult in construction. It won the Technological Progress Award from the Ministry of Construction of China.
Figure 10 shows that the stator is wound with several turns of insulated wires with single-phase power-frequency alternating current. If the voltage of power supply is 220V, the number of turns is:
The corresponding Ethernet interface boards shall be added for the communication backbone transmission equipment.
(14) CTC system commissioning meets the following safety requirements:
Support IEEE 802.3, IEEE 802.3u and IEEE 802.3ab
Report timely the project progress to the project general manager and regularly submit analysis reports and solutions regarding the problems existing in project implementation to the project general manager for decision-making.
Our company plans to deploy the personnel, mechanical equipment and production capacity of this project.
This project is in conformity with the requirements of design and has met the acceptance standard.
Finally, the reverse flow returned to our farm, flushing out the crops. But a day and a half later, the reverse flow went back to the river.
2 The waterproof level and prevention requirements shall be clearly specified in the waterproofing and drainage design of tunnel, which shall include the self-waterproofing measures for lining, the waterproofing measures for construction joints (segment joints) and deformation joints, those for waterproofing layer, segment lining and tunnel opening, those for structural features, and the waterproofing and drainage system of tunnel structure.
Communication interface: RS-232C (the same as PC terminal);
\A1; Backfill: varicolored, medium dense, humid, mainly composed of pebble and cohesive soil, with pebble content of about 50% and grain size of 20~90mm, with good roundness, and in oval shape.
c. The alarm area must be repaired to prevent unrelated person from entering in installation and dismantling process.
(3) The construction of insulation works of air duct and components shall be carried out after the air duct system passes the air leakage test and the quality inspection.
Mid- and long-term economic development plan, population and employment opportunities development plan, land utilization development plan, industrial development plan, tourism development plan and comprehensive traffic plan of Khartoum, etc.;
the bellow is inflated, drives the rectangular plate and push steel wire rope out, and drive the rotation of
5.1.1 The inspection of raw materials and purchased parts/outsourced parts is divided into warehousing acceptance and inspection acceptance.
Engineering geological survey is to identify the natural characteristics, engineering geology and hydrogeological conditions of the site related to the route, accurately evaluate the site suitability, and evaluate the engineering geological conditions.
Note: Drawings corresponding to items 1~8 in the table above shall be mounted onto a lightweight baseplate, and properly sealed and packaged.
Article 48 Filing shall be made to the HR Department of CR5 in advance if departments of CR5 arrange leaders of departments under the responsibility of CR5 to participate relevant business training.
First Contract Section of Hunan Yiyang to Loudi Expressway Project starts at Chainage K3+499.58 and ends at Chainage K9+500 (of which the broken chainage is K6+000-K8+080.638), with a total length of 8.131km.
The meter-gauge rail in logistics center is connected with main line section of existing meter-gauge rail, and set with 1 receiving-departure yard (including 3 receiving-departure tracks and 1 locomotive holding track).
Request Form of Approved Material Procurement Beyond Budget, and the detailed account of contracts, etc..
The system mainly consists of UPS equipment, AC distribution panel, storage battery and corresponding cables.
06Cr19Ni10 (original one -0Cr18Ni9)
2) Special operating personnel will meet the requirements in terms of quantity and qualification;
All logistics service activities related to the business of Sinotrans (refer to the detailed business scope for details)
1) Overall control plan for contract execution.
7) For the exposed cast-in-situ reinforced concrete parapet walls, clevis, railing panels, eaves and other members, if the straight length in horizontal direction is more than 12 m, expansion joints shall be set.
3) It takes 4,946.72 s for the vehicle to take a round trip between KDMI Station to Station KKVS at an average velocity of 36.58 km/h (including turn-back time of 120 s), which meet the requirement of not less than 31 km/h.
Comply with all maintenance and safety procedures of urban railway transportation.
5) The bottom end and the top end of the vertically-laid metal pipe as well as the metallic object shall be connected with the lightningprotection device.
11.8.25 The allowable deviation for elevation of the top surface of pile shaft shall be ±50 mm.
Code for Design of Roads in Factories and Mining Areas GBJ22-87
Hydraulic circuit of tamping unit controls the action of each hydraulic cylinder.
Before attending the bid opening meeting, the Bidders' Legal Representative(s) or Authorized Agent(s) shall submit their ID cards and copies for review of the supervisor for bid opening;
If the project meets the completion acceptance conditions, Party B shall submit four sets of complete completion data (including the as-built drawing) to Party A. The preparation of completion data shall be implemented according to Shanghai Municipal Construction Committee, Shanghai Municipal Archives Bureau and relevant document requirements of Party A.
The power used for the Project shall be supplied by the municipal power grid system to ensure the power demands.
This observation point is located in residential areas with dense population.
Upon completion of lifting operation, trolleys should be moved to specified positions, and hooks should be hung on anchoring objects.
The supporting device of overhead catenary system adopts registration arm support, to increase the wind resisting stability of overhead catenary system. Add windproofing support to the supporting device in bridge.
The Test Procedure is only used as the basis for type test of monorail drive gearbox.
17) Code for Investigation of Geotechnical Engineering (TB 50021-2001);
After going out of the station, it continues to run in the median of the Al Mehwar Street in the eastward direction. The ElHosary Station is constructed on the west side of the intersection of the Abdel-Salam Amin Road.
Cable trench water-collecting well 800x800x800
1. Make statistics on and review the quantity adjustment of the own-supply materials caused by Ⅱb design changes;
Therefore, their relations can be summarized in sixteen words "Company Supervision, Department Assistance, Authorized Management, Overall Responsibility".
8. Cover: 40mm-thick C20 fine aggregate concrete with built-in 6@150 bi-directional wire mesh, 10mm-wide joint caulked with sealant
Root valve PDT020 of inlet differential pressure gauge of active carbon filter
It is suggested to select at least three conditions possibly causing the worst interfering current:
8.1.5 The General Contractor of conductor rail system must review all the test results and submit for Supervisor and Owner.
See Table 1.7-1 for requirements of compaction degree of subgrade.
Damage on the surface of pile foundation: Treat the pile foundation surface to present a leveled one. If the grade of the concrete to be poured is lower than that of the pile foundation concrete, use the pile foundation concrete in the repair. Otherwise, pour concrete directly on the pile foundation.
­ Cost control risk: capital budgeting management mechanism.
The pulp preparation workshop, papermaking workshop, post-processing workshop and finished product warehouse shall be arranged successively at south side of the site. To the north, the alkali recovery workshop and auxiliary workshop for power station shall be arranged from east to west. The auxiliary production workshop shall be arranged in the remaining area.
Click the fault to view the emergency handling method of the selected fault.
--Use a Φ8 plastic gas pipe to connect the outlet end of the controllable check valve to the inlet joint of the toilet drain valve.
The communication cable is introduced to the telephone splice box through outdoor direct burying; then it is introduced therefrom to the telephone coupling box in each floor.
Quoted Prices for Seedlings and Grass Seeds for ADB-Financed Conservation Project in Three Basins (Shanggou Reservoir, Xiahongma Reservoir, and Xiaoqiaohe Reservoir) of Xifeng County in 2010
The decoration of the station shall be designed to eliminate the sense of depression and tediousness with different designing skills, in addition to the texture of decorating materials, according to different station environment, station form, scale, and rating, so as to enable the station to possess common characters of uniform pattern as well as its special characters.
(2) The coefficient of loose paving material shall be tentatively set at 1.4 (the final value shall be determined according to the test section); a section shall be taken every 5m on site, and elevation control shall be carried out at 3 points on each section.
5.3.6.1 The KPI set in the development process of new products and the project management process, of which the target projects and target values are released and implemented in the company's annual documents.
As the CRRC ZELC produces this model for the first time, it's necessary to fully evaluate the difficulty of certification, and there are large risks of design scheme compliance, cycle and costs.
The traction type of this line should be consistent with the adjacent line, so the diesel traction (electrification conditions reserved)is recommended in this study.
Construction conditions, adaptability and supply capability of materials, financial condition, and the like for similar works;
According to the current national standard "Standard for Design of Building Lightning Protection".
The auxiliary power box shall operate normally under rated working conditions. After the temperature rise is stable, the temperature-rise values for all measuring points can be measured respectively.
Use flat washer 8 (Item 27), SK series S-type M8 washer (Item 28), M8 hexagon nut (Item 29), sliding block (Item 32), and M8X30 hexagon bolt (Item 33) to pre-assemble connecting base and apron board.
For the cantilevered member, the bottom formwork support shall be dismantled when the concrete strength grade reaches 100% and the member does not support pouring and compacting of the concrete of the superstructure at the bottom formwork.
The term of employment of the above comrades will be from December 31, 2019 to July 31, 2022.
Code for Electrical Design of Residential Buildings (JGJ 242-2011)
Pay attention to design of slope protection: except for partially adoption of masonry protection, plant grass or use other biological measures to reinforce slop.
b) Define the controls of both external supplier and resulting output;
D-series high-speed trains: are trains which have power and integrated design, can be operated from both ends and consist of motor cars and trailers.
Grounding device installation: According to the design resistance value and geological situation of the installation ground wire, match the number of required grounding electrodes and the length of the grounding network, manually bury the grounding device underground, and use steel stranded wire and iron hook clamp to reliably connect the cross arm, the equipment grounding terminal and the grounding device.
③ Temperature at site being above 40℃ or mixture temperature during paving above 35℃;
RW25b high-grade cushioned berth sleeping car: development and manufacture of the 25 type passenger car started in 1965,
(4) The Buyer is entitled to go to the factory and participate in various testing items;
2. The shoulder coping concrete thickness in part sections is less than the thickness stipulated in the design.
d. Color cards will be provided in advance for color and hue selection and color schemes will be prepared by the Employer and the Designer.
Djibouti government attaches great importance to the development of tourism. There are 9 hotels in the country with 440 rooms.
(See Annex 1 for List of Equipment and Bill of Quantities)
The inspection and replacement methods for operating motor shall be provided in the user manual;
The consultant has acted as a leader of structural engineering in the following projects:
2) If the anti-explosion valve of the transformer is broken, the power of the equipment is off, there are still large amounts of oil and gas spraying out, and the gas relay is activated, it is indicated that fire catches inside the transformer. In this case, open the oil drain valve of the transformer to make oil flow into the oil pit as well as to avoid the fire from spreading due to oil flowing around.
Mutual inspection: Mutual inspection among different jobs shall be carried out. The team leader shall carry out handover inspection after the completion of the previous process and before the construction of the next process, and fill the handover checklist. Only after the handover checklist is signed by both parties can the next process be allowed to start.
The Company's office building and camp planning includes the office building, multi-functional center, staff dining hall, staff apartments, gym and some supporting facilities.
After the base date, as for the additional expenses arising from any change in laws during the Contractor‘s performance of the Contract (except for the situations agreed in Sub-clause 11.1 [Adjustment due to Market Price Fluctuation]), the Employer shall be responsible for the additional expenses. In case of any decrease in the expenses required, such amount shall be deducted from the contract price.
The operating handle of selector valve shall be mounted on the side where operating personnel stand.
(3) Take back guide channel on the right: open the shut-off valve ○2 (handle is located at parallel position) in the Fig. 2, and close the shut-off valve ○1、 ○3 (handle is located at vertical position) in the Fig. 2.
Each air conditioning unit includes 1 electric return air valve which is driven by the electric servo motor and is installed in the return air inlet.
7). Material and specifications of flexible coupling: ultra-soft copper stranded conductor TTJR.
3.2.2 Construction of Pavement Cement Stabilized Base Course
2) The Grade 8.8 or above high strength joint bolts shall be adopted for the rail joints of station tracks, with Grade 10 high strength nuts and single-layer spring washers.
Yue Lina, female, born in October 1979, doctoral degree, associate researcher of State Engineering Laboratory of Optical Fiber Sensing Technology, Wuhan University of Technology.
Built-in AC function, realizing deep integration of wired and wireless services without purchasing additional AC hardware;
China Railway Engineering Equipment Group Co., Ltd., China
Operating ambient temperature: -30℃~60℃
6. The quality of the project conforms to the standard: "the quality of the handover acceptance is qualified and the scoring of quality assessment is not less than 95; the quality of completion acceptance is evaluated as "excellent" .
B. Provide security guarantee by fully utilizing the security features of WLAN.
Equipment more than RMB 500 will be examined and received by the Production Department according to procurement contents and its operating instruction and the acceptance results will be filled in the Acceptance Form for Equipment Entering Factory. If it fails to pass the acceptance, results also shall be filled in the Acceptance Form for Equipment Entering Factory and disposition measures will be discussed and made by the Procurement Department and the supplier.
After being inspected, the train received is declared to be allowed to be sent to the place of use, where it will be commissioned.
Close the circuit breaker (=35-F202)
In addition, we will ask 10 staffs to taste our dishes every week and to give valuable opinions and suggestions for our chef and service teams, so as to improve our service standards and quality of dishes.
The position setting of various grounding busbars shall adapt to the equipment layout condition in the Signaling Equipment room to facilitate the grounding connection of equipment and ensure the grounding wire is shortest.
The front-end module consists of the main surface shield, the fixed shield and the movable shield.
(6) Special attention shall be paid to environmental protection and safety of construction personnel during the construction of waterproofing and anticorrosion works of the pond. The construction procedures and technical safety disclosure construction shall be strictly followed, and the phenomenon of violating operating instructions and procedures must be completely eliminated.
Stop the operation of the large air conditioning system of station and close its corresponding chilled water pipelines after the train service is off at night.
2 When the strain and cross-sectional displacement of pile shaft are tested, the relevant data shall be processed to plot the axial load distribution of pile shaft, and to calculate the shaft resistance and end resistance in different soil layers.
The engineering change cost calculated according to Clause 9.3.1 shall be subject to cost reduction according to the reduction rate of relevant contract lots in Attachment 1-1.
12. Formulate implementation plan for creating quality projects of the Project Department, supervise and inspect quality construction implementation status during construction, and actively communicate with the Owner and Myanmar government regarding the implementation of quality objectives and inspection work;
Equipment layout details, equipment outline dimension details, and equipment structure diagrams, including all technical parameters such as installation dimension and dead weight;
Certification Standard and Technical Requirement: Clause 2 of YJXL[2000] No. 396 [2000];
A total of 46 elevators and 74 escalators are set for the 21 stations of the line.
15.6 Poverty Causes of Poverty-Stricken Population in Project Area
The Project is set with 2 service areas, which are built with investment promotion.
6 from the Nigerian side, working in two-shift system, are responsible for unstuffing and handling of goods in containers.
6. The local Zhuang people have no political, economic and cultural systems independent of the mainstream society
12.2.1.2.Supply scope of vehicle tenderer
7.1.2.2 General Management Division shall manage the infrastructures pertaining to Clause a).
That is to say, at each GPS positioning point, the increased/decreased mileage status will be automatically modified as long as it does not conform to the selected increased/decreased mileage.
Apply transverse load to the center pin to -10.6kN;
(1) Project Manager is responsible for approving the project quality plan and technical measures for quality assurance, focusing on quality control of key processes.
(Project No.: 44010-012)
Ensure that all workers on site are equipped with the following protective equipment:
② The safety representative shall inspect it at least once a month and prepare an inspection report based on the inspection.
Inhale oxygen, keep smooth breathing or provide artificial respiration.
Take the frontal plane as an example. The projection of frontal plane is as shown in Fig. 8-2-9. The projection characteristics are as follows: The frontal projection reflects the true shape; the horizontal projections converge on a straight line parallel to axis X; the side projections converge on a straight line parallel to axis Z.
Whether simulated brake loop/emergency relay working properly
Perform adjustment by flame adjustment method in case of concave, convex or uneven part at box body.
All broadcasting contents at the central level and broadcasting contents at the time of artificial broadcasting at the station should be recorded. The recording equipment is provided by a centralized recording system. The broadcasting subsystem should be provided with the corresponding recording interface, and the audio interface is temporarily determined, while the specific interface form and content should be determined at the design liaison phase.
See the attached Table 7-1-6 Survey on the Existing Ballast of the Entire Line for details.
3. Party A shall pay the one-way freight charge on the basis of price of 40-foot/ 45-foot containers (unit price of each container (40HQ/40GP)/45').
Dispatch and command: for train D001, perform ‘change time', ‘delay', stop ticket selling ((include resume), seatless adjustment, presale segment adjustment, withhold ticket instruction, coach expansion, coach cut (include resume), unblock station, and train stop (include resume)!
Standardize gate entrance and exit management of materials, personnel and vehicles to maintain orders for company production and secure the safety of the company employees and properties.
Table 9.2.1-1 Basic Situation of Evaluation Schemes
The company plans to quickly get in touch with the owner and the construction contractor after winning the tender, and as soon as possible to carry out technical disclosure and fully understand the problems such as product production, transportation routes and the connection with the sleeper laying contractor.
The materials of arc welding for the steel lower than Grade 460 according to Standard UNI EN 440, and equaling to or higher than Grade 460 according to UNI EN 12535 must meet the requirements in Part 1 and Part 2 of Standard UNI EN 1011.
If stirrup is required to be arranged [σtp-2]=0.83MPa
The panel switch is smooth without shaking. the quick lock can be locked normally.
The public---One or more persons are severely injured.
Discipline adjustment coefficient: discipline adjustment coefficient of road works is 0.9; discipline adjustment coefficient of bridge and culvert works is 1.1; the discipline adjustment coefficient of pipe network works is 1.0; the discipline adjustment coefficient of auxiliary works is 0.9.
Contents of design input can be generally induced as the following factors: abstracts of project research results and final results, main research contents, expected object, main technical economic indicators.
11.2.8 Safety Supervision Work System
1. Organize ticketing and refunding works at station.
6) To prevent asphalt mixture being attached to wheels in rolling with road roller, rolling wheel may be watered with the water mixed with a little detergent or other materials recognized to keep rolling wheels wet.
Reinforcement acceptance: bound reinforcement shall be inspected comprehensively before concrete pouring, and the procedures for concealed works shall be gone through. After it passes self-inspection, acceptance can be applied for and only after it is accepted by the Owner can the construction enter the next process.
The clearance shall be determined through the analysis and calculation according to the factors including overall dimension and technical parameters of cars, track requirements, power receiving mode, construction method, equipment installation, etc.
High/low pressure before the pneumatic butterfly valve at the inlet of vacuum pump #1
The driver's seat will be placed in the center of the cab.
6.1.3.3 Operation Mode of Emergency Lighting Power Equipment
Slope protection shall be carried out at adit entrance according to the terrain. The protection of advanced small pipes + mining steel arches + plain concrete shall be performed for the adit entrance section with the concrete strength of C30.
Finished product protection must be conducted for equipment in the process of hoisting and assembling.
5. The polyurethane waterproof coating used for external of side wall shall conform to Clause 3.3.3 in Technical Conditions for Waterproof Layer of Railway Concrete Bridge (TB/T2965-2018).
Article 25 Indemnity against the loss occurred in the period of insurance liability shall be calculated by the Insurer as follows:
2) The door which communicates with the outside shall be opened outward.
1. Separate septic tanks shall be set up outdoor near T1, T2 and T3, and toilet sewage from podium building shall be connected nearby.
The shipyard and the oil field service land are located in the same block. The land area of this section is composed of two parts: the original land area and the new reclamation land.
B. First measure the fixed position of original assembly prior to replacement like the related position of four points a, b,c and d as shown in Figure 1-12, and then record this fixed position.
Commencement Preparation Coordination Meeting Minutes of the Construction Branch on the 500kV Yongchang Power Transmission and Transformation Project (Line)
The No.9 single turnout (concrete sleepers and 60kg/m rails) is recommended for the main track and auxiliary line, with the technical indexes of allowable straight passing speed ≤120km/h and allowable lateral passing speed ≤35km/h;
6.1.1 When accident happened, responsible entity shall call emergency medical institutions (28441120) immediately, or assign personnel to escort the injured to the medical institutions for rescue an follow the arrangement of the medical staff in the process of emergency rescue.
Fujian Zijin Mining and Metallurgy Testing Technology Co., Ltd.Quality HandbookQ/ZJCS1.1-2019
2. Administrative Regulations on the Work Safety of Construction Projects;
After the centerline of the pipeline is determined, lime lines can be marked on the ground according to the location of the centerline and the ditch excavation width.
It is planned to transport the plate vertically with a tower crane or hoist, and install it manually.
The whole line of the project has 16 tunnels, including 9 tunnels with a single tunnel length of 1~3km, and 7 tunnels with a single tunnel length of 0~1km. The longest tunnel, Dongshan Tunnel, is 2.695km long.
1.12 "Technical Documents" and "Technical Data" refer to the documents that can reflect the know-how, including the reasonable specifications required for commencement and continuation of producing JV products, construction drawings and other drawings or data.
9.9.9.The side walls, floors and seats where electric heating equipment are installed shall be treated with safety and heat insulation.
This Plan emphasizes timeliness and unifies and standardizes the overall building column network according to the modular design method of container rooms, so as to achieve the objective of short-term construction in the future.
Our company undertakes testing and inspection for the engineering raw materials, finished structural products, semi-finished products and engineering items inspected by the Employer, and assists the Employer to complete the test and inspection management within the scope of this Lot.
9.2Each individual package shall contain a product certificate. The certificate shall indicate the manufacturer's name and code, product name / batch / specifications, performance grade, date of manufacture, quantity, and inspector's code.
The Project provides employees with personal safety protection and labor protection articles (including but not limited to):
Two loops shall be closed when selection switches are placed at the location, otherwise they shall break.
This document is applicable to the design of the Project's TCMS.
Roads are constructed according to the terrain to avoid landscape disorder and damage.
6.2 The safety management departments (personnel) at all levels of all subsidiaries (branches) and project departments shall register, file and monitor accident potentials by classification according to the following requirements.
The capacity expansion and reconstruction of existing unattended crossing is not specified, and related description is required.
2. Water resource protection program to prevent pollution of drinking water and natural rivers around the site
Daily regular automatic inspection shall be provided for the fire pump and fire pool water level.
1. The least adjustment and maintenance shall be considered for the design of system equipment and main component.
There is 36 months for the commenctment of project to the completion of project.
-equivalent height of load (kN/m2) (to be calculated according to the following formula):
A nameplate describing the function of the equipment shall be provided on the front of each cabinet.
SINOMA-TIANJIN-PM-PR31- R3 Comprehensive Evaluation on Contract
Galvanized angle steel bridge pole, stub reinforcement, support (Q235)
Q/JS G0111Archives Management System
1) The Project Department has not marked out the rooms with waterproof requirements on the construction part, and thus the workers don't know which parts are required to be added with a concrete sill;
Works Outside the Sewage Boundary (Road, Drainage, Reclaimed Water, Lighting, Greening and Road Signboards) of Luofu Road (Pule Road-Jieyuan Road West) and Huanghe Road
The public address system provides advanced operational tools with perfect functions for railway passenger transportation, train operation, disaster prevention, equipment maintenance and other departments.
The BMS software provided by us for this project includes:
The door operating system is composed of top rail and upper driving mechanism of the door.
In a routine test, the test may last 5 min only, and fans may not be put in operation.
The focus of vehicle maintenance operation: Model 25G passenger transportation trains and Model C70E, NX70 and X70 freight transportation trains are adopted for the Mombasa-Nairobi Railway.
c)Apply the pressure to 100% the full scale of the transducer; measure the output under the maximum and minimum loads of the transducer; check according to formula (12) whether the calculation results meet the requirements of 7.5.
It embodies the requirements of urban planning and design, and has unique design quality and concept. The scheme deals with
Gathering hub is internally provided with methanol unloading system and sewage loading system.
The structural engineer is responsible for tracing small-lot trial production and handling the problem during the production process.
Table 7.13.2-1 Allowable Time Interval of Concrete Pouring
Insulation voltage withstanding test is conducted according to TE972500000A510 Debugging Outline.
αc — Average loss of optical fiber connector (dB), αc≤0.7dB for single mode fiber.
Planned airfield facilities and clearance conditions are satisfactory for safety operation requirements.
7.5.5 Where there are any additional construction expenses incurred by the incorrect instructions of the Employer's Representative and (or) the Supervisor or by any other reasons other than those of the Contractor, the Employer shall take the responsibilities.
Tel.: Internal 021-74692, 49305Local 010-51874692, 51849305
According to the construction characteristics of the project, the construction of bearing platform shall be alternately carried out, and machine shall be adopted for the earthwork of bearing platform and manpower for the matting. Earthwork of the bearing platform shall be immediately carried to the right place, open ditch shall be adopted for drainage of the foundation pit of bearing platform.
Don't load the concrete too full. In order to prevent the moisture in the concrete from evaporating in hot weather, the compartment can be covered with the awning cloth, and the transportation time shall not exceed 30 minutes in summer.
Fourthly, the issues such as water supply shutdown and unavailability of passenger or freight facilities at the Mujiadini to Port Reitz Station have not been properly solved, and the operator must rectify or take effective safety measures.
The drive takes card at the mainline toll station of PK36~PK37 and pays the fee for the whole line at mainline toll station of PK8~PK9;
a) Mechanical and electrical characteristic requirements of interface;
Electronic level, also called digital level, is the basis of automatic level, is added with spectroscope and reader (CCD Line) in the light path of telescope and is the high-tech product integrated optical surveying with electromechanical surveying consisted of bar code leveling rod and image processing electronic system.
If the Employer requires usage of foreign standards and specifications, the Employer shall provide original version and Chinese translation thereof and indicate the name, copy number and release date of the standards and specifications in the Special Conditions of the Contract.
Power system is a kind of on-line working mode to achieve on-line insertion and removal and on-line maintenance and it is of good scalability.
4.2.1.2 Train Position Tracking System
To organize the formulation of specific measures, to implement quality accountability, to fully perform quality control responsibilities in relation to the project, to lead, review and carry out total quality control measures, according to quality plan.
(23) Capture rate of painting mist: ≥ 98%
In addition, demand of stable traction power supply is unable to be guaranteed for subway, light rail, monorail, modern trolleybus and other system format as Haiti's coastal areas have poor power resources.
0-100Nm torque wrench, 3/8"-8mm hexagon socket wrench, and 3/8"-200 extension bar
3) Workers shall accompany the entry or exit of the substation of equipment that entering or exiting the site.
Sulfur dioxide is discharged into the atmosphere through a 100 m tall torch.
Tcl- = ------------ = --------
Seal: China Railway Wuhan Electrification Engineering Group Co., Ltd.
Similar to the scenario select, the playback will begin after selecting the record, clicking "OK" and the start button in the main interface.
1) Before concrete pouring, mortar of the same mix proportion with the concrete of 5~10cm thick with stones reduced shall be poured so that the binding with lower concrete is dense.
A three-level education system composed of primary, secondary and tertiary schools, including 10-year compulsory national education (7 years for primary schools and 3 years for secondary schools) is in place.
Road construction, traffic control, sign setting ...
The hazardous chemicals in the warehouse must have a distribution account and the relevant department shall regularly check the quantity.
2.3 Construction Methods for Road, Square and Sidewalk
The drying time shall not be shortened by fan or other similar tools.
During drilling, push the drill bit slowly to the workpiece by applying the force evenly and properly; when the workpiece is about to be drilled through, do not apply too much force to prevent any injury caused by the rotation of workpiece or the breakage of the drill bit.
CRRC CHUANGCHUN RAILWAY VEHICLES CO.,LTD.has already produced many projects of the track train aluminum alloy car body.For aluminum alloy car body design and manufacture performance of CRRC CHUANGCHUN RAILWAY VEHICLES CO.,LTD.,see table 2 aluminum alloy car body design and manufacturing performance.
Compared with the feasibility study, the tunnel in preliminary design is 1.447 km shorter than that of the feasibility study due to the optimization of line plan, and the proportion of the V-level surrounding rock is reduced, resulting in a decrease of USD 30.174 million investment.
At the same time, set up anti-impact, rain-proof operation shed for the woodworking, reinforcement, concrete, hoisting machinery, air compressor on the construction site; The Project Department shall be equipped with equipment management personnel, who shall be responsible for the operation and maintenance of the equipment and the coordination of the equipment. Maintenance is prohibited during the mechanical operation
Estimated Workload for Design Technical Service Outsourcing - Drawing Documents
The origin and destination station of high-speed railway train shall not be too much due to maintenance, repair and night watching demands of EMU. But capacity of large terminal station of centralized departure and arriving must be considered.
For pavement works construction, centralized mixing is carried out at the mixing station, transported to the site by truck, spread and formed by paver, and compacted by combination of steel wheel roller and pneumatic tyred roller.
The pipelines above road shall not be installed with the components that may be exposed (such as valves, flanges, etc.);
6) Frequently check the high-pressure system and pipe system to ensure that the pressure and flow rate can meet the requirements of specifications and the pile diameter can meet the design requirements.
Since the trains operate with empty load at depot at low speed, 43kg/m rail shall be adopted; however the demand for 43kg/m rail in China is currently small, and this type of rail is no longer in production, leading to difficulties in purchasing. It is, therefore, recommended that 50kg/m rail be adopted for depot.
The proposal for use function to be changed provided by the entrusting party or other data to determine the service load;
e)Other mechanical properties shall meet the requirements of TB/T2075.
6 Separately display the prompt message, or simultaneously display the video and the prompt message, and when separately displaying prompt message, the corresponding audio and video can be called;
The production room area of the depot is shown in the Table 8.1.2-1 and 8.1.2-2.
Table B.17Emergency Treatment Information Sent by the Central System of Railway Administration to Onboard Earthquake Detection Device (DC005)
4.4.9 The original calculation sheets are not allowed to be taken out of the Information Center.
The training shall include lectures, presentations, investigations and other necessary contents to ensure the Owner's personnel can master all necessary knowledge and skills for the Project. All training costs shall be assumed by the Contractor.
At present, with the great development of Chinese railways, newer and higher requirements are put forward for the needs of the talents team.
When the train stops at the sectional tunnel due to failure or other causes, if the stopping time exceeds 2 minutes, the tunnel jet fan should be started up to ensure that the air-conditioning condenser of blocked train can be operated normally and meet the fresh air flow requirements of passengers on the train.
Technical Specifications for Waterproof Works of Buildings (DBJ15-19-2006)
The protective device shall act according to the time limit given on the protection setting sheet.
Organic matters and stones with diameter of more than 40mm shall not be found in backfilled soil within 500mm from the top of the pipe. Shaft chamber within the road range should be backfilled with limestones, gravels and other materials.
(1) The Contractor shall resurvey the original ground at the location of works before commencement of protective works to check whether the dimension, shape and foundation elevation of structures in the drawing comply with the actual situations.
The amount of total liabilities reaches RMB 5.319 billion, including current liabilities (RMB 5.299 billion) and non-current liabilities (RMB 20 million).
1) Before concrete pouring, formwork shall be thoroughly cleaned; some temporary weep holes shall be drilled in the formwork to check its interior and drain the cleaning water; these holes shall be patched up after cleaning.
No one is allowed to stand under the part with be mechanically knocked. The positions on the top and bottom to be knocked by operators shall be staggered in vertical direction. No one is allowed to stay in front of the pipe openings during heating of the pipe.
Double-jacketed Gaskets NB/T47026-2012
The tee valve or unloading valve shall be placed in the backwater position before the pump is stopped.
3) The stockyard shall be more than 150 m away from the residential area and shall be covered to prevent scattering.
Staff for the project are provided according to the mode of "two shifts with three teams".
Repair C1: for electric locomotive, 70,000 kmX(1±10%), not exceeding 3 months;
2.8 Construction Process and Method for Passenger Information System
In case that the Employer:
Communication between PTU software and KPC controller is normal.
21.D8 (hole reserved for vented exhaust of the bathroom) dimension: 130??150; refer to the plane for location; the hole center is 2850 away from finished surface of the building.
drilled drain pipes D50x3 L = 2.5m GOST 8732-78*
Check whether the finished system configuration meets the technical requirements of the equipment.
Customs declaration and clearance must be approved by Laos-China Railway Co., Ltd.
After the underpass setting out, the elevation of portals on both sides of underpass shall be in line with that of auxiliary roads on both sides. If the portals can not be connected due to large deviation in elevation, it is required to inform the Supervisor and the design representatives to review for construction.
3.3 The Representative of the Issuing Party may assign his duties and delegate his authority to his assistants and may also revoke such assignment or delegation from time to time.
The branch railway from Nowshera to Charsadda via Mardan has been out of service.
In the third quarter, combine the requirements on standardized construction of safety production to inspect the production safety for projects of general contracting projects and carry out a 50-day safety production inspection in September.
The transfer functions shall be taken under the test conditions specified in Chapter 8 for categories 2 and 3 equipment and in Chapter 9 for category 1 equipment.
Organize bidding or negotiation for material procurement, sign the procurement approved by the Employer and undertake the jobs and responsibilities for manufacturing supervision of procured materials (as per requirements), expedite material delivery, logistics and transportation, installation and commissioning, acceptance, after-sale service, trial operation and management of material transfer station etc.
2.4.2.1 Early warning of accidents shall be further standardized.
The power supply circuit that supplies power to the outdoor equipment must be provided with reliable lightning protection measures and separate power supply.
Number of diodes configuration: each arm is connected in series with 1 diode; each arm is connected in parallel with 2 diodes; the total number of diodes is 12 for each three-phase bridge; the total number of diodes is 24 for each rectifier.
4)For more or less axle number counted by the axle counter due to interference, the vacancy information should not be provided.
Design scope: preliminary design, construction drawing design, construction coordination and budget estimate.
The surface is of brownish yellow and purplish red silty clay with a thickness of 1m ~ 3m; the underlying bedrock is of Jurassic lower series purple thin-layer mudstone.
Blocking of pipes resulted from no protective measures during construction process
Traction energy consumption of the train refers to the energy from the AC power grid consumed by driving the vehicle, and the main influencing factors are shown in Table 2.
\pt33; Gully; with a slow and small water flow, the gully is 2m wide and 0.3m deep.
□ Class A supplier, the well known or benchmarking enterprises in domestic or overseas transmission and distribution industry,;
The bedrock fissure water exists in the bedrock fissure, recharged by rainfall and Quaternary pore phreatic water. The water content and water level are related to the lithology and fissure development.
5. Flammable, explosive, poisonous and harmful dangerous goods shall be properly kept, with preventive measures taken to prevent accidents such as fire, explosion or leakage during storage, transportation and use, so as to avoid environmental pollution and production accidents.
(7) During the construction of pile foundation, monitoring shall be strengthened to prevent the occurrence of pile breakage, slurry inclusion, diameter reduction and other defects.
The three-phase AC synchronous motor driven reducer equipped on the top of each lifting seat and the nut screw in the middle of lifting seat column drive the active and driven turning mechanism sheathed on lifting seat column to lift synchronously.
4.2.1 Be responsible for the supervision and inspection for the use of personal protective equipment.
(1) Before the waterproof roll is pasted on the top of the tower, the surface of the substrate shall be cleaned and leveled with cement mortar.
The capacity is proposed to be 2 X 8 kVA, and the host is redundantly configured.
(1) Organize the construction in strict accordance with the construction drawings, technical specifications and technical measures; supervise the implementation of quality plan, inspection and test plan; formulate corrective measures for nonconformities, and verify these measures.
Note: from C1 to C16, the lowest arithmetic mean is selected.
Metallic Materials – Bend Test (GB/T 232)
The primary aim of post-disaster recovery process control is to achieve the steepest gain from post-disaster system.
Static Function Test Report for Mombasa-Nairobi Railway Signaling System
When the crane torque is close to the rated torque, the liaison officer shall immediately report to the commander, who shall make safety instructions to ensure the safety of lifting.
Twisted pairs, optical cables, coaxial cables and other signal cables should be bound in bundles according to cable type, quantity, diameter and core number.
The reinforcing steel bar binding must be in strict accordance with the requirements of construction drawings, with accurate binding size, spacing and position, and the overlap joints and anchorage length of all reinforcing steel bar must meet the requirements of design and construction specifications.
5) use concrete carrier vehicle to transport concrete to the casting position, and then vibrate with injected vibrator when casting.
The product nameplate records the product name, model, manufacture date and manufacturer information.
1. Carry out assembly and wiring of main and auxiliary cable channel in accordance with assembly drawing.
c) Communicating with the input and output card (IOU) to receive the pre-contact conditions of proximity rail relay, ballastless-track relay and axis-counting reset relay;
The line number shall be indicated on the sign board. If there is no number, the cable model, specification and the starting and ending locations shall be indicated.
Design for Treatment of Exhaust, Dust and Toxic and Harmful Gases of Production Workshop
Except for special circumstances, samples for type tests of products shall be sampled from trial production products or the first batch of products in a production series or sampled on a regular basis as required by standards.
The implementation of China's "the Belt and Road Initiative" and "Going Global" strategies has even opened up a fast lane for Chinese enterprises to go global. Studying and adapting to the international community is a compulsory course for Chinese enterprises to go global.
The water sample analysis at current stage (2007-NTS-164) shows the water quality is of the type of HCO\ Na per 2+thweak corrosion and weak-medium dissolu erosion to concrete structuresgenerally has no corrosion to steel bars in reinforced concrete and has weak corrosion to steel structures. The PH value erosion class is judged as H1 based on durability judgment criteria.
The attendance of the meeting shall be 5 directors who all attended the meeting.
(b) Weight of technical capacity: 70%
Site Plan of South Syaphru Besi Bridge at K0+159.05
Note: if there is no threaded pipe fittings and one end has thread and one has no thread, it means threaded end.
The main tunnels have a clear width of 13.5m and a clear height of 5m for the structural approach limit.
Snap an installation location line on wall according to door size, elevation, position and opening direction, if there is an architrave on the door frame, it shall be flush with the plastered surface.
If the strength is not up to the requirements, a report shall be submitted in time, and remedial measures shall be taken.
D. Top 60 Chinese Design Firms
Official seal is affixed by the Bank on/(MM/DD/YY).
Unless otherwise stipulated in the contract, the expenses for construction, movement, maintenance, management and removal of construction lighting facilities by the Contractor as per contract requirements shall be included into the project unit price or total price of corresponding items in Bill of Quantities and the Employer will not make additional payment.
The slope start button is only valid in the driver cab terminal activated.
When verifying the vehicle strength, a jack is considered to be used to jack the heavy-load wagon body at the two sides of the body bolster at one end of the wagon body or other jacking points.
Legal Representative___________(signature)
If the hopper sieve frame is not closed and locked, the equipment is not allowed to start.
It is required to keep consistent color and gloss, and should be colorfast in 10 years.
The main workshop, paint room, thinner room, and waste material room shall each be provided with an emergency ventilation system, which shall be linked with the gas (paint and thinner volatile matters) concentration alarm device (including concentration alarm device integrated with the paint spraying line).
9.2.6 After the Contract enters into force, if the Designer requires the termination or rescission of the Contract, the Designer shall return twice of the down payment made by the Employer.
Grouting should be performed with grouting machine from bottom to top, and the grouting in each pipe should be completed in one operation without break halfway.
According to the calibrated gravity model parameter as well as the existing road network, future network and travel time of each subdistrict in the affected area, the induced passenger and freight traffic volumes in each future characteristic year is calculated.
1.5.2.4 Region-city-type TOD: Airport Station
2. Fire hydrants should be matched with portable dry powder fire extinguishers. Two MF/ABC3 dry powder fire extinguishers should be arranged in each extinguisher cabinet at hazard-grade positions in Class A and Class E fires.
Foundation uniformity test (preliminary static force test and standard penetration test)
Wang Taishan, Wang Tao, Zeng Qing, Zhao Shanyou, Zhang Xiaofeng, Li Mingqi, Liu Zhe
Overall Dimensions and Reinforcement Layout of CJ615-1, 2
DSO_OUTX_P with X=[1..8]: shielding point of output X
1 The permanent works and temporary works of facilities of the track laying base shall be combined. Attention shall be paid to the environmental protection and the full utilization of existing water sources, electric power and transportation passage.
The center line of the beam shall be constructed after the column formwork construction. The beam bottom shall be laid first for construction of the beam formwork, the reinforcements shall be bound, and the vertical beam sides shall be reinforced, corrected and fixed. For shallow beams, the beam formwork can be supported first, then the reinforcements can be bound. For the platform formwork, keels and secondary keels can be erected according to the bottom elevation of the slab, and then bamboo plywood can be laid. After passing the acceptance, the floor reinforcements can be bound.
In case of initiation with blasting fuse, there shall be equipment that enables the workers to leave the hole quickly; the blasting fuse shall be subject to firing time test to determine the length of the fuse; detonation shall be started with electric detonator when the hole is more than 10m in depth.
Inspection method: visual inspection, inspecting the product quality certificates and conducting performance test by the Contractor.
The types of tickets that are available on the online ticket selling website can be customized and corresponding configuration could be realized based on different demands.
GB11032-2010 Metal Oxide Surge Arresters Without Gaps for A.C. Systems
In the whole process of project implementation, China Chengda Engineering Co., Ltd. will be bound by the requirements specified in the "HSE Management Agreement" signed with the Owner and the HSE management rules of the Bidding Documents.
Parapet wall / (200mm thick) solid sintered shale brick wall (M7.5 cement mortar)
To ensure the successful implementation of the contract, other meetings may be held to clarify the interfaces between vehicle and other equipment (if these interfaces are not clarified at the meetings mentioned above). The time and place of such meeting are determined by both parties.
3) Scaffold jacking→Diagonal Bracing→Pole and Horizontal Pole of Scaffold (Layer by Layer)→Base of Scaffold
The capacity of main transformer and quantity of 10 kV outgoing lines shall be adjusted according to the construction power demands.
It is able to synchronously and symmetrically operate to the completely switched position.
Apart from the HV isolating and earthing switch, high speed circuit breaker and other equipment installed, the equipment such as the fuse and auxiliary power diode have been installed in the main circuit to effectively protect the entire medium-voltage, low-voltage and traction equipment.
Emergency traction: The maximum speed under DCU is undermined
6.2 Types and dimensions of bearing blocks and items from 4.3.1 to 4.3.2 in the technical requirements shall be inspected.
9 After the solder sealing on the casing orifice, the wellhead shall be leveled with cement mortar, and the well sealing is completed.
The electric disconnector cabinet is adopted and its installation land is considered together with the ground used for traction substation.
5.8.1.3 Annual outstanding trainers of different levels assessed in the last year can apply for corresponding training fund in this year.
Paving of indoor mixtures should be full, and the mixtures should be evenly transmitted.
As location test bench, according to geographical location of CSR Zhuzhou Electric Locomotive Works Co., Ltd. and category of power supply for traction and domestic consumers in China, application environment of test stand is determined as follows:
1. In compliance with the tender document, the scope of work of the Contractor shall include the following:
1.2.1 Major Applicable British Standards
7.3.1.1 Limits of Dimensions, Axle Load and Masses for Motor Vehicles, Trailers and Combination Vehicles (GB1589-2016) is followed.
The first limit is used as a criterion for determining whether the VUTs are qualified.
Under high voltage of the train, if TCMS detects that SIV communication is normal and chargers do not work, there will be an alarm with 10s delay, and the alarm content is both chargers do not work.
16.4.7 Before glued insulated rail joints are welded, the electrical insulation property shall be measured to make sure that it meet the relevant technical requirements.
2. Shares enjoyed in other comprehensive incomes that cannot be reclassified into profits or losses in the investee under the equity method
The main contents of the contract review include: the feasibility of the contract project, the economy of the contract project, the suitability of the technical content of the contract, and the legitimacy of the contract content.
18. At tunnel portal, adjacent works shall be conducted as a whole. When the bridge and tunnel are connected, excavation protection shall be conducted timely for the abutment and foundation pit, to avoid influence to the stability of the tunnel and mountain.
Mount the safety glass on the support as per the designed dip angle.
It is reported that this is also one of the three tourism projects declared by Hangzhou municipality in 2016, and it is also the only two projects in Zhejiang province which is selected as a complex.
Soft plastic cohesive soil, saturated silt, sandy soil, etc.
Table 7.4.18 Allowable Deviations, Inspection Quantity and Methods of Drainage Ditches
Internal Audit Procedure (TQT-CX-J8.8A-2019)
Container trailer → Rail-mounted gantry crane → Train departure
C'b – average economic loss of unit accident of the existing related road under "baseline scenario" (USD/accident;
3, Cable laying shall be applied for temporary power lines at construction site. The cable lines moved constantly shall be laid in places where the lines are not susceptible to be rolled by vehicles, pressed by people and colliding with pipes or work pieces. The lines shall not be laid in mud or water.
For side slope of embankment which is more than 15m high, it is widened to the extent determined by subgrade filling materials, height of side slope and gradient of ballast slope, and designed with an over 2.0m-wide bench in the middle.
Letter of Acceptance (Scanning Copy) for "Communication, Signaling, Power Supply and Traction Feeding" System Integration of New Chengdu-Chongqing Railway Passenger Dedicated Line and Works Related to Equipment Buildings, Reconstruction and Capacity Expansion of Chongqing-Guiyang Railway, Introduction of "Communication, Signaling, Power Supply and Traction Feeding" System Integration for Chongqing Hub under Agent Construction and Relevant Works (Bid Lot CYSD-1)
Average acceleration (on flat line, with half abrasion of wheel and under AW2 load):
This reduces the degree of wear and improves the safety of the locking system.
8. Expenses for safety monitoring and protection during the transportation and storage of explosives and safety check and evaluation.
The Sales Department shall be responsible for informing the Customer and Contracting Party on important environmental factors, occupational health and safety risks and control procedure and requirements determined in the products and services, to make the customers know better about the safety and environment protection conditions of the high-quality products produced by our company.
14.3.1 Quantities Table of Main Materials of Main Track
Trackwork shall be replaced for the existing track that is seriously worn.
In the Jining New Airport project, MR.LIU presided the overall planning and design of the terminal area, and designed the traveler collection and distribution system of the terminal,baggage system and GTC building, and coordinated the design of the air-side planning of the terminal area.
DN200 flexible waterproof steel sleeve (passing through the pool roof)
19 In the event of a heavy rainstorm, the use of resistive braking devices and air conditioning units is prohibited.
The insulators in equivalent mechanical-assembly structure have the same or larger bar diameter or structural dimension, and hazardous section has the same or smaller withstand bending torque, electrically equivalent insulators have the same or larger creepage distance.
3. The garage induction fan is currently out of operation. It is recommended to restore or replace the induction fan, and it can also be modified to use the smoke exhaust system pipe as its exhaust route.
8.4.2 Technical Requirements of Raw Materials
Construction shall not be performed if there is not any targeted safety measure or safety clarification.
If there is any construction material to be stacked near the bridge site, open ditches, sediment traps and retaining walls shall be made around the stock yard, so as to prevent such material from being washed off by the rainstorm runoff to the water, which would influence the water quality.
The braking self-check result will be indicated in the brake state interface of MTD screen.
Article 32 In case of any contradiction between the contents hereof and those in the Insurance Law of the People's Republic of China and other applicable laws, provisions of laws shall prevail.
The sprayed concrete adopts the wet spray process to reduce the rebound of the aggregate of the sprayed concrete and inhibit the cracking of the initial support spray layer.
The peak value of negative pressure is greater than the peak value of positive pressure at all monitoring points. The maximum negative pressure is -2661Pa (monitoring point 3), the maximum positive pressure is 1,178Pa (monitoring point 1), and the maximum pressure difference is 3,645Pa (monitoring point 2);
A strengthening scheme for a span of double-track steel truss beams with a span length of 64m of Shuozhou–Huanghua Railway was studied and implemented. The tensile members of main truss and the deck longitudinal beams were strengthened with the strengthening effect meeting the expected values of theoretical calculation.
③ Prior to the commencement of the Project, special safety measures shall be organized and formulated for key processes, multi-storey, aerial work and other risky works.
The insulation resistance of stator shall be measured. Short circuit and disconnection tests shall be carried out for coils.
Estimate Rating of Electric Power Construction Engineering (2007);
+5V: IO board working power supply<para/>-24V:
Code for Design of Outdoor Wastewater Engineering (GB 50014-2006, 2016 edition)
60X30X60 (estimated dimensions of parts)
8.5.2 The Tenderer shall adopt various control means to ensure that each phase of the Project is started and ended as scheduled.
Instruct the contractor to immediately take measures to protect the site of accident and report to the Employer at the same time;
Move the main control handle of the driver controller of this activation end from traction position to coasting position, service braking position and EB position in sequence and check whether the working condition displayed on TCMS screen corresponds with the position of the main control handle of the driver controller.
If the contract requires that the customer's consent is required for use in concession, the Marketing Department should apply to the customer, use the products only with the customer's consent, and record the nonconformity.
7) Sheets should have even thickness, and convex hulls on the surface should be evenly distributed.
Electric locomotives will consume necessary machine sand, grease, coolant and other vulnerable consumables in normal operation. In order to ensure the normal operation of locomotives, it is necessary to formulate and implement a reasonable locomotive maintenance plan.
We hope to build a closely united consortium with the participation of members of all parties. All parties shall assign representatives to join the jointly established project management company that will manage the Project.
Work current shall not be lower than 59mA and shall be 65mA at maximum.
The term of protection of software copyright is 25 years,endingon the 31st of December of the twenty- fifth year after the first publication of the software.
Requirements for Prohibited Substances on Automobiles (GB/T 30512-2014)
7. One cast-in-place concrete step shall be set every 50~100m along the slope surface, to facilitate maintenance. The step shall be 1.0m in net width and as thick as the framework, with the 0.1m concrete water-retaining edge respectively provided on both sides. The height of step stair shall be 15~20cm and the depth of stair shall not be less than 25cm.
The training of users mainly focuses on organizing the training of information management system, basic knowledge of computer software and hardware, and system operation of software companies designated by the Employer.
Drawing of JKL-2010-04-03 (Process Gas Heat Exchanger) requires ammonia leak test on shell pass. But the test procedure is not given in quality plan; there is no ammonia leak test procedure and standard ammonia filling amount in process.
Beyond China, it shall be implemented in accordance with the relevant provisions of the Circular of the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of Foreign Affairs on the Management Methods of Expenses for Temporary Overseas Business Trip .
CRRC orientates itself as an "integrated rail transportation solution provider for global customers" and a "value creator".
Ramp A Bridge Structural Diagram of Reinforcement for Pier Pile Foundation Collar Beam
About 8.0km of road should be relocated due to the requirements of interchange.
4. The Project Management Department shall evaluate the safety work of teams once a month, and have a spot check once every half a month. The construction team shall evaluate shift safety once every half a month, have a spot check once a week, and patrol several times a day to solve found problems in a timely manner.
Change the slope of "one cut" and form gentle, natural and smooth surface.
After the installation of the support structure of a cantilever sign, high-strength reflective film shall be attached to the welcome flow surface of column as the elevation mark according to the requirements in the drawings.
After alignment of a platform plate, use foundation bolts to temporarily fasten the platform plate (see Fig. 1);
The TM Dept. shall establish the project performance evaluation and monitor the progress and efficiency of the project according to the performance indicators.
4.6.2. When construction cannot be carried out due to the impact of the weather factors, adjust the timetable of the Project.
Install the AC arrester on the installation base with hexagon bolt M10 x 35 and locking washer VSK10 with tightening torque of 32N.m.
In this phase, the monitoring and assessment group monitors and investigates the 53 shop tenants that can be investigated. The investigation proportion is 62％.
Implement the annual production plan, monthly plan, weekly plan, daily plan report, approval, order, issue and execution processes for entities at all levels.
Long-term: further improvement of railway network according to regional social and economic development and transport demand.
The thickness of subgrade for station tracks is 1.2m, in which the surface layer of the subgrade bed is 0.3m and the bottom layer of the subgrade bed is 0.9m.
The replacement of system personnel must be approved by relevant departments, and the qualifications of the replacement personnel shall be reported for inspection.
The messenger wire shall be located above the contact wire to hang up the contact wire via the dropper.
X4/X5 socket is sensor analog input interface. X4 is 37-core pin-type type-D socket. X5 socket is 37-core hole-type type-D socket;
The company shall consider the output of analysis and evaluation results as well as management review, to determine whether there are needs and opportunities for continuous improvement that shall be noticed.
There are five natural ore types: massive, nodular, flaky, dendritic and granular, of which massive type accounts for 21%, nodular type 35% and others 44%.
Control panel for gas fire extinguishing LD-QKP06
The electro-slag pressure cold binding is adopted for jointing the longitudinal reinforcement; flash butt binding is adopted for joining the beam in place of reinforcement binding and lapping so as to save the consumption of reinforcement.
The following main indexes show the results achieved by reform programs and implementation of this project according to the latest reports of MOFED, CSA, and National Bank of Ethiopia.
The mounting flange on the camera foundation shall be placed horizontally, and the four M24 foundation bolt shall be kept vertically.
1.4 The indoor floor elevation of the building is assumed to be ±0.000, and the corresponding absolute elevation is 13.45m. See the general drawing for the building plane position.
● The necessary mark transplanting shall be carried out by the warehouse keeper at the same time of material distribution, to ensure that the same contents are identified on both the distributed and remaining materials for traceability.
Power B Connector <para/>DL25T-B
(7) In the process of construction, the site roads shall be kept unblocked, the drainage and the sewage treatment system shall be maintained in good condition, and the construction waste shall be cleared by specially-assigned staff at all times to keep the site clean and tidy.
Many domestic experts and scholars have carried out exploration and targeted research on the construction of large-diameter shields in combination with specific projects.
4.1.3.7All the fasteners shall have effective anti-loosening measures, and shall be submitted in writing for the Buyer's approval.
(The stretching or compression of adjustable vibration-isolating supports and hangers for air ducts or air-conditioning equipment shall be adjusted by design requirements.)
This regulation is hereby formulated to implement requirements of corresponding laws and regulations such as Production Safety Law of the People's Republic of China and Administrative Regulations on the Work Safety of Construction Projects, adhere to guiding ideology of "Work Safety and People First" and implement HSE responsibility system of all levels.
After the performance acceptance test report is signed and the trial production stage is completed, the Tenderee shall issue the preliminary acceptance certificate (PAC).
25MM-thick step pavement of sesame gray granite with litchi-like pattern
Customers will be informed of problems found during the inspection procedures.
4) The reinforcement shall be stored in a dry, ventilated and horizontal bracket at least 30 cm from the ground.
100% of combed cotton; 60tex±3tex of warp yarn density; 75tex±3tex of weft yarn density; 405±5g/m of weight; twill weaved; dyed with super-performance indigo; sand wash with softening agent
(3) Configuration of ventilation, air supply and other safety equipment.
3.The area elevation is5.300m, the area elevation is 5.150m, the area elevation is5.100m.
8.1 The Purchaser or its representative shall be entitled to inspect or test the Goods to confirm whether the Goods meet the requirements of the Contract, and will not bear any extra expenses.
This will also further improve its highway network and promote its position as a logistics center of the region.
Where plants grow at the side slope of embankment, foreign soil shall be at least 20cm thick and meet the requirement specified in the "Requirement on Planting Soil" part of "Design Drawing for Protection of Side Slope of Embankment with Seed".
28.1During the evaluation of Bids, the following definitions apply:
⑥ The castable shall be vibrated evenly, fully, without leaving the dead angles. the castable and anchoring brick shall be tightly integrated to form a whole.
Rolling bearing proven by application in electrical railway system is adopted as axle bearing.
[Be submitted to the Company for deliberation at the twenty-filths (2016) annual general meeting of shareholders]
Indoor and outdoor fire water of the building is supplied from fire hydrant water supply pump and fire pool (with a volume of 600m3) in the 4# power station, parameter of the indoor and outdoor fire hydrant water supply pump are Q=30L/s and H=60m (3 sets in total, 2 for operation and 1 for standby), which meet fire water demands of the building.
All indexes of the table conform with GB/T3138-2006 and GB/T3139-2006.
"Intellectual Property Related Rights" means all rights relating to intellectual property right existing in anywhere in the world including the right to register and apply relevant rights and the right to apply for such registration where those rights can be acquired or strengthened through registration.
Peshawar Station is a district station. In this study, the locomotives at Peshawar Locomotive Depot are set to undertake the transportation task at loop routing for trains of the loop railway in this project.
A27 Application Form for Inspection of Defects Handling of Equipment/Materials
Temporary stopping, skip-station passage of the train, operation adjustment of the train, station exiting, evacuation in service areas, and train coupling.
The concrete pouring on the ground should be performed as much as possible during the day. The concrete construction in the tunnel should be provided with sufficient illumination on the pouring working face.
Expected completion date: October 2016
Technical Performance Indicators of Concrete Additives
During the stone is paved, the wall surfaces and the ground of other rooms shall not be polluted. The operators shall wipe away the excess cement mortar in the wake of pavement.
Quality Management Group consist of main department heads of the Project Department; supervise and control the execution and implementation of quality measures by the involved department; circulate a notice of execution of quality measures by the involved department at regular internal quality working conferences; Meanwhile, coordinate with other units to check and supplement omissions.
This project is mainly about the inspection of structure of each component in the driver's cab, with highlighted introduction of oil feeding place, oil feeding inspection sequence
Design for side slopes of soil and completely weathered rock shall be determined as per height of side slope, humidity of soil, compaction degree, conditions of ground/surface water, origin and age of soil, stability of natural side slope, etc.
Once the axle reaches the section monitored by the axle detector and before it is cleared out of the section in question, the main unit shall indicate occupancy and its response time shall be not more than 1s;
(3) Review the suppliers of items to be procured and create a list of qualified suppliers;
② 6m-long steel tubes shall be erected; lap joint can only be used on top; other joints must use butt joint through butt joint fastening. The butt joint and setting shall comply with the following requirements:
The metering accuracy of electromagnetic flow meter shall be 0.4 grade and 75% of the maximum range shall be greater than 175% of the designed flow value for the maximum fire pump.
(4)Causes in terms of laws and regulations, policies, or administrative actions (not incurred by the Contractor);
d. In case of serious inclination or excessive settlement of the load plate and abnormal test data during the test, find out the causes, conduct the test at another location and note in the test record.
<19-W3>Sandstone mixed with shale and gypsum: gray, highly-weathered, fine grained structure, medium-thick stratified structure, fragmented rock core mainly in block shape and partially in short column, RQD=0%.
Manual rust removal and rust removal by power tools are only applicable to local repair of paint defects and parts that can not be sprayed, and the surface cleanness level shall reach St3 specified in GB8923-88.
(1) The carrying capacity of electric connecting clamp of contact wire shall be larger than or equal to the minimal rated carrying capacity of the connected cable.
5.2.9 Party A shall inform Party B in writing in advance of the consignment requiring special transportation conditions such as refrigeration, heating, over - length, over - width, over-height and over - weight, and Party B has the right to decide whether to accept the consignment.
Signal system transmits the signal system information to the control center and each substation through the data channel provided by the communication system.
If the acceptor is located in a different place, the number of interest-bearing days for the discount interest shall be increased by additional 3 days for fund drawing.
Design Specification for Occupational Safety and Health in Petrochemical Industry SH3047-1993
Mineral resources include bauxite, gold, silver, copper, iron, and limestone; among which, bauxite has a big reserve of 12 million ton.
1. As the construction of Nepal's domestic railway project is still in its infancy and lacks investment control norms and charging methods, it is currently prepared according to Chinese standards.
Plan of waiting hall of elevated station (Changchun West Railway Station)
Building number (basement floor), according to the architectural discipline.
b) Stipulate form (e.g. Languages, software version and diagram form) and carrier (e.g. in paper and electronic form);
(2) 1.5m-thick lining structure has the optimum opening diameter of 30cm ~ 40cm;
Figure 8.1-11 Nighttime Noise Contour of Branch Line (AK0+000~AK2+500) in the Long Term of Operation
Business view (marketing posts): summary of businesses conducted by operators.
2) The Contractor shall implement the blocking and protection and draining of the material yard and slag disposal pit, the protective measures for plants, and the maintenance and management of material yard and slag disposal pit during construction pursuant to water and soil conservation measures approved by the Supervisor.
Toothing is forbidden for the intersection angle of the outer wall, the two sides of which shall be built concurrently. A racking shall be built for the temporary intercostal part of the wall. The length of the racking should be not less than 2/3 of the wall height and the raking shore height not greater than 1.2m.
(4) Inspection for Boosting Wire, Power Line, OCS Insulation, OCS Marking, Sign and Warning Portal
In design, effective waterproof and drainage measures shall be taken into consideration, and in construction, advanced prediction shall be intensified.
Power supply system (according to IEC60850 Standards)
Inspect shielding materials for upstream process; make it up if there is looseness or falling off.
Passwords of documents and equipment that need encryption control in the network system
3. Installation form: wall mounting with the bottom being2.5m from the ground
Complex Building of Phonhong Service Area - Layout of Roof Battens (2)
Inspect with theodolite and feeler gauge or other measuring instruments
a. Except otherwise marked on the drawing, sewage pipelines shall be installed at the following gradient:
When the toilet fails, the toilet is locked, the fault light indicates a fault, and a fault signal is sent to the vehicle TCMS via the MVB. The passenger can only open the door inside the toilet.
Single deflection grille (aluminum alloy), 500X500
1) Coiled materials and cementing materials must conform to design and construction requirements and acceptance specifications.
6) Lubricate the thread and bases of hexagon bolts (21), (24) and hexagon nut (27) with Staburag NBU 30 PTM [H1].
The traction locomotive also provide brake force for the returning locomotive and the high speed EMU to perform air brake.
5 Materials, Products, Technology, Process and Equipment
Insulated wire, PP-Y 3x2, 5 mm2
The main bridge of Zhijiang Bridge is a cable-stayed steel-box-beam bridge with arched twin-tower space and twin-cable plane structure; the non-navigable span bridge on the east side of Zhijiang Bridge is a continuous-beam bridge with variable sections; the superstructure of mainline bridge of Xinpu Road Interchange is of pre-stressed concrete uniform section and continuous-beam bridge with variable sections, and the substructure is of column piers and bored pile foundation.
Shell shall reserve the rights of supervision and participation in the audit conducted by the third party invited by the Contractor.
12.3.9 The floor in rescue cross passages and parallel drifts, emergency exit passages, refuge and galleries, emergency rescue stations shall be flat, stable, and free of accumulated water.
The floating dust and pimples on the surface of the base course shall be cleaned. The surface isolation agent and oil stain shall be cleaned with alkaline water, and the remaining alkaline water shall be washed with clear water.
Method for pipe cleaning: I use the air compressor to blow out all sundries in the pipes.
6. Code for Design of Masonry Structures (GB50003-2011)
TUEV SUED Product Service GmbH (ISO 17025)
Discipline acceptance teams believed that the static overall system of Reconstruction of Harbin Station (North Yard) and each discipline and its interface met the design requirements and acceptance standards and met the use function and safety performance, with acceptable overall quality of the project, and were agreed to pass the static acceptance, meeting the preliminary acceptance conditions.
5.2.1.2 Information and materials that are passed to each other during the collaborative activities shall be documented, and received, transmitted, stored and recorded by the project leader.
Reserved hot water return pipe for Men's/Women's changing room for this floor (DN40)
Note: the number of people in the table is the total of personnel from Owner, design and supervision organizations.
Bogie wiring consists of cables, cable brackets, pipes/clamps, clips and fasteners.
Recharge at a time can offer continuous working hours more than 30 hours;
(8). Class A decorative materials should be used for ceilings, walls, floors and fixed furniture in the exit hall, corridor and large public space of underground civil building.
9.1Without the prior written consent of the parties, neither party could transfer its rights and obligations under the agreement, except as otherwise provided in this agreement.
The cohesiveness and water relentivity of mixture shall also be observed.
5. Be responsible for the organization and comment on meetings before and after shift, the arrangements for the production tasks and the supervision and inspection on the completion status.
The controller can also control the charging current to the energy storage system as per parameter requirements of super capacitor.
There are large differences in quantities of works of each discipline and many construction interfaces in this section featuring many worksites and long length, and the E&M works is restricted by the civil works to varying degrees. Therefore, the construction arrangement shall follow the guiding concept of "highlighting the key points and giving overall consideration" all the time.
Test the coding indoor equipment in the station and check the correctness of circuit operation, code type and code sequence.
●Under normal circumstances, the system automatically generates the driving route according to the vehicle destination and controls the vehicle operation.
Major bridge over Ishim river (CK3+760)
(1) Responsible for construction organization, guidance, coordination and monitoring throughout this bid.
Institute of Computing Technology, China Academy of Railway Sciences Corporation Limited
The contents are basically advanced, basically responding to the research in the advancement in the relevant technology field of the smart power gird and a certain breakdown has been conducted to the research contents.
g. Glass properties and fixation materials as required in section (8).
The continuous speed of locomotives, which is mainly limited by the temperature rise of the locomotive traction drive equipment, is generally limited by the temperature rise of the traction motors.
Installation for pipe supporting elements and pipe clamps shall ensure accurate, secure and reliable position.
He pointed out that our school is a railway institution with a profound background of rail transit industry and has a long history and distinctive characteristics of running a school.
Mainly grayish black, mainly fine angular gravel soil, the granular components are highly-moderate weathered slate; sharp angular in shape, medium dense and slightly wet.
After the mobilization for the Project, all instruments and equipment allocated shall be subject to periodic verification in accordance with relevant regulations of China's national standard measurement department. All instruments and equipment that do not have a verification certificate or exceed the verification validity period must not be used.
(3) Demolish the existing bridge to jack frames into a hole under protection of temporary beams, and construct the access after frames are placed in position.
Neither Party shall be limited in the proceedings before the arbitrators to the evidence or arguments previously put before the DB to obtain its decision, or to the reasons for dissatisfaction given in its Notice of Dissatisfaction.
Analyze and evaluate the stability of surrounding rock and support on the basis of displace –time curve and according to displacement and displacement speed, etc.
(Located at the area of main crane, the 70t crane, with a distance of 4204mm between its crane center and Axis 1, is at the place 3109mm away from Row B.)
Construction Management Department of China State Railway Group Co., Ltd. (seal)
Through planning, the items, responsible persons, realize duration, materials (safety helmet, safety rope, protective gloves, safety mesh and Safety guards, etc.) and expenses of the safety measures and plan shall be implemented. They shall be checked in time.
After concrete casting is finished, the concrete scattered on the formwork shall be cleared and the formwork shall be covered for protection according to relevant requirements.
After it is put into operation, the flow direction, temperature rise and sound shall be normal without leakage
Scoring Sheet for Inspection of Fire Safety at the Construction Site (Special Inspection)
The safety management objectives of Simandou Railway Project include but not limited to the following contents:
1-7See the appendixes for the supervision scope of the Project.
4. Objections proposed by the competitive negotiation/tender persons and replies at the site.
1. Type and specification of skeleton and frame materials: Stainless steel frame
The procedures of settlement of such pressure vessels shall be handled in collaboration with the production and operating units and the relevant evidential documents for relevant use shall be obtained prior to the commencement.
It means to wrap or tie the parts that are easy to be hit, damaged or smirched.
Establish and improve the safety management system and operate in an orderly manner.
The width and number of side ditches and transverse ditches shall be determined according to the design inlet flow rate of the transverse ditch to meet the drainage capacity of two pumps working at the same time, and certain plugging coefficients shall be fully considered.
GB9254-1998 Limit Value and Measurement Method of Radio Disturbance of Information Technology Equipment
It is a reinforced concrete slab culvert, with clear width of 1.0m, water inlet clearance of 1.0m; water outlet clearance of 1.85m, angle of 90°, length of 8.5m; both the left and right side portals are wing wall type.
For the critical stressed fatigue-controlled penetration fillet weld, ultrasonic peening treatment is adopted to improve the fatigue resistance ability of the structure.
Through discussion with subcontractors of each discipline or each type of work, determine the alternating construction sequence of each discipline and define corresponding construction time.
Component drawing of bogie: constitutional diagram of the constitution of frame, constitution of wheel set, axle, constitution of journal box, journal box positioning device, central suspension device, draw gear, foundation brake rigging, gear drive device and coupler.
c. The safe and civilized construction fees must be used for the safe and civilized construction. In case of accidents caused by insufficient safe and civilized construction fees and work safety measures, the Contractor shall be held liable.
3.3 The requirements for safety technologies, labor protection, fire prevention and environmental protection in installation of relevant units should be implemented in accordance with the relevant regulations.
Shi Jiankun and Zhou Jian are responsible for contact with hospital, labor department and so on, explaining detailed accident site and situation, and appointing a person to meet personnel of above departments at the crossing.
Photovoltaic Structure Department shall formulate Validation Form of Design and Development according to the test results. If problems to be rectified and corresponding suggestions are provided in the previous validation form, Photovoltaic Structure Department shall organize the rectification.
The requirements for carrier outdoor equipment are in consistent with that for optical communication equipment as demonstrated.
Central axis of foundation pit, power cable accessing position for the equipment, accessing position of compressed air for equipment, embedded hole, lead wire shaft is 400 deep, contour of cushion.
7.6 The connection between the transverse pipes and between the horizontal pipe and the stand pipe for indoor drainage shall be 45° tee or 45° cross and 90° lateral tee or 90° lateral cross.
Please refer to Table 2.6.3.2-1 for quality control standard of formwork:
Cars are the dominated type to support the automobile demands in future, and will be sharply increased. Therefore, the load factor of passenger cars in future will be reduced. The non-economic vehicles such as freight trucks as small and medium freight trucks will be gradually developed to large vehicles.
EPC service fee = contract price of the subcontracted works designated by Party A * 2%, which shall be calculated and taken in a unified way at the time of settlement.
9.5.4 When the height of section of secondary beam is greater than the height of section of main beam, see the Figures 9-7 and 9-8 for the practice of node.
3) Grounding continuity test: After the completion of the whole anti-static grounding system, the grounding continuity test shall be conducted, with the grounding resistance of not greater than 1Ω.
Materials used in the Project shall be transported in containers by sea, and shall be firstly transported to Abbas Port in Iran by sea and then to Azerbaijan by road from Iran.
After the end of test, the rated current and speed are checked after the motor returns to its normal state and their changes shall not exceed ±15% as compared with those before test.
13.6 Uninspected products are not permitted to leave the factory. Workshop director, quality inspector and warehouse keeper shall sign their names when products are put into warehouse. Warehouse keeper and sales department shall sign their names when products are taken out of warehouse.
3m insulating tape, 2228 3M professional waterproof electrical tape, 5cm wide
6.1 This Regulation is proposed and interpreted by the Process Department.
3 Predication and forecast of underground water, especially prediction and forecast of the development of water-rich fault, water-rich fold axis and fissure water in the water-rich stratum.
(Huizhou: Outgoing Line Project of Haifeng Power Plant)
Detection for entry area refers to automatic detection, tracking and classification of the moving target entering into the designated area. In the setting area of the video image, the objects that suddenly appear and invade are detected and alarmed in time.
Use the tower body opening of the ground section or herringbone wooden derricks for erection. The erection height shall not exceed 4 sections per time (16 meters). After the tower body lifting is finished, use the upside-down method to erect the last 4 sections. And then list the tower head.
Test personnel shall record data of test results in accordance with test program and test method, and request special inspection to inspectors.
MT0420MP01# conveyor center
Take sample cup out, remove the part with vaseline, take two samples above 10g into weighing box, and weigh the mass G11 and G12 respectively.
e. Various inspection information: after the communication, keep the inspection record and form into an inspection report.
(7) Communication interfaces shall be reserved for future track line expansion.
50t truck crane or 25t truck crane is used for hoisting of coamings for tank.
For spare parts, wearing parts/consumable materials, as well as tools, words like "Spare Parts", "Wearing Parts/Consumable Materials" "Tools" shall also be marked.
★TV output: can be connected to TVto carry out infrared remote real-time monitoring
In case of emergency, the number and frequency of monitoring points can be increased as required by the Engineer.
Review Report of Operation Platform Structure (25.5mX7.5m)
If the assistant company passes the annual examination, the license shall be stamped with the seal of passing the annual examination. If it fails to participate in the annual examination as required or fails to pass the annual examination, the project license will be invalid and the qualification of qualified credit will be canceled.
The operation principal shall fill in the Power-off Work Order and send it to the central control room, and the electric worker shall disconnect the switch of the HV cabinet of the main fan in the power room, and hang the warning board of "Operation in progress! Do not switch on!" attached with the Power-off Work Order. The electric workers, operation principals, workshop safety officers and representatives of the operation personnel shall be responsible for lockout.
Analysis of liability accident caused by improper maintenance and test methods; measures for preventing accidents, obstacles and equipment abnormities.
By the calculation，the calculated sectional concrete stress is 4.8MPa, the reinforcement tensile stress is 116MPa, reinforcement tension stress is 32.1MPa and the cracking width is 0.11mm, which all meets the standard requirements.
Longitudinal construction joint is set in the bottom of side ditch, usually adopts water-stop belt, water-stop strip or concrete interfacial agent as treatment measures;
The internal lighting system includes normal and emergency lamps.
All parts to be supplied shall be packed at the place of manufacture or assembly workshop; thepacking shall be suitable for shipment by sea and for all special requirements of the transportation to the site.
5. In 18 o'clock statistical subsystem, there are several "Station Name" in information inquired by the statistical table for daily comprehensive production index of the station.
The construction area of operation buildings in the parallel section of trunk line is 7300㎡ in total, and the auxiliary operation buildings is 3000㎡. The average construction area per kilometer of main line is 203㎡.
The central hot water heating system is adopted in the proposed production plant of Zhetygen Station. The heat is supplied by the proposed modular boiler room, and the electro-thermal furnace is also used for heating.
Continue to move vessel backward to make pipe head pass operating line and each position in turn and finally reach Position A;
Lavatory shall be provided at both ends of the seating car and the "B" end of the baggage car, and vacuum permanent dejection collecting device (toilet), throttle valve, hat hook, toilet mirror, stainless-steel washing cabinet, dustbin, toilet paper box, toilet paper sheet box, safety handrail, window rail, lamp, power socket, etc. shall be provided in the lavatory.
Passenger load (AW1)
2. It is strictly prohibited to use all kinds of splicing sleeves, strain pipes and steel anchors that do not conform to the current national standards General Technical Requirements for Electric Power Fittings (GB 2314) and Manufacture Quality Specification for Electric Power Fittings (DL/T 768).
(4) The structural calculation shall meet the requirements of strength, rigidity, stability and durability.
Inner diameter of large ring Φ3058(+0.05,+0.33)
(1) A water meter well is provided, and a check valve is installed behind the water meter well.
Moreover, receiving of offline data refers to batch downloading of the data of on-board systems to the server on the ground for state estimation, failure analysis and maintenance support of vehicle systems through WLAN in the depot area provided by the communication discipline once the train returns to the depot. The schematic diagram for data integration of on-board equipment and the equipment at the car depot is as follows:
1) For stations near the sewage pipeline network that can be constructed in a short time, their outdoor septic tanks shall be enlarged and regular clearance of sewage shall be arranged.
(1) After the box-type substation is arranged, the single unit commissioning shall be done first, then the whole unit shall be tested by a comprehensive method.
15 "Warranty Period" refers to a certain period after the completion of the Project or divisional works, during which the Contractor shall be responsible for the quality problems of the built works.
Inspection method: Check the construction records and carry out visual inspection with instrument and measurement.
2 Promote urbanization and build Addis Ababa into an international metropolis.
1.1.4 The "opinions" incorporated into the SIPRED are "opinions without prerequisites", and the opinion with prerequisites will be acceptable only when it is "opinions that do not have tax revenues".
6. The mileages of piers and abutment indicated in the drawing are the left track mileages of main line.
For Wuhan-Huanggang Intercity Railway, the dynamic performances of subgrade meet the requirements of relevant standards when the EMU is running at a speed of 200km/h or below.
4) At least one manual alarm button is provided at the fire entrance and exit of each fire compartment.
Figure 4-2.36 Prestress Loss Curve of SB4 Tendon (End)
(6) According to the requirements of the Company's quality management system, the monorail turnout specialty shall perform management on standard implementation documents and records in strict conformance with the management program.
For the intelligent periodic temperature testing instrument, 6min is taken as a sampling period during temperature measurement and the temperature parameter table is printed every 1 hour for future reference.
For train sets generally running on straight lines, the door opening side at the stations will often be the right side in the vehicle running direction.
3. After the concrete strength of the beam section reaches 95%, the elastic modulus reach 100% of the design value and the age is no less than 5 days, stretch the steel tendons of 2N24 and 2N25 to the design value, and dismantle side-span closing-up supports and external supports.
(4) The steel structure shall be made of Q235 (i.e. A3) steel, which shall be provided with certificate of conformity on standard strength, elongation, yield strength, content of sulfur, phosphorus and carbon, meet the technical specifications for structural steel in GB700-88 and can only be used after rust-proof treatment.
Horizontal and vertical sections of the Line in this study are studied according to relevant data obtained from Google Earth. Since basic data related to economy, society, traffic, hydrology, meteorology and geology are not sufficient, the study is restricted in depth and range; thus the bill of quantities in the estimate should be further discussed.
③ Frame box culvert is at least 2m in size. Large size is preferred.
If the interval is long or the temperature, environment and load change greatly, this section shall be resurveyed before the construction.
Outdoor rain and sewage drainage pipelines (non-pressure gravity-flow drainage pipeline) will be of HDPE double-wall bellows with flexible joints of seal ring type.
(2) Before the start of the post-grouting operation, the grouting test shall be performed to optimize and finalize the grouting parameters.
After completion of equipment manufacture, before factory acceptance.
Mc car length (the length between coupler connecting faces)
(8) A milestone plate is arranged at each integral kilometer, a hectometer post at each integral hundred meter, and a highway boundary stone at the boundary of highway land.
Bolt head shall be polished at first, and then applied with 1~2 layers of epoxy zinc rich primer or epoxy zinc phosphate primer with thickness of 50μm~60μm, and then applied with intermediate coat and finishing coat by supporting systems of adjacent positions.
1. This drawing is the structural diagram of the guide wall of the section at CH368+725 ~ CH368+726 of North Portal of KG.PANTAI[-]TUNNEL.
Traction control unit will provide the following (but not limited to) protections for the traction motor, and it will also provide fault indication and alarm:
In mountain area highways, retaining walls are used more widely.
2) The pitted surface at the secondary grouting point of the foundation shall be leveled, the depth of pits shall not be less than 10mm, and the density should be 3-5 points per square decimeter.
The Regulations also apply to all personnel using the Company's network system.
After finishing the account statement, the Daily Bank Account Statement and the Bank Slip will be printed and delivered to the accounting personnel; whereas the relevant accounting personnel will fill in the Balance Reconciliation Sheet, and deliver it to the financial manager for review and filing.
Two sections are provided for each transition section between road and bridge.
2) The dedicated telephone exchange of the control center shall be capable of forming not less than 10 independent dispatching systems and shall be scalable; the user port of the dedicated telephone exchange of the depot shall be initially configured with 128-port, which can be extended to 300-port.
STAFF BREAK AREA, MAN'S AND WOMAN'S LOCKER ROOM, LARGE CONFERENCE ROOM, LECTURE HALL , RESTROOM (LECTURE HALL)
13.2.4 Modification and alteration to the Agreement shall be made in writing after consultation with all parties and shall take effect on the date of signing or sealing by all parties.
5.3 Special Geological Subgrade Design Principles and the Design Proposals Comparison/ Demonstration
The horizontal mounting of pipe supports and hangers is shown below:
Interior design parameters are set only in summer.
JG/T 69 Liquid Sample Extraction Method for Hydraulic Oil Tank
Increasing budget revenue and controlling cost in construction process are complicated system engineering based on the principle of "opening source".
PetroChina Hohhot Petrochemical Company 2800kt/a Catalytic Cracking Unit
Project Name: Wenzhou Lingkun-Gexiang Section of Ningbo-Taizhou-Wenzhou Multi-lane Expressway
The Seller shall put forward a complete technical proposal for the passenger self-service machine in the Technical Proposal for Tender.
The evaluation values will be calculated as per the formula specified in the Bid Data Sheet of the Bidding Document; or
As seen from the conditions of the constructed buildings (structures) on the site, the geological conditions on the site are stable and suitable for continuing construction.
With this feature, the element composition of the sample to be tested can be known through non-destructive testing.
2.5 Pipe slope and slope direction shall meet design requirements in the drawings.
To design the products according to the requirements of technical specifications and the Tenderee's approval comments, and be responsible for the results.
Develop new markets, win new clients and establish cooperative partnership; adopt new construction methods and technologies to improve quality, enhance client satisfaction or reduce costs; conduct performance analysis for the quality management system, reduce waste and improve efficiency, etc.
Insulated wire BV-1X0.5mm2
2. The main functions of the college student entrepreneurship center include teaching, experiment, outbound programs, logistics and other complex functions. The sum of remaining ten school building indicators is used as the basis for calculation.
In case the damage is caused by design defects, on-site office shall consult improvement with relevant authority and maximize road safety.
4. The practices refer to national standard atlas 03S402.
To ensure the competitive advantage of railway, it is suggested to optimize freight setting plan and adopt differential pricing strategy based on different transport directions and varieties of goods, so as to effectively attract the sources of goods and ensure more traffic volume of the project.
Take charge of contract management, budget and final account management and cost management of the project.
The impact on the air environment during the construction period of the Project will be mainly the flying dust generated during the construction process.
2 points will be deducted for failure to report as required; 2 points will be deducted for failure to fill in accident report.
The ground-train information transmission methods commonly used for high-speed railway include digital track circuit, wireless mobile communication (GSM-R), track cable two-way transmission method, leaky cable method, inquiry/balise method and wireless spread spectrum communication method.
WGKL1 and outer steel column web connection node
5)Whether the connector becomes loose and whether connection and insertion are reliable.
For the double-row steel sheet pile cofferdam, the cofferdam width is 10m, the cofferdam body elevation is +3.00m and the cofferdam crest elevation is +6.00m. For the steel sheet pile, U-shaped 750X225X14.5 model is selected and Q390BZ material is used.
A (DN1600 steel pipe elevation at pipe top 22.603)
5.1.3 When the company's EPPPS structure or customer requirements change, the Engineering Technology Department shall update and reclassify the EPPPS in the item or product BOM list in time, and send updated information to the Material Procurement Department and Quality Management Department in time.
3. RMB 0.98 million less project investment than that of 3500m radius curve option, and RMB 1.68 million less than that of 4000m radius curve option.
b. For factory external pipes, cables and pipelines of water supply and drainage, on the basis of sketch design of each relevant discipline, the Project Design Manager and the General Plan Discipline Director shall organize relevant disciplines to conduct reasonable arrangement of routing and location of the factory pipeline and determine routing and location of the pipeline of each discipline.
Electric shock accidents include accidents caused by lightning, electrostatic, and electric shock.
f In case the drain elbow/trap and faucet of the rinsing sink are chromium-coated, such coatings shall not be damaged during installation.
The Dapilon Port is an inland port area on the Nunez River and is located about 5 km in the west of Dabankou in the Boke region of Guinea.
The major highway network of PNG is centrally located in coastal areas of Morobe Province and Madang Province in the north, which together with the road network of inland Eastern Highlands Province, Simbu Province, and Western Highlands Province, forms the trunk road network of the northern economic zone.
Lanzhou-Chongqing Railway Co., Ltd.
Founded in 1999, it is a well-known curtain wall system solution provider, a listed company, and a high-tech enterprise integrating product research and development/engineering design/precision manufacturing/installation construction/consulting services/export of finished products.
Clause 15: for the self-owned varieties completed regional tests, production tests and DUS tests, the applicant should submit the data, summary and conclusion report of each test point to National Crop Variety Approval Committee within 60 days.
Elevated three-floor stations are adopted. Existing railway and a platform are on the first floor; the second floor is the station hall floor; the third floor is the platform floor.
Τn2 - shear stress of inner pipe materials induced by torsional moment, in N/mm2;
The General Contractor must follow instructions from the Employer and the Supervision Engineer when implementing general contracting service management, construction cooperation and coordination;
Surface layer-4cmSMA-13; middle layer-6cmSup-20;
Investment projects may have a variety of risks, and different classifications can be made from different perspectives, but some classifications may coincide.
After humidity test, the battery compartment shall be able to work normally and there shall be no rusting occurred to metal parts inside the compartment.
Describe the design considerations for each program, each module, or subroutine.
3. Count the first pass yield of the new production line;
The dispatcher may create several sets of basic plans for departure yards and arrival yards and file it into the database.
Weight of passengers of rated capacity (of 138 persons, 70 kg/person)
The unit size of the model is mainly 50(mm).
To 110kV line disconnector 2G mechanism box
Secondly, anchor mouth formworks and end formworks are made of steel formworks and bolted to anchor backing plates for integral hoisting and positioning.
Cement concrete pavement markings (including those in cross section and bridge pavement)
Internal combustion air compressor ≤6m3/min
After the Chinese team arrives at Kenya, the first barrier to be solved is the communication, so the pre-job training shall be mainly the language training, as well as the technical training in the construction process.
The function of the printer shall be checked to ensure the printer can print all reports, alarm values,
When the check finds no abnormity, exit from the program and restart it. If the problem still exists, please contact with factory staff.
Level marked in the structural construction drawing must be inconsistent with that in the building construction drawing. During the construction, according to the building construction requirements, thickness (0.030m) shall be reserved in advance for the surface course.
Safety signs shall be provided for facilities such as the fire extinguisher, passenger compartment door, corridor, emergency interphone device, electrical cabinet and electrical heater in the car, as well as labels of car manufacturer, manufacturing date and number.
Required carrying capacity and transport adaptability in the study years
Requirements for turf paving: the surface of the turf is flat; the joints between the turfs are tightly connected and firm; the joints between the turfs are tightly packed with humus soil. If the turfs are paved on the slope around the site, the turfs shall be paved from bottom to top, and the joints between the turfs shall be filled with humus soil to ensure the smoothness and compactness after turf paving.
③Both sides of the connecting bolt shall be placed with plain washers, and the nut side shall be installed with spring washer or locking nut;
Broadcasting speakers are provided in platform, waiting room, ticket lobby, station exit, etc.; for stations equipped with automatic fire alarm system, speakers are provided in office area.
Before coordinating an important matter when the Supervisor leads the organization and coordination among the collaborators participating in the construction of the Works.
Based on technical annual report of PIARC in 2004, the parameter of baseline emission volume specified in this clause applies the research achievements of national research and development institution. The baseline emission volume, qv1in 2000, of smoke in noxious exhaust gas discharged by vehicles should be 2.0m2/ (vehkm).
Culvert foundation shall be placed in the bedrock weathered zone where the foundation base is stable.
Construction and installation activities shall be carried out in accordance with the engineering design requirements, construction contract terms and construction organization while ensuring the works quality, construction period, cost, safety and security, environmental protection and other objectives, and the works shall be handed over to the Employer by the Constructor after they meet the acceptance criteria upon completion.
The access control system is provided with a center-station two-level management mode (depot).
Figure 1 Figure 2
(4) Estimate (budget) method and basis (if applicable);
2) Construction technology of HDPE double-wall ribbed corrugated pipe
Then install oil pipe in the correct position.
The elastic properties of the bearing are maintained under the action of small earthquakes. The inelastic deformation of the lead core can dissipate the energy and make the structure ductile under the action of large earthquake.
Information saved in mobile storage medium must be deleted immediately after use.
• R=3,100m(V = 250km/h)
Under its Standby Mode, the Central System and DRS shall not interface Station Equipment and all external interfaces shall not be operational. Only database data synchronization and verification process shall be allowed between Central System and DRS.
Building Automatic Subsystem (BAS)
The passenger detection system in the controlled door area is not activated when the driver uses the basic function of door opening and closing (i.e. passengers are not allowed to control the door by themselves).
Besides requirements on the User Requirement Book, the waterproof board and waterstop should following the prevailing industrial standards and specifications in terms of design, manufacture, package, transport, installation, test, and experiment.
Adhesive tape shall be pasted to the joint of the side wall formwork to prevent slurry leakage.
Strictly implement various post-responsibility-system-oriented management systems of safety production and take charge of organizing implementation of safety design and safety measures.
Article 20 Establish the activist team in labor union and give play to the roles of such activists.
The joint shall be tightly and straightly filled with a uniform width and color. The plates at the inside and outside corners shall overlap in a correct direction and the floor tile without a full size shall be used at a proper location.
Start-up process control of the project shall be subject to YDIC's Regulations on Start-up Process Control (GW00-68-2018), Control Procedure for Risk and Opportunity Identification, Assessment and Actions(GP03-2018), and the Employer's requirements for start-up.
1) For tunnels in need of disaster prevention and rescue, emergency lighting and evacuation lighting shall be equipped inside the tunnel, in emergency exits or refuges.
Refer to Fig. 5 below for the schematic of imposition position of horizontal load of the bogie frame.
c. For piles meeting the requirements of the bearing layer after inspection, the bottom of the hole shall be cleaned in time, and relevant departments shall be notified again for final hole acceptance;
4.2.2 The audit team leader is responsible for preparing the "Internal Audit Schedule".
Bunker with valve hopper must be provided, and the materials shall be discharged and directly loaded and transported.
The monthly plan shall be submitted to the Employer and the Supervisor on the 25th of each month, and the weekly plan shall be submitted to the Employer and the Supervisor on each Monday.
Stack up with sleepers; use 8# iron wire to strap the sleepers for fastness and steadiness of the platform.
Common failures such as cracks and subsidence in ground engineering are not only technical operation problems, but also affected by construction management, operator quality and other factors.
After the bending of steel bars is completed in the processing plant, binding of reinforcement framework shall be carried out on the pedestal.
Assist with welding structure scheme, technology and working drawing design review and welding structure design review involved in first level product design reviews.
Notice on Adjusting the Members of the Welder Examination Committee
Engineering Technical Standards (2006) of the Republic of South Sudan
In principle, the initiator shall organize and distribute the meeting's documents.
Cement sewage ditch leveling (material is the same as sewage pipe)
Completely-weathered trachyte ④1 (QP): dark brown,primary rock structure (with construction completely damaged), of sandy soil texture due to weathering effect, easily smashed and fragmented, partially containing residual weathered fragments, of a diameter of 1-5cm, hard broken by hand, slightly allowable for dry drilling, with plant roots contained in top layer.
The leveling and setting out shall be carried out and the horizontal elevation line and the dimension lines of wall, column and beam skins shall be snapped.
The project was commenced in October 2003, and planned to be completed in September 2005.
The CR200J trains meet the China's EMU standards in interior decoration and structure design. The design concept refers to the China's EMUs with a speed of 350 km/h.
Documents/inspection reports that must be submitted include but are not limited to:
Allow to depart after receiving the signal of safety gates (sliding gate/ emergency egress door) being in locking state.
\Pt318.5; The surveyed area features low mountains and hills with the ground elevation of about 530 ~ 662m and the relative height difference about 130m. The terrain is undulating.
The Quality Manual of Marine Valves is the highest level of document of the Company's quality management system, and it is also the basis for the implementation of quality management and control in the Company.
The slope stability observation shall be conducted, and when an abnormal displacement of the slope observation point occurs, it is necessary to promptly warn, strengthen the protection, and change the slope protection plan.
The Supervision Department will submit the summary and report to the information window of the Employer and the municipal quality supervision station before the 30th of each month.
HEAP LEACH PAD ILS POND
To date, SIYUAN has undertaken the design of all underwater tunnels crossing the Qiantang River in Hangzhou.
1. Administrative department shall guarantee the reserve of emergency equipment to fire protection.
The Class-2 medical locations include: anesthetic rooms, operating rooms, and intensive care units (ICU).
Two receiving coils are vertical to the rail, and their central point coincides with horizontal central point of the rail; coil bottom is 155mm±5mm distant from rail surface.
The line crosses through Hengduan Mountains in north Laos. As 80% landform along the line is mountain land and highland, this area is also called "the roof of Indochina", where the terrain is high in the north and low in the south.
1.3.3.2.6 Video Surveillance Information System
The main track of the schemed line has a total length of about 48.616km,.
The operating procedures of main and common equipment and instruments shall be posted on the wall, and the "Instruments and Equipment Use and Maintenance Record Book" shall be provided. After use or maintenance, relevant information shall be recorded in the book carefully.
After the parameters are determined, an excavation blasting construction scheme should be prepared and submitted to the Supervising Engineer for approval. After the scheme is approved, the site blasting excavation is carried out.
The point degradation system can have the point ATP and point ATO functions.
(4) All exposed concrete components meet the quality standard of fair-faced concrete;
If the place of fire work changes, apply anew for the certificates of fire using.
Neutral grounding mode: high voltage side is not grounded, while the low voltage side is directly grounded
Where the Company loses the joint control over or the significant influence on the invested companies due to disposal of part of equity investment, the rest of equity after the disposal is accounted for as per standards for financial instrument recognition and measurement, and the difference between the fair value and the carrying amount at the date of losing joint control or significant influence is included in profit or loss for the current period.
Inspection, test report and quality evidence of products;
Unless otherwise specified or approved, filling materials placed on the building shall not contain particles with grain size exceeding 40mm.
The station platform width is calculated based on the predicted passenger flow (long term) given in the passenger flow data. The following tables list the predicted passenger flow in the long term.
The connector socket shown in Fig. D.3 and Fig. D.4 is recommended equipment terminal M12 D Code connector socket.
The annual fee of the patent shall be paid before August 12th of each year.
1. Fewer locomotives are needed, so the locomotive purchase cost is low.
Perfect the internal contract and timely draft, review and sign the internal contract.
The gap among ballast shoulder of track bed over bridge and outside of tunnel line, ballast retaining wall and side wall (or ditch on higher side) are filled with ballast.
(8) All control piles shall be marked with description of point location: The sketch of point locations shall be drawn on the site, showing the intersection distance between control piles and the surrounding objects on the ground, to the accuracy of 1m.
The pickups are installed on the side plate of the car, as shown below.
Electrical load of podium: 17466.00m2X100W/m2=1746.60kW
The following text will introduce the communication network operation industry in China. The mobile communication network is closely related to the future national network of the Republic of Congo.
Exertion of pre-stress should adopt the double control mode of tension and the extension. When the pre-stressed steel bundle is stretched to the design tension, the deviation between the actual extension value and the theoretical extension value should be controlled within ±6%. The actual extension value should not take the inelastic deformation effect of the steel bundle into consideration.
It is agreed to appoint Mr. Chantoula PHANALASY as the director of the second board of directors of Laos-China Railway Co., Ltd. to replace Mr. Lattanamany Quinion. The term of office shall start from the date of adoption of the resolution of the shareholder meeting and end at the expiration of the term of office of the current board of directors.
When constructing sections of main girders, small instruments and tools, garbage, waste rebar head, waste steel plates and others shall not be thrown around to avoid falling accidents.
The work sheet for pressure test is used for the pipes, equipment, vessels, tanks installed for the Project and the equipment and facilities for pressure test (such as hydraulic test and air tightness test).
2.3.3 Description of layout plan of sleeper precast factory
Fixed and same instruments and equipment (including the level and staff);
(4) Establish environmental monitoring points, carry out the work under the guidance of the owners and the local environmental protection monitoring stations, provide a sufficient number of environmental monitoring instruments, which shall be under the supervision of the designated personnel.
The impact of other adverse factors on the company's safety in production shall be minimized on this basis.
If the property of the customers and the external suppliers is found to be unqualified, inapplicable or lost or damaged, the customer shall be contacted in a timely manner for handling, identification shall be carried out if necessary, and necessary written records shall be made.
4.4.4 In duration of warranty period or its extended period, the Successful tenderer shall make response to incidents such as damage to spare parts and components that is caused by quality issues within 24 hours since being informed of such damage, and can repair or replace the failed components or equipment for the Tenderee as soon as possible without further charge being aroused.
Second: Advance China's HSR technology to the world's leading level by mastering the 300-350 km/h HSR technology through the practice of such new HSRs as the Beijing-Tianjin Intercity Railway.
23+2+1 set+79+8+8+1+1
3.1.2.4 Providing the compliance evidence and forming the evaluation records.
Table 3-23 Average Daily Traffic Volumes of Sections of West Passage (veh/d)
Your bidding documents submitted on November 08, 2010 for the construction of Lot CW8 of Civil Works in Chengxian-Wudu Section of Gansu Pingliang-Wudu Expressway (S15) are accepted by us, and you are determined to be the bid winner.
Purchase of Television Monitoring Equipments and Service Equipments for the Communication System of the Shenyang Metro Line 1 and Extended Project
After construction of lower subbase is completed and the lower subbase has been cured for seven days, construction of upper subbase can be carried out after quality inspection and approval of the Engineer.
Ware labor protection equipment stringently; clean away garbage and keep the site clear
In case the output of diesel engine is 300kw, the output power of unit shall be (300-10.7)*0.93=269kW, where the power consumption of fan is 10.7kW.
Two dining cars, 20 semi-cushioned seat coaches, four semi-cushioned sleeping cars, four cushioned berth sleeping cars
FAD shall be able to interface with SECM Sub-system through alternate communication interface such as USB and Ethernet to permit data to be exchanged with the SECM Sub-system.
2 The grain gradation of coarse aggregate shall meet the requirements in Table 8.4.3-1.
An axle temperature detector shall be provided for a traction motor so as to prevent the motor from operating in an overheating mode.
The top and bottom ends of metal pipes and metal objects laid vertically inside and outside the outer walls shall be connected with lightning protection device for connection.
(2) The continuous supply of concrete shall be well organized and the supply capacity shall be greater than 15m3 per hour, to ensure the continuous pouring of concrete;
TBEA 50MWP PV Power Generation Project in Jingxia, KumuL, Xinjiang
The quotation shall be rounded off to two decimal places.
The compressed air is extremely dangerous and must be handled with care.
2. Split air conditioning units shall be installed in the fire control center, weak current room and nursing room as the cold source of air conditioning system.
Mounting fasteners are not required on steel structure, but distances between supporting and lifting points shall remain unchanged.
4. Make safety risk assessment on specific working points and management schemes, to prepare response plan for coping with risks;
Materials fail to comply with the criteria of Montreal International Treaty;
He pointed out that in recent years, mainland railways, especially HSR, have achieved remarkable development achievements.
The bamboo and wood modeling finish of the ceiling surface layer shall be of a grid light-transmitting style and an overall arc effect. The material is heavy and is easy to deform when fixed on the steel frame for a long time. Once deformation occurs, the original light-transmitting design option will lead to extremely poor effect, and the cost of maintenance at later stages will be very high.
Prepared by: Chuan Yu Construction Group Co., Ltd. December 31, 2015 Unit: RMB yuan
The maximum output voltage of CSM Power of power supply panel is 236.8V, exceeding the relevant standard scope by 220±10V
Entering and development of related enterprises as well as development of tourism resources in the Subproject area can provide more job opportunities for the local residents.
Dual power changeover box shall be provided on site and its interface with FAS is the terminator in the local control box of the equipment. Control line for start-stop of equipment is from fire linkage cabinet of the FAS in the fire-fighting control room.
Verification for Corrective and Preventive Actions of Safety AccidentsJS/04-1GS- 435
This area is flat, and most of the landforms are mostly hills and low mountains. There is no forest, and there are only some surface vegetation including low grass and undershrub. The elevation of the VK Mine is 780 - 820m.
(3) At the hand-over of the project, the Contractor shall remove all temporary water supply systems, unless the two parties had other agreements before the hand-over.
In terms of environmental protection, high-speed rail has the lowest carbon dioxide emissions among all transportation modes, only 6% of aircrafts and 11% of automobiles.
In case of working in a metal container, personnel of the Security Guard Division shall be present for protection, and welding torch and cutting torch as well as gas pipe shall be checked carefully for air leak; if yes, they shall be replaced or repaired; in addition to preventing electrical shock, the welders shall keep good ventilation in the container, and wear dry uniform and insulating rubber shoes.
3) Establish a highly effective Project Management Shift, focus on the setting up, personnel selection and transfer, and responsibility assignment of Project Department, and rationally allocate production factors and work and living facilities.
Covering more than 20 municipal majors such as roads, bridges, tunnels, structures, pipe networks, buildings, tracks, landscapes, lighting, transportation, electromechanics, ventilation and fire protection.
Inconformity of the requirements of ISO14001:2004 and OHSAS18001:2007 standards.
4.1.2 Overall Construction Technical Scheme
The manufacturer should boast the production control system in line with the requirements of EN ISO 9001, which should be regarded as the minimum standard to meet this Specification.
Incoming and outgoing cables shall be adopted for the power supply inlet and feeder lines of each power distribution room.
Accordingly, in this paper, the ratio of the economic loss caused by seismic secondary fire to the total investment for urban construction is defined as the seismic disaster degree affected by secondary fire, and a formula is proposed by utilizing statistics on usual urban fires.
Motors installed outdoors shall have anti-condensation measures.
Insulated wire WDZN-RYYP-3*4mm2
Interface with T-08 work shaft
HSSE Management Department, Marketing Company, Wuhan Natural Gas Branch Technical Center, HE Department, Labor Union
All the outlets of power cable and control cable tray shall be subject to fireproofing treatment by painting 1mm thick G60-3 type fire retardant coating within the range of 1m.
In any running conditions, including air leakage of air spring, any part of car body or bogie shall not invade within 10 mm from exterior of the spring.
The surface water along the section is mainly ditch water, swamp water, AWASH River water and BESEKA Lake water. Except for AWASH River, there is basically no river with water all the year round along the line. Ethiopia abounds with rich groundwater resources and is named "Water Tower of East Africa".
5.5.4 Muck chamber and water chamber shall adopt form-working concrete, with connection between inlet and outlet being reinforced; when necessary, I-beam or steel rail shall be further provided; steel sheet shall be paved at the muck loading/unloading site of muck chamber.
The Project mainline will occupy about 2,251ha land, including 1,159.8ha dry land, 23ha forest land, 747.1ha barren mountain, 158.5ha old road land, and 162.9ha seasonal stream land; the demolished buildings will be about 735m2.
List of applicable documents (ADL) (including equipment manufacturing program list and quality planning list)
2.7 Please refer to Attachment 6 Applicant's Quotation Notice for details of the Quotation Notice.
Contents of Class Ⅱ maintenance: in addition to Class I maintenance, some inspection items will be added. Moreover, the extent of inspections will be expanded. The onboard failure detection system will be used for inspections and performance testing on all equipment on the Multiple Units.
The through line K+L of the Project consists of Route K and Route L, with a total length of 17.63767 km.
1) There shall be no violation in the project management process. Actively cooperate with the Employer (including the county bureau) on the inspection and point deduction of the site within the jurisdiction scope.
Floating ash on reinforcement reserved on the poured concrete surface shall be cleaned up in time.
The exposed part of the concrete surface is tightly covered with impermeable and airtight plastic film cloth to ensure that the concrete is adequately cured without losing water. Condensate water must be kept in the plastic film.
Considering the characteristics of dense work sites and large electricity consumption of this line, the domestic electricity is mainly supplied by local power sources, while the construction electricity is mainly supplied by local power sources and supplemented by self-generated electricity. The power supply mode of Project Management Department is shown in Figure 1.5.1-33.
The gap between the upper edge of bottom door and side sill shall be no more than 5 mm.
Qjrnax——volume in the loaded container direction at the railway logistics center. (It refers to the receiving volume or departure volume, whichever is greater.) (TEU/a);
5.4.4 Followed Operation and Management
(1) The Agreement and various annexes of the Contract (including: any clarification document and complementary material used during bid evaluation and contract negotiation; detailed outline and schedule for survey and design and detailed outline for thematic research submitted by the Design Consultant and approved by the Employer, etc.);
Surface water within the substation site is to be drained out of the substation from west to east in line with the gradient of the substation site.
During construction, the signboard hanging system shall be conducted at the site for operations of major disciplines involving reinforcement, concrete, formwork, bricklaying, plastering, etc.; the manager, operators and construction date shall be stated on such signboard, and corresponding graphic records shall be kept as important construction files.
a. Send original materials for test and determine mortar mixing proportion.
③ Passengers need to walk a long way to ride the escalator into the station, and the possibility of getting lost exists.
Isolation Transformers (240V/240V/5000VA)
Sound insulation: The average sound insulation of 100 thick ALC plate is 40.8dB and that of 150 thick is 45.8dB;
The former standards replaced by this Part are as below: GB/T 2423. 3-1981、GB/T 2423, 3—1993、 GB/T 2423, 9—1989、GB/T 2423. 9—2001.
Security administration rule of Heavy Oil Development Company, Introduction to the security situations of Karamay as well as at home and abroad, explanation of typical cases in combination with the Company's current security trend, law popularization and drug control knowledge
The temporary foundation shall be excavated manually to prevent over-excavation. The subgrade is leveled and tamped by manpower and machinery.
(7) The fault resetting button of the sitting toilet in the cabinet is flexible without sticking; DTC is in good appearance.
Bei Ben ND3310W284SJ
Live load combination coefficient for gravity load representative value effect: CEA_C=0.50
Conduct the civilized construction and the safety construction to protect the environment.
g. The Supervision Engineer shall take the initiative to deal with the relationship with the Owner. The Supervisor shall be responsible to the Owner in all supervision activities, and regularly report the construction situation to the Owner, which has no right to change the construction contract without authorization.
Base of frame bridge, culvert and road shall be placed to a certain depth of the weathered layer of underlying bedrock, where the foundation base is stable.
Abstract: Based on the shield tunnel in Bid 2 (tunnel between South Chengdu Railway Station and Gymnasium of Sichuan) on Chengdu Metro Line 1, this thesis discus a key technology of earth pressure balance shield construction aiming at the water-rich sandy gravel stratum of Chengdu Metro is adopted aiming.
For the pipe crossing the wall of the well, its partial anticorrosive coating of the pipe wall shall be removed and cleaned up;
Contractor: Zhejiang Provincial Transportation Engineering Construction Group Co., Ltd.
The quantity of inflammable materials which need to be carried in the construction site due to the need of construction shall not exceed the limitation of the project plan. Practical fire precaution measures shall be taken for those materials.
B. When the wind power exceeds Grade 6, the operation on scaffold shall be stopped.
SiO2, Al2O3 and MgO: Take sample of ≤ 5g, ignite it at 1050ºC ± 50ºC for at least 30min, allow it to cool in the drier to room temperature, and then weigh the sample to determine the loss on ignition.
The carbody end includes the cab, underframe end, bumper, cowcatcher, etc., as shown in Fig. 10.2.
The foundation base is located above the underground water so artificial precipitation is unnecessary for excavation of foundation pit but supporting measures should be well prepared.
The above thickness data are standard values and small changes are allowed as per different environment conditions.
At the opposite side, there is arranged with corner cabinet, internal combined trash bin and fire extinguisher.
Second brake oil pipe of chief pump (HG-3506030B)
All the above four commissioning contracts are entered into between and by China Energy Engineering Group Northwest Power Construction Engineering Corporation Ltd and Party A.
8.6Refer to Table 2 for specification parameters for CO2 gas shielded welding.
A blending stacker with a capacity of 1500t/h and a blending reclaimer with a capacity of 1200t/h are provided at the blending yard.
The department that does not obey the arrangement of the scheduling meeting must explain the reasons and the final arrangement of the scheduling meeting shall prevail. Otherwise, it shall be dealt with severely according to the internal management rules.
The Tenderer shall provide the test programs specified in the User Requirements.
Unless otherwise indicated, the dimensions in the drawing are measured in cm.
Where a registered software product contains any content as listed in Article 4 of these Measures or of which the registration was completed by furnishing fraudulent materials for registration and record-filing, the software registration administration department shall revoke the registration number and registration certificate of the said software.
(3) The stacking time of the aggregate on sub-layer cannot be too long.
The system shall be expandable, for the purpose of reserving capacity and expanding conditions for future services.
The special function of the speaker (marked as area A) will be simulated by sound system mounted in the driver's desk.
Optimize the chemical composition of high manganese steel and control the content of harmful elements such as phosphorus, etc.;
If there is no design calculation book or it fails to be approved by the superior level, deduct 9 points.
The special operators, such as operators for blasting, electrician and gas monitoring, in the subcontracting team must be certificate holders.
Inspect and measure the geometry size and run-out valve of each relevant part of rotor.
Prior to construction, the positioning control points for buildings shall be subjected to accurate review as per the drawings of engineering design. The axle control points of buildings shall be set out and protected by using the axial relationship of the positioning points and buildings.
During implementation of the project, the plan may develop in multiple editions and will be continually detailed and furthermore modified and adjusted in the process of the project.
8. Each steel pipe shall be crossed by two Φ3mm iron wires, with 50 cm exceeding on both sides.
Noise in cab (under any working condition): ≤76 dB(A)
The disposal categories of the audits generally include demanding on paying or handing in due revenues within the deadlines, ordering on return of illegal gains within the deadlines, ordering on return of invaded assets within the deadlines, demanding on transferring or adjusting relevant accounting subjects, and other due disposal measures.
Have not less than one SFP optical port, which must match 100Mbps and 1000Mbps optical modules.
The circumstance of exceeding the load of lifting equipment and slings;
1)The handler implements a solution, if necessary, by changing the release management procedure. At the same time, the event / service request enters into the pending state until the change is made.
By 2025, the scale of railway will be up to 131 x 103 kilometers.
Land requisition and relocation are more difficult in these areas, bringing great pressure for the subsequent construction period. Detailed drawings are absent, so the specific work amount cannot be determined, causing trouble for subsequent construction arrangement.
It considers the technical characteristics of concentrated-power EMU, ensures the cab meets the ergonomics requirements, facilitates the driver to clearly watch the signal and line ahead, and clearly check the instruments and equipment on the driver's console. The design sketch for cab is as shown in the figure.
3.4.2 Major parts: fault of such parts will affect service performance and life of overall automobiles and may lead the user to make complaints.
Operating voltage of blowersingle-phase AC 220V/50 Hz
The difficult construction caused by complex terrain and inconvenient traffic of the line in addition to the conflicts in interface reservation in civil works will have an adverse impact on the construction progress.
Within 5 working days according to the requirements of Party A
GDDR3，1GB，maximum resolution 2560X1600
9.1 All elevations shall be the elevation relative to the designed elevation ±0.00M of the finished floor surface.
(2) The best admixture, the best ratio and the improved strength shall be determined by testing.
The relation between the peak of unit hydrograph and the peak time is as follows:
The surface is mainly overlaid with clay (black cotton soil), then followed by silty clay, artificially filled soil and coarse sand while the underlying bedrock is mainly dominated by highly- and moderately-weathered tuff.
5. The coordinates of the four corners of building in this design project are the intersection point coordinate of exterior wall.
Between a power input port and a housing:≥50
Pile-loading and preloading construction technology process for full support of cast-in-place box girder: side grading and reinforcing processing→ support erection and formwork installation→ stepwise loading→ stepwise unloading of support→ → data collation and analysis→ end
(4) Preside over the investigation and handling of safe accidents during the construction of the project, count the losses caused by the accidents, and develop reward or punishment suggestions for relevant responsible personnel.
② During the excavation, the horizontal elevation of the planimetric positon and the slope in the excavation area must be usually surveyed and checked to know whether they meet design requirements or not.
Make sure the secondary floor covering is aligned at the laid floor covering. Cut out proper gaps on the floor covering at the joint of edge baffles.
Crushed stone (Q4 r dl+pl ): grey ~ grey white, loose ~ slightly dense, slightly wet, containing a few block stone, consisting of amphibolite, gabbro, etc., with general grain size of 20~200mm, filled with sand soil, unfavorable grading, with a layer thickness of 1.0~4.0m.
(13) The unqualified products shall be disposed of according to relevant regulations of the company.
Article 14 Original certificates concerning land acquisition, compensation for demolition and the like shall be separately filed by the Employer, included into land archive and submitted to the Takeover Unit for permanent preservation.
Maintenance operation on any driving machinery or equipment is prohibited.
The indoor domestic water is directly taken from the outdoor water supply main.
Requirements of the interested parties about the QHSE management system.
Construction drawing is the basis of engineering implementation and acceptance.
Drainage protection works play a role in preventing the water and soil loss.
­ Updating and maintain the risk management knowledge base of the Project Group;
The interior and external walls of the distribution room are cement mortar wall surface and whitewash over-coating. See 05J909 sheet no. NQ16 (sheet 205) interior wall 8A-3 for details.
Unless otherwise specified, the requirements in the excavation section also apply in this section.
The glue is turned over, stirred and shaken well so that the consistence is uniform, and the heat-insulating glue shall be uniformly coated on the outer surface of the air duct, the component or the equipment, being free of any gap, space, leaking and dead angle.
Other agreements on labor remuneration between Party A and Party B:
(2) In terms of safety management, attention shall be paid to the construction of the safety risk management system for infrastructure construction, the "four-step method" for the safety of infrastructure construction sites, the safe and civilized construction of construction sites and the standardized management of construction machines and tools.
The Bidder shall demonstrate that the proposal is equivalent to or sufficient to allow the equipment to meet the technical and performance requirements of the Technical Specifications.
See drawing CN0428DD0990TE1-13
Article 19The Minutes of the Office Meeting of the General Manager and the Minutes ofThematic Meeting of the General Manager shall be prepared according to the decisions made at the office meeting and the thematic meeting.
In view of some irregular parking behaviors of tourists, the parking lots which are prone to parking problems shall be re-planned.
4.3.1.3.3.8 Train Hibernation
The finished components with any of the following defects shall be discarded unless the Engineer approves that they are to be repaired.
TORX screwdriver T5, T8 and T10
Organize over 2 (included) joint inspections of all professions monthly, and there shall be documents such as records or minutes for the inspections.
Centralized signal monitoring extensions are provided at all stations.
3 Weathered soft rock shall be subject to mineral composition analysis.
Tests on raw materials and components must follow the witness sampling rule.
The short-segment 8-core optical cables of long-distance communication lines and those in weak field sections are directly buried. Machinery protection is provided according to relevant requirements at difficult sections with bridges and culverts crossed and in lack of enough burial. The machinery protection measures include plastic pipes, steel pipes, cement tanks and cement cover plates.
Inspect and confirm whether the monitoring system of cold storage has data collection, transmission and recording functions.
Apart from the Certificate, the CPA who audited the Financial Statements presented by the bidder may submit a Certificate of Valid Record to the General Administration of Federal Tax Audit (AGAFF).
Each scale of the speed scale represents 10km/h, displaying from 0. The odd-numbered scale displays a shorter scale mark which is 2 pixels long. The even-numbered scale displays a longer scale mark which is 5 pixels long and corresponding scale value.
The contract supervisory engineer will establish the records on monthly completed quantities and payments, make comparative analysis of actually completed quantities and planned quantities, work out the adjustment measures, and report such measures in the monthly supervision report to the Employer.
The assembly of the steel structure and cutting tools at the front of full face rock TBM, which performs full face excavation of the stratum through rotation or other motions.
(1) Kaporta quarry yard:It is mined by a Chinese company Kaporta Quarries SL. Ltd.; it produces various sizes of gravel, machine-made sand, flaky stone and block stone, and the production capacity is 1000m3/day.
♦ The Project Manager is changed from Zhang Quan'an (0007656) to Liu Guozhen (0139019).
However, the cost of foundation treatment for placing large construction machineries in Zone D will increase in the future.
(Preliminary Acceptance Committee passed this report on September 15th, 2012)
The Project will mainly produce printing-and-writing paper with the self-made bamboo pulp, with a production capacity of 100,000 tons/year.
a ) Drawings, diagrams and other information, shall be submitted on standard sizes.
Picture 13-29 Carbonation Depth Test on 1# Arch Support
10. Soil nail (including shotcrete and other ancillary works)
Nie Qiangyong, has been participating in the training of "New Technology for Drilling Fluid" from September 17, 2006 to September 27, 2006. Having completed all the courses specified by teaching programme with qualified score, he is hereby qualified for graduation.
Organize the supervising engineer to inspect conformity of supplier qualification
Operators shall immediately stop the construction operation, keep calm, obey the emergency rescue command, carry out emergency rescue, start the standby power supply when necessary, and restore the power supply.
The logistics team will prepare a safe and well-planned transportation plan for materials in advance. The materials will be organized and transported to the storage place designated by the COMPANY after passing the customs at a Benin port/airport.
1.12 Additional contract price refers to the contract price added by calculating contract price as agreed by both parties after being confirmed by Party A under the circumstance that contract price needs to be increased during performance of the Contract.
Other matters that shall be subject to the resolution of the shareholder under the law, administrative regulations and the Articles of Association.
6-7-2 Medium Sand (Q3a15): The bottom elevation is 354.36m and the thickness is about 4.5 m.
The operations shall be suspended in case it is heavily windy or rainy
